A 2
CHAPTER I.
As slow our ship her foamy track,
Against the wind was cleaving,
Her trembling pendant still look'd back
To that dear isle 'twas leaving;
So loth we part from all we love,
From all the links that bind us,
So turn our hearts where'er we rove,
To those we've left behind us!
Moore
Let
melancholy spirits talk as they please
concerning
the degeneracy and increasing miseries of
mankind, I will not believe them. They have
been speaking ill of themselves, and predicting
worse of their posterity, from time immemorial;
and yet, in the present year, 1823, when, if the
one hundreth part of their gloomy forebodings
had been realized, the earth must have become
a Pandemonium, and men something worse than
devils, (for devils they have been long ago,
in the opinion of these charitable denunciators,)
I am free to assert, that we have as many honest
men, pretty women, healthy children, cultivated
fields, convenient houses, elegant kinds of
furniture
,
and comfortable clothes, as any generation
of our ancestors ever possessed.
This notion of mine, be it right or wrong, has
not resulted from any course of abstract
syllogizing
upon the nature of things, a mode of
discovering
truth in which I never had much confidence.
It has arisen from that more certain source of
acquiring
opinions, vulgarly called ocular
demonstration
having
lately had a view of part of that
portion of the American hemisphere, which
extends
from the South Mountain in Pennsylvania,
over the Alleghany ridge, to the head of the Ohio
river; a country which, in the recollection of
many yet living, was long the scene of want,
hunger
,
desolation, terror, and savage warfare; where
the traveller had not a path to guide his course,
nor, in a journey of many days, could find a hut
in which to repose his frame; where the hardy
white man, who ventured to make a settlement,
had not a neighbour within many a league, and
where he seldom retired for the night, without
fearing that, before the morning, both his family
and himself might become the victims of the
tomahawk
and the scalping-knife.
As a remedy for the unhappy malady under
which the misanthropic believers in the
deteriorating
condition of mankind labour, I think, that
an attentive ramble, at the present day, over this
extensive region, making, at the same time, a
careful comparison between what it now is, and
what it was about fifty years ago, would be
effectual
.
Wild and giigantic mountains are, indeed,
still there; but beautiful and well cultivated
valleys
,
lying on the bosom of peace, and in the lap
of plenty, are spread beside them. At the
distance
of every two or three hours' ride, a
flourishing
town or village, inhabited by sober Christians
and industrious freemen, salutes the eye of the
traveller; while people of all ages, sexes, tastes,
and tempers, enliven the road as they pass along,
either on foot or on horseback, or in vehicles,
which are here to be met with of every
description
,
from the light sulky, which scarcely presses
upon its springs, to the heavy, cumbersome
waggon
,
dragged slowly along by six horses. In this
region, there is now neither want, nor fear of
want; neither enemy, nor fear of enemy; but
every man earns his bread in comfort, and eats it
in safety, in the midst of his family and friends,
without fear of molestation from either civilized
tyrants or savage marauders.
Far different was the situation of things in this
fair region of the earth, when Gilbert Frazier first
erected his log-house on the bank of the
Monongahela
.
Then, indeed, might a misanthropic
grumbler have had reason to complain of the
condition
of men, at least of those men whose fate it
was to be planted like Gilbert, in a savage
Wilderness
.
It was fate, indeed, and not choice, as
may well be supposed, that had, at first, planted
him there; but notwithstanding his residence was
exposed to numerous inconveniences, and constant
dangers, a stout heart, (for he had a good
conscience
and feared nothing,) combined with a
feeling
of generosity, the source of which will be
hereafter explained, to bind him to it, and
Providence
had hitherto preserved him in safety. Nay,
in process of time, habit had so reconciled him to
his situation, that he scarcely looked upon the
misfortune that had brought him there as an evil.
Years had mellowed its impression upon his mind;
and, sitting by his winter fireside, he would often
relate the story to his family with much the same
feeling that a sailor, snug on shore, recounts the
dangers he has undergone at sea.
He had entered the world nearly about the same
time with the century in which he lived, and
somewhere between Colerain and Londonderry,
in Ireland. Whether his father or mother was
forty-second cousin, or no cousin at all, to some
nobleman or squire, is of no consequence, merely
because he thought it of none, or rather because
he never thought any thing about it. A far more
important matter of recollection with him, was his
marriage, which took place in his twenty-first
year, with Nelly M`Clean, a pretty rosy-cheeked,
fair-skinned Irish girl, with dark eyes and black
hair, who was about a couple of years younger
than himself, and whose heart, although it was as
light and as tender as a linnet's, had stood nearly
a twelvemonth's siege before it surrendered to his
attacks. When it did surrender, however, it was
at absolute discretion, and Gilbert ever after found
it as faithful and fond as a hearty lover like
himself
could wish.
As Gilbert wished to make his dear Nelly
a lady
,
but was unable, from a cause very prevalent
among his countrymen, the want of funds, nothing
would now satisfy him but a trip to America, in
order to make his fortune. Not that he intended
to leave his own country for ever, for with all its
poverty, he still thought it was a dear and sweet
country, but he supposed that a residence of seven
years at the farthest, in a land so far off as
America
,
must make him rich enough to return home,
and live the remainder of his days like a
gentleman
.
What fine times will it then be for Nelly,
(thought he,) when, dressed in her silks and laces,
she visits her poor cousins, the Burrels and the
Blairs, and gives each of them every year, on
Hansel Monday
, some handsome present for a
New-year's gift. Faith, it will be happy times for
us then!
To America, therefore, it was settled that he
should go; but think not, that he separated from
his Nellyno; he would as soon have thought of
separating his head from his shoulders. They set
sail together from fair Londonderry, one bright
morning in April, 1723; and Gilbert felt, as many
an Irishman has since felt, on taking the last look
of his native country, that it required all his
courage
to prevent him from betraying his sorrow;
for notwithstanding the prosperity that he
supposed
awaited him abroad, he felt that he was about
to purchase it dear by forsaking the land of his
nativity. He looked at his wife, as she stood
beside
him gazing at the fast retiring promontory of
Inishowen, which was the last vestige of dear
Ireland
that she was to see. He perceived that her
eyes were swollen with the moisture of grief; and
although his own heart was filled from the same
cause, he thought it his duty to comfort her, as he
tried to comfort himself, by half whispering and
half singing in her ear,
We need not grieve now, our friends to leave now,
For Erin's fields we again shall see;
But first a lady in Pennsylvania,
My dear, remember thou art to be.
Whether this promise of her becoming a
Pennsylvanian
lady, had the consolatory effect upon his wife
that Gilbert intended, I cannot say; but it is
certain
,
that except about three weeks, during which
she laboured under the tortures of sea-sickness,
she endured a boisterous passage of nearly three
months with considerable liveliness and good
humour
.
At length, if we may believe Gilbert's own
account of the matter, one Sunday morning(as
good luck would have it)he had the happiness to
land on the wharf at Philadelphia, with his Nelly
in his arm, and twenty gold guineas in his pocket.
Gilbert was now in the Land of Promise, the
bright Eldorado of his imagination, where every
thing he did was to be so richly remunerated, that
his very scratching of the ground would cause it
to teem with wealth, and his spreading his hands
to heaven would bring down a shower of gold.
During the first week after his arrival, he was in
ecstasy. Although none of the expected riches
had yet made their appearance, he very
reasonably
ascribed this to his not having made any of the
exertions necessary to attract them; for he was not
such a fool as to suppose that they were to be
gained
without exertions of some kind. But these
exertions
he could make when he needed them; and,
like a true Irishman, he considered his twenty
guineas sufficient for all present purposes. He
therefore thought that it could not be wrong to
enjoy himself a little in a new country; and, as
Nelly, who was rejoiced to have her foot once
more on Terra Firma, was unusually cheerful and
engaging, he could do no less than spend a couple
of weeks in showing the dear girl the novelties of
the place.
At length his twenty guineas were reduced to
ten; and he began to think, for he had a mixture
of Scotch blood in him, that he should do
something
to prevent their farther reduction. He
expressed
his wishes to several of the natives,
expecting
that they would make him acquainted with
the plan of getting rich which suited their
country
.
They told him to work.
Work! ejaculated Gilbert to himself; for he
had the prudence to perceive that it would not do
to affront the natives, by expressing audibly any
feelings of disappointment respecting their
country
work!
an' was it for that, after a', that I
left the snug toonlan' o' Maughrygowan, an' cam'
owre the ocean, whan I thoucht I wad become a
gentleman on my very landin! Work! why what
waur could I hae done at hame, than to hae
laboured
for my daily bread? But I was hae quite at
that need either. Eh! sirsNelly, puir lass! is
as little likely to become a lady in
Pennsylvania
,
as the sang we used to sing, says, than she
was in her ain country!
However, Gilbert was not of a temper to be
cast down by trifles; and, as his eyes were now
pretty much opened to the real circumstances of
the country, and his funds were every day
diminishing
,
he thought at last of seriously betaking
himself to
work
, as he had been advised. He was
healthy, young, and active, and, as far as
respected
himself, had no other objection to a life of
labour
,
than the slowness with which it brought in
that affluence which had been the great object of
his emigration. His Nelly, however, was more
affected at the thought of his being obliged to earn
their sustenance by the sweat of his brow; and
her sorrow galled his feelings far more sensibly
than the necessity which occasioned them. She
became
home-sick
, as it is termed, and for several
months internally pined after the oat-cakes, the
hedge-rows, the genial zephyrs, the warbling
groves, the fairy haunts, and the rural sports of
her native land. But her mind, naturally
cheerful
and elastic, soon recovered its tone, and,
becoming
resigned to her situation, she not only
encouraged
her husband in his industry, but assisted
him by her own.
In a short time Gilbert's diligence and good
conduct became noted among his neighbours, and
several gentlemen of property were heard to
speak in his commendation. It may be here
observed
,
that the manners of the Philadelphians
towards strangers on first settling among them,
seem, at this day, to be much the same as our
friend Gilbert found them to be a hundred years
ago, that is, reserved, discouraging, and forbidding,
until some species of merit shall appear to justify
attention and kindness, which will then be
afforded
exactly in such proportion as the merit
deserves
,
but in no more. In other words, the
Philadelphians
appear to be the most punctual in
rendering
justice, but the most backward in
displaying
generosity, of any people in the world.
Gilbert Frazier's merit was also pretty much of
the kind that has always been in highest
estimation
with the inhabitants of Philadelphiafor
sobriety and perseverance
seem to be their
characteristics
,
and might, without much impropriety,
be adopted as the motto of the city. It is true,
that the warmth of his Irish blood prevented his
manners and conduct from being so rigidly
regular
,
tamed, and disciplined in all things, as those of
the older citizens; but, for his levities and
indiscretions
,
as they called them, his neighbours had
the good nature to make a suitable allowance, on
account of his being an Irishman, and also to give
him the greater credit for that unexpected degree
of steadiness and attention to his employment that
he exhibited.
But, although resolute and determined to do
what he could to earn a comfortable and honest
living, the income of his occupation, which was
only that of a common labourer, was by far too
inconsiderable to satisfy his wishes. He was also,
on account of having received, when he was about
five months in the city, from his Nelly, the
interesting
present of a fine son, to whom, although he
was no catholic, he gave the name of Patrick, in
honour of his native tutelary saint, the more
solicitous
to change his employment for one more
lucrative
.
He had been bred to no mechanical
trade, and he had neither inclination nor talents
for traffic. The management of a farm was,
therefore
,
what best suited him; and it was not long
Vol. I. B
after the interesting event just mentioned, that he
agreed with a gentleman, who passessed some land
on the Juniata river, a short distance above its
junction
with the Susquehannah, to remove there, and
cultivate a certain number of acres
on the shares
.
On this place Gilbert had resided about ten
years, and had thriven so much, that he felt
himself
able to make to its owner such proposals for
purchasing it, as he had every reason to believe
would be accepted; when, unfortunately, a
formidable
party of Indians made a furious
irruption
into the settlement, and after pillaging or
destroying whatever articles of value came in their
way, they carried off, as prisoners, upwards of
twenty families, among whom was that of the
unhappy
Gilbert. He was, at this time, the
father
of three children, two sons and a daughter,
who, with their mother and himself, were carried
rapidly, for more than two hundred miles, over a
pathless and interminable wilderness of thick,
lonely, and gloomy forest, corresponding in its
state of wild and dismal savageness with the
nature
of the ferocious and vengeful prowlers, on
whose barbarous caprice their very existence now
depended.
To expend a quantity of elaborate tropes and
sounding superlatives in describing the woful
contrast
produced by this disaster upon Gilbert's
affairs
,
would not, I am convinced, in the slightest
degree, strengthen that vivid conception of it with
which the reader must be already impressed.
The threats, the barbarities and exultation of the
savages; the terrors, the tears, the lamentations
and the actual sufferings of the captives, many of
whom, during their rapid and cruel march, died of
their wounds or their ill-treatment, might require
description if they were not already present to
every imagination. The party at length arrived
at an Indian town, on the banks of the Alleghany
river, called Catanyan, on the scite of which the
present Kittaning is built. Here a council of the
chiefs and other great men of the several tribes
in the neighbourhood met, in order to deliberate
on the fate of the prisoners. Among these,
Gilbert
was surprised to observe five or six white
men in military dress, but different in its
decorations
and construction from any he had ever before
seen. He was nevertheless strongly inclined to
conceive them Europeans, and the only thing that
caused him to doubt on the subject, was their
speaking neither English, Irish, nor Dutch, the
only European languages of which he had any
knowledge. His doubts were, however, soon
removed by some of his fellow-prisoners, whose
information was more extensive than his own,
from whom he learned that these military men
were French officers, who were now exploring
the country, and forming alliances with the Indian
tribes. He was also given to expect that their
presence might be advantageous to the prisoners,
as they would no doubt make exertions to save
as many as they could from that cruel fate, which
the Indians, if left to themselves, would not fail,
according to their custom, to inflict.
Accordingly it so happened; for out of about
seventy prisoners, there were only five selected to
be burned, and about twenty to run the gauntlet.
It was Gilbert's fate, however, to be one of the
latter; but he underwent it courageously, and
being
brave an' supple, as he himself phrased it,
he reached the goal with the infliction only of a
few bruise, which broke neither bone nor
blood-vessel
.
A few days afterwards the greater
number
of the prisoners were marched off, as Gilbert
was informed to Canada. With respect to himself
he, together with his family, were permitted to
remain at the Catanyan town, even after all the
other families were sent off, some of them
separated from each other, to different directions.
This was a favour for which he could not account,
but which gave him the greater joy, as it was
unexpected
.
Nelly, whose mind had been greatly shaken by
her misfortunes, soon began to recover her
serenity
after the departure of the other prisoners; and
permitted as she was to enjoy the society of her
children and her Gilbert, she thought it
ungrateful
to repine at that providence which had been
so much kinder to her than to so many others of
her companions in misfortune. Gilbert's mind,
also, on this occasion took a pious turn, so that
both husband and wife felt in their adversity, a
disposition
to religious exercises, to which, during the
period of their prosperity they had been
strangers
.
Such feelings are natural, and could be
easily
accounted for, but it is not the province of a
novelist to do so. His duty obliges him only to
state the fact, and leave it to the philosopher, or
rather, perhaps, the divine, to discover the cause.
Although Gilbert and his family had been
exempted
from many of the severities which they
saw inflicted upon their unfortunate
fellow-prisoners
,
their minds were still much agitated with
apprehension
;
for they knew not how soon so
capricious
a people as the Indians, would take it into
their heads to torment, and perhaps, destroy them.
But the same religious feelings which made them
thankful to heaven for the reprieve they had
obtained
,
inspired them also with hopes of continued
protection and final deliverance.
But Gilbert's mind was not so entirely
engrossed
with his own concerns, as to spare no feelings
of sympathy for the more disastrous fate of his
neighbours; and he was considerably puzzled to
account for some who had been more rigid, at
least in the externals of religion, and full as
attentive
to moral appearances as himself, coming
off so much worse than he did.
Ah! it is a wonnerfu' thing, said he to Nelly,
to think how they were permitted to burn that
holy man, Matthew Morrison, that they say never
missed makin' family worship three times a day
since he began hoose-keepin', an' yet to
owre-look
a caulrife member o' the kirk like me, an'
no s muckle as brak' a bane in my body!
Matthew Morrison was fit for heaven, an' the
Lord took him, was Nelly's reply; but he has
gien ye time to repent
An' oh! that he would gie grace wi't!
returned
Gilbert, baith to make me thankfu' for't,
an' to use it richt.
Ay, ay, Gilbert, she observedwe
should aye be constant in prayin' for his grace,
baith to pardon us an' to guide us, for ye ken
they're weel guided, that He guides.
In this manner did Gilbert and his wife
frequently
converse and encourage each other, on this
occasion; and although their minds were
naturally
much agitated with fears and doubts, they were
still supported by the kindly influence of piety and
hope.
It was not long, however, before Gilbert
discovered
the agent to whom, under providence, he
was indebted for the favour he had experienced
from the Indians. A French officer came one day
into his tent and, to his great surprise, addressed
him in English.
I have been the means, said he, of
preventing
you and your family from being sent to
Canada
,
and I wish from you a favour in return.
A favour! your honour! replied Gilbert, who
instantly felt the workings of gratitude in his heart,
B 2
A favouray! that you shallonly tell me how
I maun do it, an' I'll rin owre the worl' to oblige
you.
I do not wish to send you quite so far,
returned
the officer, but, if you would have no
objection
to part with your wife for a few weeks,
I have occasion for her services.
At this Gilbert bent his head, and looked
somewhat
glum, which the officer observing, corrected
his phraseology, by sayingBut noI will not
separate you from her. I'll obtain permission for
you also to go; and your childrenyou will all
be as secure there as here.
An' whar do you want us to gang?and what
want ye wi' Nelly? asked Gilbert in a tone half
angry, and half fearful.
The officer perceived the state of his feelings,
and with a smile observedI shall answer your
last question first, as I believe you consider it the
most important. It is a female, and to be plain
with you, my own wife, who wishes at present for
the society and attendance of a white woman.
She is far advanced in pregnancy, and is
unfortunately
surrounded altogether with Indians, for the
presence of whose females, on the occasion she so
soon expects, she has the utmost aversion. When
I perceived your wife among the prisoners, a
married
woman, the mother of children, and of
decent
,
respectable appearance and demeanour, I at
once conceived that she would make a suitable
companion for mine under present circumstances;
and, therefore, I successfully exerted myself to
prevent your being sent away with the other
prisoners
.
As to your first questionwhere I wish to
send you?My wife is at present under the
protection
of an Indian Queen, who resides on the
bank of the Monongahela, a large river about forty
miles distant.
During this statement, the countenances of both
Gilbert and his wife brightened into an
expression
of delight, which perfectly satisfied the
officer that they would cheerfully and thankfully
comply with his wishes.
We will attend ye, sirreplied Gilbert
instinctively reaching for his hat, of which the
Indians
had not deprived him, and which now
lay on a short log that was used inside of the tent
for a seatyesyour honoursaid he,
clapping
it on his head, and making a motion to march
forwardwe will attend you, or your sweet wife,
by nicht or by day, in a' weathers, an' whare'er
ye like to send us.
Nelly also assured him of the care and zeal with
which she would serve his wife, in order to make
some return for what he had done for them.
The next morning, therefore, the officer
accompanied them to the residence of Queen
Alliquippa, a short distance above Turtle Creek,
near the Monongahela river.
CHAPTER II.
Now to yon mourner go,
Mark the hot tears that from his eyelids flow,
And smothered sighs that all his breast dilate
Speak notfor comfort doth on silence wait
But thou poor widow'd bird that quivering seest,
At one fell swoop thy dwelling desolate,
Oh! what shall comfort thee, thou o'er thy nest,
In vain may'st chirp and call for thy lost mate
Bromiey
.
In
a reasonable time our party arrived at the
royal wigwam of Alliquippa. Reader! startle not
at the word royalfor why should not a wigwam
be royal as well as a palace, when it is the
residence
of a queen? If we believe those who
conceive
that royalty altogether consists in a fair,
uncorrupted
descent of legitimate blood from
enthroned
ancestors, or in the title given by a
blood thirsty sword, to the supreme authority of a
conquered country, then it has nothing more to do
with a mansion built of marble and covered with
gold, than with a hut constructed of oak bark, and
covered with rush mats, except this, that
whenever
it can, for it is a very selfish principle, it
secures
to itself residences of the former kind. But
setting
abstract reasoning aside, for I hate it in a novel,
we hear of royal gardens, royal forests, royal
theatres
,
royal baths, royal fish-ponds, royal stables,
and royal hog-stiesand surely, dear reader, you
will tolerate a far more decent and respectable
phrase than some of thesea royal wigwam.
Alliquippa's
royal residence, when Gilbert visited it on
this occasion, was not, indeed, so costly and
magnificent
a building, as the good people of
New-York
and Philadelphia have, no doubt, hitherto
fancied a royal residence to be; for their ideas on
this subject are full as elevated as those of the
Londoners
,
Dubliners, or Edinburghers themselves,
who are every day blest with the sight of royal fabrics
in abundance. But I would have the
New-Yorkers
and Philadelphians to know, what in their
republican
ignorance they, perhaps, do not, but
what the Londoners, Dubliners, and Edinburghers,
know well, that the presence of a royal personage
has the virtue, not indeed of the philosopher's stone,
to transmute every thing into goldbut of Adam's
seeds and animals, to produce every thing after its
own kind, and consequently to make all things
royal. Hence Alliquippa, whose blood is stated
by the ancient chronicles lately fished up from
the bottom of the Monongahela, to have been as
purely royal as a descent of upwards of forty
generations
could make it, was undoubtedly
capable
of making the wigwam that had the honour of
holding her royal person, a
royal wigwam
.
Having settled this important point, we shall
introduce
Gilbert and his family to her majesty,
who received them graciously, and presented each
of them with a string of beads made of red berries,
in token of her royal favour. She was seated on a
conveniently formed block of wood, about
eighteen
inches high, covered with a neat mat, in the
outer apartment of the wigwam,for this edifice,
although the generality of its species contain only
one apartment, happened to contain two, the
additional
one having been constructed at the request
of the French officer for the accommodation of his
wife, of whom we shall directly take notice. But we
must first finish our respects to her majesty. She
was a widow, and still young, and considerably
handsome. Her manner united dignity with
affability
,
and her personal attractions had lately
induced
several chiefs and great men to solicit her
in marriage. At the present time, her most
encouraged
lover was king Shingiss, a young warrior
whose residence was on the south bank of the
Ohio, about two miles below the confluence of
the Alleghany and the Monongahelaand it was
so confidently believed that he would succeed in
obtaining her, that almost all her other lovers had
relinquished in his favour. Being, however,
somewhat like the British queen Elizabeth in her
disposition, fond of being admired, but fonder of
being obeyed, she acted much in the same
manner
,
by encouraging lovers, but keeping free from
a husband. Her tribe, which was called the
Shannoahs
,
was in complete and satisfied subjection to
her authority, and that authority she was resolved
neither to depute nor divide with any one. As,
however, Shingiss was much devoted to her, she
contrived to keep alive his hopes so long, that he
never sought any other for a wife, and after a
courtship of nearly thirty years, he died a
bachelor
.
She was dressed, when Gilbert first saw her, in
rather a showy costume. A kind of diadem
made of the red feathers of the flamingo plaited
together, encircled her brows, and, in some parts,
seemed to be fancifully enwreathed with her hair,
which was very plentiful, and of a brilliant jet
colour
.
A large splendid crystal hung pendent
from each ear; and from her neck, which, as well
as a considerable part of her breast, was bare,
hung a glittering chain of variegated beads. Her
elbows and wrists were surrounded with scarlet
bands made of dyed skins, and ornamented with
beads. A kind of gown, or wrapper fabricated
from a large silk shawl, of which the French
officer's
lady had made her a present, covered her
body from the breast downwards, being suspended
to the shoulders by straps of beaver skin, so
formed
as to have the fur on both sides. This
garment
was also fastened round her waist by a
beautiful fur belt of various colours secured with
silver clasps. Light coloured moccasins of deer skin
covered her feet, and completed an arrangement
of dress, of which Alliquippa was as proud as ever
queen Elizabeth was of her court-day robes.
The ceremony of introducing the strangers to
her Shannoah majesty being over, she addressed
the French officer as follows.
My Brother,
I am glad you are come back so soon.
My sisteryour wifewas cast down in your
absence
.
But I could not blame herfor I
remember
when Shanalow, my husband, went first to
hunt, after our marriage, I was disconsolate, and
dreamed every night of evil till he returned. He
is now gone to his fathers, and shall never more
return. But he died of a breast-wound fighting
the Otawas, and our whole tribe has praised
him.
Brother! you did well to bring these people
your wife will be better pleased with a woman of
the east, than with my squaws. You will tell me
at another time, why the rising sun gives a fairer
skin than the setting.
Brother! I shall order provisions for your
people. But your wife wishes for your
conversation
.
I shall detain you no longer than to request,
that until the Great Spirit makes you a father, you
will be free to tell me your wants, and use my
wigwam and my people as your own.
The officer made a suitable reply, and the
conversation
,
descending from the stateliness of
ceremony
,
became promiscuous and familiar.
Nelly soon became much attached to the
officer's
lady, who was, indeed, as sweet and lovely
a woman as the sun ever beheld. They had, at
first, some difficulty in understanding each other's
discourse, for the lady, who was a French woman,
spoke but imperfect English; and with respect to
Nelly's English, she scarcely knew one word in
ten. But minds that are disposed to
accommodate
each other soon overcome difficulties of this
kind; and Nelly and her mistress, in less than
twenty four hours' acquaintance, contrived not
only
to be mutually intelligible, but mutually
agreeable
and interesting.
As to Gilbert, his habits of industry while he
resided on the Juniata, rendered his present
prospect
of idleness irksome, and perceiving at the
junction of Turtle Creek with the Monongahela,
a short distance from the wigwam, a suitable place
for building a log cabin, which he thought would
be a more convenient residence for the French
lady on the approaching occasion, he proposed to
her husband to erect one, which, with the aid of a
few axes and a few Indians, he said he could do,
so as to make it considerably more commodious
than the wigwam, in a single week. The officer
gladly acceded to the proposal, and procured from
Alliquippa, not only permission for Gilbert to
build the house, but also a grant to him of several
hundred acres of the land around it.
Gilbert knew too well how to appreciate this
unexpected piece of good fortune, not to turn it
to advantage. He immediately commenced
building
his house, and as the queen directed a number
of her Indians to assist him, it was completed in a
more comfortable style, and in a shorter time,
than the officer had conceived to be possible.
His lady was conveyed into it; but in a few days,
her husband's joy at finding her so conveniently
lodged, was turned into griefinto distraction
by her death in giving birth to a daughter!
On the first intelligence of this event, he sunk to
the earth overpowered with anguish; but,
recovering
his muscular energy he suddenly arose,
hastened
to the beloved corpse, and pressed it to his
bosom
in an agony of sorrow. Tears now gushed
from his eyes, and to all appearance he became
somewhat calmed. He asked to see his infant.
Nelly brought it forward. He kissed it with an
almost convulsive fervour, and burst again into
tears. He then withdrew to a bench on which,
with his throbbing temples pressed between his
hands, he sat in silent anguish for a short time.
He then started to his feet.
Mrs. Frazier, said he, dreadful, dreadful
has been my loss! and dreadful has it been to that
infant! I have lostbut oh! I need not now
recount
her virtues, her loveliness, her tenderness!
The world now has nothing for me!But what
will become of thisOh! God!God!
support
me! Oh! protect this tender plant! Nelly,
I conjure you to be its mother, for it has now none
else. And you, my friend! he here caught
Gilbert
by the hand, be you in place of that
unhappy
father, who is now unfit to look after ithere,
here! So saying, he ran to one of his wife's
trunks,here, take this, and he cast a purse of
gold upon a table, and whatever else these
trunks containsupport my childbury my wife
decently. Oh, God! her grave will be here in
the wilderness, but her soul is with thee in
heaven
!
Vol. I. C
He again ran hastily to the corpse, and
embracing it for several minutes,Farewell,
farewell! he at length exclaimed, and hurried
out of the house.
Gilbert, after a moment's deliberation, followed
him, for he saw him in a fit of frenzy, and dreaded
his committing some rash and fatal deed. But he
had disappeared, and Gilbert perceiving from the
thickness and intricacy of the woods, that pursuit
would be fruitless, soon returned to console and
assist his wife, whom grief had rendered almost
unable to attend to her domestic duties.
Alliquippa, who was much affected with these
distressing occurrences, attended herself, and
ordered
a number of her tribe to assist at the
funeral
of her deceased friend, which they readily did;
so that Gilbert had the satisfaction to see the
remains
of this unfortunate lady deposited in the
earth in as decent and respectable a manner as the
circumstances of the time and the place would
admit.
As to the infant whom Providence had thus
thrown upon his care, he was resolved both to do
for it a father's duty, and cherish for it a father's
feelings; and on conversing with his wife, he found
her not only ready to approve, but solicitous to
perform, every benevolent wish he had conceived
in its favour. The little orphan, therefore, whom
they named Maria, as its mother had been so
called
,
they resolved to esteem as their own offspring,
and provide for it accordingly.
It was now a matter of much deliberation with
Gilbert and his wife, whether they should
determine
to make a permanent residence on the spot
where Providence had placed them, or endeavour
to obtain permission from the Indians to return to
their former habitation on the Juniata.
I canna weel tell, Nelly, said he, what's
best to be done. Gin we stay here, we may ne'er
see the face o' a gospel Christian again, unless it
may be some blackguard trader, drappin' ance or
twice a year doon the river, to cheat the Indians
o' their furs. I ne'er liked them tradersit's their
cheatery that mak's the Indians sae
wicked
against
the white people
An' what's the warst o't, observed Nelly, if
we stay here, we'll no see a worshippin'
congregation
in a hale lifetime.
But we can worship as the bible directs in oor
ain family, he replied; for Joshua said, that he
an' his hoose should serve the Lord: an' ye
remember
what oor minister at the Juniata himsel'
has aften said, that if we seek the Lord sincerely
at oor ain fireside, he will be fan' there as readily
as in a temple, by whilk he meant a church or a
meetin-hoose; for, I tak' it, that he could na
think o' Solomon's temple, that was burnt lang syne
in the days o' the Jews. Besides, I fear muckle
whether the savages will gie us leave to gang back;
an' ye ken it's an unco road.
Ah! I weel ken that, said she; it's na road
ava. In Ireland, we had better anes through the
peat bogs.
Ah! dinna talk o' Ireland, he replied,
drawing
a deep sigh; it mak's my heart sair ilka time
it's named. But we maun e'en bend to
Providence
an'
it's late in the year: gin we had
liberty
,
I doot muckle, whether we could mak'
oor way hame withoot a road to guide us in frosty
weather, and four helpless weans wi' us. Think
o't, Nelly!
I do think o't, she replied; I doot muckle
we maun bide here for yen season at ony rate. We
canna think o' the road just noo, an' we hae a
decent
biggin owre oor heads to shelter us till the
simmer comes
An' I'm thinkin' beside, observed Gilbert,
that we hae a chance gin we bide, to hear frae,
or may be see, oor wee helpless Mary's father, gin
he be in the lan' o' the leevin', whilk may be o'
mair use to the puir bairn than ony thing we can
do for it.
Ye're quite richt, Gilbertpuir wee Mary!
Here Nelly lifted the object of her condolence in
her arms, and kissed it: Puir wee thing! she
continued, we'll bide here; ye're father's, may
be, to the fore yet, an' may come back in search
o' ye. Gilbert! I think it wad, indeed, be wrang
to gang aff. The gentleman's mind may come to
him again, an' he may want his dochter, an' wadna
ken whar to find her if we were gane.
It's a' true, replied Gilbert; an' ye ken
the place at the Juniata was nae oor ain either;
an' the pleneshin' has been a' ruined; an' so, on
the puir bairn's accoont, I think we had as gude
content oorsels. I'll e'en try to fence awee, an'
chap wood, an' put some things in order to mak'
us leevin'-like through the winter; an', wi' the
blessin' o' God, we'll try to be content an'
thankfu'.
It was now that Gilbert began, in the midst of
the desert, that course of industry which, in a short
time, created a smiling and comfortable farm round
him, and which, in a few years, attached him so
much to the place, that he abandoned all thoughts
of ever leaving it.
Alliquippa and her Indians continued friendly to
him, and occasionally assisted him in the heavier
exertions which his improvements required; but
their habits were too unsteady and uncalculating,
ever to imitate him by making any of their own.
Besides, they were now almost entirely occupied in
either planning or executing predatory and bloody
incursions upon the frontier settlements of the
British colonists, who, with wonderful hardihood,
were every year encroaching more and more upon
those mountainous regions that form the great
barrier
between the eastern and western portions of
the continent, and to the eastern portion of which
the Indians were resolved, if possible, to confine
them.
History informs us, that the French, who, at this
time, claimed the whole of Western America, from
Quebec to New Orleans, were now very
industrious
in urging the Indians to restrain the rapid
progress that the British settlements were making
in that direction. The savage warriors had,
besides
these, other inducements of a powerful
nature
to urge them in lifting the hatchet against the
adventurous frontier settlers. These settlers,
instead
of attempting to soothe and conciliate a
people
whose heritage they were thus gradually, but
rapidly, engrossing to themselves, treated them,
often unnecessarily, as enemies, and always repaid
blood with blood, and outrage with outrage.
In the savage state the feeling of revenge is,
perhaps, the strongest and most inveterate that
actuates the minds, especially of a warlike people;
and, heaven knows, the unfortunate Indians were
never allowed to remain long without suffering
abundance of injuries to excite this feeling;a
feeling which not only their natural propensities,
but their religious opinions taught them to believe
that it was meritorious to gratify. It is
reasonable
also to suppose, that a taste for pillage must
have had its influence upon numbers of those
improvident
and homeless warriors, who were
engaged
in the sanguinary depredations so
frequently
committed on the white inhabitants of the
frontier
settlements in Pennsylvania and Virginia
during
C 2
the middle times of the last century; and, at
the present day, when we reflect that these
inhabitants
must have expected such depredations, it
cannot but astonish us how they could possess
hardihood and boldness enough to expose both
themselves and their families, by their perpetual
advances to the dangerous vicinity of their
barbarous
foes, to such imminent hazard of destruction.
But, in times of danger, there is an excitement
often produced in the minds of men, which
enables
them to encounter, nay sometimes to court
hazards and hardships, from the bare idea of which
they would be apt in ordinary times to shrink with
horror and dismay; and there have been
instances
but
a truce with philosophizing!I must go
on with my story, and shall, for that purpose, open
another chapter.
CHAPTER III.
The sculptor's art can mould the form,
Can give its shape a mein and grace,
Yet cannot give that godlike charm,
The music breathing from the face.
The form Prometheus' hand had wrought,
Remained a lump of lifeless clay,
Until the gleaming heaven he sought,
And fir'd the clod with heavenly ray.
Anonymous
.
Although
separated from the world of
Christians
,
as he conceived himself, Gilbert Frazier felt
that amidst his seclusion, he possessed many
comforts
,
and he was thankful for them. His farm
advanced
yearly in improvement, and its produce in
value; for being long the only cultivator of the soil
for many days' journey around him, and living
convenient
to a navigable river, which was, even then,
a considerable thoroughfare to those adventurous
spirits who traded with the Indians, he could
always
without difficulty, make a ready and profitable
sale of his surplus produce. With respect to
security
,
in either life or property, he felt perfectly
at ease. He knew that Alliquippa and her lover
Shingiss, were both his friends and declared
protectors
;
besides which, his own inoffensive conduct,
not to speak of his useful industry and occupation,
from which all classes of the neighbouring Indians
had, at one time or other, derived some benefit,
had interested them in his prosperity, and excited
for him such a feeling of attachment that they
would have been ready to avenge his cause, had
any one, even of themselves, attempted to injure
him.
With respect to his children, they increased in
years and in strength, but not in number, for
Nelly
had given him none since her settling in The
Wilderness. His eldest son, Patrick, the
Philadelphian
,
we have before mentioned, was soon
able to assist him in farming, which he did pretty
attentively until he became seventeen or eighteen
years old, when, being of a temper far more
restless
,
daring, and shrewd than his father, he
manifested
a disposition for traffic rather than labour;
and, contrary to his father's wishes, spent a great
portion of his time in rambling over the country,
and dealing with both Indians and white people,
as chance afforded an opportunity. By this time,
however, his younger brother, who was called
Archy, was able to fill his place on the farm, so
that the old man's industry suffered but little
inconvenience
from the defection of his first-born.
His daughter, whose name was Nancy, was the
youngest of his three children, and but one year
older than the little orphan Maria, whom
Providence
,
as we have seen, had thrown upon his care
and affections under circumstances so well
calculated
to excite them. Nancy grew up to be a
pretty young woman, the picture of health and
good humour, with well-rounded regular features,
glancing eyes, smiling aspect, and rosy
complexion
.
She was an open-hearted, honest creature,
with little penetration, and less suspicion; one,
who, had she lived in what is called the civilized
world, would have been better calculated to
enjoy
it, than to thrive in it; but for that description
of world where her lot was cast, she was well
adapted. There she might roam the woods in
safety without fear of a betrayer, and indulge her
thoughtless gayety without giving offence. Her
affections were warm, but her sensibility not
extremely
acute, for although she may have been
said to have loved almost every one with whom
she had become acquainted, yet their misfortunes,
though they might cloud, could not obliterate her
bias to mirth and hilarity. In short, she was like
many of her sex, more fitted for love than for
hatred
,
and for joy than for sorrow.
Such was the young female who had been from
her infancy, the companion of Maria Frazier, for
so we must at present call the little orphan who
had been taught to call our friend Gilbert, father,
since by that name every body knew her so far as
she was known. During her childhood, Maria was
of a very playful disposition, partaking much of
the vivacity of her sisterfor the two girls long
conceived themselves to be really sistersbut she
was too timid to join in many of her freaks; and,
although she was the younger, her superior
prudence
and discernment had imperceptibly
acquired
for her a degree of control over the other, to
which Nancy had become so habituated, and
which, indeed, was always exerted with so much
good-nature and kindness, that it never caused her
any soreness of feeling, while it had often the
effect of preserving her from indiscretions.
Although in their persons these two young
women
were both highly attractive, their attractions
differed much both in kind and degree. Nancy
was, if any thing, rather robust and stout in her
appearance to suit the general idea of
symmetrical
beauty; yet, to many tastes, that firmness and
solidity of frame which was the consequence of
this slight variation to the side of plumpness and
vigour, was rather pleasing than otherwise. Her
countenance, like her person, was also, perhaps,
too much rounded and full to entitle her to the
character of a finished beauty; but from its
regularity
in its individual features, and its healthy
complexion, together with the perpetual
expression
of content and gayety that it exhibited, it
never
failed to please the beholder. Her manners
sometimes possessed a little too much forwardness
and familiarity to be strictly correct and
agreeable
;
but these, most people would think, were
fully atoned for by her innocence, archness, and
vivacity.
As to Maria's manners, if modesty without
coldness, delicacy without affectation, affability
without obtrusiveness, liveliness without
pertness
if
easy dignity and attentive complaisance
can be pleasing, hers were eminently so. Her
person was elegantly proportioned, inclining, as
some perhaps would think, rather much to the
slender form of nymphlike beauty, but, at the
same time, displaying solidity and fulness enough
to indicate a healthy and sound constitution. Her
motions and gestures were natural, flowing, and
harmonious. As to the charms of her
countenance
,
they were so full of that magical attraction
which I have heard called the inexpressible
somewhat, and the impression of which no
iciness
of heart can resist, that it is impossible for
words to depict them justly. A mere delineation
of her exquisitely-formed features, and beautiful
complexion, when she reached the interesting age
of seventeenan account of the bright
expression
of her black eyes, shaded with their thick
silken eye-lashes, and surmounted with her white
and polished foreheadof the damask bloom of her
cheeks, of the coral of her lips, and the shading of
her dark ringlets profusely flowing round her fair
temples and snowy neckwould afford but a faint
idea of the striking loveliness, which, no doubt,
partly emanated from these, but which had their
principal source in that soul-speaking intelligence,
that living lustre of mind, that glow of sensibility
and benevolence, which characterized her looks to
an unrivalled degree, and made her the delight, as
well as the admiration, of every beholder.
Such were the distinguishing traits in the
manners
and appearance of these two flowers of The
Wilderness, that had grown up and flourished
into full and beauteous bloom under the diligent
care of Gilbert Frazier, and his attentive and
managing
wife. But they differed more in the
extent
of their information, and in their natural
aptitude
and relish for acquiring knowledge, than in
either their persons or their manners. To Nancy
the labour of study was always rather an irksome
task, while Maria ever courted it as her chief
delight
.
It will be naturally supposed that her means
of gratifying this inclination for learning must
have been necessarily very limited; but Providence
furnished her with them to a greater extent than
could have been expected. A singular old man,
named Tonnaleuka, whom the Indians regarded as
a prophet, frequently made his residence in the
vicinity
of Gilbert's for several months together,
and, on these occasions, took great delight in
teaching
his children, and seemed particularly
interested
in giving instruction to Maria, perhaps because
he found her so capable and solicitous to receive
it.
He informed Gilbert, who, on their first
acquaintance
,
expressed his astonishment to find
such a variety and extent of information possessed
by an Indian, that he had, in his early youth,
imbibed
a great thirst for knowledge; in
consequence
of which he had run off from his tribe, who
opposed his desires in this particular, and travelled,
for several years, through the towns of
New-England
,
where he studied the English language, and
became acquainted with various sciences. From
thence, said he, I visited Canada, for the
purpose
of acquiring whatever useful knowledge the
French could give me. When in Quebec, the
governor
,
at his own expense, placed me at a
seminary
,
with the intention of qualifying me to act as
an emissary among the Indian tribes, whom he
wished to secure to the interests of his country.
While there, I acquired a knowledge of the French
language, and of the histories, institutions, and
political
views of the principal European nations. I
then returned to my own people, that I might
gratify
the wishes of my benefactor, the governor, to
whom I felt very grateful. My friends received
me well, and forgave my leaving them, as they
said it was the Great Spirit that put it into my
head, that I might acquire knowledge to direct
them in the management of their affairs with the
white people. But they would not permit me to
teach any of their young men or young women
the sciences I had learned. For, said they,
if it were useful for us to know these things, the
Great Spirit would have communicated them to
our fathers, and they would have taught us.
However, they gave me credit for my knowledge;
and whenever I am among them, or any of their
kindred tribes, they consult me concerning all
their undertakings, and generally follow my
directions
.
But I do not wish my knowledge to be
uselessI am desirous to communicate itand
since the children of my own people will not hear
my lessons, I am glad that yours will.
The reader may wish to know, how an event so
fortunate for the little Maria, as Tonnaleuka's
introduction
to her father's, (for she naturally
considered
Gilbert as such,) took place. It happened
about two years after Gilbert's first settlement on
the Monongahela, and under the following
circumstances
.
His son Patrick, or Paddy, as he was
usually called, who was then about twelve years
old, had gone one day into a deep glen, or defile,
about a mile from home, to search for some cows
that had been missing, where, not finding them, he
amused himself by climbing the rocks that walled
up the sides of the glen, when happening to slip, he
fell from a considerable height, and broke one of his
legs. His cries occasioned the appearance of
Tonnaleuka
who immediately placed the boy on his
shoulders, and carried him home. Gilbert had
several times of late heard of this Tonnaleuka,
and on one occasion, a few weeks before, had seen
him, but had never spoken to him. Grateful now
for the service he had rendered his son, he invited
him to frequent his house, and enjoy his
hospitality
,
whenever he should visit the neighbourhood.
We'll, maybe no' treat you in your ain way,
wi' roasted venison, an' sic like, although we
kill a deer noo an' then; for we ha' leev'd unco
muckle in the Indian fashion, thir twa year back
but, howsomever, come an' see us, my freen,
an' we'll aye mak' ye welcome to a share o' what's
gaun.
My brother, said Tonnaleuka, think not that
I dislike your offerwhenever I have occasion, I
will accept of it; but I want you to know that I
do not accept of it as wages for carrying home
your wounded son. A virtuous Indian will receive
no return from men for an act like this. If he did,
the Great Spirit might refuse to give him that
reward
which he expects when he diesfor he
rewards
every good deed that is not rewarded here,
a hundred fold better than either Indian or white
man can.
Vol. I. D
But, brother, hearken to me, I will tell you
what I will do. I will take you for my friend, and
because you are my friend, I will eat at your table;
and when I am hungry, if I happen to be near you,
I will come and tell you, and you will prepare for
me, and I will eat as you eatfor I have been
among white people, and have been taught to sup
from various dishes, and also to use the
instruments
of eating, employed by the nations of the
cast.
Brother, hearken to me, I know something of
the art of bone-setting, for I have studied it under
the great Maraloomaand, if you permit me, I
shall now set your son's leg.
As this was an operation of which Gilbert
himself
was entirely ignorant, and as there was no
professed
surgeon within perhaps a hundred miles of
him, this request was readily granted, and the
service
speedily and dexterously performed. The
operator
daily waited on his pationt for several weeks
until a cure was perfectly accomplished.
It was during these visits that this Indian sage
appeared to become so much attached to Gilbert's
little girls, that he resolved to commence their
tutor
.
He also extended his benevolent instructions
to the boys; but the chief object of his care, as
we have before observed, was the little Maria,
who, although the youngest of the females, soon
shewed herself the most capable and willing to
profit by his instructions. As she advanced in
years, he drew up for her use a book which he
entitled
Wisdom for a Young Lady, in which he
laid down maxims for the regulation of her
conduct
in both a state of seclusion and society, but
particularly the latter. For, said he, fortune may
yet place you there, among white people like
yourself
.
While I lived among them, I found it was
difficult for men, but far more so for women to act
properly. Their manner of life is not like ours.
Propriety and duty call for a thousand things to be
done among them, which they do not require
among us, and the best informed of their people,
whether male or female, cannot at all times
remember
,
and attend to every thing that the
multiplicity
of their institutions, customs, and
ceremonies
,
renders incumbent upon the person who
would in all respects act well. Hence it is, as I
perceived while with them, that no one either
expects
perfection from another, or aims at it
himself
,
and this may be the chief cause why they
have never known any instance of complete
happiness
.
But although I do not expect, my child,
that if ever you live among them, my lessons will
enable you to behave better than any of them, yet
I hope they will qualify you for behaving better
than the most of them.
There was another copious source of
information
within Maria's reach, of which the
instructions
of her friendly preceptor enabled her to avail
herself. This was a small but well selected
collection
of books of both English and French
literature
,
that was contained in one of the trunks
belonging
to her mother, which the reader will
remember
her father to have mentioned in his
address
to Gilbert on the melancholy day of his
wife's death. She was soon taught by her
instructor
to read and understand the French authors
almost
as easily as the English, and to comprehend
whatever was difficult or obscure in either. Thus
a fund of great enjoyment, as well as of
improvement
,
to which she could, at all times, have
recourse
,
was in her possession, and altogether
under
her control. She valued this the more, as
the sage Tonnaleuka, whom she now esteemed as
her second father, was often called away on the
business of the tribes with whom he was
connected
;
for the fame of his wisdom and foresight had
spread widely amongst them, and they never
wished
to undertake any important enterprise without
consulting him, and obtaining his advice and
direction
how to conduct it. On such occasions, he
was often obliged to be absent for many months
together, during which she generally felt as much
solicitude for his safety, as if he had been some
near and dear relative.
Next to Tonnaleuka, and the members of her
own family, Maria's greatest favourite, and most
agreeable associate, was queen Alliquippa. This
Indian lady had always manifested for her a great
affection, to which the melancholy circumstances
of her birth, perhaps, at first gave rise; but which
her own endearing sweetness, loveliness, and good
nature, afterwards strengthened and confirmed into
a sincere and permanent attachment. In
consequence
of this intimacy with Alliquippa, Maria
obtained a tolerable knowledge of the language
spoken by the queen, and a considerable
acquaintance
with the manners, customs, and traditions of
various Indian tribes.
Thus, notwithstanding this beautiful young
woman
was reared by strangers, in the heart of a vast
and barbarous Wilderness, and in the midst of
savage tribes, yet providence had not only
protected
her childhood from injury, but had, almost
miraculously
afforded her such means of cultivating
her mind as, with the aid of her own excellent
understanding
,
in a great measure, supplied the want
of a more regular and finished education. When,
therefore, she had arrived at the age of
womanhood
,
whether we consider the endowments of her
mind, or the charms of her person, she was
eminently
qualified to adorn and delight the most
polished
society in civilized life.
CHAPTER IV.
If thou art parentless, my daughter, hear me;
Childless I live, and never can have offspring;
But in my heart for thee a parent's love
I long have cherish'dfor a mother then,
Oh! do thou take me, and thou never shalt,
While beats this heart that loves thy gentleness,
Know what it is to feel a mother's loss.
Saveladour
.
Thus
until about her sixteenth year, did the life
of Maria Frazier pass along in an unruffled,
undisturbed
stream of contentment and satisfaction.
No misfortune had occurred either to herself or
her friends of such importance as to occasion any
lasting impression of grief upon her mind. It is
true, that the prevalent quietude of the most
secluded
and tranquil life will be sometimes
interrupted
by small domestic cares, crosses,
inconveniences
,
and ungratified wishes; and she was, no
doubt, like every one else in the world,
occasionally
annoyed with such unaccommodating
occurrences
.
But compared with the general serenity
of her life, these were only like the touch of a
fly upon the cheek, soon obliterated and soon
forgotten
.
She was about the age before mentioned, when
the first uneasy impression of a durable nature, was
D 2
made upon her mind. Of the history of her birth
she had hitherto been kept in ignorance, and
never
entertained the least suspicion but that
Gilbert
and his wife,(who had always treated her with
the most affectionate indulgence,) were her
parents
.
Alliquippa's attachment to her was the
cause of her now becoming acquainted with the
truth. This Indian princess, who was now
advancing
in years, was childless, and had, therefore,
for some time past, unknown to Maria, cherished a
strong desire to adopt her for a daughter. She
had once or twice expressed her wish to Gilbert,
but could not procure his consent. She thought,
however, that her favourite was now sufficiently
old to act for herself. She, therefore, one day as
they conversed together in her wigwam,
unexpectedly
addressed her as follows: My daughter,
hear me! and think seriously upon what I am
going
to say. Nature has not made me thy mother,
but affection for you has long ago told me that it
would have been well had she done so, for had
you been formed of my own body, I could not
have loved you more strongly than I do, or felt
more interested in your welfare.
Daughter; our customs enable me, in this
case, to correct nature. You are already the
child of my heart. I wish to make you the child
of my adoption. If you consent, I shall call the
heads of my tribe together that they may confirm
my wish.
This unexpected proposal both astonished and
confused Maria so much, that for some moments
she could not reply. Alliquippa, therefore
continued
:
My child, listen again! I see your perplexity.
It may be, you do not approve of my proposal.
Perhaps you do not love me so much as I thought;
or, perhaps you may be unwilling to live in this
wigwam, after our manner. Here we have not
so many utensils for cooking, and preparing
luxuries
for the table, as where you have been
accustomed
to live. But if we have not, look to it, my
daughter! have we not more ease?have we not
less annoyance to endure from fire-side labour?
And yet we are nourished and have flesh and blood
upon our bones, as well as the white people.
Look at me, my child! I have seen forty two
summers, and am I impaired in strength? Are my
bones drier, or is my flesh more shrivelled than if
I had been fed at a white man's table?
My child, listen to me! If you become my
daughter, you will become accustomed and
reconciled
to our mode of living.You will be honoured
by our tribe. Kings and Sachems will desire you
in marriage. You will, if you choose, have the
pleasure to resist them, and yet keep them in
subjection
,
as I did. Or, as Shannalow, the eagle of
his tribe, gained me in marriage, so may some
great warrior gain you, and make you happy in
his love, and joyful in his renown. You have
heard me, my child! Will you become my
daughter
?
Maria was still much perplexed for a reply.
She was resolved to refuse, but she feared to
offend
.
She found now, however, that she must say
something; and she endeavoured to express her
refusal in terms as little offensive as she could.
Mother, said she,for so she had been
always
accustomed to address AlliquippaI have
heard your proposal which is the result of
kindness
for me. It excites gratitude in my heart, and
although I cannot become your daughter, for I
have parents to whom I owe a child's affection and
dutyyet I love you as much as if I could.
Think not, therefore, that my refusal springs from
my not loving you, for how can I but love one who
has been so kind to me?
My child! hear me! returned Alliquippa
I believe you love me. But hearken to a truth.
It is right you should hear it. What parent have
you in the world nearer to you than I am? None.
Or is there one in it that loves you better? None.
Gilbert Frazier is not your father, as you have
supposednor is his wife your mothershe did
not bear you more than I did. Alas, she who
bore you, died in doing so. What, my child! be
not surprised. Oh, do not tremble! I wished not
to frighten youOh! Spirit of Maneto! save my
child!
Here Alliquippa caught Maria, for she
appeared
to be falling from her seat. Her countenance
had turned deadly pale, her lips quivered, and
sensation
for a moment forsook her. She recovered
gradually, but it was several minutes before she
could sufficiently collect her senses to speak
distinctly
concerning the strange and distressing
intelligence
she had just received.
Ah! said she, without recollecting
Alliquippa's
presencewhat has she told me? Some
strange thing. Alas! it was thisthat I have not a
motherand she died in giving me birth!
Merciful
Providence! and am I so bereaved! Here
she melted into tears, and her agitation somewhat
subsided, when perceiving Alliquippa to be much
affected, she addressed her calmly.
My mother! be not so disturbed on my
account
.
I have, indeed, heard what distresses me.
I will not ask you to tell me the whole story. I
will ask it of my father. But, I think you said I
had no father. Ah! say, was I dreaming? or am
I really a bereaved orphan?
My child! replied the queen, I am
rejoiced
to hear you again. I feared you were gone
for ever, and I blamed myself for what I told you.
But, listen, child! Alliquippa never told lies
what I said was truth. The Great Father is your
only parentbut he is a good one; and he has
given you friends who love you, and you have
never wanted for any thing. Then, child, listen
to me, it is not right for you to grieve so much.
It is as if you distrusted the good will of your
Great Father towards you. But let me not find
fault with what I have done myself. I grieved
when Shannalow was killed, although it was in
battle against our enemies, and he has been
much praised. But I was to blame. And I have
since thanked the Great Spirit, that my husband
died a hero!
Hearken further! I wished you for my
daughter
,
because I have no child, and you have no
parent
,
and because I love you, and believe that you
love me. But my brother, Gilbert Frazier, and
my sister, his wife, love you also, and have been
good to you. They are of your own kind, and
you may not wish to leave them for a mother of a
red colour. Child! I speak plainly! Follow your
own inclinations. If you become my daughter, I
shall be glad. If not, you can still be my friend,
and I shall be satisfied.
For these generous sentiments Maria felt, and
expressed a sincere gratitude; and taking leave
of the queen, she returned home, with a mind
more disturbed and oppressed with melancholy
reflections, than she had ever before experienced.
And is it thusthought sheam I really thus
alone in the worldwithout any being attached
to me by the indissoluble ties of nature and kindred!
Forlorn, helpless, and destitute, must I still depend
upon the charitable support of the hard-working,
generous people that have hitherto supplied my
wants! Alas! that I have been so long in a
state of dependence! But I knew it not
Perhaps
it would have been better that I had never
known it. Then would this proud heart have felt no
pangs at living the unintentional object of
compassion
and charity. ButGod forgive me!
thou hast ordered it so. Enable me to humble
my spirit, and submit to thy dispensations. Ah!
it was thy pleasure to take my mother from me,
ere I could enjoy a mother's tenderness!And
my father, alas! what was his fate? Oh, God
of the fatherless! enable me to listen to the story
of his sorrows.Oh! point out to me what I
should do, for I feel now as if on thee alone I had
any natural claim for support.
There was something of a comfortable feeling
connected with the last reflection. It was a
feeling
,
as if, on account of her being destitute of all
claims to any other natural support, she felt
assured
that she had something like a greater claim
upon
her Heavenly Parent, the supporter of all his
creatures, and the only friend of the destitute and
the helpless. This assurance tended to calm her
agitation, and throwing her whole dependence
upon
her Maker, and resolving never to distrust his
providence, she reached home in a far more
composed
state of mind than when she left Alliquippa's.
Her agitation, however, was too apparent not
to be at once observed by the affectionate Nelly,
who felt for her well-being all the solicitude of a
real parent.
What ails you Maria? said sheI doot
something's wrang, my bairnare you no weel?
Nomy kind mother! she replied, I am not
well, but it is my heart alone that is sick. Alas!
that heart feels that it owes you a debt of
gratitude
,
which it never will be able to repay.
Why, my child, said Nelly, surprised at such
an observationWhy, what's come owre ye?
That's strange talk, indeed! I doobt some o' thir
books ye're aye readin hae put ye crazy. I aften
tauld ye it was wrang to study sae muckle. Tak'
mair diversion, an' sport yoursel', like Nancy, for
it vexes your puir mother to see you sae.
My mother, do you say! cried Maria,
almost
unconsciouslyAh! would to heaven that
you were my motherthen, you would not see me
now unhappy.
Would I were your mother! repeated the
alarmed Nelly. Did ony body ever hear the
like o' that? Why ye ken, I hae aye been your
mother
ay,
an' I aye will be your mother, for ye hae
aye been a gude bairn to me. Dinna cry noo, my
bonny jeweldinna cry saesome yenfoul fa'
their tongues! maun hae tauld ye some ill story to
vex you. But dinna mind them, my bairnye hae
aye been my ain, an' aye will be my ain!
So saying, she kissed Maria, who was weeping
bitterly, on the cheek, and wiped the tears from it
with a handkerchief, while at the same time the
moisture was breaking from her own eyes.
Tell me, she said, my bonny lamb! what
vexes ye sae! for I canna bear to see ye cryin' this
way.
Maria grasped her hand; she looked in her
countenance and saw that her heart was full, and
she could not resolve to increase its sorrow by
disclaiming that tender relationship she had
hitherto
conceived herself to bear to the affectionate
guardian and cherisher of her childhood.
Yes! I feel it, she exclaimed, you are my
mothermy best of mothers, and shall still, still
be sothough I have been told you were not.
An wha was sae hard-hearted as to tell you
sae, my bairn?shame fa' their ill tongues! could
they no hae been better employed than to blab oot
what can noo do naebody gude to hear?
Ah! then the tale is true, my motherOh!
I will still call you so, though I fear I have no
right.
Nae richt! Maria! my ain! sae lang my ain
wean! Wha dare tak the richt frae ye to ca' me
mother? Sair, sair, to me will be the day when
ye cease to do sae.
I never will cease to do so, while I live, said
Maria; and now, mother! I am better.And
she here endeavoured to appear more cheerful
for she perceived that her sorrow had produced a
violent agitation in Nelly's mind. Be
comforted
,
my dear mother, she continued, I will not
again permit this story to vex me. Only do not
let it vex you, and we shall again be happy
together
.
God bless you, my gude bairnyou were aye
a gude lass, a gude dauchter to me. An' though I
did na bear ye, I bred ye, an' watch'd owre ye,
an' nursed ye in my lap, an' fondled ye in my
arms, an' ye lay in my bosom.Oh Maria! Maria!
indeed ye are my ain as muckle as if God had
made ye sae. Oh! dinna think o' aucht else, for
I canna bear it.
Yesyou, who have been the tender
protector
of my infancy, and the affectionate supporter of
my childhood, from whom I never experienced any
thing but kindness, I never can, and never shall,
think of you in any other light than that of a
parent
,
whose duties you have with so much care
and solicitude fulfilled towards me. Gratitude for
theseah! that is but a cold word for what I feel
a daughter's love you deserve from me, and
warmly
and truly do I feel it, and for ever shall I
cherish
it for you.
They now embraced, and felt a confidence and
comfort springing up in their hearts, that soon
restored
them to tranquillity and cheerfulness.
Maria now informed her mother of Queen
Alliquippa's
proposal to adopt her as a daughter, and
the account she had given her of the loss of her
parents.
Nelly, in return, acquainted her with all the
circumstances connected with her birth, of which
the reader is already informed. She ended her
relation by observingYour father an' I would
hae tauld you thir things lang syne, but, no likin'
to disturb you wi' a bad story, an' no likin' eether,
it may be, that you should nae think us your father
an' mother, wha like you as weel as we do them
that are oor ain flesh an' bluid, we aye put it aff
frae day to day. We feared it wad be an unco
trial, an' ye micht hae thoucht we did it frae
unkindness
.
But you canna think sae noo. The
trial's owre; I'm glad o't, an' I hope in God, the
Great Parent o' us a', that he'll keep us a' happy
lang tighether.
Fortitude, reflection, and piety, soon restored
Maria's mind to such a state of serenity, that, if it
was not quite so undisturbed with uneasy
sensations
as formerly, it was sufficient at least to
prevent
either Gilbert or his wife from thinking her
unhappy. It was, indeed, reluctance to give that
uneasiness to this good couple, which she knew
any apparent affliction of hers would occasion, that
induced her to make exertions to conceal from
their view many a long hour's mental anxiety,
which, in spite of all her efforts to resist it, would,
from this time forward, frequently obtrude upon
her. She could not, at any time, totally divest
her mind of the recollection that she was
dependent
on their goodness and bounty, and that she
was fortuitously cast upon the world, without
possessing
any natural claim to the protection and
support of any fellow-being. Alas! she would
often involuntarily say to herself, if I knew any
Vol. I. E
human being, whose blood could claim affinity
with mine, how comfortable I should feel. But,
alas! there is none!
But this sense of forlornness never interrupted,
for one moment, her gratitude to God, for the
manifold
blessings she had hitherto enjoyed, nor her
affection and duty towards those kind people, who
had been the instruments of his bounty.
Her preceptor, Tonnaleuka, had been for
several
months absent at the time she received the
intelligence
of her state of orphanage; and her
tranquillity
of mind had been considerably restored
before his return. His acute penetration,
however
,
soon discovered that something had taken
place, since he last saw her, to disturb that
cheerfulness
and vivacity of disposition which she had
hitherto displayed, and which he knew was her
natural bent of mind. He mentioned his
suspicion
,
and without hesitation she told him the truth.
My daughter, said he, you do wrong to
grieve for events which you cannot recall, and
which no fault of your own has produced. A wise
person will only grieve for sin; and even then his
grief will not be lasting, since grief for sin is
repentance
,
and repentance reconciles him to both
God and man, and should, therefore, reconcile him
to himself.
My daughteryou say you have no kindred;
but you only mean such kindred as have been
called
so by the customs of the world. These it may
sometimes be a comfort to have, but it is not
always
a misfortune to want; for the faults of a man's
kindred often reflect upon him their evil
consequences
,
when he himself is blameless. But,
daughter, you have kindred. The Father of the
world has given us all a common origin: we have
all sprung from himself. Every one you see is,
therefore, your relative, whether white man or
Indian
.
Such is the unchangeable law of nature!
and so long as you act justly towards these your
relatives, they are bound, by that unchangeable
law, to support and protect you.
But, my child, I speak thus, not to chide, but
to advise you, not blame, but to comfort you; for
although it is hurtful for you to grieve, yet, for
such a cause as yours, it is natural, and, therefore,
cannot be offensive to your Great Father. Nay,
my daughter, hear me! I am glad to see that you
possess those fine feelings of the heart, that sweet
and amiable sensibility, which is the true source of
affection and tenderness, and which, when it can
be controlled by religion and reason, is a great
ornament
to your sex. But, for your own sake, I
wish you to restrain its impulses within due bounds.
Its possession is often a great augmentation to
happiness
,
but, unless under proper control, it is
almost
constantly a great source of misery, and the
origin of misfortune.
And now, daughter, I must say, that you have
reason, considering all things, to be satisfied with
your lot. God has given you kind and steady
protectors
in my brother Frazier and his wife; and,
have I not been to you the father of instruction,
and can you think me less than a father in
affection
,
or that I shall ever see you in misfortune, and
not step forth to relieve you?
Daughter, be of good cheeryour blessings
are many. You have health, and understanding,
and knowledge, and on earth many friends, and
God in heaven!
CHAPTER V.
Lo! to the desert bend their venturous way,
A daring band, regardless of each toil;
Beneath a youthful leader's valiant away,
To rear their standard in a distant soil,
And open out an empire which might tame
The lawless wild to cultur'd arts of peace,
Bid the bleak waste the boon of plenty claim,
And cause th' accursed reign of savage times to cease!
Savelabour
.
About
two years after Maria became
acquainted
with her state of orphanage, an event took
place, which, as it had the most important
influence
upon her destiny, it is our business to relate.
Shortly after the treaty of Aix-la-Chapelle,
which left the boundaries between the British and
French dominions in America altogether
undefined
,
the British government, which claimed an
unlimited
extent of country westward, on a parallel
with their eastern settlements, granted a large
portion of land, situated about the head of the
Ohio river, to a number of noblemen and opulent
merchants, who associated together under the title
of The Ohio Company. This company, which
was formed some time in the year 1750,
contemplated
territorial as well as commercial
advantages
,
and employed several adventurous
individuals
to explore the country, with a view to its
settlement. It was soon understood, however,
that the French, who also made pretensions to this
country, would resist any British establishment
that should be made there. But the company
determined
to persist in their designs; and, for the
purpose of giving effect to their operations, in the
year 1752, it was resolved to send a party of men
to take formal possession, and erect a fort on the
southeast side of the Ohio, near Chartier's creek,
about three miles below where Pittsburgh now
stands.
Thomas Adderly, Esq. a wealthy merchant of
Philadelphia, and a leading member and a director
of the company, was one of the chief promoters
of this enterprise. He was a native of Ireland,
and of the same neighbourhood with our friend
Gilbert Frazier; a few years after whose arrival
in America, having offended his father, who was
a man of large property, by marrying a portionless
young lady of extreme beauty and fine
accomplishments
,
he also emigrated to the same country,
where, in a short time, his success in mercantile
business amply remunerated him, in point of
fortune
,
for what he had lost by his father's
displeasure
.
This gentleman had an only son, named Charles,
who was born shortly after his arrival in
Philadelphia
,
which was in the year 1730. Being very
solicitous for this young man's education, he had,
when about fifteen years of age, sent him to
Europe
,
where he studied for five years at Trinity
College in Dublin, and spent another in travelling
over the British islands, and several parts of the
European continent. After an absence of about
six years, he returned to Philadelphia, only a few
months previous to the fitting out of the
abovementioned
expedition to the Ohio.
Being a young man of an enterprising
disposition
and inquiring mind, he felt a strong desire to
explore the western Wilderness, and get
acquainted
with the languages and customs of the Indian
tribes. He communicated his wishes to his father,
and requested permission to avail himself of the
favourable opportunity now offered of gratifying
E 2
them, by accompanying the intended expedition.
His father conceiving, at once, that such an
excursion
would afford a valuable addition to the
already
extensive stock of general knowledge that he
possessed, and might tend ultimately to the
obtaining
of vast commercial advantages with the
Indians
,
after some little deliberation on account of
the perils of the undertaking, yielded to his
request
;
and as Charles's education, talents, and
courage were well known, he had no difficulty in
getting him placed at the head of the expedition.
At the time that Charles Adderly undertook the
management of this enterprise, which was one, in
those days, somewhat novel in its nature, he was
in his twenty second year, and as accomplished,
active, handsome and gallant a young man as any
lady could wish to behold. His stature wanted
but one inch of six feet. His features were well
formed and expressive; glowing with
benevolence
,
and animated with good nature. His eyes
were dark, intelligent and penetrating. His hair
was black and somewhat curledwhile the
complexion
of his countenance was altogether Irish,
consisting of a happily blended union of white and
red. His limbs were well modeled, firmly knit,
and justly proportioned. In short, for I must be
brief, his manners and gestures united an air of
intrepidity and dignity with conciliation and
kindness
.
A journey from Philadelphia to the Ohio river,
at the period about which we are writing, was a
quite different thing from what it is nowAt the
present day there is nothing to obstruct the
traveller
,
except those numerous annoyances to badly
supplied purses and avaricious tempers, the
turnpike
gates; but when Charles Adderly set out
with his party, for more than two thirds of the way,
there was not a path nor a track to direct them
onwards. Instead of the numerous houses of
entertainment
,
and the constant and cheerful
concourse
of travellers that are now to be met with
every where in the whole distance, there was then
nothing to be seen but an unceasing and
monotonous
continuation of gloomy, thick, and, in many
places, impenetrable forests, covering vast and
awful mountains and wild and gloomy glens and
valleys; concealing lonely rivers and impassable
swamps; and yielding inaccessible retreats to
numerous
races of wild animals and beasts of prey,
and human savages, the most dreaded and
dangerous
of all the obstacles our adventurers feared
to encounter.
The party started about the latter end of
August
.
It consisted of twenty persons. They had
about a couple dozen of pack horses laden with
luggage, consisting of provisions, amunitions,
labourer's
tools, and merchandise for the Indians.
They were all hardy, courageous, able-bodied men,
regardless alike of fatigue, hardship, or hazard.
The majority were men accustomed to work, such
as labourers, masons, and carpenters; but they
were all able and willing to assist in case of need
in the performance of any duty. Charles
himself
;
a half-pay military captain, who had once
fought in the New England wars against the
Indians
,
and understood several of their languages;
an engineer; a young surgeon who was employed
not merely as such, but as secretary to the
expedition
;
and two young men of mercantile
knowledge
,
who had been bred merchant's clerks, were
the only individuals, not professionally workmen;
unless we exclude from this class, Charles's body
servant, Peter M'Fall, who had followed his dear
master from the sweet city of DublinOch! long
life to it!Over all England and Scotland, and
Germany and Italy, and France, and now to
America
;
and was ready besides to follow him all
the world over, and Ireland into the bargain, if he
should ever go back to it.
Every man of this stout-hearted and
stout-bodied
party was well armed, and well prepared to
encounter either the natural obstacles of the way,
or the attacks of an enemy, should they meet with
any, whether French or Indians.
They left Philadelphia laden with the prayers
and good wishes of the citizens, and the fourth
day afterwards crossed the Susquehannah in a flat,
amidst the cheers and acclamations of the people
then resident upon its banks. As they
proceeded
,
however, the obstacles to their progress
increased
,
and it was the eighth day from their
starting
before they reached the South Mountain.
They had great difficulty in passing this mountain.
Their axes and mattocks were put in frequent
requisition
.
On the eleventh day of their journey,
however, they reached the plain near where
Chambersburg is now situated. They here
pitched their tents and halted for a couple of
days, in order to shoot game, and give those
who were fatigued an oportunity of resting.
They set forward again on the tenth day, and
arrived at the eastern foot of the North, or, as it is
sometimes called, the Cove Mountain, that night.
The crossing this stupendeous mountain was one of
the most laborious tasks they encountered on the
whole rout. They set their bodies to it, however,
with great vigour, and hewed their way manfully,
through the almost impervious thickets that
incumbered
the numerous rocks and precipices over
which they had to pass into the valley on the
western
side, in about four days. Here, on the scite
of the present M'Connelstown, they again halted
for two days, for the sake of rest and recreation.
In this manner, they proceeded over the vast
and mountainous wilderness, not unaptly called
the Backbone of America, with infinite labour
securing
footing for their horses, by sometimes
filling
up, and sometimes bridging over, ravines,
runs, creeks, rivers, and morasses, and levelling
impenetrable woods and rocks, as they tottered
dizzily along the sides of fearful precipices, on
the edges of which trunks of trees had
frequently
to be fixed to afford a passage for their
trembling horses, until, about the latter end of the
sixth week of their journey, they reached
Shanapins
,
a small Indian village at the head of the
Ohio, where fort Du Quesne was built about
eighteen
months afterwards, and where Pittsburgh
now boasts her cheap markets, her noisy
manufacturers
,
and her industrious ten thousand
inhabitants
.
They here remained several days, trafficking
with the Indians, from whom they had not as yet
met with any molestation. Nay; several of their
kings and chief men who visited them, seemed
to be rather friendly disposed. Among others,
our friend Shingiss, king of the Delawares,
Alliquippa's
lover, treated them with great attention, and
ordered his people to furnish them with
provisions
and furs in exchange for their goods,
whenever
they wanted them. His residence being
near the place where they had instructions to
erect their fort, Charles took care to secure his
acquiescence and assistance in the undertaking,
by a splendid present of rings, pen-knives, small
looking-glasses, tobacco-boxes, glass beads, and
other trinkets. In managing these matters the
half-pay captain before noticed, whose name was
Ridgely, acted as interpreter; and the whole
affair
was settled so much to the satisfaction of all
concerned, that a few days after their arrival at
Shanapins, Charles thought proper to remove the
party to Chartier's creek and take formal
possession
of the ground he intended to fortify.
He soon marked out the place best adapted
for a fortification. It was a high bank near the
creek on the south side of the Ohio river,
commanding
its channel, but sloping towards the land,
so as to render its approach from that direction,
easily susceptible of being made difficult. Here
he resolved without delay to raise a small
entrenchment
,
and erect a block-house for a temporary
defence
,
for he was informed that the French
commander
at the fort of Le Beuf, about twenty miles
distant, had expressed great displeasure at the
report
of his incursion to this country, and it was
probable that he would not even refrain from
violence
in order to drive him off.
Charles thought that it was not likely the French
would use force for such a purpose, as it was then
a time of peace between France and England;
but, at all events, he conceived it prudent to erect
some species of defence, for if the French
commandant
should not venture openly to attack him,
he might secretly spur on some of the Indian
tribes to do so.
His men were immediately set to work; some
in preparing timber for the block-house, and some
in digging the trench. They had been two or
three days employed at this business, when Peter
M`Fall, who had been hewing timber at some
distance
from the rest, perceiving a deer, threw down
his axe, and seizing his gun, (for, to guard as much as
possible against any hostile surprise, each man was
ordered to have his charged musket convenient to
him while at work,) proceeded after it for a short
distance. It had stopped, and in a crouching
posture
,
among some thick undergrowth of hazels and
spicewood, he silently and slowly approached it,
when, all at once, he heard the sound of human
voices, as if talking together. He thought no more
of the deer, for he was altogether attracted by the
sounds, in which he believed there was something
not absolutely unknown to him. He drew near
them with as much silence and circumspection as
he could, and soon distinguished the words to be
French, a language of which he had acquired some
knowledge while attending his master on his
European
travels. He still continued cautiously
approaching
until he obtained a stolen view of the
speakers. They were white men, and he had no
hesitation in believing them to be French, although
they had on no uniform that could distinguish them
as such. Each of them wore a plain round hat, a
short gray coloured hunting roundabout, and gray
pantaloons. They were standing leaning upon
their guns beneath a brush-covered bank that
over-looked
a small run, and from which bank,
concealed
by the brush, he saw them only four or five
yards below him. After listening to their discourse
for about fifteen or twenty minutes, he became
impatient
to communicate it to his master, it being
of such a nature as to show that there was
mischief
to be soon expected; but happening to
withdraw
from his skulking-place rather incautiously,
they espied him, and immediately fired at him.
One of their balls passed through his hat, and
another
through the skirt of his coat, without
injuring
him. He speedily returned their favour, and
saw one of them fall, but did not wait to ascertain
whether he was killed or merely wounded. He
hastened through the wood with the swiftness of
an Asahel, and was, in a few minutes, breathless
before his master.
Oh! holy Bridget! master! cried he in a
great flurryI am wounded both in the head
and the tail!
Wounded! how? exclaimed Charles. Why,
what has happened, Peter?
Ogh, nothing, your honour, replied Peter,
somewhat recovering his respiration; but I shot
a Frenchman as neat, your honour, as neat as a
pigeon, through the
Then, Peter, I dare say it is the Frenchman,
and not you, that is wounded.
Ogh! now, master, sure didn't I tell you the
truth? Look at the ball they shot through my
headI heard it whistling like a pipe-staple
You'll see it there in both sides of my hat, your
honour. Ogh! it flew like the wind through a
barn door
But it has not cracked your skull for you, I
hope, Peter. Let me see. Why! you
blunderpate
,
there is not so much as a scratch here
Agh! your honour, let Peter alone for that.
The devil never yet made the bullet that broke my
head, although he sent one through my tail too.
By my sowl, it was tight going, to be shot through
at both ends, master!
And yet to be injured in neither, observed
Charles, who was now satisfied that Peter had
received
no hurt. But tell me how this affair has
happened. Where did you see the Frenchman,
and what was he about?
By my sowl, sir, it wasn't one, but two of them
I saw, skulking, like thieves from a Kilmainham
twist, behind a hay-stack. It was just, your
honour
,
under the brow of the big ditch yonder
where the little river runs, that I spied them, as
snug as a pig, from among the bushes. They were
speaking French treason, when I listened like a
lark, and heard every word of it.
Well! and they discovered, and shot at you,
did they?
O! it was when I got up to run, that they did
it. But, faith, I left my mark in one of them
and if there had been only another ball in my gun,
I would have killed them both, for sure they
disarved it, master.
Well, but tell me, Peter, what conversation
did they hold? Did you hear it distinctly?
Ay, faith, that's the news for youHear it!
your honourwhy, my mother never heard me
squalling plainer.
But what did they say? Petertell me, and
be quick
Why! they just said, that they would take
every soul of us prisoners, if them Indians, the
thehang their name!
Go on, sirwhat about them?never mind
their name.
The ChChipysI think they called them.
When they would come on, they said, they could
take us all at our work. But I thought it a devil
of a lie, master; for sure didn't I know we could
shoot every soul of them if they touched us?
But, Peter, did they say when they expected
these Chippeways, as I suppose was their name?
By the holy Derg! but you're right, your
honour
How
did you hear them? You know the
whole matter better than I do. Ogh! what it is
to be larned now!
Peace, Peter! and tell me if you heard when
these Indians are expected?
Ogh! in faith, then, I believe they expect
them already, for they cursed them for not having
come yet.
Haste, Peter!sound the bugle, and call in
the men immediately.
Peter did as he was directedand in a few
minutes
the whole party was assembled.
Charles communicated to them Peter's account
of the danger that threatened them, and desired
Vol. I. F
them to keep a good look out, and not to separate
until further orders. He then conferred privately
with Captain Ridgely on the best measures to be
adopted.
It was agreed that the men should at once be
employed in constructing a hasty parapet for
immediate
defence, of the materials they had already
prepared, so that if attacked they might have some
shelter from the enemy. At the same time a
messenger
was sent to king Shingiss, acquainting him
with the state of affairs, and requesting his
assistance
as an ally in repelling any attack.
Shingiss with five or six warriors soon waited
upon
Charles, and addressed him in the following
manner:
Brother! I will speak freelyyour people
and the French dislike each other, and many of us
dislike you both. Your two nations disagree about
this country which belongs to neither of you. It
is a hundred generations since the Great Spirit
who made it, first gave it to our fathers, and to
their sons for hunting ground. They and we have
possessed it ever since. Is it not strange that you
white nations should quarrel more fiercely about
our property than we ourselves?
Brother! I will speak truth, and you will hear.
We have no objection to your lodging among us,
and trading with us, so long as you trade fairly,
and behave peaceably, and make no attempt to
engross our land.
Brother, be attentive! I do not say that you
have yet cheated us, nor that you intend it. But
we have heard of some traders from the rising sun
who did so. This has affronted our people. They
see that the children of your nation can be
dishonest
,
and they distrust you.
Brother, hear the truth! I gave you
permission
to build here, because I know that you
cannot
,
as we do, live in wigwams, and I wanted you
to be comfortable that you might have no cause of
complaint, and that you might trade with us the
longer.
Brother! I tell you these things that you may
know how to please the Indians. If you attend to
them, they will, when you are distressed, lend you
assistance. If you despise them, they will sit still
when you need them, or it may be they will lift
the hatchet against you.
Brother! Let me now say, that you have not
yet displeased me, but the French have; and if my
warriors were at home I would now help you, for
you have my permission to live here, and the
French have no right to forbid you. I will call
upon the Shannoahs. Their warriors will come
when they hear my story, and with those of my
own tribe that are with me, I will join them; but
there will be a whole day before we can
assemble
.
Brother! Look to it! If you are delivered
from this danger, do not become proud, and say
it was your own strength that did it; and that the
Indians should be despised, and may be treated
unjustly. If you do, think you that they will again
relieve you? For you may again be distressed,
nay, if you act unjustly you will be so. I have
done, my brother! I go to call the Shannoahs
Let what you have to answer be brief.
Brother! replied Charles, I am aware that
our people have not always acted right towards
you, and I am sorry for it. But we are a very
numerous
people, and have no doubt some bad men
amongst us, for we are much diversified in our
dispositions. But you are too just to visit upon
the innocent the punishment due to the guilty.
You acknowledge we have hitherto acted
justly
.
It is our intention always to do so. Nay,
more, if you assist us on this occasion, we shall
feel bound to act generously, and shall not soon
forget your kindness.
Shingiss now took his leave; and it was scarcely
an hour afterwards, when two warriors of his tribe
came running towards Charles's tent. While yet
at some distance, they were heard to imitate the
screeching of the owl, the signal by which they
inform
each other that there is a foe approaching.
When they reached Charles, they informed him that
there was a large party of the Chippeways within
a short distance advancing to attack him, and that
their king was very sorry he had no force at hand
to assist in repelling them.
They had hardly delivered their message, when
the terrific war-whoop was heard to rise from
different
quarters of the woods at once; and Charles
had hardly time to form his men into a posture of
defence, ere a continued peal of musketry began
to rattle all around, and a shower of bullets sent
by foes, as yet invisible, rushed through the
interstices
and other openings in the scarcely half
finished
breast-work they had been hastily
attempting
to throw up.
Charles did all in his power to encourage his
men, and they, indeed, fought gallantly. But
their situation was extremely disheartening. They
knew not the exact strength of the enemy, but
they had reason to believe that it was beyond
comparison
superior to theirs. Nor did they know to
what particular point to direct their efforts, for
every part of the surrounding wood seemed to
pour forth upon them its destructive thunder,
while their ill-constructed rampart afforded them
little or no protection.
At length the savages becoming bolder, drew
near, and necessarily exposing themselves, as they
advanced, to the shot of the English, a
number
of them was killed. But they continued to
approach, sheltering themselves as much as
possible
,
behind trees, until Charles perceiving that
there was no chance of keeping them off much
longer, determined to make a charge upon them
with the bayonet, in order, if possible, to cut a
passage
through them, by which means he hoped, that
at least a remnant of his men might escape. He gave
orders to this effect, and led the way himself, armed
with a case of pistols, and a large broadsword. His
men followed with great intrepidity, and soon
drove off all the savages that were before them.
But they were suddenly closed upon by a host
from behind, and every man was seized by five or
six Indians, and either killed or taken prisoner,
and bound on the spot. Charles placing his back
to a large tree, defended himself for a considerable
time, even after he saw that all was lost; for he
determined to die fighting, and to make his death
costly to his assailants, rather than become their
prisoner, and endure the tortures to which he
knew he would in that case be subjected. He
had expended the contents of his pistols with
deadly effect among them, and now his broadsword
alone remained to him for the infliction of his
vengeance
.
He had laid several of them bleeding at his feet
with mortal wounds, when he perceived one of
more than ordinary strength, stateliness, valour,
and fierceness, approaching with the utmost fury
in his countenance. When within a few yards of
Charles he stopped, and called in a loud and
commanding voice to those who were fighting with
him. They immediately ceased, and withdrew to
a distance. Charles stood firm and collected,
waiting
the attack of this formidable savage, for the
latter
had paused in his approach, as if to scrutinize
the appearance of his antagonist, and meditate his
F 2
mode of attack upon one so worthy of his valour
so apparently well calculated to call forth its
whole extent, and prove its invincibility. Charles
on his part, perceived that the struggle was likely
to be a hard one, and he felt a sense of
self-congratulation
that it was so, because if he
conquered
,
he should rid the world of one who, if he
lived
,
was likely to be a scourge to his countrymen,
and if he himself died, he should die by the hands
of a hero.
These thoughts had the duration only of a
moment
,
for the savage was soon at the attack.
Having
observed the kind of weapon possessed by
Charles, as if disdaining to use what he supposed
gave him an advantage over an opponent whom
he wished to fight only on equal termshe threw
the battle-axe, with which he had often turned the
tide of victory against his enemies, away, and
occupied
but a moment in snatching, from the dying
grasp of Captain Ridgely who had fallen near him,
his sword, which was nearly of the same size and
formation with that of his antagonist.
At this instant, Charles paid a tacit, but high
compliment to the magnanimity of his opponent,
by relinquishing his station at the tree, and
coming
forward to meet him in the open space; for
he instinctively felt that the followers of a brave
man, although they should be savages, would not
dare to disgrace, both him and themselves, by
using unfair means, in the moment of combat, to
secure him the victory.
The combatants now met, and fierce and
terrible
was the encounter. For, although they
respected
each other's bravery, each was
determined
to destroy or die. The Indian managed his
unusual weapon with wonderful address; and it
required all Charles's skill, (and he was an
educated
swordsman,) to ward off the fiery, the rapid
almost invisibly rapid, and nearly overwhelming
thrusts, strokes, and movements of his antagonist.
And when at the beginning of the contest he tried
on his part to strike, or thrust, he was always
baffled
by some unexpected, and unaccountable turn
of his opponent's weapon or bodily position. The
savage, however, could make no impression upon
him. He was too well acquainted with every
manuvre
of parrying for that. Both were beginning
to be wearied, and provoked at such an unavailing
contest, when Charles reflected that even if he
should in the end conquer, there was no
possibility
of escaping the terrible tortures destined to
one captured by such foes, hundreds of whom
stood around, ready to seize and carry him bound
to torment and death, the moment his victory
should be declared. This idea rendered him
desperate
;
and, almost careless of conquest, he made a
spring like lightning for suddenness, upon the
Indian's
sword, the blade of which he caught firmly,
but most unexpectedly, in his left hand, (for the
Indian, who had hitherto beheld him fight rather
cautiously, had not calculated on a movement of
so much rashness) and thrusting it aside with
uncontrolable
force, he dashed his own into his
opponent's
heart.
The Indian fell, and expired without a groan, a
fate which, at that instant, the conqueror ardently
wished had been his own; for as many savage
hands as could lay hold of him, had now seized
him, and he was carried away bound, along with
eleven of his company, who were also prisoners,
(the remainder having been killed on the field,) to
the Chippaway encampment, to undergo the
investigation
and judgment of the victorious chiefs.
All the way to the encampment, which was on
the north side of the Ohio, about two miles from
the field of battle, the Indians continued shouting
and dancing, and singing songs of triumph, in a
manner so wild and frantic, that to their
unfortunate
prisoners their conduct appeared tainted with
actual madness. It was wearing near the
evening
when they arrived at the camp, which was
composed
of a number of rude and hastily erected tents
and wigwams, in one of which the chiefs
assembled
,
and having approved of an appropriate Song
of Victory, ordered two of their best singers to
chant it in the hearing of all the warriors, many
of whom joined in the chorus. As one of the
prisoners
happened to preserve a copy of this song,
it has come into our possession, and we beg leave
to offer the following translation of it to our
readers
.
An Indian Song of Victory.
CHORUS.
Now the storm of battle's o'er,
Victory the brave has crown'd;
Heroes! we exult once more,
O'er the hard contested ground,
Raise the voice of triumph high!
Let it loudly pierce the sky,
And to our father's spirits tell,
How their sons have fought so well!
How they crushed the daring foe!
How they laid the white man low!
And how their haughty souls to tame,
They bound them on the field of fame!
Now the storm, &c.
From climes towards the rising day,
The intruders hither bent their way:
They loved the country we possess'd,
Our native region of the west;
They came with murderous fire and brand,
To drive us from our father's land;
But warriors! we have let them know,
The land is ours, and shall be so!
Now the storm, &c.
The praises of the brave who fell,
Our songs shall never cease to tell;
Our sons shall hear their deeds of fame,
And warmly glow to do the same;
Our daughters shall fond trophies weave,
Such as true heroes should receive,
To crown the memory of the dead,
Who gloriously in battle bled.
Now the storm of battle's o'er, &c.
After this song, the whole savage party, which
consisted of nearly three hundred, spent the
remainder
of the evening in feasting, dancing, and
every species of exhibition they could contrive to
display their feelings of triumph and exultation.
The prisoners were exposed to view during the
whole of these revels, in order to stimulate the
joy of the revellers, by keeping in their minds a
perpetual
recollection of their victory, as well as to
mortify their enemies, by reminding them of their
vanquished condition, and the degraded and
deplorable
state to which the vengeance and valour
of their conquerors had reduced them. At length
the hour of repose arrived, and the wretched
prisoners
,
relieved from the painful situation where
they had performed the part of public spectacles,
were huddled together in a wigwam, and left there
to endure the intolerable agony of their own
rereflections
until the morning. They were all
securely tied by both their arms and legs, and a
sufficient guard of Indians stationed round the
wigwam
,
to render their escape impossible.
CHAPTER VI.
Mark yonder the captive! his doom is decreed,
His merciless foes to the faggot have bound him:
No pity they give; the poor white man must bleed,
While they raise the wild chorus of triumph around him
But who speaks his freedom? What strange one is he?
Who bursts from the mountain-top down to his side?
'Tis the mocker of fortune, the fearless and free,
Whose deep-piercing ken through its mazes can see.
Basket of Scraps
.
The
reflections of Charles Adderly during this
melancholy night, experienced but one short hour's
intermission by means of a frightful slumber a little
before daybreak, when his unreposing imagination
tormented him with ideas incomparably more
painful, and more horrible, than his waking
thoughts. A confused, unconnected, and
unintelligible
,
but terrifying crowd of ideas, unqualified
and unmitigated by any suggestions of hope, or
effort
of fortitude, gave to his feelings during this short
sleep more the character of agonized madness
than of uneasy dreaming, and when he awoke, he
felt in his real affliction a considerable relief from
the intolerable pangs inflicted by the creations of
his imagination.
He was not, indeed, without hopes that some of
his companions might be saved from the Indian
cruelties that threatened them, by the efforts of
two or three French officers, whom he had seen
among the victors during their revels the
preceding
evening. One of them had also humanely
addressed
to him a few words of condolence, but
without conveying any precise hope of
deliverance
.
At length the sun aroseand the victorious
Indians
starting from repose, the noise and bustle of
life again animated the camp, and broke in upon
that monotonous and tedious dulness which had
been so oppressive to Charles during the night.
Two Indians soon entered his wigwam, and
ascertaining
that none of the prisoners had escaped,
distributed refreshments among them, of which the
harassed and desponding feelings of the majority
prevented them from partaking.
Shortly after this, a council of the chiefs met to
deliberate concerning the prisoners, who were
ordered to be present, that they might receive
their doom. This consultation took place in the
open air, in a small glade that skirted the banks of
a rivulet, or
run
, as such streams in America are
usually called, and beside which the encampment
was situated. Here the prisoners, tied in pairs to
each other, were seated on the ground, near the
centre of a circle formed by all the warriors,
armed
with guns in their hands, and axes and
tomahawks
in their belts. Beneath a large
chesnuttree
,
near the centre of the circle, sat seven chiefs
and three Frenchmen, upon logs apparently placed
there for their accommodation. To these seven
chiefs had been entrusted the determination of the
fate of the prisoners.
When they commenced their deliberations, they
spoke separately, each, when he had any thing to
say, standing up, and generally, but not always,
addressing himself to an elderly warrior, who
appeared
to be their principal sachem, or king, but
who had nothing in his dress to distinguish him
from the rest. What each man said, was
communicated
to the French by an interpreter; by which
means Charles became acquainted with their
various
sentiments, and the progress and
management
of the consultation.
The first proposal made was to sacrifice half of
the prisoners according to their customs, and to
give the others to the French; the division to be
made by lot.
To this the French refused to assent; and one
of them standing up, addressed them to the
following
purpose: Brothers! you say it is to
please your departed warriors, that you would
sacrifice these men. Where are those warriors
now! Are they not in heaven! Are they not
happy, having done their duty, and having died
bravely? If they are then already happy, can
you suppose, that they require the tortures of these
men to make them more so? Will they not
rather
be angry with you, seeing these prisoners fought
bravely, and heroes always esteem brave men, and
wish them well?
But do you think that the English will never
take any of your people prisoners? They are a
warlike nation.Have you not often heard of
them gaining victories? Were they not
successful
in king Philip's wars? Think you then that
they will never have any of you prisoners? And
think you that, if you now destroy these, their
brethren, they will not destroy your people in
return
,
when any of them fall into their hands.
Think of this, brothers!
One of the chiefs replied: Brother, Hear my
answer to your speech.Our departed friends
we know to be happy, nor do we think that it will
make them more so to burn these prisoners on
their account. But it will shew them our
affection
,
and they will say to each other: Our
brothers
love us so that they cannot endure the
people
by whom we fell. See how they consume
them from the earth!
Brother! If the English do not burn us when
they make us prisoners, it is not because they love
us, but because they respect their customs; and the
reason why we burn them is not because we hate
them, but because we revere the ways of our
fathers
,
and walk in them.
Brother! Let the English adopt our customs
if they please. It will not dissatisfy or alarm us.
Our people have been often burned by our
enemies
.
It was their fate, and we submitted.
But, brother; I wish to please you, for your
people are our allies and friends. I will propose,
therfore, that, since for your share you are to have
six prisoners, of the six that shall remain to us,
we shall save one half by adopting them for our
sons. With the other half, we shall support the
customs of our fathers, and sacrifice them to the
memory of our slain warriors.
Brother! Will this satisfy you?
The French still remained unsatisfied; but they
despaired of making any better terms with their
savage allies, and were about to give up the
contest
,
when one of them, who had, by examining
the prisoners, found that there were four so badly
wounded that they were not likely to survive many
hours, conversed a few minutes with his
companions
,
and then addressed the chief of the council
as follows: Brother! Our nation and yours
have been long friends. We have been often
useful to each other. We wish not now to
disturb
our harmony. No seeds of strife shall be
sown by us. If you grant us one thing, we will,
therefore, oppose you no further. We wish you
to choose
now
those you will adopt as sons, and
then permit us when the sun goes down this
evening
to select, without lot, the number that falls to
our share. The others will be those you will
offer
according to your customs.
Vol. I. G
To this proposal the council appeared willing
to accede. There was one chief alone, who had
not yet expressed his assent. This man, indeed,
had during the whole proceedings hitherto said
nothing; but he had manifested great
earnestness
and attention to all that passed. His
countenance
was grave and mournful, and he was
somewhat elderly, although still healthy, strong,
and active in his appearance. He now rose in
considerable agitation and addressed them as
follows
.
Warriors! Behold me! I here stand alone,
like an old oak that his its branches cut from
around it.
Brothers! I know you grieve for me. It was but
yesterday that I was sheltered by a sapling that
grew from my own roots stronger and more comely
than myself. That noble sapling, the pride of the
whole forest of our tribe, has been hewn down by
a white man, and I see that white manmine eye
pierces his soul,here he fixed such an intense
and fierce look upon Charles as he could scarcely
endure.he is now before me!
Brothers, I disagree to the proposal made by
our French brother, unless you will except from
the number to be saved, the slayer of my son.
Ye knew Carrawissa. Were not ye proud of him?
Was he not an example to your warriors? Was
he not wise and valliant? Your oracle in peace,
and your thunder-bolt in war? It is true he was
but young, and had not the gray hairs of a sage.
But had he not the wisdom of one?
Warriors! what he would have been had he
lived 'till his brow had been wrinkled like mine,
you may conjecture by what he was ere his beard
required pulling.
Brothers, attend to me! Do you not grieve for
him? I look at your faces, and they tell me that
you grieve from your very hearts. Then let me
ask, how can you save his distroyer? But, hear
me! if you can consent to it, I cannot.
Warriors, and brothers! I request that you
will deliver him who bereaved you of a hero, and
me of a son, into my hands, that he may be made
an offering to the memory of that hero, that he
may glut the vengeance of the father who lost
that son. The man that slew Carrawissa must be
destroyed by me, or else my sorrows will never
cease. I will not yield to the proposal of our
French brother, because it might deprive me of
my victim.
Brothers, and warriors, you have heard me.
The whole party of the Indians seemed much
affected with this address, and remained indulging
a deep melancholy silence for some minutes after
the speaker sat down. At length one of the
counsellors arose, and in a solemn tone, addressed
the assembly. I have heard Carrawoona, and I
am affected. What he said is true. His son was
a hero, greater than his fellows, as the noble eagle
is greater and more generous than the buzzard, or
the hawk. We were proud of him, for he was a
Chippeway, and no other tribe could shew his
equal. It was but yesterday when we said, now
we will gain the victory, for Carrawissa leads us.
But when shall we say so again? Never!
Warriors! Carrawoona has asked what is
right. He has asked that we shall honour his son
as he deserved, by sacrificing a foe to his memory;
and who so fitwho so acceptable a sacrifice as
he who slew him? Can we refuse so just a
demand
?
Can we say, Carrawoona, we grieve
for your son's death, but we will not avenge it!
We admired him, but we will not honour him;
we loved him but we will let his memory pass
away from our feelings as the shade vanishes when
the substance is no more. We cannot say so,
Chippeways. A hero is dead; we were proud of
that hero. Our foes often fled before himnay,
they have trembled at his very name. He has
fallen
in his youth, in the midst of his glory, when
he had many years to be useful. His destroyer
is in our hands, and shall we spare him? Our
brothers, the French, will not ask so hard a
matter
.
But should they insist on it, I will not consent.
Carrawissa was a hero whom we loved. Is it
much that we desire to sacrifice to his memory
the foe who killed him?
Brothers, and warriors! To please our allies,
I will propose that all the prisoners except the
slayer of our hero be theirs. Let them save them
if they wish it, but him I will not consent to save.
We must give him to Carrawoona, to avenge his
son.
Brothers, you have heard my opinion.
This opinion, so inimical to our hero, was
embraced
by the whole of the seven chiefs, and after
several unavailing attempts on the part of the
French to procure its reversal, they had at length,
to yield.
Charles was then sentenced to the flames; and
his execution was ordered to take place under the
direction of Carrawoona, before the sun of that
day, as the chief sachem expressed it, when
pronouncing
the decision of the council, should
conceal himself behind the trees that
overshadowed
the hills of the West. The chief sachem
had finished the awful annunciation, and all the
prisoners, except the devoted Charles, had been
given over to the French, when some straggling
Indians, at a distance, were heard to give a
peculiar
shout, denoting both joy and admiration, by
which was indicated the approach of some
distinguished
and respected visitor.
The sounds of Tonnaleuka! Tonnaleuka!
were soon heard from numbers of the assembly;
and Charles perceived a man rapidly descending
amidst the woods from an abrupt rising ground,
which bounded to the northward the low glade
where the council was held. He stopped a few
yards from the warriors, when the counsellors all
rising up, saluted him with a sound, denoting
welcome
,
thou messenger of God! and the chief
sachem
invited him to come forward.
He was venerable, grave, and majestic in his
appearance, and in his manner there was
something
wonderfully awful. His head was bare, for,
when he stopped, he had taken off a cap of
buffalo
skin, which he held in his left hand, and had
lifted his countenance towards heaven, in the
attitude
of devotion. That countenance displayed
an uncommon degree of fervour, dignity, and
intelligence
.
His nose was of the aquiline form, and
his cheek-bones slightly prominent, but well
turned
,
and proportioned so as to give an oval, rather
than a broad outline of countenance. His
forehead
was high and round, imperceptibly rising
backwards into a broad, smooth, and shining
crown, altogether bald, but from the sides of which,
and from behind, abundance of long black hair,
mixed with gray, streamed down upon his
shoulders
,
and was arranged so as to cover part of his
cheeks, and hang on each side upon his breast for
several inches beneath his chin. From his dark
piercing eyes, there issued an expression of
authority
almost overpowering to the beholder, but
which excited a feeling of reverential awe rather
than personal peril.
His dress was simple, consisting of a long flannel
garment, like a shirt, with short sleeves, the skirts
of which reached down to the calves of his legs.
Above this, a wide mantle of bison-skin, thrown
G 2
round his shoulders, flowed loosely over his arms
and down his back, in the manner of a short cloak.
His moccasins and leggins of half-tanned deer-skin,
were of the usual construction, and completed
every thing observable in his dress, except a
leathern
belt round his waist, to which was attached
a deer-skin pouch, for containing, as the Indians
asserted, some mystical books, in which were
recorded
the communications he received from the
Great Spirit, whose prophet they believed him to
be. In his right hand he held a long rod, around
which were entwined a variety of feathers taken
from birds of different colours, which rod the
Indians
looked upon as sacred, and gave it the name
of the prophet's wand.
When he approached the council, he held,
stretched out, this wand towards the chief sachem,
and addressed him as follows:
My brotherI am sent to talk with you. The
Great Spirit, whom you worship, knows all things
he knows what you have decided upon to-day.
It was he who sent me.
Then hearken to me, and let all these warriors
hearken, for my words are dictated from above. I
was not of your council. No one saw me here.
But Maneto sent a good spirit, who has declared
to me your proceedings. I will, therefore, speak
freely. You have offended the Great Spirit by
your sentence against that prisoner; and, if you
execute it, you will offend him still more.
Maneto
loves you. He has given you a great victory.
He has cast down your enemies before you; and
he now warns you, lest you sin too much against
him, and provoke him to consume you more than
he has consumed them. Take warning, therefore,
and sin not!
Hearken to my voice! Maneto wishes you
to spare this young warrior. You know he made
the white people as well as the red, and can
govern
both in any manner he pleases. He has
services
for this young man to perform, which he
communicated to me. He, therefore, calls upon
you to spare him, and give him into my
possession
.
Brothers and counsellors! you have heard.
Will you obey the voice of the Good Spirit, and
preserve his love, or will you disobey him, and
provoke his vengeance?
Brother! say, what is your choice?
The chief sachem arose, and replied:
Prophet! I will give my own opinion. The
Great Spirit should be obeyed. We are the
workmanship
of his hands, and he has a right to our
submission. What are we without him? Were
it not for him, we should have neither deer, nor
buffalo, nor bear's flesh to cat, nor air to breathe,
nor water to drink, nor weapons to destroy our
enemies.
Prophet! you say he has use for this prisoner,
whom we were going to burn. Why were we
going
to burn him, but to please the spirit of
Carrawissa
,
which yesterday left its body? But it is
better
that we should please the Great Spirit who has
existed for ever, and can easily recompense
Carrawissa
,
if we do him an injury.
Brothers and warriors! I think none of you
will refuse to give our prisoner to the prophet,
Tonnaleuka, as the Great Spirit commands us. If
any one refuses, we will hear him. If none speaks,
I shall order the prisoner to be loosened, and given
to the prophet.
He here paused for some one to replybut all
continuing silent, he was about to command the
giving up of the prisoner, when Carrawoona rose
in great agitation.
What! brothers! said he, have you so soon
forgot my son? Will no one speak in his behalf?
Has he no friend here, who will ask justice for
him? I cannot believe this story of Tonnaleuka.
Prophets have sometimes spoken falsely, or they
may have mistaken dreams for the orders of the
Great Spirit.
Listen to me. The Great Spirit loved
Carrawissa
,
and made him a hero. Think ye then, that
he could thus command us to defraud his memory
of the accustomed sacrifice? I, for one, cannot
think itI, for one, will not consent to spare the
prisoner. If Carrawissa has a friend in this
council
,
let him now speak.
When he sat down, the same chief that had so
warmly espoused his cause in the former part of
the deliberations, now rose and addressed him.
Brother! I am the friend of your son's
memory
;
but I am a worshipper of the Great Spirit, and
wish more to obey him, than to please any friend.
I spoke for your son to-day;you heard me. I
spoke sincerelybut I did not then know the will
of Maneto. He wishes for the victim we
intended
for your son. That victim, your son, and all
of us, are his already. He only asks for his own.
We cannot refuse himand your son cannot be
offended. Carrawissa is too just, to ask from us
what is not ours to give, and too generous, to be
angry for our not doing what we can not. He saw,
from our decision to-day, that our hearts were
with him, that our desires were to please him, and
that it delighted us to do him honour. He will
not, therefore, blame us for surrendering to the
prophet of Maneto what we had devoted to him,
but what Maneto claims as his own. Nay, hearken
to me;he loved Maneto so well, that he will
rejoice
in yielding his offering to him; and Maneto
will reward him, for he returns every service
ten-fold
.
Brothers and warriors! we must give up the
prisoner.
Carrawoona again rose, and in a hasty and
impassioned
manner exclaimed
Brothers! hear me again! I am but one
among hundreds, and my voice is nothing. But,
were I only one among thousands, I would let you
hear it. I say, the man who slew my son, shall
die! I will hunt him over the earth, till he be
sacrificed
.
My heart must have revenge! Maneto
could never forbid it. I do not believe what the
prophet says. He says that Maneto wants this
white man. What can he want with him? Are
there not plenty of Indians to perform his errands,
and to worship him? And are they not more
faithful
to him, and more beloved by him, than the
superstitious
white men, who have so many different
creeds? If it be true, that Maneto wants some
one, would he not prefer an Indian? If the
service
he wishes to be done requires honesty, are
not Indians more honest than the Whites? What
Indian defrauds his neighbour?If it requires
bravery, are we not brave? Think of our last
battle.If it requires wisdom, think of our sages,
and our old men, endowed with prudence.
Hear me, brothers!I will not believe that
for any purpose the Great Spirit would prefer a
white man to an Indian. Has Tonnaleuka said
what Maneto wants with the prisoner? If Maneto
wanted him, he would have told for what
purpose
.
But he has not, or we would have heard
it, if Tonnaleuka be his prophet.
Brothers! you percieve there is something
wrong in this matter. Be not, like children,
ready
to believe every story; nor upon such a slight
pretence, deprive my son of his right. Act
wisely
.
Comply with the customs of your fathers, or
refrain from them only when you have some
sufficient
cause.
Warriors! I only ask justice for my son, and
the Great Spirit never yet opposed justice.
He sat down, and Tonnaleuka again advanced
He pointed his sacred wand, the very motion of
which had power to strike awe into the minds of
the savages, three times towards heaven, and
three times towards each member of the council.
He then raised it, and streching his arms upwards
with his eyes directed to heaven, exclaimed:
Oh, Great Spirit! what is man, that he should
question thy will! Didst thou not make him!
Dost thou not sustain him! Is not the ground he
treads on, thine! Is not the light he sees, thine!
Is not every step he takes, and every breath he
breathes, dependent on thy will! And he presumes
to dispute thy right to thy creaturesHe dares to
ask for what purpose thou layest claim to thine own!
Glory be to thee, that thou dost not consume
him in the instant of his presumption!Thou art
mercifulinfinitely more merciful than he is.
Thou acquittest when he would condemn; thou
forgivest when he would revenge; thou sparest
when he would destroy. Happy is it for him,
that thou art not like him!
Oh Maneto, hear me! wilt thou now indulge
the vain questions of him who disputeth thy will?
Oh, wilt thou answer his sinful inquiries?
He here paused for about a minute, during
which he seemed to mutter something in a
super-natural
language, and displayed so much the
impressive
,
sublime, and entranced appearance of
one holding communication with superior beings,
that all present gazed silently upon him with
spell-hound
attention and astonishment.
At length he was heard to say:Thanks!
thanks!It is good in thee! Then turning
abruptly
to Carrawoona, he touched him with his
wand, and with an energy and a fervour which
made even that hardy savage tremble, he
exclaimed
:
Son of presumption! Thou who would
thwart the wishes of God; instead of blasting
thee on the spot, I am permitted to tell thee what
in thy daring wickedness thou hadst the
hardihood
to ask. Listen to me now, and ask no more.
That man in bonds, whose flesh thou wouldst roast
in the fire kindled by thy vengeance, is in the
favour
and under the protection of the Great
Spirit
;
and, listen farther, I am commanded by the
power who moveth all minds, to open to him the
sacred fount of inspiration, to lay before him the
oracles of the Great Father contained in this holy
book, which profane hands should never touch, into
which profane eyes should never lookand which
none but the favoured of Heaven can understand.
This is the destiny allotted to this youthlet man
resist it if he dare!
Brother, said he, turning to the chief sachem,
I claim that prisoner in the name of the Great
Spirit;I claim him as the successor to my gifts.
Order him to be unbound!
The chief sachem instantly complied. Charles
was unboundand Tonnaleuka advancing towards
him,
Follow me, my son! said he; we go to
worship our Great Father!
Charles followed his conductor, who, with his
eyes steadily fixed upon heaven, in an attitude of
deep and solemn devotion, walked slowly from
amidst the assembly towards the east, leaving
every
individual who beheld him, not excepting
Carrawoona
himself, awe-struck, and fixed
immoveably
to his place, as if by the effects of
enchantment
.
It was several minutes before any of the Indians
recovered from the spell that was over them,
sufficiently
to speak Carrawoona, whose thirst for
revenge against the conqueror of his son was still
the leading passion of his soul, was the first to
recover
from that temporary entrancement which
had produced a suspension of all passion, so
irresistibly
thrown over the whole assembly by the
wonder-working power of Tonnaleuka's energy
of manner, and preternatural and awful
appearance
.
With the return of his faculties, this thirst
of revenge, heightened now by the irritation of
opposition and the vexation of disappointment,
returned
with all the force and rancour with which
such a feeling can fire a savage breast.
He started up, with all the wildness of
ungovernable
rage agitating every feature, and
addressed
the assembly.
Warriors! hear me! I am bereavedI am
defraudedI am used ill! Did my son deserve
such treatment? Would Carrawissa have acted
so to the memory of any one here?
Warriors! What have you done? Think of
it. You have permitted the destroyer of a
Chippeway
and hero, to walk free from his bonds, and
to escape that fire through which his soul should
have been sent as a grief-offering to comfort th
soul of your hero.
Chippeways! It is useless now to argue. It
is useless to rage. It is useless to complain. I
will act. Is there any man here who will act with
me? I will have my vengeance. Has Carrawissa
here any friend who will assist me? You
condemned
the white man. By your sentence he
was mine. You gave him to be sacrificed to
my wrath. Your own act made him mine. You
could not take him from me. I will yet have him,
and execute your sentence.
Warriors! I again ask, is there one who will
assist me?
He sat down, and no one offering to reply, the
chief sachem addressed him.
Brother! None speaks to you. I will. Hear
me patiently, and let the madness of your passion
yield to reason. We all grieve for you. Look
round, is there a countenance but has grief upon
it!
Brother! Do not fight against the Great Spirit.
Do not resist the will of Maneto! He, who is the
author of all things, should be permitted to
regulate
all things as he pleases. It was he, and not
we, who deprived you of vengeance. He had a
right to do so. The prisoner was his property,
before he belonged to either us or you. I am
sorry you oppose him. It is awful, Brother!For
our parts we would offer ourselves to the sacrifice
first.
Brother! we love youbut if you fight against
Maneto, we must resist you. Your madness grieves
us. We fear it will lead you to wickedness, and
to ruinfor in contending with the Great Spirit
you must be overcome. Persist not, or your fate
will be awful!
Carrawoona started to his feet, and, in a tone
of rage, bordering upon absolute frenzy,
exclaimed
,
Chippeways! Have I no friend, then! Am I
alone in my wish for justice! Do you want to
frighten me from my purpose! You should have
known long since, that Carrawoona cannot be
frightened. My revenge you call madness. But
I call it justice. You advise me to desist from
seeking it. Bid the rocks of the mountains skip
like the squirrels of the tree. Will they obey you?
Vol. I. H
No. Bid the roar of Niagara resemble the
purling
of that brook. Will it listen to you? No.
Neither will I. But I will talk no more. I will
pursue the destroyer of my son. My weapon shall
find his heart, if it should be through the heart of
Tonnaleukanay, the bosom of Maneto will not
protect him. Maneto protects no one from justice.
But should his lightning shrivel me on the instant,
if I only obtain vengeance on my enemy, I shall
be satisfied.
He here gave a sudden yell, and made a leap to
the eastward, as if he intended immediately to
pursue the object of his resentment. The chief
Sachem ordered him to be stopped, when a
warrior
rising, called out
Brother! Let Carrawoona take his way. We
have nothing more to do with the business. We
have given up the prisoner as the Great Spirit
ordered. He has not ordered us to restrain
Carrawoona's
madness. We should not take the
protection
of the white man out of the hands of
Maneto
.
Let Carrawoona go. We have done our
duty.
The furious and untractable savage was
accordingly
allowed to take his course as he pleased, and
the assembly broke up.
CHAPTER VII.
A merry day, my boys, we'll have,
And form a happy quorum:
Confound the dog who would be grave,
While he can swig the jorum!
While grog inspires we'll frisk it out,
Just as the whim may please us;
And daddy Care will kick about,
Till he no more can teaze us.
Savelabour
.
It
will be readily supposed, that the French
officers
were much pleased with this fortunate
termination
of an affair in which they had so much
interested themselves. During the time that their
feelings alone influenced their minds, they were,
indeed, heartily rejoiced. But when they
reflected
on the political consequences that might arise
from the escape of any of the English prisoners,
especially of the leader of the enterprise, which
had, as every one of the prisoners now knew, been
defeated by their secret instrumentality, they
began to feel uneasy, and heartily to wish Charles
Adderly in perdition, rather than in Philadelphia,
or any other place where he could inform the
world of what they had done. They felt a strong
repugnance to have any human being sacrificed in
the cruel manner in which the Indians often
sacrifice
their captives; but they, at the same time,
dreaded the results which they had a right to
suppose
must take place if the government of Great
Britain should hear of the part they had taken in
the attack upon their subjects in the time of
peace. Either a national war might be the
consequence
,
or their own government might disavow
their conduct, and deliver them up to the
vengeance
of the British. As men they rejoiced in
the safety of Charles Adderly, but as politicians,
and servants of a European power, which might
not, in the end, sanction and defend their conduct,
they feared the evils that would most probably
result
from the information which, in the event of
his safe arrival among his friends, he would not
fail to give to the political world.
The contingency, however, suggested by this
political consideration, was more remote and
uncertain
,
than that produced by the splendid and
unexpected
triumph of humanity they had just
witnessed
;
and we must do them the justice to state,
that they, for some time at least, gave way to the
amiable impulse of feeling, rather than to the
selfish
influence of policy. The more, however,
they considered the matter, the influence of the
political consideration increased; and rather than
be brought to an account for their conduct, by
their own government, or be the occasion of a
European war, of which they could not foresee the
consequence, they became the more heartily
inclined
to wish that the prisoner, for whom they
had felt so much, and pleaded so strenuously, had
been, by some means or other, put out of the way,
as it was from his information alone, they
believed
they had any thing to fear.
It must not be supposed, however, that the steps
they had taken to defeat the designs of the British
Ohio Company, were altogether unauthorized by
their government. The French ministry had
given
instructions to their Canadian servants, the
spirit of which, at least, sufficiently warranted all
they had done. But the agents in this affair knew
too well the degree of reliance to place upon such
instructions, especially when they are at all vague
and indefinite in their particular application, as
these happened to be, when it suits the interests of
cabinet ministers to disclaim them, to feel altogether
easy under the idea that the British government
might hear of their conduct, and make it a national
concern. It would, indeed, they were aware, be
soon known that the Ohio Company's party had
been attacked and defeated by the Indians; but,
without some specific information, they themselves,
although they might be suspected, could not be
convicted of participating in the deed.
Had Charles, like the other prisoners, been in
their custodym every thing would then have gone
to their satisfaction; since their prisoners they
could hold an indefinite time, and liberate only
when other national concerns occurred to render
what they had done of too little importance to
occasion
inquiry.
It was partly under the influence of these
considerations
,
and partly, we would fondly hope,
with a view to save Charles's life, that after the
breaking up of the Indian council, one of them
offerred
to Carrawoona a large reward if he should
bring Charles a living prisoner to them at the fort
of Le Buf within six months from that time.
To this offer the chief replied,
Brother! what do you mean? Do you think
I will give up my son's right for a hire? Will I
let him remain unavenged for the sake of
presents
?
No. I will pursue this white warrior from
no such motive. I would not move my finger at
him, to injure him for the paltry object of gain.
And, listen to ithad I him now in my power, all
the wealth of your great king would not save him
from being sacrificed to the departed spirit of my
son.
Brother, I would be angry with you but for
this reasonI know that the customs of your
country
prevent you from thinking your offer an insult.
H 2
This, and your ignorance of our customs, excuse
you. But, as every Indian may not make this
consideration
,
that I now do, I would advise you never
again to offer any of our warriors a bribe to act
contrary to his feelings. If you do, he will be apt
to turn upon you as the bear turns upon those who
wound him.
Brother! I leave youI pursue our released
prisoner, but it is to destroy him, for he who
killed my son must not walk abroad upon the
earth.
So saying, he left the Frenchman with a look
of high disdain, and set off on his revengeful
errand
.
The day after the council was held, the French
proceeded with their prisoners for fort Le Buf,
which was situated on French Creek, near where
the present village of Waterford stands. It was the
commander of this fort, who, in conformity both
to his official instructions, and to the general
policy
of his government, to prevent any English
settlement
from being made west of the Alleghany
mountains, had excited the Chippeways to attack
our hero's party, and thereby laid the foundation
of that memorable war, which, although it began
disastrously for the British arms, yet resulted,
under
the energetic auspices of the elder Pitt, in the
total expulsion of the French authority from this
extensive region of America, and in their
discomfiture
in the East and West Indies and several
other parts of the world, raising the power and
influence
of the British nation to the highest
pinnacle
of strength and glory.
It was during the disastrous period of this war,
that the celebrated but unfortunate expedition of
Braddock to this wilderness, the most
impressively
disastrous of all its events, took place, and
perhaps
,
had more the effect of drawing the attention
of mankind towards these remote regions, and
their savage inhabitants, than any other
transaction
recorded in history. This noted expedition,
which is still referred to as an epoch in the annals
of Western America, will, on account of the
influence
it had upon the fortunes of those persons whose
adventures we have undertaken to relate, come
again under our notice during the course of this
work, when, we trust, it will be in our power to
give the reader some more circumstantial details,
concerning it, than he can procure from any
public
history at present extant. We may here
observe
,
however, that it is not our intention to
dwell more minutely upon those matters that are
already known to the world, than will be
necessary
to afford a clear and satisfactory view of their
connexion, with the individuals in whose affairs
we are more immediately concerned. We,
therefore
,
beg leave respectfully to refer those who may
wish for more extended information, of a public
character, concerning Braddock's Times, to the
numerous, well-written, and copious histories of
that interesting period, which the world already
possesses, and which we can assure the reader
are, generally speaking, almost as authentic and
worthy of credit as our own.
The French officers, who, as we have seen,
were both glad and sorry at the escape of Charles
Adderly, finding that they could make no better of
it, like true Frenchmen cast care aside, and the
next day set out with those prisoners which
remained
to them for Fort Le Buf, in order to have
them there secured, as soon as possible, from any
accident, whether of escape or of Indian violence.
The prisoners were now only seven in number,
four having died of their wounds the preceding
night. Of those who survived, three also were
slightly wounded, among whom was our
acquaintance
Peter M'Fall, whose left arm had been
broken
by the stroke of an Indian battle-axe before
he submitted to be bound. Thus, of those twenty
gallant fellows that had so lately crossed the
Alleghany
mountains, only eight were now living;
and but five, one of whom was Charles Adderly
himself, had escaped from their savage foes
without
personal injury.
The French were assisted by a dozen of
Chippeway
warriors, in escorting the prisoners to their
destination, the remainder of the savages having
agreed to continue their excursion into the
Virginian
settlements, for the sake of additional
plunder
and scalps.
When the escort with the prisoners had
proceeded
about five miles on their way, they came
to a tent situated at the foot of a hill, near a small
brook, at which they halted. In this tent there
were three or four squaws, and two Frenchmen,
one of whom was lying on a tolerably comfortable
bed made of buffalo skins and some blankets
spread upon dried leaves, which, as it was now
considerably advanced in the
fall
, were scattered
in great abundance all through the woods. This
man was labouring under a bad wound from a
musket ball he had received in the groin, which
still remained there. His appearance, as well as
that of his companion, immediately suggested to
Peter M`Fall that these were the men he had
overheard
conversing previous to the attack of the
Indians
,
one of whom he knew he had wounded. He
heard this man moan once or twice from the pain
he endured, and his heart smote him from a
consciousness
of having been its cause.
He went forward to the patient, and taking him
by the hand, Now, honey, said he, did you
ever see me before?
The man looked at him, and answered No.
By my sowl, then, he continued, your eyes
were not so good as mine. And it is lucky for my
head they were not, or else a bullet might now
have been lying as snug in my brain as in your
kidney, my jewel!
The man stared at himwhen, as if struck with
some happy idea, he continued
Arrah now! I have it as nate as my nail. Be
asy, nowYou'll be cured as stout as a peat-stack
in a jiffy, my dear. I'll have the doctor at you at
once, with his tongs and pincers, and he'll soon
whisk out the fellow that tazes you, smack into
your fist, like the toss of a ha'penny.
He here called out to the young Philadelphia
surgeon we have before mentioned, whose name
was Killbreath.
By my sowl, doctor! here's one of the natest
jobs for you, you ever did in your life. Och, now!
if Doctor M`Faddyen was only here, he wouldn't
be after asking the second bidding to do it, when
he knew it was an ould friend of mine. But, God
bless the mother's son of you, you can do it as nate
as a hairfor you spliced my arm, long life to you,
as firm as a whip handle.
By this time the surgeon had approached, and
offered his service in extracting the ball which
tormented the patient; and the French having
secured
the instruments he had brought with him
from Philadelphia, being a part of the plunder,
of which they knew the value better than the
Indians
,
they were soon produced, and the
operation
performed.
When Peter got the bullet in his hand, he
examined
it closely, and perceiving that it was
perforated
with a small hole, he commenced flinging
it into the air, and catching it again, exclaiming as
he continued this operation
By Saint Columb! I have you again, my boy!
But the devil a bit of Billy Binder will ever hang
a string of
pig's byrses
to you again, my honey
He's snug in the moulds now, under the rotten
leaves yonder, where we left him yesterday.
Jasus
be with him!But when I again send you
scampering
after a Frenchman, don't stick in his hip,
my honey, to torment him, but blow his brains out
at once, or don't touch him at all, at all, my
boy!
Peter was here interrunted in his apostrophe to
the bullet, by one of the Frenchmen accosting him
rather abruptly, in an unintelligible mixture of
French and English, to repeat which verbatim,
would be as difficult as to read it would be
uninteresting
.
It merely contained an exclamation,
par le diable! that Peter looked as if he were the
man who had wounded the patient. Either the
suddenness of the address, or the awkwardness of
the language, prevented Peter from at once
comprehending
its meaning; and after staring a little
in some surprise at the Frenchman, he replied
Look how, master? But ogh, in troth, my
jewel, it's your own self that looks like a
gentleman
,
every inch of you. Arrah! blessings on the
swate mother who bore you!
The Frenchman, impatient at not receiving a
direct answer, chattered something still more
unintelligible
,
and completely beyond Peter's
comprehension
,
which occasioned him to exclaim
By the holy Derg! master, if I can make
either
top or bottom of what you mane, I'll be
hanged.
The Frenchman catching at the word
hanged
, of
which he knew the full meaning, repeated it
several
times, with so many significant gestures, as
well as sounds, that Peter began very distinctly to
perceive the alarming purport of the uncouth
jargon
addressed to him. He knew some French,
as we have before observed; but this man had
spoken neither French nor English. Hence
Peter
either did not, or he perhaps wished not, at
first, to understand him. His meaning, however,
was now too plain for misconception, and Peter
replied
Why, master, sure now, your honour, you'll
be asyYou wouldn't be after hanging me for
shooting a man through the griskin, after he had
shot me through the head? By Jasus! it wouldn't
be law, your honour.
Shoot vous troo de head! exclaimed the
Frenchman in astonishment.
But Peter continued, without noticing his
exclamation
And
didn't I tell you besides, your
honour
,
that the doctor would cure him as nate as a
leek?and faith and troth, you see (here he
tossed
up the bullet, and caught it again) he has half
done it already. My blessing on the swate
mother's
son of him, and the jewel of a smith that
made his long tongs for catching bullets, into the
bargain.
The wounded man now understanding the
nature
of the discussion between his countryman and
Peter, explained to the former the circumstances
of the case, acknowledging himself and his
companion
to be the aggressors, not only on account
of acting, as they were then doing, in the
character
of spies, but on account of having shot first at
Peter.
Peter, finding that the patient had exculpated
him, seized his hand, and cried out, Arrah!
long life to you, for yourself is a gentleman; and
I wouldn't send my ball any where but into your
kidney, my honey, where it lay snug among the
fat, like a little pig in a gutter, and the devil a bit
of harm I knew it would do you, my jewel. Och!
the blessing of Saint Bridget be on you, for you
have saved poor Peter's neck from the twist,
master
and
the doctor will cure you in a week, as
sound as a church bellOnly now take a little of
the swate stingo to warm your stomach, dear.
Sure, don't I know from experience, that
whiskey
Here the surgeon interrupted Peter, desiring
him to leave the patient, for that quietness and
repose were absolutely necessary to him after the
operation he had undergone. As to whiskey or
brandy, or any such liquor, it would, he
observed
,
be extremely detrimental to him in his
present
situation.
Peter complied, observing, Sure, doctor, you
know better than I do. But, by my sowl, I
always
found a drop of the cratur good for
myself
and
sure you know I couldn't think it bad
for another.
The performing of this operation, and the
enjoying
of a plentiful repast, consisting of venison,
wild fowl, Indian-corn bread, biscuit, and various
other luxuries supplied from the French stores,
and which the squaws, assisted by one of the
Frenchmen, who was fond of good eating, had set
about preparing for the party immediately on its
arrival, consumed so much of the day, that it was
proposed to pitch a few more tents, and spend the
remainder of it in this place in jollity and
enjoyment
.
This agreeable proposal was relished by
the whole company; and the French, during the
evening, got into such good humour with the
prisoners
,
that they permitted them to join in their
revels, ordering the Indians, however, to keep a
good look out, lest any of them should escape.
As to the surgeon, whose manners, education, and
good sense, indicated the gentleman, he had,
immediately
after the operation, obtained, on his
parole
of not attempting to leave them until they
should arrive at Le Buf, the indulgence of being
master of his own motions, with the command of
a rifle, for the purpose of hunting and fowling.
There are, perhaps, no people in the world
better
qualified to enjoy the passing moment than
the French. They have the happy faculty of
dismissing care whenever it becomes troublesome
to their feelings, or unnecessary for their
purposes
;
and on this evening they exerted that
faculty
in a most commanding and masterly manner.
We have seen that they had brought themselves
into a predicament calculated to make the most
serious impression on their minds, and that they
were fully aware of the circumstance; and yet,
when they had got their bodies replenished with
a reasonable portion of substantial fare, and had
warmed their minds with a sufficient dose of
brandy
punch, or, as on this occasion they were not
over nice, with whiskey grog, they bade for the
time adieu to all uneasy reflections, and
absolutely
set the power of fortune at defiance, except the
power she had of making them happy for the
present
.
Random catches, songs, jests, glees, dances, and
loud laughing, were all that they now either could
or would think of. In vain did the affairs of
to-morrow
venture to intrude. Out they were
hurled
there
was no room for them in bosoms where
hilarity, mirth, and pleasure possessed every
corner
that could be spared.
If the French are noted for unthinking frivolity,
the Irish are no less so for a fervency of feeling,
by which they are enabled to suppress the
suggestions
of care, as effectually as the French can
dismiss
them. Hence, when opportunity tempts,
they are ever ready to yield with their whole heart
Vol. I. I
and soul to the full tide of enjoyment, and swim
away on its stream, regardless of consequences.
On this occasion, therefore, there was none who
entered with more spirit into the humours of the
evening, than Peter M`Fall.
On a green level sward, by the edge of the
rivulet
,
the party formed a circle; but it was for a
very different purpose from that formed the
preceding
day by the Indian council. Here were no
life and death matters to be discussedhere were
no serious and vehement calls for the destruction
and burning of a fellow-beingno loud and
sorrowful
manifestations of griefno fierce and
reiterated
imprecations of vengeance upon an
unfortunate
captive. Grief, vengeance, and every other
uncomfortable feeling, were banished as
unwelcome
guests; while good humour, sprightliness,
cordiality, and joy, were invited to be present, and
inspire the revels of the evening by the merry
strains of a Frenchman's flute, and the jolly sounds
of an Irishman's voice; for, in the intervals of the
flute player's performance, Peter, with great spirit,
industriously exerted himself, to prevent the
company
from wanting music, by singing the merry lilts
of his native country.
At the commencement of the
supple-heeled
sport,
the Indians had entertained the party by
exhibiting
the various dances of their nation. The war
dance, the hunting dance, the courtship dance, the
marriage dance, and the birth dance, had each its
characteristic gestures and manuvressome of
which were, to the eyes of the Europeans, so
grotesque
,
wild, and ludicrous, that they were kept in
an almost continued roar of laughter.
Peter was particularly tickled with the romping
and capering of the squaws, who were tolerably
handsome women, and had been nothing loth to
exhibit their personal attractions in the various
attitudes of their native dances.
By the holy Patrick! but it's yourselves can
do it in style, my girls! would Peter every now
and then exclaim, while he snapped his fingers and
beat time with his feet, in the high glee of
admiration
at their extraordinary and laughable
performance
.
His fancy was particularly taken with the
gracefulness
and agility of the youngest of the squaws,
who made really an interesting figure among the
groupe; and at every remarkable bound she gave,
smack went Peter's fingers in the air, dash went
his heel upon the ground, and loud rose his
obstreperous
cheers of applause.
Well done, by the powers of Barnaby! Och!
kape it up, you swate little soul, ye! There
goes mettle for you!he thus kept vociferating,
while the company kept laughing, almost as much
at his extravagancies, as at the singularities of the
dancers. At length his heels itched so much to
bear a part in the boisterous amusement, that he
could keep his seat no longer, but springing up,
and with his sound arm, hooking in with the
squaw, who had pleased him so much, he leaped,
and bounded, and capered among the Indians with
all his might, imitating as well as he could, their
gestures and behaviour, to the great admiration
and delight of all present.
When the Indians and Peter had finished, the
French felt inclined to succeed them in the
exhilarating
pastime; but as their musician was
desirous
to join them, and it was impossible for him
to both dance and play the flute at the same time,
it was determined that Peter should either whistle
or sing to them, as he best could, to keep them in
time. But he knew none of the airs to which
they were accustomed, and after several
ineffectual
attempts to learn some of them, the French
were at last obliged to accommodate themselves to
those he did know. They accordingly set off
with Nancy Dawson, to which they tripped airily
and nimbly along in measured movements, with
great art, sprightliness, and vivacity. Now, (for
every ten or fifteen minutes they changed their
mood, and Peter had as often to change his tune,)
the light corant, the gay cotillion, the merry
riggadoon
,
the measured waltz, and the sprightly jig;
succeeded to each other, and were rattled off to
the successive tunes of the Irish Washerwoman,
the Soldier's Joy, the White Cockade, Patrick's
Day, and Morgan Rattler. Through these various
measures the nimble-toed Frenchmen tript gaily
and smilingly without much noise, so that their
easy but busy exertions were, in comparison to
the violent romping, jumping, and tearing which
had just preceded them, what the rippling of a
gentle river is to the roaring billows of the stormy
ocean.
Becoming at length somewhat wearied with this
species of pastime, the party sat down to an
evening
repast, rudely enough served up, no doubt,
but plentiful and substantial. This was succeeded
by the singing of some jovial songs, of which, only
the two following have come into our possession.
The first was sung by one of the Frenchmen, and the
other by our friend Peter. Each sung in his
own language. Of the Frenchman's performance
we of course can only give a translation.
The Frenchman's Song.
Let philosophers prate, and discuss as they will,
The maxims of knowledge, the sources ofbliss;
The true fount of knowledge and pleasure is still
To be found in a free-flowing bottle like this.
Ah! look where it sparkles so brilliant and gay,
To enlighten our minds and our sorrows to cheat,
Ah! think of what virtues the soul can display,
When 'tis warm'd into bliss by a cordial so sweet,
Though scorn'd by the world, and deserted by friends,
Each evil in life I will bravely despise,
If only this cordial that energy lends,
Which to each jovial fellow it freely supplies:
When in debt, I will care not for bailiff or dun,
If this heart-cheering cordial sticks close to my side,
For in life, as in war, half the battle is won,
When the foe is met boldly, and boldly defied.
Then, hear me, ye sons of true wisdom and mirth,
For mirth and true wisdom are always combined,
The wisest of things we can do upon earth,
Is like true-hearty souls to give care to the wind.
Then drink from this bottle, the draught of delight,
That can banish each harassing care from the soul,
Round and round let us drink, and experience to night,
The best cordial of life is a free flowing bowl!
Peter M'Fall's Song.
In Ireland so frisky,
With girls and with whiskey,
How happy was I when a strapping young lad:
Every market and fair,
To be sure I was there,
With my breeches and boots like a gentleman clad.
And then as to money,
Och! sure it was funny,
To hear the dear shillings and sixpences clink,
And the lasses so sweet,
Arrah, faith! when we'd meet,
By the powers I could bring them along with a wink
Then so snug in the fashion,
We'd take up our station,
In a tent that was covered with blankets and sheets;
Arrah, landlord! be quicker,
And bring us that liquor!
I would cryand he'd skip like a cat in the streets.
I 2
So snugly thus fix'd up,
The punch I soon mix'd up,
Then handed it round so genteely and neat,
That the girls, the dear creatures,
With sweet smiling features,
Saidpunch in a tent was an elegant treat!
Och! the punch was so cheery,
That soon we got merry,
And the lass I lov'd best sat so snug in my arms;
That I courted and kiss'd her,
And teaz'd her and bless'd her,
'Till she blushed like the moon with a million of charms!
I was then in my glory;
But to cut short my story,
The best thingoch! conscience, I tell you the truth,
On the girls to be trying,
To make them complying,
Is a jug of good punch and a neat strapping youth.
The next morning the party re-commenced
their journey to fort Le Buf, leaving the
wounded
Frenchman, who was unable to endure removal,
under the care of one of his countrymen, and two
squaws. They arrived at the fort on the fourth day
of their journey, without meeting with any
accident
worth recording. Here the escort of Indians
received presents for the services they had
performed
,
and were dismissed.
As for the prisoners, they were all strictly
confined
within the ramparts, except the surgeon, who
was occasionally permitted on his parole, to recreate
himself in the adjacent country. Our friend
Peter
had it in his power, very shortly after his
arrival
,
on account of his understanding a little French,
to have exchanged his situation of a prisoner, for
that of a servant to one of the officersbut he
promptly refused it, from a motive whimsical
enough, perhaps, but certainly honourable to his
fidelitywhich was his resolution not to serve any
one in a menial capacity except Charles Adderly,
to be again with whom, soon became the leading
feeling of his mind. He was, indeed, treated
tolerably
well as a prisoner, and the gay sprightly
manners of the garrison were perfectly congenial
to his disposition; but still he was a prisoner, and
consequently under the control of certain
regulations
which he did not relish; and what was
worse, he was absent from his beloved master,
who might be so circumstanced as greatly to
require
his services. He, therefore, jolly, gay, and
thoughtless as his disposition was, had sufficient
reason for feeling uneasy in his captivity.
CHAPTER VIII.
Creation's God! with thought slate,
Thy hand divine I see
Impressed on seenes where all is great,
Where all is full of thee!
In every scene, where every hour
Sheds some terrific grace,
In nature's vast o'erwhelming power,
Thee, thee, my God! I trace.
Helena Maria Williams
.
Although
Tonnaleuka and his protegee had
retired
in a slow and unhurried manner, while in
view of the Indians, yet they were no sooner
removed
from their observation than the former,
who was aware of Carrawoona's implacable and
rancorous temper, thought proper to hasten
onwards
with the utmost speed. He conceived it
prudent also to change his direction, so that if the
unappeasable savage should pursue them, he might
not be on the proper track. He accordingly
turned towards the northward, in which course
he kept for about two miles, then turning again
towards
the east, in about two hours after he left the
savages, he reached the Alleghany river nearly six
miles above the Shanapin's town. Here they
entered
the wigwam of an Indian, who received them
with great reverence and respect. Tonnaleuka
desired
this man to prepare some refreshments, and
while this was doing, he beckoned to Charles, to
whom he had not yet, since their leaving the
Chippeways
,
spoken a single word, to follow him. He
led the way into a narrow dingle at a short
distance
from the wigwam, and to Charles's surprise
addressed him in English.
My son, said he, let us here worship the
Great Father of all, and thank him for thy
deliverance
.
They fell on their knees, and the prophet lifting
his eyes, and spreading his hands to heaven,
addressed
the Supreme Origin of all things as
follows
.
Almighty Spirit! We kneel here to adore
thee, and to thank thee. We adore thee for thy
incomprehensible greatness, for thy illimitable
power, and thy everlasting purity. We thank thee
for thy inexhaustible goodness, thy readiness to
forgive, and thy forbearance to punish. Thy
greatness fills us with wonder, thy power with awe,
and thy purity with admiration. Thy goodness
inspires our love, thy readiness to forgive, our
hope, and thy forbearance to punish, our
gratitude
.
Almighty and good Spirit! We humbly adore
thee and thank thee, at this time in particular, for
the manifestation of thy goodness in delivering this
youth, as thou hast this day done, from the hands
of an unpitying and cruel enemy, who had
determined
on his destruction. He is on his knees
and I am on mine. Look at us, merciful Spirit!
look into our heartsthou wilt see them truly
thankful for this signal instance of thy protecting
and kind providence. He thanks thee because
thou hast, in this manner, assured him of thy
friendship
,
and I thank thee, both because thou hast
saved him, and because, in doing it, thou hast made
me thy humble instrument.
Almighty Spirit! Hear us yet! We entreat
thee to be always our protector from evil, our
deliverer
from distress, and our director and
conductor
through all the snares and intricacies of
life, so that we may act pleasingly to thee, and be
worthy to be called thy children, and deserving of
thy favour.
Almighty Spirit! we have done, and we hope
thou hast been graciously attentive to what we
have said. Amen.
When they arose, Charles caught the prophet
by the hand.
Father, said he, permit me to ask, who
thou art, whom that holy God we have been
worshipping
,
has made the means of rescuing me from
a cruel death?
My son, replied Tonnaleuka, I am a man
like thyself. I have borne trials, perhaps more
severe than thou hast, and yet survived them; for
our Great Father was good to me. He has sustained
me, and thanks be to his goodness, he has not left
me without some comfort in the world. In return
for his mercies, I wish to serve him in that way,
which of all others, is the most pleasing to him,
the doing good to his creatures.
My brothers, the Indians, wage often bloody
and cruel wars against each other, and, as I know,
that the Great Father is always displeased at any
cruelties inflicted upon his children, I think it my
duty, and I make it my business to go from tribe
to tribe, endeavouring to reconcile them when
they quarrel, or if they will fight and destroy each
other, trying all in my power to mitigate their
mutual
ferocity, and to soften and restrain their
revengeful
feelings, or when I cannot succeed in this,
to disappoint them, if possible, in the execution of
their barbarous designs.
I may have other cares and employments on
hand. But, my son, I wish you to inquire no
further
concerning me. Tonnaleuka cannot now tell
all he knows to the world, and I should not wish
inquiries to be made, that I must refuse to answer.
My son, you are now in a vast wilderness, far
from the habitations of your people, without friends
or resources. Something must be done for you,
and as our common father has thrown you upon
my care, I shall try to do something. May I ask
what would best suit you to be done?
Charles now stated to him the name and
residence
of his father, and gave him a concise
account
of the expedition which he had commanded,
and which had ended so disastrously. He
concluded
by observing, that he now saw nothing left for
him but to make his way back to Philadelphia as
speedily as he could.
My son, said the Prophet, you speak
wisely
.
To return to your friends is the most prudent
thing you can do. But the journey is long; and
considering the state of the country, to a single
individual
,
especially a white man, bred up in cities
it must be impracticable. You will find no
provisions
on the way, and there is scarcely a path to
guide you, for more than two hundred miles. It
will not be easy to overcome these difficulties.
But I shall try to assist you, and, perhaps, it
may be done. In this country you are not safe,
I acknowledge it, my son. My brothers of the
different tribes will distrust you, for they have
had reason to both distrust and dislike white
people. But from Carrawoona your greatest
perils
will arise. Beware of him, for I know he is
implacable, and will destroy you if he can.
My son, until we can prepare matters for
your return to the east, I will tell you where to
reside, and where I hope Carrawoona will not find
you. About fifteen miles from us on the bank of
the Monongahela, lives the only man of your
nation
in our country. His name is Frazier. He is
my friend. He will entertain you till I meet you
there, which will not be many days. I would go
with you now, but I must watch the motions of
the Chippeways, and especially of Carrawoona,
that I may frustrate, if possible, any attempt against
you.
My son, we will now partake of the
refreshments
prepared for us in this wigwam. Its owner
will supply you with arms for your protection,
for he is my friend; but as the day is now
advanced
you had better lodge with him to-night. In the
morning you will proceed to the house of my
white brother, Frazier, where you will remain till
I see you.
They accordingly partook together of a
tolerable
comfortable repast of some wild-fowl, and a
preparation of Indian corn called
homony;
after
which Tonnaluka departed, having first given
Charles particular directions how to find the way
to Gilbert Frazier's residence. It is as needless to
repeat the expressions of gratitude poured out by
Charles to his deliverer, when they separated, as
to describe the profound feeling of pious awe and
thankfulness to the Deity with which, when left to
his own reflections, he felt his mind impressed.
The reader who knows the circumstances we have
detailed, will give him credit for both, as readily,
and to as great an extent, as if they were painted
with all the accuracy and force that the colouring
of language could give them.
There is no feeling whatever so conducive to
sound repose as the impression of being in the
favour and under the protection of a supreme
providence
.
The wonderful deliverance which
Charles had obtained from an awful and
apparently
inevitable fate, naturally produced upon his
mind this evening such an impression; and with
feelings of a most comfortable, although still much
excited description,such feelings as the mariner
who, after the extinction of all hope, has been
just rescued from the power of the raging main,
experiences on laying his exhausted frame upon
the kindly-spread couch of some hospitable
cottager
he
laid himself down upon the bed of dry
leaves and buffalo skins prepared for him in one
corner of the wigwam by its friendly owner, and
enjoyed a sound and refreshing sleep, which
continued
till the morning.
When he arose, his friendly host supplied him
with a gun and a war axe; and with the former
upon his shoulder, and the latter, together with
some ammunition and provisions girt to his side, he
set forward on his journey to Gilbert Frazier's.
The reader may smile at the care with which a
young fellow like him took to equip himself for so
short a ramble as fifteen miles; an excursion which
a smart young man of his age would in our day
think no hardship to perform in two or three hours.
But although I have, on careful inquiry,
satisfactorily
ascertained that the young men in
Braddock's
Times were in all respects as courageous,
spirited, and active, as they are even in ours, and
that Charles Adderly was one of the most
eminent
of them in all these particulars; yet he
expected
and found the performing of that same
journey of fifteen miles in about seven hours, to be
no despicable task. But it was the difficulty of
the road, and not the incapacity of the man, that
made it so; and I can assure any of our modern
heroes, who may imagine themselves fit to make as
good a figure in a novel as Charles Adderly, that
they would have considered the journey of which
we are speaking as difficult, and found it as
tedious
as he did.
To have a proper idea of his situation, and
what he had to encounter, let any reasonable
reader
lay down this book for a moment, and figure to
himself a young man of sociable habits,
accustomed
Vol. I. K
during all his past life, to the animation and
refinement of cities, colleges, and churches, to
paved roads, flagged pathways, and graveled walks,
now dropped, by one of fortune's capricious freaks
into the midst of a barbarous and pathless
wilderness
,
a close grown forest of heavy timber of all
sorts, oak, hiccory, maple, chesnut, walnut, birch,
dogwood, poplar, &c. &c. the small spaces between
which were completely choked up by a luxuriant
growth of underwood, wild grasses of
innumerable
descriptions, not to mention the trunks of large
trees that had fallen from the decrepitude of age, or
were overthrown by the fury of storms, and which
were perpetually presenting impassable
obstructions
to the progress of the traveller. And this
too, in an extremely hilly country, intersected by
deep ravines, glens, and dingles, without number
or regularity, and out of some of which it was
impossible
for a'stranger to disentangle himself
without
incredible labour and dexterity.
Such was the country through which Charles
Adderly, to whom any savage path that might be
in it was totally unknown, undertook, in the year
1752, without guide or companion, to traverse, for
a short distance indeed, but over ground so
difficult
,
and amidst impediments so intricate, that it
would be easier now to traverse the same space
in two hours than it was then in seven.
The directions, however, which Charles had
received
from the prophet, were plain, and he set
forward fearing nothing, although it was the first
time he had ever been altogether alone amidst the
woods. But this very circumstance, instead of
rendering
his excursion disagreeable, threw over it a
peculiar charm of novelty and romance, which, to
a mind constituted and circumstanced as his then
was, was inexpressibly attractive.
Here I am, he would say to himself, as he
often paused to reflect, on arriving at a height from
whence he could look for some short distance
a round him; here am I, in the midst of this
immense
forest, cut off from that busy world of
civilization
with which alone I am acquaintedHere
am I, with God alone for my companion! Oh,
what a sublime and awful thought! Yet, why
tremble at its vastness! It cannot be
presumptuous
,
for it is true;
For He is always present; ever felt
In the void waste as in the city full!
Oh, adorable Being! thou hast placed me here,
where I feel the true independence and dignity of
my nature, for here I am only dependent on thee.
In this place society claims nothing from me, nor
I any thing from it. Were all my fellow-men
extinguished
from the earth, and I left alone here,
dependent
,
just as I now almost feel myself to be,
solely
on my own exertions and thy blessing, how
awful
,
how solemn, but how ennobling, how elevating
would be the thought! O! let me for a moment
enjoy the magnificence of the idea, for it will
only
last a moment. There are yet men in the
world with whom I must unite, and to whose
institutions
and forms, I must bendand this
soulexalting
illusion of my God and myself, being all
my concern, will soon vanish. But it is thy will,
and I submit.
At other times the recollection of Carrawoona's
malignancy towards him, would occur to his mind,
and he would, especially in passing ravines, glens,
and rivulets, instinctively exert all his faculties of
hearing and seeing, lest an enemy should attack
him unawares. At length, having exerted both
mind and body, with intense energy for a number
of hours, he reached the Monongahela; but he
was uncertain from not seeing the marks referred
to in his directions, whether Gilbert Frazier's
house was, in respect to the river, above or
below
him. In this state of incertitude respecting
his course, he reclined himself beneath a large
maple tree that grew upon the bank, amidst a
thicket of sassafras, elders, and hazels, in order
to reflect a little before he should determine on
which way to proceed. Here his mind soon
wandered
from its original object, and turned towards
the waste and barbarous state of the country
where he was then seated, a forlorn, solitary
being
,
amidst ferocious savages, and the object of
intense
hatred to some of them.
Among other subjects of reflection, the strange
circumstance of a white man enjoying a
permanent
and unmolested residence, in such a country,
and amidst such inhabitants, drew his attention,
and excited his surprise. What could induce a
single individual of European origin to settle
among such a people, and in such an unpromising
region, he could not understand; and if it had not
been that he considered it almost profane to doubt
the word of Tonnaleuka, he should have
conceived
the tale of a white man being in that
vicinity
,
as altogether fabulous. To believe it,
however
,
he was resolved, since his deliverer had
said itand believe it he did; but he conceived
that this man must be some adopted son of a
savage
,
perhaps married to a squaw, and in point of
manners, disposition, and understanding, in all
probability, nothing superior to his wild brothers
of the forest.
Having come to this charitable estimate of
Gilbert's
character, he rose to pursue his course up
the river, almost careless whether or not it should
bring him to the residence of one of whom he had
formed so indifferent an opinion. Since
Tonnaleuka
had agreed to meet him there, he, indeed,
was desirous to find the place; but that he
believed
he could easily do without at present giving
himself much trouble about it, before
Tonnaleuka
could be expected to reach it. In the
meantime
,
the falling in with any Indian wigwam might
afford him for the night, as hospitable, and
perhaps
as comfortable a lodging. With these ideas
revolving in his mind, as he was advancing from
his thicket, he perceived to his utter
astonishment
,
two white and decently attired females,
approaching
towards him down the bank of the
river. He suddenly drew back into his
concealment
,
struck, not with fear, but with awe; for as
he could not suppose civilized white women to be
in such a place, and, at the first glance, he saw they
were not squaws, he for an instant concluded them
to be nothing less than supernatural beings, sent
for some divine purpose, to visit him in his
present
extraordinary situation. His philosophy,
however, instantaneously arose in arms against
this conclusion; yet he thought fit to remain
concealed
for a few minutes, until he had discovered
something more satisfactory concerning objects
that had struck his excited fancy as being almost
too lovely to be earthly.
When they drew near enough, however, to be
more minutely distinguished, he became satisfied
that they were of kindred clay, real flesh and
blood like himself; and he was delighted to hear
their language to be English, for not perceiving
him, their discourse was not interrupted as they
passed.
It was indeed, a noble, a holy proceeding,
worthy of Tonnaleuka, whose whole pleasure is
in doing good, said she, whom he perceived to be
by far the most beautiful of the two, and whose
loveliness
had, indeed, rivetted his attention so much
K 2
as to make him almost overlook her companion,
who replied
And Paddy says that the prisoner was one of
the best looking young men he has ever seen. I
hope Carrawoona will not find him.
A good providence will protect him! said
the first. That God who afforded him such a
timely rescue is able, and I trust that he will still
be willing to extend over him his shield of
safety
.
Charles, who at once, knew himself to be the
subject of this conversation, felt something
inexpressibly
sweet in the tones of that voice which
had uttered this wish for his safety; and he was
only prevented from rushing forward to express his
gratitude, by that profound feeling of awe he had
imbibed at their first appearance, and which was
now kept alive, not by an impression of their
being
unearthly, but by a conviction that one of them
surpassed all of her sex he had ever seen, in
loveliness
and excellence. He came forward,
gradually
,
out of his concealment, as they moved from
him, with his eyes steadily fixed upon them, or
rather upon her who had charmed him more than
ever woman had before. At length, descending
into a valley, they were hidden from his sight.
I will follow her, thought he, although it be
not the course I intendedsuch a being can lead
no where but to safetyto happiness.
He accordingly hastened after them; but, on
coming to the point at which they had
disappeared
,
he was surprised to behold, in a romantic
vallcy
beneath him, through which a meandering
rivulet
sought and obtained a union with the
Monongahela
,
a neat and prosperous looking farm,
with its worm fences, it orchards, its
meadow-ground
,
and its fields of maize, and its stacks of
grain, surrounding a large, substantial log
dwelling
house, of comfortable appearance, having the
necessary establishment of barn, stable,
cowhouse
,
hog-pens, &c.; not, indeed, all under one
tremendous roof, as is the present Pennsylvania
fashionbut separated from each other, and
erected
at different, but convenient distances; giving
the whole as much the air and character of a small
village, as many a one whose name may every day
be seen honoured as such, with a place in the maps
of the American states.
He paused for a moment, at the unexpected sight,
and experienced such a sensation of home-felt
comfort glowing in his heart, as the long
wandering
exile on returning home, feels at the first sight
of his native village. He felt something congenial
to his very existence, in the appearance of the
sheep, cows, and horses, that were browsing in
the meadows; nay, the very
cackling
of the geese,
and dung-hill fowls, had on this occasion, the
power
to warm his heart, and give him pleasure.
The fair object that had attracted him hither,
had been for about a minute concealed from his
view, by the intervention of some trees. But he
now again perceived her, with her companion,
advancing along a short lane towards the dwelling
house. He hastened after them, when, through
an opening in the wood to his left, he suddenly
perceived two men hoeing out potatoes in a field,
which here spread itself to view between him and
the river.
He approached them and perceivedbut I also
perceive that I must cut short this chapter. A
dull performance ought never to be a long one; it
is so exhausting upon the reader's patience, of
which I am desirous that he should retain a
sufficient
stock to accompany me through the whole
work. I therefore make it a rule when I feel
myself
beginning to write heavily, to cease writing;
and, if possible, to cease at a place where it will
be convenient for the reader to cease reading. By
this means we have both an opportunity of
recovering
our spirits, and of recommencing our
respective tasks with renewed vigor and
animation
.
CHAPTER IX.
'Tis the nobility of nature, which
Survives through all vicissitude of time
And fall of states; that pure and innate love
Of human kind, which prompts the generous soul
To hospitable deeds, which bids it ask
The lone and friendless for its welcome guest.
Basket of Scraps
.
I may, at once, inform the reader, for I hate a
round-about way of telling a story, that the two
men whom we at the termination of the last
chapter, left Charles Adderly in the act of
approaching
,
were Gilbert Frazier, and his son
Archy
.
They were so busily employed in hoeing
out their potatoes, that they did not observe him
till he had advanced almost close to them, when
Archy called out
Father! look about! I purtest there's a white
man comin' to us!
Gilbert turned round, and with an evident
emotion
both of surprise and respect, moved his hat,
and then standing stock still with his hoe in his
hand, gazed intensely at the stranger until he
spoke.
My good friend, said he, I am an
unfortunate
wanderer in this wilderness, where I am both
surprised and rejoiced to meet with a white man.
May I ask a few night's lodging from your kind
ness?
Lodgin'! yeswia' my hearta white man!
an' a gentleman! wia' my heart! But, may I ask
your name, sir?
My name is Adderly.
AdderlyAdderly!you cam' wi' the Ohio
settlers, I doot na, sir, ye hae been unfortunate.
But we'll gang to the hoose, sir. Ye'll be needin'
something to eat an' drink, na dootfor there's
no muckle to be had that's guid for ony thing in
thir woods.
So saying, he moved forward a few stepsthen
turning suddenly, he mutteredWha kens! wha
kensit may be saeand turning to Charles, he
asked
Adderly, ye say they ca' ye?
Yes
An' canna ye mind to hae ever heard o' yen
Thomas Adderly, wha, when I leev'd on the
Junaita
,
I was tauld had come frae Ireland to
Philadelphia
?
That Thomas Adderly is my father.
Thomas Adderly! your father! Gilbert
exclaimed
,
staring earnestly in Charles's face
Thomas Adderly your father! my auld frien'!
here he threw away the hoe which he had till now
retained in his hand, by way of a walking stick
and catching Charles eagerly by both hands, he
continued his exclamationsWhy! why! the
sin o' my auld frien', Thomas Adderly o'
Maughrygowan
!
come to ask lodgin' frae meay,
that ye'll hae, the best that I can gi' yethe best
bed, the best meat, the best drink, the best o'
every
thing that Gilbert Frazier can gie you. The
sin o' my auld frien' frae MaughrygowanArchy!
Archy! rin fast, my braw lad! rin fast, and tell
your mother that the sin o' my auld frien', the sin
o' Thomas Adderly o' Maughrygowan, is come to
see us. An' haste ye, Archy! get the white-faced
calf killed, it's the fattestan' be na langsome,
noothat's a braw lad! An' the sin o' my auld
frien' o' Mauhgrygowan! (here he again eagerly
shook both Charles's hands) the sin o' Thomas
Adderly
,
has cam' a' the way owre the Alleghany
Mountain, an' the Laurel Hill, an' the Chesnut
Ridge, to ask lodgin' frae me. Guid bless ye,
man! ye'll hae lodgin' and leevin' frae me baith,
as lang as ye like wi' a guid-wullie heart, an a'
thoosan' welcomes. An' the auld squire, yere
gran'father, (mony a funny day I had sportin' wi'
the youngsters roon the shrubberies an' the park
wa's) I wonner if he's to the fore yet?
Charles informed him that according to the
latest
accounts, the old man was alive.
I'se warrant ye for it, replied Gilbert; he
was aye a douse body, an' will, dootless, wear
weel. But come in, come into the hoose. Nelly,
puir Nelly! hoo glad she'll be to see the sin o' her
auld acquaintance! Ye were na born in
Maughrygowan
,
were ye?
No; Philadelphia is my birth-place.
Ah! weel, it's na differenceye're the sin,
an' the gran'-sin o' Maughrygowan menan' na
doot a true Irishman in your heart.
Charles assured him, evidently very much to his
satisfaction, that he had a great partiality for that
country; for, independent of its being the land of
his fathers, he had there received the chief part
of his education, and spent the happiest portion
of his life.
Then ye hae been in Ireland, sir?
Yes; within these last six months I sailed from
Londonderry.
Frae Derry! frae Derry!an' hoo did the
auld country, and the auld city look?An' ye
were at Maughrygowan too, dootless?
Yes, I spent part of the last winter there.
An' was every thing the same? Ah! I doot
na, there are mony changes there syne I saw it. But
I need na ask sae fool a question frae you, that
was na then in the lan' o' the leevin'.
They had by this time arrived at the door of
Gilbert's dwelling, where Nelly, in consequence of
Archy's information, was waiting in a state of
great impatience to meet them. Recollecting
Maughrygowan, and the days of her youth, she had
just taken time to make herself
decent
, as she
phrased it, by putting on a clean cap and a shawl,
in which, although she was now verging towards
the pale days of fifty, she still exhibited some
remains
of those blooming graces which thirty years
before had captivated Gilbert; and if report spoke
truth, had drawn some eulogies, which had come
to her ears, and now returned to her recollection,
from the then young squire, Thomas Adderly,
himself.
Nelly! Nelly! exclaimed Gilbert, as they
approached where she stood in the door; here,
here is the sin o' young squire Adderly, oor auld
acquaintance, an' the gran'-sin o' the auld squire,
just cam frae Derry owre the sea, an' a' the way
owre the Alleghany mountain, an' the Laurel Hill,
an' the Chesnut Ridge, to ask lodgin' frae us! Did
you ever think o' seeing sitch a day?
Nelly made a courtesy, and Charles holding out
his hand, she caught it, and, while the tears were
perceptibly swelling in her eyes, she bade him
welcome, adding,
Ah! sir, indeed ye pit me in min' o' auld
times, ye hae sae muckle o' the braw looks o' your
father. Glad I am truly, to hae yen frae the place
un'er my roof. In thir wild woods, I ne'er
expected
to be sae christianlike on this side o' the grave.
I kenned your father weel in Maughrygowan
Ye hae muckle o' his looks! But come inwe
maun get something ready to mak' ye comfortable
for ye maun hae had a hard time o't through the
woods. I wonner in the wide warl hoo ye could
guide yoursel' amang them.
She had by this time led Charles to the door of
a decent but small apartment, in which the
furniture
,
although it was rough, was convenient, and
extremely clean in its appearance. It had been,
as the greater portion of the furniture in the house
was, of Paddy Frazier's workmanship, whose
industry
,
when he would be industrious, inclined
more to matters of this kind than to cultivating the
soil. It was well for the respectability, at least in
point of appearance, of Gilbert's household
concerns
,
that Paddy did possess ingenuity of this
nature
;
for he himself possessed little or none, and
as to Archy, he was totally destitute of any thing
like it. We may here mention, that Paddy had
procured tools, and other necessaries for making
furniture, from several of the Indian traders, and
that he had, in consequence, frequently tried his
hand in manufacturing chairs, tables, bedsteads,
chests, &c. which, although, as we have already
said, they were coarse, yet were convenient, and
gave the whole habitation an air of considerable
comfort. The floors, doors, partitions, and shelves
of the house, were also placed and kept by him in
a tolerably neat condition; so that if, upon the
whole, Gilbert's residence had no splendour to
exhibit, nor much display of taste to boast, it was
at least clean, commodious, and comfortable.
It was two stories high, built of large logs hewn
square, with a long platform or porch in the front,
made of logs squared on the upper side, and solidly
fixed together, like a wooden pavement, on which
were constructed seats for enjoying the luxurious
atmosphere of a summer's evening. The front door
was in the centre of the building, from whence an
entry or hall, of about five feet wide, extended
through the house, leading out of the back door
Vol. I. L
into a secondary or inferior house of round or
unhewn
logs attached to the other, which served for
a kitchen. The stairs, or rather steps, for they
were nothing but a
broad-stepped
ladder, boarded
behind, arose from the back part of the entry.
Both floors consisted of four rooms, of nearly
equal size and construction, but not equally well
furnished; the one into which Charles was now
introduced
by Mrs. Frazier being by far the most
favoured
in this particular.
But this room contained what would, in Charles's
eyes, had it been ten times more rustic than it was,
have given it the superiority, in point of
attraction
,
to the most splendid apartment in any of the
king of England's palaces. After saying this, we
need scarcely add, that it contained the beautiful
being whose charms had lately, as we have related,
so strongly riveted his attention, and attracted him
hither, and whom the reader has no doubt already
conjectured, and conjectured with truth, to be
Maria Frazier.
She arose at his entrance, and was introduced to
him as Gilbert's youngest daughter; and Nancy,
who had been in another apartment, at that
instant
appearing, she was introduced as the eldest.
The manner in which these two buds of the
forest
received Charles, was considerably different,
and, considering the circumstances of their
respective
minds and education, somewhat surprising.
From Archy's report, which had been faithfully
made to his mother, they knew that some
extraordinary
visiter, and a white-man, was approaching
them. When they received this report, they were
both in a plain, but neat dishabille. But with this
Nancy was not content. She hastily retired to
improve her appearance, and exhorted Maria to
do the same, which she declined. It must not,
however, be supposed that she did so from any
affectation of humility, much less from any
unwillingness
to show the stranger a proper degree of
respect
.
Neither was she quite indifferent as to the
effect of her appearance upon him; nay, it must
be confessed, that before she decided against
changing her apparel, she had taken a sly stolen
glance or two at a mirror, (for Gilbert had been
supplied by the river traders with several of these
articles,) which hung conveniently for such a
purpose
,
upon the wooden wall of the apartment.
The result of this examining glance was, that she
should be content with her present condition; for,
although not gaudily, she was neatly apparelled,
and having no desire particularly to attract the
stranger, she did not think it necessary studiously
to adorn her person.
When she first saw Charles Adderly, however,
a feeling of an undefinable nature, such as she had
never before experienced, seized upon her mind,
which caused her, in a certain degree, to repent
her not having followed Nancy's advice: and when
this feeling became considerably heightened, by his
name suggesting to her, that this must be the same
interesting youth who had been so lately rescued
from the cruel vengeance of the savages by her
revered Tonnaleuka, she, in spite of herself, felt
uneasy and embarrassed, from the idea that it had
been in her power to have made a better
appearance
in his presence. The reception she gave
him, therefore, was cordial, but a little
constrained
,
and her salutation, although kind and sincere,
was diffident and timid, and her manner was
rendered
the more embarrassed from her
dissatisfaction
with it.
On the other hand Nancy, prepared for the
occasion, with all her rural grandeur on her,
addressed him with an ease, gaiety, and
self-possession
partaking somewhat of familiarity, which
Charles would have felt rather disagreeable and
unbecoming, but for the apparent candour and
innocency
with which it was accompanied. In short,
the manners of the uninformed, and,
comparatively
speaking uncultivated Nancy on this occasion,
displayed all the undaunted and unblushing ease of
the fashionable lady, while the intelligent and
enlightened
Maria exhibited the bashfulness,
diffidence
,
and confusion of the rural maid.
But, strange to tell, Charles Adderly gave
unhesitatingly
the preference to the manner of his
reception by Maria. In her he either saw, or
fancied
he saw, the effects of artless nature, genuine
modesty, and refined sensibility; and these he
preferred
infinitely to any effort of cultured manner,
or disciplined conduct. In his view, nothing in
the world could exceed in elegance, tastefulness,
and propriety, the dress and behaviour of Maria,
while every thing he had ever seen, or believed he
ever could see, fell infinitely short of the charms of
her expressive countenance, and the witchery of
the thousand nameless graces that he was every
moment discovering more and more to adorn both
her person and manners. But at this time, it must
be confessed, that he was in a state of mind which
disqualified him from being an impartial judge of
any thing relating to this young woman. He was,
although, perhaps, not quite aware himself of the
circumstance, getting fast in love with her, and,
consequently, was unfit to conceive of any thing
but perfection in all she either thought, did, or said.
Thir twa lasses o' mine, said Gilbert, after
all the party were seated, except his wife, who,
placing some bread and cheese before them,
withdrew
for the purpose of getting ready refreshments
of a more elaborate description for her guest
Thir twa lasses o' mine, ye maun ken, hae been
broucht up like deers amang the woods here, an'
it maun be a treat for them to see ony thing like a
ceevilized white man. Lasses, haud up your heeds,
an' dinna be shyMr. Adderly's a gentleman born,
the sin o' my auld acqua'ntance, young squire
Adderly, o' Maughrygowan. Agh! I kenned
your father weel thirty year synethere wasna a
brisker an' bonnier young fellow in a' the parish.
I hope he's douse yet, an' wears weel?
Charles assured him that he was still healthy,
and very little altered in his appearance since he
first knew him.
Glad o't, glad o't, sir, replied Gilbert; I wad
gie the best horse ere put leg in my stable to hae
yae shake o' his auld hand, just for the sake o'
Maughrygowan an' oor daffin days. But, sir,
Paddy tells us, ye hae had an unco escape frae
them wicked Indians, the Chippeways. But
Tonnaleuka
can manage them when naebody else can
he's a wonnerfu' man that.
Charles now informed him, that it was by
Tonnaleuka's
directions that he had obtruded himself
upon his hospitality.
Obtrude, sir! interrupted Gilbert, obtrude!
I'm no' very muckle learned, sir, but I think that
word means comin' to whar yen's no' weelcom'.
Noo, sir, gin ye were na as weelcom' here as in
your father's parlour, this hoose shouldna belong
to Gilbert Frazier.
I am sensible of your kindness, observed
Charles; and to tell you the truth, I in reality
feel happier just now under your roof than ever I
remember to have felt under my father's, or I
believe
that of any other person whatever.
Thank ye, sir, I'm glad o'tan' I wish hoo
lang ye may bide wi' us, gin it will answer ye.
Ye'll no' think o' ganging hame this six months, at
ony rate. The winter's sae near-han', it wadna'
be possible.
L 2
Charles replied, that his duty required that he
should carry or send speedy intelligence of his late
disasters to Philadelphia; but that with respect to
the measures he should adopt concerning his
return
,
he had thoughts of being regulated altogether
by the advice of Tonnaleuka, on whose knowledge
of the circumstances and nature of the country, and
on whose prudence, candour, and friendship for
himself, he had every reason to rely.
Ye're richt, my frien', said Gilbert, 'an ye're
wise too in thatTonnaleuka kens ever thing
aboot this country, an' I may say aboot every ither
country in the warl', better than ony man leevin'.
I'll no' except Sir Isaac Newton the Englishman,
wha they say is the greatest philosopher, an' the
wisest man, except Solomon, that was ever known.
Ye wad wonner, sir, to hear Tonnaleuka
sometimes
talking. He's sae learned, an' has sae
muckle knowledge, that nane o' oor family can
after comprehend him, except Maria there, that he
has made amaist as wise as himsel'.Dinna think
shame, Maria! it's na affront. I wad rather than
my hale stackyard fu' o' corn that I could
un'erstan'
sitch things sae weel as you do. That
glaiket lassie, yere sisterfeggs, Nancy, I maun
tell on you, ne'er could master a single lesson for
a' the pains he took wi' her.
Father, replied Maria, who perceived that
Nancy felt uneasy at this exposure of her
ignorance
,
you draw too unjust a comparison
between
us. Nancy has in many things profited
much by Tonnaleuka's instructions. And as to
myself, considering the remote and secluded
situation
in which I am doomed to pass my life, the
gratifying
my desire for knowledge may have been
rather disadvantageous than otherwise; it may
have occupied that time which would have been
employed with more advantage to both you and
myself in personal labour.
Personal labour, my bairn! why think ye,
that gin ye had never sae muckle as learned the
alphabet, that I wad hae let you work in the
cornfields
or meadows, or in grubbing roots, or makin'
rails?Na, na, faith! I wad hae done a' thir
things on my knees first. But hae na ye been
aye busy, Maria? Why Nelly has aften said that
ye hae doon mair sewin', an' spinin', an' knitten
in yen week than Nancy, wi' a' her disregard to
learnin', has done in a month.
My dear father, said Maria, seeing that
Nancy
was extremely hurt at this invidious
comparison
,
do not be so unjust towards my sister. I
cannot bear to be complimented so much at her
expense. She is far from being so ignorant as you
suppose; and Tonnaleuka, whose judgment you
will not dispute, has often borne testimony to the
goodness of her heart, and the amiability of her
disposition. As to industry, does she not perform
thrice the labour that I do in dairy matters, and in
kitchen concerns? From which of us does our
mother receive the greatest assistance in the
preparation
of your food? Is it not from her? Yes,
father
,
she has often, when she supposed I was too
busily employed in these matters, desired me to
leave their performance to her, lest I should fatigue
myself. I cannot bear that so much kindness
should not receive justice.
Here Nancy, whose feelings were more touched
with her sister's generous defence than they had
been with her father's accusation, caught her by
the hand, (for she sat next to her,) and with a
heart evidently as full at least of gratitude as of
vexation, said
I must confess that my father speaks truth; for
you hae obtained far more benefit than I ever
could from Tonnalenka's lessons. And as to
heavy
working, you are always as willing as I am, but
as you are not so strong, you are more easily
fatigued
,
and on that account I do not like to see you
much at it. You are better and more usefully
employed
at quilting and darning, and figuring, and
knitting, and such things that keep the house trig
and comfortable, than I could be, for I couldna like
you confine myself closely at them, as they
sometimes
require.
Here Gilbert, pleased with this generosity of
Nancy, as if his heart misgave him for having said
any thing to hurt her feelings, arose and, catching
both her and Maria by the hand, said
Ye are baith my bairnsgude lasses to yere
father, an' I hae na' fan't to find wi' ye. I dinna
prefer the tane to the tither; I like ye baith alike,
an' I'm muckle pleased that ye hae aye liked yen
anither sae weel. Indeed ye hae aye been a
comfort
to baith me an' yere mither in this wild
wilderness
.
Withoot ye, I think we wad hae brak'
oor hearts. But God has gien ye to us, an' ye hae
made the desert smile on us. An' oh! may he
lang preserve ye to us, my bairns, baith gude, an'
innocent, an' contented as ye noo are.
So saying, he kissed them both upon the cheek,
and turning to Charles, asked him if he would walk
out with him upon the porch for a few minutes,
until supper should be ready. Charles readily
assented
,
for he perceived that the old man wished to
relieve his daughters of their presence, in order
that Nancy might the sooner recover her serenity
and cheerfulness.
CHAPTER X.
Around the bowl of vanished years,
We talk of joyous seeming;
And smiles that might as well be tears,
So soft, so sad's their beaming;
Till memory brings us back again,
Each early tie that twin'd us,
How sweet's the cup that circles then,
To those we've left behind us!
Moore
.
As Nancy's mind was not the most susceptible
in the world of lasting impressions, especially of a
disagreeable kind, a short time was sufficient to
restore
her usual vivacity and good humour; and as
both she and Maria now assisted their mother,
supper
was soon got forward, and Charles and his host
were without delay summoned from their
perambulation
on the porch.
When Charles saw the plentiful, and even
luxurious
table that was spread before him, and the
good-hearted and contented family, whose own
industry
,
under the blessing of Providence, had thus
procured it for them in a wilderness, sitting down
to partake of it, his heart was filled with sensations
of pride for his species, arising from this proof
before
his eyes of what their own efforts, if properly
directed, can do to supply their wants, and make
them happy in this world, under even the most
unpromising
circumstances. What a contrast, thought
he, is what I now behold, to that scene of savage
wrath and vengeful feelings to which I was
yesterday
so nearly becoming the victim!
Impressed with these ideas, his heart was in a fit
state to join fervently and thankfully in that simple
but sincere address to the Giver of all good, which
Gilbert who, ever since he had been cut off from
all opportunity of enjoying public worship, had
been careful always to pronounce, not in set words,
but in the spontaneous expressions dictated by his
feelings at the moment, before partaking of the
bounty of his Maker. Sometimes this address,
being the only species of religious worship strictly
attended to by Gilbert, was extended through the
duration of several minutes. On the present
occasion
,
it was not so long, but it was still longer
than any fashionable clergyman would ever think
of making a grace. As it was, notwithstanding its
illiterate and unharmonious phraseology, at the
time, highly gratifying to Charles Adderly, I
presume
it will not be unacceptable to the reader, and
shall, therefore, submit it to his perusal, as
follows
:
Great God! oor Maker, an' the maker o' a'
things whilk are in the heavens or on the yearth,
an' the ruler o' baith the city an' the desert! thou
hast gien us these gude things oot o' the bountifu'
stores o' thy providence, that we may nourish
oorsels
wi' them.Albeit we are na' worthy o' the
sma'est morsel o' thy favour, an' could na' mak'
the grun' produce a single ear o' corn, or a koo
bring forth a single calf without thy ordering!
yet thou hast gien us plenty o' baith, an' mair nor
that, thou hast gien us this e'ening, un'er oor roof,
what we hae na' had for near-han' thirty year, a
visiter, an Irishman's son, o' oor ain kind, frae
Maughrygowan. Oh! bless him, an' bless us a',
so that we may be nourished by this temporal food,
an' also, or a' be owre, wi' the spiritual food o'
grace an' glory in heaven. But thou kens better
what fits us than we do oorselswe, therefore,
lippen
every thing to thy mercy, whilk we earnestly
pray for, through Christ our RedeemerAmen.
Many a more splendid supper than Gilbert
Frazier
,
the only cultivator of the ground, at this time
within, perhaps, a hundred miles of him, could
afford
,
has been more splendidly described than I
could describe it. No entertainment could,
therefore
,
be expected from a middling description of
what, at the table of a great man, would scarcely
be accounted a middling supper. I will,
therefore
,
be excused from not entering into tedious
particulars
concerning it. I shall merely state, that at
the one end of the table, (the end where our hero
himself was stationed,) was placed an elegant
roast-joint
of the fatted calf which Archy had speedily
sacrificed for this joyful occasion. By special
request
,
Charles had undertaken to carve and
distribute
this, which I can assure any gay lady or
gentleman
,
who wishes to be informed on the subject,
that he did with exceeding good grace and
gentility
.
Mrs. Frazier and her son, Archy, had each
under their jurisdiction a large barn-door fowl,
elegantly and sumptuously stuffed with the most
sapid and agreeable ingredients the good hostess
could command; the very smell of which when
opened out would, in less than a quarter of an hour
after a full meal, have restored to original vigour
and voracity, the appetite of any hundred thousand
pound alderman in existence. Gilbert himself had
charge of a large dish of excellent potatoes, which
although he said they were as gude as he ever
could raise here, yet were naething like the rich,
laughing, mellow, an' meally jeanachies he used
to raise in Maughrygowan. Still wi' a' their fau'ts
they were aye a favourite dish wi' baith him him
an' Nelly.
When a reasonable havoc was made among
these substantials, Maria and Nancy distributed to
the company and to themselves dainty and enticing
slices of apple pies, custards, or egg puddings, just
as the appetite of each desired. After the
disappearance
of these, Gilbert returned thanks, and the
cloth being removed, (for, dear reader, Mrs.
Frazier
had several table cloths,) he produced from a
cupboard, which was in one corner of the room, a
bottle of brandy; and soon the fragrant and
inspiring
vapours of the punch-pitcher curled swately
and nately as Peter M`Fall would have said, over
the table, which was now lit with a flaming candle
of Gilbert's own mana acture.
On this occasion the social bowl did not frighten
away the ladies as it mostly does within the circles
of ultra civilization and high refinement. But in
Gilbert Frazier's house the superb customs of the
haut `on
were unknown, or rather uncared for; and
as no excess from spiritous liquors was feared by
the ladies, for neither Gilbert nor Archy were
drunkards, and they had no reason to suppose
Charles Adderly one, they conceived that they
could spend the evening as comfortably and as
creditably in their society as any where else.
Nay, they did not disdain, for the sake of
complaisance
and good humour, to use a moderate
portion
of the exhilarating fluid themselves, and to
pledge in its
socializing
draught their good wishes
for their visiter's health and prosperity. But the
degree of their complaisance, I can assure the
world of sobriety, was both as moderate and
modest
as the most rigid could wish, and extended no
farther than the most precise-mannered and
delicately-nerved
lady in Christendom might have
carried it, without risk to either her reputation or
her morals.
Neither did the gentlemen indulge too heartily
in the use of the fascinating liquor. They only
drank as much as tended to expel vapours and
enliven conversation, thereby showing themselves
to be real men, whose strength of resolution
enabled
them to stop at any assigned point in the path
of enjoyment. But we must confess that, although
the ladies only tasted a little for the sake of
complaisance
,
yet the gentlemen used a sufficiency of
the cordial fluid to render their situation
comfortable
,
and their conversation free. It was now that
Gilbert communicated to Charles the history of his
life from his leaving his native country till the
present
time, excepting that passage which related to
Maria's birth. He explained, at the same time, in
his own homely language, the feelings that the
passing events had excited in his mind. In return,
Charles detailed to him the history of the
expedition
that he had lately commanded, its unfortunate
result, and his own adventures with, and
providential
deliverance from the Indians. Maria listened
to his recital with great interest, and seemed to be
particularly affected with his hair breadth escape.
She hung upon his story with fervid and
enthusiastic
intensity, and when he had finished she could
not help exclaiming
Happy, happy Tonnaleuka, who has had it in
his power to do so much good!
Heaven bless ye, my bairn, said Gilbert, for
that gude-hearted sayin'. Oh! Mr. Adderly! gin
Tonnaleuka could only teach the Indians
humanity
to their prisoners, I think he wad be amaist as
great an' usefu' a man as Moses, wha taucht the
Jews the sixth commandment, Thou shalt not
kill! Gin the savages only knew that
commandment
,
and feared to break it, I'm thinkin' I micht
soon hae white neighboors plenty roon me, and
may be some Irish familiesan' its no' likely that
Nelly an' I wad then break oor hearts sae muckle
aboot Maughrygowan.
Alack! cried Nelly, bonny Maughrygowan
Vol. I. M
will ne'er be oot o' my head gin a' the Irish in
America were to settle beside us. Its bonny green
meadows, an' its hawthorn hedges, wi' their sweet
smelling blossoms, an' its saft dimplin' burns, wi'
the yellow primroses an' speckled daisies on their
banks, an' the sweet pretty larks an' the thrushes,
an' the lads an' the lasses, an' the sports o' a
simmer
evening, an' the jokes an' mirth o' a lang
winter's
nichtah! I canna think o' them withoot a
sair heartforfor I'll ne'er see them again!
Here Nelly's heart filled, and she was wiping
away a tear that annoyed her, when Gilbert
addressed
her
Dinna fretdinna fret, Nelly, at misfortunes.
It micht hae been waur wi' usGod didna forsake
us a' thegither. We are aye leevin' examples o' his
gudeness, an' hae oor weans aboot us. We hae
mony comforts. Nelly, gin we should ne'er see
Ireland
again. Dinna think think o't nooit maks
ye greeve owre muckle.
Ah! ye may bid me no grieve, gin ye like,
replied Nellybut dinna Gilbert, dinna bid me
no think o't, for I canna obey ye in that. I maun
aye think o't, though my heart should bleed for't
though it should break for't, as it's sometimes like
to do. It would noo please me, Gilbert, to hear
Maria sing the sang she learned frae ye, an' which
ye're sae fond to hear yeresel, that was made by
Tam Beggs, oor neighboor on the Juniata, whom
the savages burned on that awfu' day at Catanyan.
He made it on leavin' Larne, an' I ne'er hear it
but it does my heart gude, its sae melancholy, an'
it shews that there were ither folk that grieved for
ither places as muckle as I do for Maughrygowan.
An' Maria aye sings it so sweetly, that it makes my
heart baith pleased and sorrowfu'. Ah! it's a
warm-hearted, comforting sang!
Weel, Nelly, observed Gilbert, if it will
comfort ye ony thing, an' Mr. Adderly has nae
objection, I'm sure Maria will please ye. That sang
aye pleases me, though it aye mak's me
mournfu'
.
Charles signified his desire to hear the song, and
Maria, knowing that it would yield satisfaction to
both her father and mother, required no further
solicitation, but sang as follows, with a voice, every
tone of which thrilled through Charles' heart, and
awakened all his feelings of sympathy, tenderness,
and admiration.
The Haunts of Larne.
Oft as I think on other days,
When with a blithe light heart I rov'd,
Those haunts which lovely Larne surveys,
Where first I felt, and first I lov'd;
What sorrows pierce my bosom's core,
Since I must sigh,
Farewell to joy!
Ah! lovely Larne! must I ne'er see, ne'er see thee more?
By Curran's shore I often stray'd,
And scenes of purest rapture knew,
When there I met the sweetest maid
That ever blest a lover's view;
But ah! these joyful scenes are o'er,
And I must sigh,
Farewell to joy!
Ah! lovely Larne! must I ne'er see, ne'er see thee more?
By Inver's banks, so green and gay,
I join'd each little warbler's song,
And tun'd to love the blithesome lay,
The fragrant hawthorn shades among.
Fate ne'er can scenes like these restore,
For I must sigh,
Farewell to joy!
Ah! lovely Larne! must I ne'er see, ne'er see thee more?
Oh! mem'ry, cease! it gives me pain
Such recollections dear to wake;
Yet I will think them o'er again,
Although my tortur'd heart should break.
Yes; still I'll think, and still deplore,
How I must sigh,
Farewell to joy!
Ah! lovely Larne! must I ne'er see, ne'er see thee more?
When Maria had done singing, so deep was the
impression which her melodious voice and
affecting
manner had made upon her auditors, that they
all, for a minute or two, sat silent, as if for the
purpose of prolonging that luxury of sorrow which
she had thus so strongly excited in their bosoms.
At length Nelly, whose feelings had become so
acute as evidently to require relief from weeping,
retired, that she might indulge her grief more
privately
.
Her daughters withdrew also, and as
Charles arose to bid them good-night, he was
irresistibly
impelled to say to Maria. This has
been my happiest night. I shall never, never
forget
it! He then checked himself as if he felt
that he had taken too much freedom, and resumed
his seat considerably embarrassed, with his eyes
fixed steadily upon the door through which she had
passed, as if still beholding the lovely image that
had there left them.
His meditations were soon interrupted by Gilbert
exclaiming, Poor Tam Beggs! his story was a
mournfu' yen! But grievin's a folly, an' we maun
e'en just tak' the warl' as it comesthe sweet wi'
the soor. I yence ran through the gauntlet wi' the
savages mysel'. That was na to be sure sae bad
as being burnt. But there's na gude in
complainin'
what's
gane past is done, an' canna be help't.
We'll e'en, Mr. Adderly, talk o' something else,
an' no' torment oorsel's this way wi' sorrow. Ye
hae na seen my son Paddy yet. I christened him
for oor auld Irish sainthe's a through-gaun chap
winna min' the farm, an's awee owre fand o' the
drap
by times. Ye hae na seen him yet, Mr.
Adderly
?
No, replied Charles, who had by this time
thrown off his reverie, nobut I have
understood
that you had a son of that name.
Ay; but he's a quite different chap frae Archy.
He's a smart fellow, sir, an' a wee crafty in his
disposition
,
that is, when he's dealin' wi' the Indians.
I'm no' pleased at it, for I dinna like them cunning
tricks, it's so much like cheatery. Though Paddy
winna cheat either, I'll no say that o' himbut
he'll no' gie the Indians fair play an' he can help
it. He palms on them shells, an' beads, an' brass
rings, an' ither things, no' worth a button, for
whilk they sometimes gie him hale back-burdens
o' skins o' musk-rat, an' beaver, an' buffalo, that
he sells to the traders comin' doon the river for
fifty times as muckle as they cost him I canna
think it a' thegither fairforbye I canna see the
gude o' him tradin' this way. I'm sure that a' the
skins an' trumpery he has gathered thegither this
six year past wouldna get us a comfortable dinner
in thir woods. I kenna what they're gude for here,
but to look at.
Father, observed Archy, who had just come in
from disposing of the cattle for the night, as Gilbert
commenced this complimentary picture of Paddy's
character and employment, `father, I maun say
you speak owre hard o' Paddy. He disna cheat
the Indians half so muckle as some o' the ither
traders
.
They aye say he deals fair, though he maks
hard bargains; but the men that come doon the
river often cheat them ootricht. The gentleman
maunna think Paddy sae bad as ye ca' him.
I hae na ca'd him a downricht cheat, Archy,
I canna think that badly o' him; but I think it
wad be a mair honest employment, forbye being
mair usefu', to stick by the lan', an' help us to raise
something that we can eat an' wear; for, atweel, I
can see nae gude in them wild beast's skins, an'
bits o' glass, an' auld brass rings that he's so fand
o'. They can neither be made into cakes nor
puddin', Archy; an' as to wearin' themtroth, a
M 2
coat o' the coarest sacking that was ever made into
a beggar-man's poke, wad be mair comfortable.
I perceive, said Charles, that it is not with
your approbation that your son has devoted
himself
to traffic rather than agriculture. But you
seem to get on with the latter tolerably well
without
him; and, perhaps, the furs you speak of him
having amassed, may yet turn out much to his
benefit. They are very valuable in the eastern
cities. As to his obtaining them for articles of
such little real value, if the Indians attach an
imaginary
importance to these articles, they have a
right to please themselves, as much as the white
people have to attach a value to gold and silver,
which are in themselves as intrinsically useless for
either sustenance or apparel, as any of the trinkets
you mention. Your son cannot be said, at least in
the common meaning of the word, to cheat the
Indians
,
when he makes them such a return for their
goods as renders them content to part with them.
It may be sae, replied Gilbert, I dinna dive
sae deeply into sitch arguments as to ken a' aboot
them; but I aye think, that Paddy wad hae mair
ease o' min', an' lieve happier, helpin' us here on
the farm, than in rinnin' after the tails o' the
savages to spy farlies, or to catch a chance o' a
bargain. Forbye, I'm awee flyed that he may
sometime or ither fa' in wi' some slut o' a squaw,
an' turn Indian himsel!
For aught I know, observed Charles, there
may be some danger in that respect, especially as
he never sees any other females except those of his
own family. A trip to the eastward might remove
this danger.
I hae aften thought sae, returned Gilbert;
an' sometimes whan I think o' my twa boys, I
canna help comparin' mysel to auld Isaac, wi' his
Esau and his Jacob. The auldest is the Esau, an'
the youngest is the Jacob; the yen wilfu' an'
stubborn
,
an' the ither obedient an' gude-natured; an'
wi' respect to baith, I aften feel as if I could apply
to mysel' the words o' Rebekah: `I am weary of
my life because of the daughters of Heth: if Jacob
take a wife of the daughters of Heth, such as these
which are the daughters of the land, what good shall
my life do me?'
An' what wad ye hae yen to do, said Archy,
who felt himself interested in the cause of his
father's
uneasiness. What wad ye hae yen to do,
whar' there are na ither women to be had? Ye
wad na surely ask yen to leeve a' his days withoot
a wife?
It's a hard matter, I acknowledge, said his
father
;
an' gin I could spare ye, Archy, I wad send
ye, wi' my blessing, owre the mountains eastward,
as Isaac did Jacob, to get a wife amang the
daughters
o' yere ain kind.
But wad it no' be neest thing to impossible,
said Archy, to coax ony o' them white lasses at
the ither side o' the mountains, to come back here
to lieve in thir savage woods? An' ye ken, father,
ye wad na be pleased gin I staid awa frae ye
a' the gither. Trouth, I canna' tell weel hoo ye
could work the lan', and mind things right withoot
me, noo when ye're getting auld, an' hae sae
muckle mair
cleared
than ye had no mony years
ago. I think, Mr. Adderly, said he, turning to
Charles, that it wad be better for the auld man
that I should bide wi' him, an' gin I should tak' a
fancy to marry, to tak' a squaw, than gang twa or
three hundred miles owre the Alleghany
mountains
,
for a wife, or else ha nane ava. Want, ye
ken, is an unco bare word, sir.
Charles acknowledged that the dilemma was
rather of a perplexing nature. All he could
counsel
him to, was to stay with his father, and have
patience
;
as fortune, by some unforeseen occurrence,
might throw a white woman in his way; in which
case, if he were too hastily to unite himself with a
squaw, he might feel inclined to regret his
precipitancy
.
Oh! sir, said Archy, I'm na just yet sae
madrife for a wife as that comes to. I'm no' just
gaun to marry the first Indian woman I meet wi'.
I'm thinking that I'll gie fortune the opportunity
o' half a dozen o' years yet to bring me a white
wife; after that, I think the auld man canna say
muckle gin I should bring a red daughter-in-law
ben the hoose to him.
Guid forbid! Guid forbid! ye should do sae,
Archy! exclaimed Gilbert, shaking his hand, But
we'll no' talk mair aboot it noo. Gin ye only keep
your word, an' gie us six years to come an' go on, I
doot na but Providence will consider your case, and
provide some yen for you that we may a' like,
before that time. But as to Paddy, I dinna ken
but it wad be wiser in me.
Here Gilbert was interrupted by the door
opening
without ceremony, and Paddy himself entered,
and Gilbert, in a kind of continuation of his
discourse
,
addressed him; An' there ye are, my lad.
We were just talking o' ye, an' I was telling this
frien' o' mine.Paddy, ye maun ken that's a frien'
o' mine, a sin o' my auld acquaintance, Thamas
Adderly, the young squire o' Maughrygown. Ye
didna ken the squire, Paddy, but your mither
kenned them a' weel; an' sair she grat this vera
nicht wi' joy to see the sin o' her auld frien' un'er
her roof in this wild wilderness.
Paddy had by this time approached Charles,
and cordially shaked him by the hand, expressing
great pleasure to see him here so far safe from the
savages.
This young man was rather below the middle
size, and of a slender, but very firm make,
indicating
great agility and endurance of fatigue, rather
than muscular strength. He was not, however,
deficient in the latter respect, his want of sufficient
weight alone preventing him from being
remarkably
powerful. His countenance was keen, smart,
and intelligent; expressive, however, of ingenuity
rather than deep thought, and of cunning rather
than caution. He was slightly pockpitted, and so
much sun-burnt as to be almost of that Indian hue
which he sometimes affected, when he wished to
flatter the native tribes. He also often dressed in
their fashion, and, on such occasions, as he had
learned several of their languages, and spoke them
fluently, he could not easily be distinguished from
any of his red brethren. He had been present, as
a spectator, at the Chippeway council, which had
so nearly sacrificed Charles, in his Indian costume,
on which account, as his dress was now more of a
European than of an Indian fashion, he was not
recognised
by Charles, who had not, indeed, paid
much attention on that occasion, to the appearance
of the individuals forming the mass of the assembly.
He was at this time attired in a rudely formed white
flannel jacket, or rather long vest, with sleeves
attached
to it, being put on in the manner of a shirt,
with that part of the front, usually permitted to open,
tied with tapes. A pair of long canvas drawers
came up to his waist, round which, outside of his
vest or shirt, they were bound with leathern thongs,
instead of buttons, and kept in their place by a
broad leathern strap carried over each shoulder in a
crossing direction, like modern suspenders. The
common Indian gaiters, and moccasins of half
tanned deer skin, and a bear skin cap, constituted
the residue of his dress, which, from its lightness
and freedom from every kind of incumbrance upon
his motions, was well adapted to the full exercise
of that swiftness and dexterity in scouring the
woods, for which habit, and a healthy, sinewy, and
buoyant frame, had rendered him remarkable, even
among the wild sons of the forest.
When he first entered the room he had a musket
in his hand, and a long knife of the dagger form,
for bleeding any animal he might shoot on his
excursions
,
in a leathern sheath at his left side, which
sheath was suspended from a belt that crossed his
right shoulder. On perceiving Charles, without
paying any attention whatever to the address of his
father, before given, he hastily deposited his gun in
a corner of the room, and, with an air of
recognition
,
saluted him with the cordial expression of
satisfaction
for his safety, we have mentioned, adding,
at the same time, But I am sorry that you have
met with so rude and uncivil a reception in our
country.
In that respect, replied Charles, it is a
question
whether I ought to complain or rejoice; for,
since coming to your Wilderness, I have met with
the extremes both of kindness and hatred
happiness
and misery.
Then you have met with all that life can give
you, since you came among us, observed and who
But I think you have purchased your pleasure,
whatever it may have been, dear, by the sufferings
you have paid for it.
But I, perhaps, enjoy it the more sensibly on
that account, returned Charles; and I do not
know if I can grudge the personal hardships and
trials I have sustained from the Indians, since they
have been the means of procuring me the happiness
your father's house has this night afforded me.
It was but a sma' thing we could do to make
you comfortable, said Gilbert. Could we do
mair, I wad be glad o't; for the very sicht o' ye, sae
Christianlike, sae like oorsel's, and o' oor ain kind,
has made us a' blither an' happier
nor
we hae been
for mony a year.
Mr. Adderly, observed Paddy, you have
gained one friend by your misfortunes, for whom
it was, indeed, worth while to endure something
I mean Tonnaleukaalthough, I confess, I should
be very loth to undergo what you did even for
such an acquisition.
To have acquired the esteem and friendship of
that good and wonderful man, replied Charles,
might itself have been sufficient remuneration for
my sufferings; but Providence has added to this
satisfaction others that(here he checked himself,
and hesitated for a moment; then continued)
that providence has shown me in this house
to-night
,
that virtue can secure to herself happiness,
even in a `Wilderness,' amidst savages; and
henceforth I resolve to keep in her paths, so far as
I know them in despite of all temptations to the
contrary. Is not the arriving at such a result worth
all I have endured?
I have no means of exactly comparing the
benefits
such a resolution with the evils you have
undergone," observed Paddy; for I do not
understand
matter
sufficiently. But this I know, that
yesterday saw you in a predicament, to get out of
which I would have thought you excusable in
committing
any sin, although I confess I was better
pleased
to see you escape by a miracle; and I only wish
that in every scrape of the kind you may fall into,
you may be so fortunate. To be sure, you have a
watchful and powerful friend in Tonnaleuka. If
any man can protect you from Indian violence, it
is he. But he cannot do every thing; and, to be
plain with you, for it is only this very day that he
desired me to be so, there are trap-doors of
destruction
into which you may yet fall, if you be not
circumspect. Your arch-enemy, Carrawoona, is
intractable. He has vowed either to sacrifice
himself
or you, and is, at the present time, ranging
the woods, like a wild and infuriated animal, in
search of you. You are safe here, in the mean
while, however; and I have reason to believe that
the prophet will manage matters so, that the
implacable
savage will take the wrong direction in
pursuit of you.
Surely, observed Charles, I need not be
under much apprehension from the hostility of a
single man. His tribe relinquished their claim
upon
me, and he will scarcely dare to destroy what it
was their pleasure to spare.
He has sworn your destruction, said Paddy,
and his tribe have abandoned any further
concern
in the business. The contest is now between
you and him, and God grant the right side to be
successful, say I, which is a wish altogether at your
service.
With arms in my hand, and a watchful eye in
my head, I think, said Charles, if the contest be
only between him and me, I have nothing to fear.
He cannot be more terrible in fight than his son.
He is not, perhaps, more terrible, rejoined
Paddy, but he is more treacherous; and who
knows but he may seduce some of the haters of the
white men (for there are many of them in this
country) to join his cause. He would have had
half a dozen after you from Shanapins-town, but
for the timely interference of Tonnaleuka, who
represented
to the warriors that you were under the
protection of the Great Spirit, who had denounced
vengeance against any one who would harm
you.
I fear much, said Charles, that the
prophet's
generous zeal in my behalf will excite this
rancorous savage to his destruction, which would
be to the world a much greater loss than mine,
and a loss that would grieve me more than any evil
that can befall myself.
You have nothing to fear on that point,
returned
Paddy. Carrawoona, with all his
ferocity
,
will not dare to harm the prophet. If he did,
every Indian arm of man, woman, and child, from
the Alleghany mountain to the Mississippi river,
would be lifted against him, and his name and
memory
would be for ever held in abhorrence, as the
enemy and destroyer of the prophet of Maneto,
their chief deity.
For myself, then, said Charles, I will fear
nothing. Let the savage do his worst.
By heavens! sir, said Paddy, who had
learned
a number of civilized oaths from the white
traders he had so frequently dealt with, and with
which, when he wished to express himself with
more than usual energy, he never failed to garnish
his speech; By heavens! sir, I like your spirit,
and shall keep an eye upon Carrawoona myself, if
he pursues you to this neighbourhood, where I
know every foot of the country a thousand times
better than either he or any one of his tribe.
Charles thanked him for his friendly intentions,
observing, With such protectors as you and
Tonnaleuka
,
I do not see why I should apprehend any
thing from a savage, whose power, unless I am
taken unawares, or unprepared, can do me no
injury
.
Paddy! ye please me noo, said Gilbert; I
aye kenned ye had some spunk in ye, though ye
never made a gude worker on the lan'. I thought
ye were carried awa' owre muckle wi' the Indians,
but I see ye hae nature in ye, an' aye like to serve
yere ain kind, when the pinch comes. Goth!
Archy! you an' I too maun hae an e'e to this
matter. We mauna sit still, an' see a
Maughrygown
Vol. N
man ill-used amang us. Na, na; fegs!
that wadna be natural.
Archy having assented to the propriety of this
opinion, and Charles expressed his thanks for their
kindness and good-will, Paddy observed that the
night was pretty far advanced, and proposed
retiring
to rest. Gilbert yielded to the proposal,
although
,
he said, he would hae been glad to hae
cracked an 'oor or twa langer wi' his
Maughrygowan
freen'; but he comforted himself with
observing
,
that it wadna be the last nicht he should
share a jug o' punch wi' him.
CHAPTER XI.
I see the flowers and spreading trees,
I hear the wild birds singing;
But what a weary wight can please,
And care his bosom ringing!
Fain, fain would I my griefs impart,
Yet dare na for your anger;
But secret love will break my heart,
If I conceal it langer.
Burns
.
Although
Charles's frame had need enough of
repose, his mind had too many objects of
contemplation
to dwell upon after he had retired for the
night, to permit him for a long time to enjoy it.
There was one object, in particular, that soon
swallowed
up the rest, and engrossed every faculty of
his mind, and every feeling of his heart, so
entirely
that he neither thought, nor wished to think, of
any other. What was this object? Was it the
sudden and enthusiastic friendship of his good
host and hostess, and the singular and unexpected
state of domestic comfort in which he found them?
No. Was it the extraordinary and almost
super-human
character and conduct of the benevolent
Tonnalenka? No. Was it his own miraculous
deliverance from an apparently inevitable fate?
No. Was it the unfortunate issue of the
expedition
he had commanded? No. Was it the
persecution
and perils he was likely to sustain from the
inveterate malignancy of Carrawoona? No. It
was something that had a more immediate, more
uncontrollable influence over his thoughts and
feelings
than all these put together: the sagacious reader
will, no doubt, have anticipated me in saying, that
the loveliness of Maria Frazier was this object.
Not her personal beauty, which he thought he
had never seen equalled; not the sweet
intonation
,
enchanting melody, and almost
overpowering
pathos of her voice and manner, when she
sung; not the interesting manifestations of
feeling
and embarrassment in her first reception of
him; not the wisdom, propriety, and refinement
of her whole deportment and conversation; not
the kind and generous disposition displayed in her
defence of her sister; not one of these, perhaps,
singly and by itself, would have been capable of
producing the intense impression that was now
made by her image upon his feelings, and to the
influence of which, as he lay meditating upon her,
he totally resigned his whole faculties. It was the
happy union of all these excellences, which he
perceived so strikingly combined in one
captivating
individual, and that too in a Wilderness, amidst
savages, where, of all places in the world, he least
expected to meet with such a being, that now
overpowered and absorbed his whole fancy,
feelings
,
and reflections, his whole desire, his whole
heart and soulin short, that had thrown him
desperately
and incurably into love, as fervent and
rapturous as ever man felt.
It was to the enchantment of this wonderful, this
all-subduing passion, that his mind alluded, but
which his words dared not express, when he
informed
Paddy that he had experienced a happiness
since he arrived in the Wilderness, sufficiently
remunerative of all the evils he had undergone;
and he now blessed that Providence which had
conducted his steps, even though it had been
through danger and bloodshed, to the abode of so
much beauty and excellence.
With such a woman for my wife, my life
would, indeed, be one of happiness; but without
her, alas! it must be one of misery! he would
frequently say to himself during this night's
meditations
.
The difficulty of obtaining her would, it
is true, sometimes occur to him, and torment him.
His father might forbid, or she herself might resist
his addresses. But he was young and sanguine,
and could not but believe that he had some grounds
on which to hope for success. With respect to his
father, the only objection could be her want of
fortune
.
But, did he not himself choose a wife
without
regard to fortune? It would, therefore, be with
a very bad grace that he should condemn him for
following his example. His example, however, he
was determined to follow, provided he could only
obtain the fair one's consent. Of this, although
he might have hopes, he could have no certainty.
It was not indeed probable that her affections could
be engaged. She was yet very young, and,
except
the Indian traders, to none of whom it was
likely that she could become attached, there was
no white man, he had reason to presume, had ever
seen, much less solicited this captivating daughter
of the Wilderness.
Shall I declare myself? thought he. Shall
I tell her how much I love her! how I cannot be
happy without her? Shall I do so to-morrow?
Ah! I fear it would be imprudent. I am yet too
much a stranger to her. Such precipitancy might
alarm her delicacy, and rouse her pride to oppose
me. I must act with caution, if I mean to gain
such excellence. Her understanding must be
convinced
,
that I am not unworthy of her. Oh! if I
could only gain some interest in her heart. But
time, and time only, can effect these things. I
must have patience! I wish Tonnaleuka were
here. I will tell him how I feel. His wisdom will
advise me how to act; and perhaps his friendship
may successfully plead for me, if my own suit be
N 2
rejected; for she reveres him as a father, and will
attend to his counsel. I will wait the coming of
Tonnaleuka.
With this resolution, whether wise or foolish the
reader may decide, formed in his mind, after about
three hours active meditation, Charles at last
resigned
himself to sleep, in which he spent about
three hours more, very deliciously dreaming of
Maria, love, and happiness.
Some of our sympathizing readers will, perhaps,
wish to know how Maria felt on this eventful night,
towards by far the most interesting young man she
had ever seen, and upon whose heart her charms
had made such an indelible impression. But as I
never considered it proper to inquire minutely into
the feelings of young ladies on such occasions, I
cannot give the exact chain of thoughts that
passed
through her mind, although I have ascertained
that their tenor was even something more than
favourable
towards Charles.
And was it this noble youth, she would say
to herself, that the hard-hearted savages were
about committing to the flames? Oh, happy
Tonnaleuka
!
I shall love you, I shall revere you more
than I ever yet did, since you were the blessed
instrument
,
in the hands of God, to save him. Oh!
may heaven still grant him protection from that
barbarous enemy, who seeks his destruction!
Ah! if he were destroyed now, in the bloom and
fervour of youth, what an ornament to his species
would be cut off from the world!
But, as I have already said, I know not the exact
chain of Maria's reflections on this occasion, I shall
not, therefore, follow them further. I have given a
few of them only, to show the temper and feeling
with which they were conceived, not the form or
manner in which they arose. But I have another
view in refraining to detail Maria's thoughts on
the first night that she beheld her lover, even if I
could do it in a regular and connected series, which
is, my wish to acquire the reader's favour, by
leaving
him something on which to exercise his own
imagination.
The whole of the ensuing day was spent by
Charles Adderly, in the manner of all others the
most delightful to a youthful lover, in looking at
and listening to the mistress of his heart. It was
a day altogether unchequered by any incident of
importance enough to claim a place in this
narrative
.
It passed on in the calm enjoyment of
domestic
and social happiness; or, if it be thought
that the happiness derived by Charles from the
presence of his Maria, was something different,
perhaps superior, to this, then the appellation of
enamoured felicity
may suit it better. In
beholding
and conversing with Maria, the world and all
its concerns were forgotten, or only so far
remembered
as to occasion a comparison which added a
higher relish to his present happiness. If, during
the preceding evening, the chains of love were
prepared and thrown around his heart, they were
now riveted there, never to be taken off; and so
delighted was he with these chains, that he would
not have exchanged them for king George's crown.
Although he was afraid to excite her displeasure
by a premature disclosure of his feelings, and had
also resolved to consult Tonnaleuka, whom he
knew to be her friend, on the subject, before he
disclosed them, yet, during this day, several
tempting
occasions offered, when, forgetting his
resolution
,
he, by the warmth and energy of his
expressions
and manner, permitted the state of his mind
to be almost as well known to her, as if he had
made a formal declaration.
Towards the after part of the following day,
however, as he walked along the bank of the river
in company with his beloved and her sister, his
feelings so plainly betrayed themselves, as to leave
Maria no room to doubt concerning them. It was
a beautiful afternoon, in that most delightful of all
seasons on the American continent,
characteristically
called the Indian Summer. The
atmosphere
was in a sweet, mellow temperature, equally
free from summer's heat and winter's cold. A
soft, waving species of fog encircled the brows of
the hills and the tops of the trees, but in such a
manner as rather to enliven than conceal them,
and to throw over them an air of romantic
wildness
and grandeur. The trees of the forest were
indeed in the season of decay, and shedding their
wasted verdure profusely around them, allowing
it to be scattered abroad, and to cover every path,
and all the surface of the ground, with a
variegated
bed of red, brown, and yellow leaves, which
moved to and fro, and sparkled to the view, with
every impulse of the passing wind. Yet, in this
very decay, there was a serene and composing
influence
,
which, while it reminded the spectator
of nature's great and awful change, at the same
time assured him of a prosperous and happy
renovation
of his original and uncorrupted condition.
Is it not strange, said Charles, that this
decay
,
this disorder of nature, which we now behold,
and which reminds us so forcibly of the great
change we must all undergo, should, instead of
inspiring
us with melancholy and desponding ideas,
animate us with feelings of the most welcome and
agreeable description, and produce a contentment
and cordiality of existence, which neither the
freshness of spring nor the bloom of summer can
effect?
Tonnaleuka has often explained to me,
replied
Maria, the source whence the feelings we
derive from external nature arise. But in the
civilized
world, you must have had opportunities
of becoming better acquainted with these things
than a child of the forest. It would, therefore,
be presumption in me to offer you Tonnaleuka's
explanation of the feelings you mention.
In the civilized world, as you are pleased to
call it, said Charles, there are many
appearances
of nature which cannot be studied so well
as in the desert; and such of the sons of the
forest
as have inquiring minds, frequently discover
truths for which the drudges of science often
search in vain. I doubt not, but the most learned
of our philosophers would find Tonnaleuka
capable
of teaching them many things, especially on
abstract and metaphysical subjects, which require
not the proof of experiment, but only the
suggestions
of nature, for their elucidation. As for
myself
,
I will always be proud to learn from
Tonnaleuka
,
and always delighted, ah! more than
delighted
,
to receive his lessons from you.
It may be so, sir, replied Maria; since you
say it, I must believe it. But in this instance, as
I am convinced you will be more benefited by
getting your lesson from its original source, I will
not deprive you of that benefit, by communicating
it at second hand.
Forgive me, Maria, said Charles, somewhat
startled at this reply, if my asserting the truth
has given offence. Believe me, I spoke seriously,
and not with the least view to compliment, when
I mentioned the delight your communicating
Tonnaleuka's
doctrines would give me.
You mistake me, sir, replied Maria; you
have given no offence. But do you suppose I
shall be so presumptuous as to turn your
instructor
?
What a reflection it would be upon the
learned
professors of Dublin college, if a simple girl,
born and bred in the wilds of America, should
be found teaching a pupil upon whom they, no
doubt, expended all their lore!
I beg you, for mercy, said Charles, be not
so severe with me. What those men taught me,
might be of service to me in the ranks of society;
but here, I acknowledgehere, in the midst of
sublime and beautiful nature, it sinks into
insignificance
;and
here, heaven knows, I feel happier,
and would be more content to spend my whole
life as I now do, than in the midst and in
possession
of all the pleasures and all the honours that
society could afford me.
Sir, said Maria, I believe all you say; for
even in these wilds, I have learned that it is
uncivil
to disbelieve any one. But I may venture to
express my surprise, that the social life should be
so very disagreeable as to induce you to give these
barbarous woods such a vast preference. Neither
Tonnaleuka, who for several years lived in
society
,
nor my father, nor my mother, who were bred
up in it, and who have this many a year fretted
almost to broken-heartedness to return to it, have
ever described it to me as so very disagreeable
and hateful as your language would infer.
I mean not to say, replied Charles, that
society is destitute of its charms and enjoyments.
It has many, and those too, powerfully alluring.
But to me, all its charms are inferior to the charms
I have here beheldall its enjoyments are insipid,
to those I have, within these last two days,
experienced
.
Ah, Maria! I do not undervalue the
joys of societybut I value more highly, because
I feel far more acutely, those I have felt here!
I am glad that Mr. Adderly is so happy with
us, observed Nancy; but I cannot guess what
has made him so. It surely cannot be the bonny
blue mist that's now around us, curling over the
tops of the trees like smoke rising from the
burning
of brushwood.
No, said Maria, smiling, I think not;
neitheir
our fogs, nor our withered leaves, nor any
other feature of our landscape, nor yet the
gentle
reception that our native tribes have given him,
could have been the strangely attractive cause that
has bound his fancy so strongly to these
uncultured
wilds. I rather imagine that Mr. Adderly is
subject
to a certain complaint, with which I have
heard Tonnaleuka say that young travellers and
young poets were often afflicted. He called it
the hyperbole, which, he said, in English means
`overstraining.' Not, Mr. Adderly, said Maria,
somewhat raising her voice, to check an effort
which Charles was here making to speak, at the
same time sweetly smiling in his face, so as to
keep him in good humour; not, Mr. Adderly,
that you have wilfully, or even knowingly, fallen
into this disease. Your judgment and your
candour
,
I believe, are sound; but your imagination
I beg your pardon, sir, I say nothing about it.
Ah! tantalizing girl! said he, not knowing
whether he ought to be pleased or displeased with
her observations; tell me whether you really
think me mad, for you half seem to do soor are
you only bentering me?
Think you mad! repeated MariaWhy, I
admit it is likely enough. But then, if you were
mad, it might be dangerous to tell you so, and still
more dangerous to banter you. No, no; I shall
never banter a madman, unless I first become mad
myself. But, in sober earnestness, sir, I do not
think you madI only think you wild. But,
perhaps
it is customary for you civilized gentlemen
to be so.
I beg a truce, cried Charles; for really if
I have offended by expressing the sense I have of
my present happiness, I have surely been
chastised
enough. But no, he added; even this
chastisement is happiness.
What, said Maria, Hyperbole again! But
I see you are incurable, sir. I will have done with
you, and leave you to your malady. So let us
return
home, if you please.
They according turned towards the house, when
Nancy observing some cattle at a short distance in
the woods, which she wished to drive homewards,
ran after them, and left Charles alone with his
beloved
.
Alas! Maria, said he, as soon as their
companion
was out of hearing, the true cause of my
happiness hereoh! would to heaven that you
knew it, and approved of it!
Mr. Adderly, she replied, in a tone and
manner
which had become suddenly serious and
embarrassed
,
what, what good would my knowledge
of that circumstance do you? If it will do you
good, let me hear it, for I will rejoice to serve
you. But if you are happy, as you say, already,
is it not enough? Be content and continue so.
My knowledge of your concerns, or my
interference
with them, can surely, for my power is
exceedingly
limited, do you no good.
Yesyoumy Maria! he cried, rather
instinctively
than rationallyyou alone, of all the
world, have the greatest control over my fate
you alone have
Sir, said she, interrupting him, this is
mysterious language. How I can in any manner
control your fate, I do not understand, nor do I
wish, at the present time to be informed.
Mysteries
and secrets have never been pleasing to me,
and to become acquainted with yours now, is what
I will not, with my own consent. I am persuaded
that while it might do me harm, it could do you
no good; and now, when I think of it properly, I
desire you to let me remain in ignorance
concerning
your affairs.
Ah! Maria, said he, why put this cruel
injunction upon me. But it is your wish, and I
shall obey it.
They here walked for sometime in silence,
during
which, Charles's manner betrayed great
agitation
.
Maria afraid that this might continue after
their arrival at the house, and be observed by
some of the family, stopped at a short distance
from it, and said
Mr. Adderly, I wish what has occurred
between
us this evening, not to alter our bearing
towards
each other, nor to interrupt whatever
degree
of friendship may have existed between us.
I assure you I have not changed my opinion of
you, be that opinion what it might, nor will I
change my manners towards you, unless a change
becomes perceptible on your part.
Maria! Maria! said Charles, looking
seriously
and affectingly at her, while he laid his hand
upon his heart, I here seriously promise, that
whatever may be your wishes, only let me know
them, and I shall obey themfor obedience to you
is, and ever shall be, my chief happiness.
Maria blushed deeply, for she could not now
avoid comprehending his meaning, but she said
nothing, and continuing their walk, they soon
arrived
at the house.
Vol. I. O
CHAPTER XII.
She felt his flame, but deep within her breast
In bashful coyness, or in maiden pride
The soft return conceal'd; save when it stole
In side-long glances from her downcast eye,
Or from her swelling soul in stifl'd sighs.
Touch'd by the scene, no stranger to his vows,
He fram'd a melting lay to try her heart;
And if an infant passion struggl'd there,
To call that passion forth. Thrice happy swain!
A lucky chance, that oft decides the fate
Of mighty monarchs, then decided thine.
Thomson
.
The
day after the preceding interview,
Tonnaleuka
visited Gilbert's residence. Taking Charles
aside, he informed him of various unsuccessful
attempts
that Carrawoona had made to engage the
neighbouring Indians to assist in pursuing him.
But, said he, my son, although he is not
likely to obtain auxiliaries in this vicinity, yet he
may obtain them elsewhere. Besides, without
any auxiliary, his own personal exertions, his
cunning
,
ferocity, perseverence, and intrepidity, are
formidable perils to encounter. There will be no
end to his attempts against you, while you remain
in this country. Alas! my son, while here, you
are not for a single day assured of your life. You
know not how soon, from some unsuspected
ambush
,
the treacherous savage may discharge the
bolt of your destruction. Then, hear my advice
Fix an early day for your departure. Our brother
Frazier will furnish you with a horse and
provisions
,
and I will procure you a guide. My son,
I wish you were safe with your friends in the east,
for I fear much for you here.
My father, and my deliverer, said Charles,
I know you wish your son to be happyAh! if
you wish him to be so, do not bid him so soon
leave this place. When I last saw you, father, I
wished for nothing more ardently than to get out
of this Wilderness. Now I dread, I tremble, to
leave it, for in leaving it, under present
circumstances
,
I shall separate from happiness and,
perhaps
,
bid adieu to it for ever. Oh, Father!
forgive
the weakness of your son. I will reveal to
you my heart. I want a confidant and an adviser,
and where can I find a better than you? You
whose friendship will sympathize with me, and
whose wisdom will direct me. Father, my heart
is bound to this place, for it loves, fervently, and
unalterably loves, the fairest, the sweetest maiden
that ever charmed the affections of man.Ah!
need I tell you, when I say so, that it is Maria, the
daughter of our kind host, to whom I am become so
attachedso devoted, that without her, or
without
hopes of her, I know not how I shall support
life.
My son, said Tonnaleuka, you have made
me your confidantI will endeavour to be a true
oneyou have told me your weaknessI will not
blame you for it, nor coldly exhort you against
encouraging
itfor I am not ignorant of what love
is, and therefore know that it would be fruitless.
Advice to a lover is like the wind to the burning
forest, instead of cooling and diminishing the fury
of the flame, it aggravates and increases it beyond
the power of control. But my son, I will say
that I grieve for youyour passion is, at present,
extremely inconvenient, it is unfortunateit may
interfere with your safetyfor if it will not permit
you to leave this country, you are sooner or later
likely to fall by the revenge of Carrawoona. My
son, may I ask if the maiden knows that you love
her?
Alas! Father, replied Charlesshe has
not permitted me to make the declaration. But
I believe she suspects, ah! she cannot but
suspect
how I feel!
Hear memy son, said Tonnaleuka. The
maiden you love is the child of my instruction,
and as dear to me as if she were the offspring of
my loins. Her peace of mind, therefore, and her
prosperity are as much the objects of my solicitude
as yours can be. Your attentions may have made
an impression upon her mind, even at present
unknown
to herself, which may, in the end, be
ruinous
to her peacefor, alas! the female mind is
too susceptible of such impressions. I shall try
by studying her attentively while I talk to her
about you, to discover the state of her feelings; and
if she be undisturbed, if she be cool, if she be
indifferent
towards you, hear me, my son, nor consider it
unkindness
if I say, that I shall then require you, for
her sake, to relinquish all pretensions to her, and,
if possible, for your own sake, to abandon all
thoughts of her. For I will not sanction any
measure
that will tend to interrupt the even and
smooth tranquillity which has hitherto occupied
her unruffled mind.
Ah! Father! will you be
Hear me, furtherson, do not interrupt me;
I have not yet done. If an impression has been
made on Maria's mind; if I find that your
attachment
is likely to be mutual, I will then advise you
to declare it. I will encourage you to persevere,
and use any influence I may have over her in
promoting your success. My son, you may now
speak.
Fatherby what you have said, you have bid
me despair. I hoped for your interference in my
behalf, but, alas! I now expect none. You will not
befriend me, nay, you will oppose my efforts to
gain her favour, unless you discover that I already
enjoy it! Father, you may save yourself the
trouble
of making the inquiry, for I know I do not
enjoy
it. She has forbidden me to speak to her the
feelings of my heart; and, alas! I have no friend
who will prevail on her to withdraw that
prohibition
.
Oh! if I had only permission to plead my
cause, permission to tell her how much she causes
me to suffer, I know she would pity meshe is
too kind-hearted to be aware of my sorrows, and
not bid me be comforted.
My son, replied Tonnaleuka, I really feel
for youI grieve for you. But if Maria cannot
love you, grief is all I can give you; for never will
I assist in either constraining, or even in
persuading
her to join her fate with one she cannot love.
It is my anxiety for her welfare, and not my
indifference
for yours, that prevents me from
interfering
with any undue influence in this matter.
My son, listen to another thing. Have you
thought seriously upon what would be the
consequence
of your suit being successful? You would,
no doubt, make her your wife. But your laws
require
a certain prescribed ceremony to be
performed
by a privileged person for that purpose.
Where could such a person be found here?
Neither
she nor you would think of submitting to our
Indian form of marriage; and you could not
expect
that she would leave her father and her
mother
,
and travel with you, for weeks together
through a howling wilderness, in search of a priest
to tie the nuptial knot! Nomy son, you cannot
expect thisfor you must see it could not be done.
Why, therefore, disturb the mind of an innocent
and hitherto happy young woman, by exciting her
affections and securing her love, when to gain the
O 2
object for which these are done, is, under present
circumstances, so utterly impracticable? No, my
son, you will be wise, you will be generous; and
if you really love this young woman, you will
permit
her to remain happy as you found her; and
not, by indulging in the pursuit of a wild and
visionary
,
and, you may now perceive, unattainable
object
,
plunge both her and yourself into perhaps a
series of misfortunes, the extent of which can
neither be foreseen nor calculated.
Oh! Father! bear with me yet! replied
Charles. Surely to procure a lawful person to
unite our hands, if our hearts were once united,
would not be so difficult a matter as you suppose.
Oh! let me only be sure of an interest in her
heartlet me but have her consent to join me
in wedlock, and I will soon hasten through the
desert, and bring from the habitations of
christians
a clergyman to perform the ceremony.
My son! hear me again, said Tonnaleuka,
your impetuosity blinds you to obstacles. It is
indeed, always the nature of passion, and
especially
the passion of love, to blind its votaries.
The accomplishment of what you propose, may
not be absolutely impossible, but an immense
majority of chances are against it. My son, let
us suppose you have gained the affections of
Maria
;
you are obliged to leave her speedily, or risk
falling the victim of Carrawoona. This would
render her miserable. Or you get safely out of
the Wilderness, and your father opposes your
return
,
unwilling that you should again encounter
such hardships and perils as will even make him
shudder to hear recited; or he perhaps, compels
you to marry some eastern heiress; or, if left to
your own inclinations, you may search in vain for
a priest to accompany you back to the desert; or
distance may cool your affection, and your desire
to return; orhear me yetyou may meet with
some fatal accident on your perilous journey;
you may sicken and die. In short, a thousand
things may take place to prevent Maria from ever
again seeing you. She, in consequence, sinks
into
an agonizing suspense concerning your fate;
she pines under the weight of long continued
disappointment
,
and at length, dies of a broken
heart, the victim of disappointed love!
Listen, my sonis it not my duty to protect
her if I can, against such a fate? and Oh! may
her great Parent above assist me! Still, my son!
hear me. If I find that her heart is already
touched
,
that her affections are already yoursthen,
as I know she will be unchangeableas I know
that her happiness will then depend on yoursI
will bid adieu to caution on the subject; and, as
I before said, will be the promoter of your suit.
For when two minds are thus mutually attached,
the sooner they come to a mutual understanding,
they are the sooner relieved from an unnecessary
burden of suspense and anxiety.
Father! said Charles, your sentiments may
be reasonable; but I do not feel as if I could judge
of them properly just now. They sound harsh
to me, but you are my deliverer, and I know you
are my friend. I will, therefore, think nothing
you can say to me harsh. But, Oh! these
sentiments
promise nothing to my happiness, and I am
not now in a fit state of mind, altogether to
acquiesce
in their propriety. But you need not fear
that I will importune Maria with my passion. I
shall for ever love her, and none but her. I shall
bear in silence the tortures of an unrequited love;
for she has commanded me to be silent, and she
shall be obeyed. With respect to any danger
from Carrawoona, since my life is thus likely to
be miserable, it is scarcely worth preserving.
Still it would be criminal to tempt fate; and the
sooner I proceed to the eastward, the sooner I
shall have it in my power to return with the
means of removing at least some of your
objections
to my suit. As soon, therefore, as the
necessary
preparations for my journey can be made,
I shall bid, but I trust only for a time, farewell to
a country, where, in the space of a few weeks,
I have felt both more joy, and sorrow, than I ever
did during the whole course of my previous
existence
.
The effects of this conversation upon Charles's
mind, were visible during the whole of that day,
and Maria could not but observe them. Indeed,
her own spirits were not in the most comfortable
condition. Tonnaleuka had decided that Charles
was only to remain another day with them, and
she saw that preparations were now making for
his journey.
But what, thought she, is this affair to me,
that I should permit it to affect me so much?
This young man is but a stranger to me. 'Tis
true he is interesting, brave, and unfortunate, and
he has almost said thatthatno I will not
presume
sofor if he did
love
me, how imprudent
it would be to return or encourage his partiality,
when fortune compels us to reside so far asunder?
Why should I regret that he must now leave us,
when his safety requires it? I will try to be
cheerful
although
I see he is not. Unfortunate young
man! I really wish his safety permitted him to stay,
for some short time, at least. But it does not. He
must go and I must not appear to grieve for it. I
will keep up my spirits. It might occasion
remarks
to be made, if I should appear particularly
melancholy at this time.
During the whole of that evening, she
accordingly
did keep up her spirits very successfully,
and so great was the triumph of her resolution
over her feelings, that when Tonnaleuka, with the
design of discovering how they were affected
towards
Charles, talked pointedly to her about his
leaving them, professing great regret for the
necessity
that occasioned it, and great admiration
for the openness, manliness, and general
excellence
of his character, she completely succeeded
in deceiving him with regard to the state of her
affections. She acknowledged that he was a very
fine, accomplished young manbut she did so in
such a careless manner, that Tonnaleuka
supposed
she conceived it of no importance whether
he was or not. She pitied his misfortunes, and
wished him safe at a distance from Carrawoona's
vengeance, with so much undisturbed and
tranquil
sincerity, that Tonnaleuka believed her to
be actuated only by the mere charity of her
nature
,
to desire his safety. He gave up his
examination
,
which by the bye, he had commenced just
when she was best prepared to meet it,
thoroughly
convinced, that she felt for Charles no feeling
tenderer than might arise from mere benevolence
and good nature.
When, however, the morning of that day came,
which was to be the last of Charles's abode with
them, she felt internally so agitated, that she
feared that during its course, if she staid at home,
she might betray herself. She thought it prudent,
therefore, to spend the day at a distance. After
breakfast, she accordingly set off on a visit to
Queen Alliquippa, so that Charles, very much to
his dissatisfaction and mortification, felt himself
compelled to pass this last of his days at her abode,
without the satisfaction of seeing her. His
chagrin
at her absence was the greater, that all the
rest of the family paid him more than usual
attention
,
frequently expressing their regret that it
did not suit him to remain longer with them.
Ah! thought heis she whose attention I
alone cared for, indifferent towards me? She
avoids me, she flies from meperhaps because
she knows, for she cannot but know, that she
renders
me miserable by so doing. Ah! this is
indeed
refinement in cruelty, and inflicts a torture
less tolerable to my soul, and less excusable, than
that which Carrawoona himself would inflict
upon me. He would only inflict vengeance upon
an enemybut, alas! she entails misery and
despair
upon a lover. But, heaven forgive me if I
accuse her wrongfully! She certainly knows not
how much I desire her presence to-day, or she
would not so cruelly absent herself, for it is not
in her nature to be so cruel.
Thus he reasoned, and thus he fretted, and thus
he accused, and thus he acquitted her, until the
day had advanced somewhat into the afternoon;
when unable longer to bear her absence,
especially
as he was not sure whether she would
return
at all before his departure, he resolved to set
out for Alliquippa's, and solicit at least a parting
interview.
He accordingly, without acquainting any one with
his intention, set off in that direction. Fortune
sometimes favours lovers even in their most
desponding
moments, and, on this occasion, she
favoured
Charles so far as to permit him, when a
little more than half way to Alliquippa's residence,
to meet his Maria returning homewards alone in
the woods.
His heart leaped with joy as he beheld her
continuing
to advance; for he was afraid, when he first
saw her, that she would, in order to avoid him,
perhaps return back to the queen's residence.
But I may now inform my readers of what Charles
himself was at that time ignorant, that feelings
similar to his own actuated the mind of Maria, and
were the cause of her now returning so
unexpectedly
soon from her visit. She thought that
it would be carrying her caution with respect to
her lover, (for she knew well that Charles was
such,) too far, and that it would be acting with too
much harshness to both his and her own feelings,
(for she too felt a tenderness, or something else
for Charles Adderly, which she did not wish to
consider love, although it possessed every one of
its qualities except the name,) to refuse him an
opportunity of bidding that farewell, which, in all
probability, was to be both the first and the last he
should ever bid her.
I will, at least, see him once more before he
departs, she said to herself; there can be no
harm in that, since we shall bid farewell, it is
likely never to meet again.
Charles, in consequence of this charitable
resolution
of Maria, met her, as we have stated, and met
her with feelings such as none but those who have
loved can comprehend, and which it would be a
folly to describe to those who have not.
Oh, Maria! said he, when he approached her,
while she blushed in some confusion as she held
out her hand to him by way of salutationOh,
Maria! how glad I am to meet you! I really
feared
I should not have seen you to have taken a
long, but, I hope, not a last farewell.
Your not seeing me, Mr. Adderly, said she,
would have been no great disadvantage to you.
I believe it would not have added one particle to
either the length, wildness, or difficulty of your
way homewards.
It would, however, replied Charles, have
dispirited and enfeebled me. I should have
feared
that you wilfully avoided me, from some
personal
dislike; so that I should have been by far
less capable of encountering the difficulties of the
journey, than if I commenced it with a
consciousness
of possessing your esteem and good wishes.
My esteem or good wishes either can be of
but little importance to any one, she replied;
but such as they are, I have no hesitation in
saying
,
that they are yours, in welcome and sincerity,
wherever you go; and if no harm befalls you until
I wish it, you will always be in safety and
comfort
.
Oh! dare I ask nothing but esteem from you?
Is there no warmer feeling of your heart to which
I might lay claim? will it be presumption
Sir! said she, interrupting himI wish to
hear nothing, at the present time, upon that
subject
,
to which I see you wish to bring the
conversation
.
We are soon to part, and may, perhaps,
never again meet. To cherish, therefore, under
such circumstances, feelings in any degree warmer
than sincere esteem, might be detrimental to the
peace and happiness of us both. Let us,
therefore
,
look upon each other only as
Here she was startled with a loud report of a
musket, the ball of which struck Charles in the right
arm, and broke it. This was immediately
succeeded
by the terrifying and tremendous yell of a
fierce and powerful savage, who leaped with
dreadful
ferocity and force upon Charles, now unable
to defend himself, and throwing him upon his back,
held him firmly down, with one knee upon his
breast, while the other fixed his uninjured arm to the
ground. With his left hand, he grasped Charles
by the throat, thereby, forcibly pressing him
to the earth, while with his right hand he
brandished
his tomahawk, and as he aimed the blow,
with which he intended to terminate Charles's
existence
,
he exclaimed
Destroyer of my son! where liest thou now?
In his father's grasp. Yes, smile thou spirit of
Carrawissa! This is thy victim. I sacrifice thy
enemy to thee. Thou art revenged, in despite of
Tonnaleuka!
What sayest thou, white man! Dost thou not
now wish that thy sword had been deep in the
caverns of the earth, when it pierced the bowels
of Carrawissa! Thou didst look at the youth
was he not stately, an ornament to man? And
didst thou not slay him? Yes, perdition seize
thee! thou didst kill the hero of his tribethe
pride, the delight of his father! But my soul now
riots in pleasure. I now have my revengeYes,
I will let thee see that woman! I perceive thou
castest thine eyes towards her. Didst thou love
her! Then I am doubly revengedfor see, her
soul is departed. Look at herfor I delight to
torment thee. She is killed! I will send thee to
death after her. Thy blood shall appease my
passion, thy scalp shall gratify my pride, and thy
soul I shall devote as an offering to Carrawissa!
Now for it!No prophet of Maneto saves thee
now!
So saying, he collected his whole strength, and
and the fatal blow was in the act of descending,
when a rifle-ball penetrated the brain of the
savage
,
and he fell lifeless by the side of his
intended
victim. Charles being thus unexpectedly freed
from the death-like grasp of his terrible foe,
started to his feet, and springing to Maria, who
had entirely fainted away, from the effects of
such a sudden and terrifying scene, he perceived
she was still quite insensible, and in a voice of
despair
,
he called outOh! God! is she indeed
dead! Is there nothing I can do to save her?
At that instant, Paddy Frazier was at his side:
but directing his whole attention towards
Carrawoona
;
Vol. I. P
on lifting whose head, and seeing his
brains scattered on the earth, he cried out
By heavens! it is what he deserved. It was
a good hit too, at such a distance. It took the
very spot I aimed at. I had no time to get
nearer
but
never yet, since I was a boy, have I
missed
within a hundred yards. It has done his
business
,
and killed him snuglythank God!
Maria's senses were now returning, and the
first words she distinctly heard, were the awful
ones, and killed him! which, in the present
scattered state of her senses she supposed were
applied to Charles, whom she did not at once
perceive
beside her, supporting her head with his
sound arm under it, and with the wounded one
lying on the other side, bleeding on the ground.
Ah! my Charles! my Charles! she in a
frenzied
manner exclaimed, has he killed thee! Has
the monster killed my beloved! Oh! let me see
my Charles! Is he dead!
(Here seeing him beside her, and thinking
what she saw to be only his corpse, she threw
her arms around him)
Oh! my best beloved, have they murdered
thee? she again exclaimed. Oh, God! thou hast
soon taken him from me. I am left miserable
here. Oh! that I could die with him! Why did
not the murderer kill us both! These pangsI
I(here her senses had returned so far that she
began to discover the truth)I, IOh! what
she now distinguished Charles, saying in a
soothing
manner
My love! be calm, neither of us is killed.
Thank God! you are yet safestill alive to
comfort
and delight your Charles.
Thank God! thank God! indeed, she
replied
but
Charles how is this! Was not that
shot mortal! and surely I saw you fall beneath the
grasp of that dreadful savage. I thank heaven
there has been no murder here.
No murder, indeed, said Charles, has taken
place; but there is a death, although a very
deserved
one. My enemy, Carrawoona, has
breathed
his last.
Your enemy! repeated MariaGod be
praised! God who twice protected you, and
delivered
you from your enemies. Oh, Charles,
how thankful we should be! Then checking
herself, as if she felt that she had expressed her
feelings
too warmly, she saidIndeed, Mr. Adderly,
you have singular reason to be thankful for the
protection of heaven, which has now twice so
miraculously
rescued you from impending fate.
I am thankful, Maria, said he, not for my
deliverance only, but also for my danger, for it
has been the means of letting me see that the
heart whose affections I should rather possess than
those of the whole world besides, is not indifferent
to my fate. Oh, Maria! there has been a sweet
consolation afforded to me this evening.
Tonnaleuka
will not now ask me to leave thee so soon.
Mr. Adderly, said she, you have, I believe,
discovered the weakness I wish to conceal; but
let us talk, at present, no more about it. Ah!
she exclaimed, noticing the condition of his right
arm, ah! I fear you are wounded, perhaps,
dangerously
wounded. Oh, Charles! the worst may
not yet be over!
The worst is over, my love! said he, in a
low voice, so that Paddy could not overhear him,
I think this hurt nothing, when I consider the
sweet confession I have gained from lips the
loveliest, the dearest to me in the world.
Oh! talk not of this, said she; let us hasten
home, that your arm may be bound up. Oh,
Charles! how much you have suffered in the short
time you have been in this Wilderness! But
let us go; your wound, indeed, must be very
painful
.
Yes; said Paddy, turning from the
examination
of the deadly proof which Carrawoona's skull
exhibited of his dexterity as a marksman, and
addressing
the loversYes, said he, Mr.
Adderly
must be taken care of. This savage, thanks
to the goodness of my rifle, requires no more care;
he'll frighten you no more, Maria.
The goodness of your eye, Paddy, I believe
also deserves credit for this result, said Charles.
No matter, replied Paddy, about my eye;
the fellow won't trouble us more, that is the best
of it. As to the worst of it, your broken arm, that
dangles there like a twig from a treeMaria lend
me that shawl, I will sling it comfortably to his
breast till we get home, and then Tonnaleuka will
fix it as neatly as he did my broken leg long ago,
for his hands are as well skilled in these matters,
as his head is in philosophy.
Maria hastily loosened her shawl, and
tremblingly
assisted Paddy in fixing Charles's fracture with
it, so that its motion might not give him pain till
he reached the house, which, as he was able to
walk stoutly enough, was accomplished speedily,
and without accident.
CHAPTER XIV.
O woman! in our hours of ease,
Uacertain, coy, and hard to please,
And variable as the shade
By the light quivering aspen made;
When pain and anguish wrung the brow,
A ministering angel thou!
Scott
.
The
excitementthe mixture of alarm and joy
produced on Charles's arrival at the house of his
kind host, upon the minds of its inmates, must,
like many other things hinted at in this history,
be left for the reader to imagine. Their joy soon
predominated, however, when Tonnaleuka, after
binding up his arm, as art, or rather as nature,
suggested
,
declared that the hurt was not dangerous,
and that a few weeks of care and good nursing
would restore him to as much vigour and
soundness
as he ever possessed; and they warmly
expressed
to Charles the great satisfaction they felt
at this successful termination of his contest with
his rancorous enemy. Paddy also came in for a
share of their joyful attention, and obtained many
hearty thanks and eulogies for his timely and
fortunate
interference, with his steady and keen eye,
on this occasion.
Goth, man! said his father, it was the best
guided an' luckiest aim ye ever took. Aye draw
ye're trigger in sitch a cause, Paddy; aye shoot
sharp in favour o' yere ain kind o' folk, an' dinna
spare the ithers when they wad do mischief, an'
I winna say, but after a' ye were born for a guid
P 2
end, though ye'll no work christian-like on the lan'.
Heth, lad! ye hae at last done what maks me
prood o' ye!
As for Charles, the assurance he now had of
being beloved by the mistress of his heart, and the
assiduous attentions which, in this period of his
affliction, she unhesitatingly paid him, gave him
such a delightful flow and buoyancy of spirits, that
he appeared all cheerfulness, animation, and gaiety,
happy in himself, and pleased with all around him.
Tonnaleuka, who did not know that he had
discovered
the state of Maria's feelings, naturally
ascribed
Charles's good humour to his having so
providentially got rid of his persecutor, together
with the prospect he now had of enjoying a longer
residence in the same place with the woman he
loved. His mind, being now at ease with respect
to Charles's safety, he was not, of course, so
solicitous
for his speedy departure as he had been;
and the wounded arm making a delay of some
weeks necessary, he acquiesced in its propriety.
He thought it prudent, however, to take an early
opportunity of cautioning Charles against
disturbing
the present serenity of Maria's mind by any
disclosure of his passion.
You know, my son, said he, that there are
difficulties in the way of your union which you
may never be able to overcome. How
unfortunate
would it then be for this young woman to fix
her affections upon one whom it is so unlikely she
shall ever call her husband. If you wish her well,
my son, you will be careful to conceal your
passion
from her knowledge. I know it is, under the
circumstances in which you are now placed, a hard
task that I prescribe to you. There are few young
men who could accomplish it; but if you can do
it, so much greater will be your victory, and, in
the end, believe me, so much greater will be your
self-approbation.
Father, replied Charles, it would be wrong
in me to conceal aught from you. Of my
attachment
for her, she is already aware. If you have
discovered that she views it with indifference, it
is my misfortune. But, father, permit me to say,
that I cannot, and I believe no one can, love as I
do, without hope. Yes, kind-hearted, lovely
maiden
!
she has given me ground for hope. Ah, father!
I feel here, within my breast, a presentiment, in
which I cannot but confide, that this sweet, this
fascinating young woman and I are destined for
each other. Do notdo not, I implore you, you
who are my best of friendsdo not, by your cold,
discouraging injunctions, forbid me to cherish that
sacred presentiment, which affords me so much
happiness!
My son, observed the prophet, I am then
mistaken in respect to Maria. I have talked to
her about you, and concluded, from her manner
as well as her language, that her mind was yet at
ease. I may have been deceived. But you
yourself
said you were certain she did not love you.
I said so once, my father, replied Charles;
I was then miserableI believe differently now,
thank heaven! and I am happy.
If it be so, said Tonnaleuka, then the die
is cast. If she loves you onceI know hershe
will love you for ever; and the only method to
secure her happiness, will be to promote yours,
and use every fair means to clear the way for
your union. She has been more than a favourite
pupil with me. She has been the very child of
my tuition. I must for ever feel concerned in her
welfare. My son, if you have her affections, you
have, indeed, a valuable prize, which, I trust, you
will ever possess wisdom enough to appreciate
justly, and honour enough to cherish fondly.
My son, I go off to-morrow to the northward.
An Indian council requires my presence in a few
days. It will be three weeks before I return here.
You will be then much recovered, and, under your
present prospects, I expect will have no objection
to proceed soon to Philadelphia, where you may
smooth the way for the attainment of your future
views.
During Tonnaleuka's absence, Charles, who
had, as we have seen, exchanged an almost broken
heart for an altogether broken arm, was so
rejoiced
at such an improvement in his affairs, that he
felt as if all the world was in the Wilderness
all of it, indeed, that he at this time considered
necessary to his happiness, namely, Maria
Frazier
,
was there.
Since the accidental discovery he had made of
her feelings towards him, she had not shown him
the same shyness and reserve as before; nay,
during the first few days of his fracture, she
manifested
for him unusual tenderness and sympathy,
under the persuasion that his misfortune was
sufficient
justification for the display of such feelings.
But she soon found herself under the necessity of
abating her attentions, and sometimes even of
avoiding his presence, in order to prevent him
from exposing both her and himself, by an
ill-timed
display of his fondness; and also, perhaps,
with the view of keeping alive that respectfulness
of passion which he had hitherto borne for her,
and which she supposed (for she had occasionally
a slight tincture of the prude in her disposition)
that too much familiarity would tend to weaken
and diminish. She, however, knew how to
regulate
this slight assumption of dignity so well, that
in place of reserve, it appeared gracefulness, and
instead of displeasing, it only the more charmed
her lover. But she, in reality, allowed him so
many opportunities of enjoying her society, of
talking of his love, of his hopes, and of his
intentions
with respect to her and connubial happiness,
that he had, on the whole, during Tonnaleuka's
absence, no reason to complain.
His love matters, that is, the matters dearest to
his heart, being thus providentially placed on the
most favourable footing, he began seriously to
reflect
on the propriety of returning home, that he
might not only acquaint the Ohio Company of the
misfortunes that had befallen their expedition, but
also arrange matters for a speedy return to the
Wilderness, with the necessary means of
making
Maria his wife. Paddy Frazier, to whom
gratitude
now naturally much attached him, was
desirous
to accompany him on his journey, for the
purpose of carrying his furs and peltry wares to
Philadelphia, to exchange them there for such
merchandise as suited the Indians. This desire of
Paddy was very agreeable to Charles, not only
because he would be both a useful and agreeable
companion on the way, but because he would have
an opportunity, when they should arrive at
Philadelphia
,
to reward him by a present of
merchandise
,
for the active and dexterous management by
which he so critically saved his life; and, if the
whole truth must be told, he also wished to have
the means of writing to his beloved by some safe
and speedy conveyance, if it should so happen that
uncontrollable circumstances compelled him to
remain longer personally, for he felt assured that
he could never be mentally, absent from her.
Paddy accordingly having resolved upon this
journey, (considerably to his father's satisfaction,
who hoped he might fall in with some good
christian
woman on the journey, whom he might bring
back with his other eastern goods, as his own
property
,)
was now busied preparing for the great
undertaking
,
by assorting, cleaning, and packing up
his wares, and adding considerably to their
quantity
,
by hastily purchasing whatever the Indians in
the neighbourhood could spare him.
At length Charles's arm was sufficiently
recovered
to permit him to undertake the journey,
and the day drew near when he was to bid
farewell
to his beloved. Tonnaleuka had returned
from the Indian council which he had been
attending
,
and the guide whom he had some time before
provided for Charles was in readiness. This man,
whose name was Manhulseh, was much in awe of
Tonnaleuka, and was, at the same time, well
acquainted
with the whole mountainous district of
Pennsylvania, from the Chesnut Ridge to the
South Mountain. He was also a tolerably brave
man, and could handle a musket or a tomahawk
with any individual of his tribe. Hence he was
one of the best qualified persons our travellers
could have procured, to conduct them through the
vast, intricate, and appalling Wilderness they
had to traverse; and his reverence and
attachment
for Tonnaleuka, secured to them the full
benefit of his fidelity.
Although thus well supplied with a guide, and in
every other respect fully equipped for the
journey
,
Charles felt at his heart such a reluctance to
commence it, that, under various pretences, some
of which were even so frivolous as to be seen
through and smiled at, although they were
indulged
by his friends, he succeeded, in spite of all
Paddy's efforts, who was very impatient to
proceed
,
in getting their starting postponed, from day
to day, for upwards of a week after the time
originally
fixed upon for it. At length all pleas and
excuses were exhausted, or rather he felt
ashamed
to advance more; and, becoming resigned to
the necessity of separating, for a time, from his
heart's best and dearest treasure, he agreed, that
the next rising sun should see him on his way. He
had just enjoyed what he considered would be his
last private interview, at this time, with Maria,
and was wandering, towards the evening, alone in
one of Gilbert's fields, indulging a train of none of
the most agreeable kinds of reflection, in which
he was entirely absorbed, when he was startled by
a person springing over the fence near which he
was meditating, and suddenly, to his great
astonishment
,
stood before him the well-known and
identical person of Peter M'Fall, who, while he
eagerly caught Charles's hand, exclaimed
Och, Master! now I have found you at last!
Just put your hand here, and feel how Peter's
heart beats, for I'm all out of breath with joy, and
with running to see you alive. By the powers of
Moll Kelly! but I thought the ould prophet had
taken you to heaven with him, and I feared I
should never see you again.
Had I been taken to heaven, indeed, said
Charles, it is likely you never should. I
therefore
,
suppose, Peter, that my being there would
have much displeased and grieved you.
Arrah, master! now believe me, for its as
true as the gospel, that I would almost as soon
have wished myself to be there. But, my
blessing
on the lucky head of you, I see that you are
not so badly off yet.
Then you are pleased, observed Charles,
that I must fret and fight a little longer with
this troublesome world.
By the sweet Hill of Houth! replied Peter,
and sure I am soand many a hard fight may you
have of it, and the blessing of Saint Kenan into the
bargain! But, master, yonder comes the doctor who
set my arm in a sling so neatbut, how! what!
your arm in tapes, too! Not broken! masterI
hopebut arrah! by my sowl, the doctor must
cure it. Not broken, I hope!
Yes broken, but mended again, replied
Charles.
Mended! repeated Peter, och! sure now,
wastn't it a pity to get it done so soon, master,
before either the doctor or I could get to you to
fix it. Doctor Killbreath is the best hand at
soldering
bones ever came from a college. Arrah!
now how lucky it would have been if you had
known we were coming, for, sure now, wouldn't
you have waited to get the doctor to cure it?
It is pretty well as it is, Peter, observed
Charles, and a good deal better, I believe, than
if I had kept it hanging these five or six weeks by
flesh and skin, in order to accommodate you and
the doctor with a job. But I beg your pardon,
doctor!he continued, turning to the surgeon, who
had just approached, for he had not exerted his
speed on seeing Charles, with such enthusiasm as
Peter had done; but coming forward at a
moderate
rate, he arrived just at this point of the
conversation
.
Doctor, I beg your pardon, said
Charles, I was just excusing myself to Peter for
not permitting my arm to remain for the last six
weeks in a state of fracture, in order that you
might now have the pleasure of reducing it.
Had you done so, said the doctor, smiling,
it is ten to one if you should now have had any
arm to talk about.
Why sure, now, doctor, observed Peter,
he didn't get them both smashed. Arrah,
master
,
I think that you still would have had one of
them to show, and to talk about.
I hope so, Peter, replied Charles, I am
glad you are so witty. Why, you have really
detected
the doctor in a bull; unless he supposes,
that, had I paid him the compliment to wait for
his services, both of my arms should now have
been food for the worms, and consequently unfit
for me to talk about. But, my friends, I am glad
you have come here at such a critical moment,
for I was about setting off to-morrow for
Philadelphia
.
Now we can all go together. What say you
doctor? My good friend, Frazier, who lives here
can have you both equipped for the journey in a
single day.
There is nothing I wish for more sincerely,
replied
the doctor; the sooner we get out of these
wilds the better. I am happy that we got here so
opportunely. I have indeed, reason to thank
Peter
for it.
No, by my sowl! said Peter, you may thank
master, there, for I would not have thought of
leaving
the French yet, if the ould prophet hadn't told
me to a shaving, how master lived here with a
decent
christian and an Irishman, heaven bless him!
but I must see him and shake his ould bone for
him on account of the sod.
Come along then, Peter, said Charles, old
Gilbert will be glad to see you. Yonder comes
his daughter, Nancy. Doctor, you must take care
of your heart, for she's a pretty girland I know
it is rather tempting to meet a pretty girl in the
wilderness.
I suppose you have found it so, Mr.
Adderly
,
replied the doctor.
I cannot say much about it, observed
Charles, but I know, doctor, you are no
woman-hater
and
Nancy, as you will soon see, is really
handsome.
I acknowledge, returned the doctor, that
in this desert, I should consider the sight of a
handsome young woman a real treat.
Vol. I. Q
Welltake care of your heart, my good
friend, said Charles, for here comes
temptation
.
At this moment, Nancy, who had been in
the woods on some errand, and was now returning
home, turned off in another direction, as if to avoid
the men with whom Charles was conversing, for
she had advanced near enough to perceive they
were strangers. Charles called on her to stop,
which she did, and the party approached her.
Why do you run away from me, Nancy? said
he, these are some of my Philadelphia
companions
just escaped from Le Buf, and one of them
is a countryman of your father.
My father will be glad to see them,
doubtless
,
said Nancy.
And won't you too, make them welcome for a
couple of days? asked Charles. Here is
Doctor
Killbreath, my friend, who, I hope, will be
found a pleasant companion.
Sir, said Nancy, who had taken one or two
sly looks at the doctor, for she had observed his
eyes fixed upon her, with a meaning she did not
exactly understand, but which she thought did not
denote any thing uncivil. Sir, I will do my best
to make your friends comfortable, for I doubt not
that they will deserve our kindness.
Doctor! why don't you thank the young
lady
,
said Charles: Why man! you seem to be
in a reverie.
I feel, I feelher kindness, replied the
doctor
,
rousing up at this reproof. MissMiss
Frazier
,
I assure you I feel your kindness as much as
if I expressed it better.
Why, I think, observed Nancy, you
express
well enough what there is, indeed, no need
at all for mentioning. You should first receive the
kindness, before you give thanks for it.
Agh! let the lasses alone for good manners!
cried Peter M'Fall, the pretty creatures can
still teach us genteelity. God bless the kind hearts
of them, for, sure, my mother was one of them!
And have you never seen any of them you
loved better than your mother? asked Charles.
Well, the devil take me, master, but I have,
replied Peter, but it was in sweet Dublin, your
honour. Och! there, how I longed, till I was
bothered almost out of my senses, for a little bit of
the cherry lips of Molly M`Nickle, of
Thomas-street
.
Arrah, master, just think now how it
pleased me to sit beside her and sing
Oh, Molly Astore!
How much I adore
The sweet smiling charms of your beautiful face,
On your lovely white breast,
Oh! how fond I could rest,
And enjoy all the bliss of a mutual embrace.
Alas, poor Molly! she may never hear me again!
The party had now arrived at the house, and a
hearty shake of Gilbert's Irish fist soon dispelled
from Peter's volatile heart, the melancholy which
the remembrance of the happiness he once
enjoyed
with Molly M`Nickle had excited.
CHAPTER XIV.
Speed, speed for your freedom, the war dogs are out,
Their scent is a sure one, it marks out your path;
Speed, speed for your safety, I hear the fierce shout
Of the foes who are panting for blood in their wrath!
Basket of Scraps
.
Whether
the writer of a tale should relate
more of it than is just necessary to make it easily
understood, is a question which I could wish the
critics to decide. It would save an indolent
author
,
like me, many a half hour's troublesome
reasoning
and balancing with himself the various pros
and cons concerning the propriety of narrating
incidents
,
the connexion of which with the grand
thread of his story, may be somewhat doubtful; but
which, if not narrated, would leave a certain air of
incompleteness and obscurity hanging over some
transactions and characters, which must be
introduced
.
It is true, there are many readers, who
might not observe this want of connexionfor
there are indolent readers as well as indolent
writers
;
but there are others who would not only
observe it, but feel it offensive, and be, in
consequence
,
heartily inclined to consign the author to
unpitied condemnation.
But who are the critics? My dear reader, you
are one of them; and if I could possibly have your
opinion on this matter, before I write this
chapter
,
the intended subject of which is one of the
above perplexing description, I should then know,
whether giving it would please you or not; and
to please you, you are aware, is the great object I
have in view. But being, of course, ignorant of
what may be your wishes on the subject, I can
only do what I suppose best adapted to keep you
in temper. I will not, therefore, withhold the
chapter, lest peradventure, you might desire to
read it, but I will tell you the subject, so that, if
you should think it has not concern enough with
the main story, you may avoid it, and without
either troubling yourself, or vexing me by your
displeasure, go on with the next, which will be
the fifteenth chapter of this volume, and which
will carry you along the path of the history,
ruggedly
and coarsely enough, I forewarn you, but I
assure you, with great fidelity and exactness. By
this management, I conceive that the only
error
I shall commit, will be giving to those who
may travel through this work, the choice of
two roads for their journeythe one shorter, but
a little more obscure and abrupt, and the other
clearer and smoother, but more winding and
tedious
.
Now, reader, having thus stated the
merits
and demerits of both these ways of getting
onwards, and left it fairly to your own choice,
which to take, I think that you cannot in
conscience
blame me, if you take the one that gives
you least pleasure.
The subject of this chapter will be the adventures
of Peter M`Fall and Doctor Killbreath, in making
their escape from Fort Le Buf, and traversing the
wilderness from thence to Gilbert Frazier's. It will
cousequently have little or nothing to do with the
history of either Charles Adderly or Maria
Frazier
.
You may, therefore, pass it by if you choose.
Although Peter M`Fall had the fortunate faculty
of soon making himself comfortable in almost any
Q 2
situation, yet there were places and persons in the
world whose presence he infinitely preferred to
others. For instance, the air of sweet Dublin he
greatly preferred to that of Le Buf, and the
authority
of Charles Adderly to that of the French
commandant. Notwithstanding this feeling. Peter
had not for some weeks after his imprisonment
entertained any desire to escape. At Fort Le
Buf he could eat and drink, and be idle, or when
he pleased, he could be merry, and dance, sing,
and frolic away with his gay-hearted jailers, as
contentedly and giddily as any of them. But this
was because he saw he could do no better. If he
got out of the fort, he was convinced that he
could never get out of the unbounded forest that
surrounded it. The chance was, that in
attempting
it, he would either perish from cold and want,
or fall into the hands of the savages, and perhaps
meet that terrifying fate from which the humanity
of his present jailers had rescued him.
These reflections had prevented him from
harbouring
any desire to escape, until about three
weeks previous to his appearing in the presence of
his master, as related in the last chapter. An
accident
which befell his fellow-prisoner, Dr.
Killbreath
,
first excited the intention to effect both his
own and the Doctor's freedom.
The Doctor had been amusing himself one day
in the woods, shooting game, (for it will be
remembered
that such liberty was permitted to him
on his parole,) when he narrowly escaped being
killed by an Indian, who shot at him from behind
a tree. He immediately fired at the assailant, who
attempted to run off, and killed him. Five or six
savages instantly raised the war-whoop, and the
Doctor was nearly seized by them. By swift
running
,
however he escaped into the fort, which
fortunately
was at no great distance, where the French
protected him from the immediate vengeance of his
pursuers. The whole tribe of the Otawas, to which
the man whom he had killed belonged, were
excited
to revenge, and made such continued and
unappeasable
demands upon the garrison for the
Doctor's
punishment, accompanied with threats, if they
persisted to refuse, that the commander at length
thought that prudence required his compliance.
The matter was in consequence submitted to the
decision of a council of twelve, composed one half
of French and the other of Indians. The latter
insisted strenuously that the prisoner should be
committed to the flames; and, after as much
resistance
as they could properly make, the French
were on the point of yielding to a compromise
which had been proposed, of having him shot,
when the approach of the prophet Tonnaleuka was
announced to the council. The Indians received
him with profound respect, and the French, on
account
of their expecting some favourable result
from his visit, with great cordiality and
satisfaction
.
After some minutes profound silence, during
which he alternately pointed his wand towards
heaven and towards the council three times, his
lips moving in the meanwhile, as if he were
soliciting
the dictation of a superior power, he spoke as
follows:
My brothers of the Otawas! Ye seem not at
this time to know the will of Maneto.He has
sent me here to reveal it. This white man, whom
you would sacrifice, has killed one of our brothers.
I grieve as ye all do for his death. But I must
tell you, that the Great Father said he should die
by the act of this white man, for he himself excited
that act. YesI can tell you, brothers, that he
first fired at the white man, and the Great Spirit,
in consequence, permitted his death. Do not,
therefore, bring down upon you the vengeance of
Maneto, by destroying this prisoner. Why should
you fight against the Almighty, against the Great
Father. Otawas, you will be wise, and do as I am
ordered by Maneto to direct you, and pardon the
prisoner.
Brothers, I hope you will obey these
directions
,
for I would grieve much for the calamities
that will befall you, if you disobey them. You
have heard what I was sent to say; I hope, my
brothers, you will attend to it.
One of the Indian counsellors, named Palaro,
replied:
Prophet, to obey the directions of Maneto,
who governs all things, is our duty. I believe his
words as they have been delivered by you, but all
may not believe them. You say that Maneto
requires
us to let a white man who has killed an
Otawa, go free. We have not been accustomed
to receive such commands from him when we
would sacrifice an enemy to the spirits of the slain,
and it is hard to let our brother remain unavenged.
But, prophet, hear your son! is it not fair, in
order that our tribe may be convinced that
pardoning
our prisoner was right, to ask what sign
you can give of your words being the words of
the Great Spirit? When we can say to our
brothers
behold
the sign! they will not blame us for
giving up the prisoner.
Prophet, you have heard my suggestion: is it
not reasonable?
Tonnaleuka now lifted his hands and eyes
towards
heaven, and continued in this attitude, with
his countenance expressive of earnest supplication,
for several minutes, during which all eyes were
fixed upon him with mute attention. He at length
spoke audibly:
Thou art, indeed, kind and merciful; thou
dost pity their weakness, and pardon their
unbelief
.
Oh! that they were as merciful as thou art!
then would such thirst for vengeance and for each
other's destruction cease.
Otawas and brothers, hear me! You have
desired proof of my veracity; a sign, by which
you may be convinced that Maneto forbids the
sacrifice of this man. Were ye not afraid that he
would punish such presumption? He would have
punished it, but shows himself merciful, that you
may learn mercy; and he allows me to give you
the sign you ask.
Listen to me, brothers! there is a high rock
on the shore of Erie, the top of which was rent
last summer by the hand of Maneto, when the
land shook, and the waters trembled at his
thunder
.
Beneath that rock, you, Palaro, my brother,
had then your wigwam; it stood uninjured amidst
the agony of nature, and you were piously
thankful
.
Brothers! on the third day from this, let three
of your warriors proceed to this rock. A living
eagle will be found there fixed in the breach made
by the thunder. Seize him; he will be a sacrifice
to the memory of your dead brother, and a more
acceptable one to his spirit than this prisoner.
Brothers! attend to Maneto, and avoid
destruction
.
The council determined to send in search of the
eagle, and accept of it as a substitute for the
prisoner
,
who was given over to the charge of the
French, on condition that if no eagle were found,
he should be without delay put to death in any
manner the Otawas might desire.
Three warriors were accordingly despatched to
the rock, who, arriving there at the time directed,
found the eagle exactly as Tonnaleuka had
described
;
and to the great surprise and satisfaction
of the French, returned with it living to Le Buf,
where the council and a numerous party of the
tribe still remained anxiously awaiting the result.
Palaro, in the name of the Otawas, now
addressed
the commandant:
Father, the Great Spirit, who is the owner of
all things, has thought proper that we should not
put the white prisoner to death. We submit to
his will, as his good prophet our brother
Tonnaleuka
desired us. We have lost a brother by
the hands of the prisoner, but our brother was
himself to blame. Maneto knew this, and has not
permitted us to burn the slayer.
Father! look at this eagle; it has been
miraculously
found fixed in the fissure of a rock, which
the finger of the Great Father opened last
summer
.
The Great Father permits us to sacrifice
this bird to the memory of our brother, in place
of the prisoner. We will obey him, we will
reverence
him, and respect the voice of his prophet.
Father, we wish you to let the prisoner go
free.
The doctor was instantly liberated from his
bonds, and in about fifteen minutes beheld the
unfortunate eagle tied to the stake that had been
intended for himself, where, amidst a blazing pile
of faggots it was soon consumed in his stead. He
was, however, forbidden for the future to be seen
outside of the ramparts.
During this sacrifice, the Indians chanted forth
with great fervency the glory of Maneto, the
praises of Tonnaleuka, and the valour of their
deceased
warrior. The doctor wished much to thank
the prophet to whom he owed so much; but
Tonnaleuka
had left the fort immediately after
pleading
his cause before the council, and now all he
could do was to supplicate the deity for blessings
upon his head. But the prophet had not
withdrawn
so hastily as to prevent Peter McFall from
obtaining with him a short, but, to Peter, a very
satisfactory interview.
Peter was standing, a very anxious and deeply
interested spectator of the deliberations, when
Tonnaleuka entered and addressed the council.
He recognised him at once, as the same
extraordinary
personage that had delivered his master
from the Chippeways, and he immediately
concluded
that the doctor was safe.
I will ask him about my master, thought he;
whether he took him to the other world or not,
sure he won't be angry at me for inquiring.
Peter accordingly watched his opportunity;
and, as the prophet was hastening towards the
gate of the fort, with hat in hand, he very
reve-rentially
approached, and addressed him to the
following
effect:
Och, now! I hope your reverence won't be
angry with me, if I ask you a civil question?
Let that question be brief then, said
Tonnaleuka
.
Suppose now, I ask you what you did with
my master when you took him away from the
Chippewayswould your holiness tell me?
inquired
Peter.
What is your name my brother? asked the
prophet.
Peter M`Fall, may it please your worship
to command.
And what is your master's?
Charles Adderly, your reverence.
Tonnaleuka, now whispered something into
Peter's ear, which he ended by enjoining him to
strict secresy; adding, if you reveal it to any one
in this garrison, dread my vengeance!
May your holiness blast me to pieces, said
Peter, earnestly, if I breathe a word of it to any
woman's son, or daughter either, while I am within
twenty miles of this place.
But ere he got the sentence finished, the
prophet
had departed from the fort, and was instantly
out of sight.
Agh! long life to you, and are you gone! ye
jewel of a prophet! I wish to St. Patrick that I
was only clear out of these walls with you. I could
soon find the Shanapin's-townand then, ten
miles up the river,why, it would scarcely be a
hop, step, and jump, to bring me toBut mum's
the word.
So saying, he gave an arch smile, and
accompanied
the last expression with that very significant
gesture of slyness, the placing of one of his
fingers
upon his nose, and then leaped off, singing
with great glee
In Dublin so clever,
By Liffy's sweet river,
When Molly McNickle was civil;
With kissing and laughing,
And whiskey-punch quaffing,
Old care I sent smack to the devil!
From this moment, Peter resolved by some
means or other, speedily to attempt his escape.
He had the determination fully formed in his mind
by the time the doctor's fate was decided; and
the eagle was not yet altogether consumed amidst
the flames, when he accosted his fellow-prisoner:
By my sowl! my dear doctor, but the fellow
fries well. Och! botheration to them that would
have roasted your precious flesh in his stead, in
that horrible bonfire. Sure, now, I couldn't have
stood to see the fat melting from your crackling
bones, like grease dropping from a leg of roast
mutton. The devil take me now, dear doctor,
don't be frightened,for the doctor had actually
turned pale at this coarse representation of what
was so nearly being his fate; which Peter
perceiving
,
gave him a sly wink, and saidOch,
now! come along, I just want to
spake
with you,
to comfort you a bit?
So saying, he half dragged the doctor to a
convenient
place, where he acquainted him with the
determination he had come to, of escaping from
the fort, and the ease with which he believed he
could in three or four days, at furthest, reach his
master's present residence, and invited him to
join in the enterprise.
The doctor considering that he was now under
no obligation from parole, and that while he
continued
in the garrison, he was still in danger of
some accident taking place which might again
expose him to the awful fate from which he had
been just saved, by an absolute miracle, agreed
at once to the measure.
Fort Le Buf was situated upon the bank of
the western branch of French Creek. It
occupied
about a rood of ground, and was
surrounded
by a stockade circumvallation, made of strong
piles driven close to each other into the earth,
sharpened at the top, and more than twelve feet
high, with port-holes for cannon, and loop-holes
for small arms, cut through them. The
garrison
,
at this time, consisted of about two
hundred
men, whose cooking, washing, &c. there
being but few European women among them,
were principally performed by squaws who had
learned a smattering of the French language.
How to get out of this stockade, was the
question
,
upon which Peter M`Fall now for about
five or six days exercised his ingenuity. At the
end of that time, however, by dint of personal
exploring, rather than thinking, he resolved it
to his own satisfaction. He had discovered a
small sewer commencing in the yard of a
washhouse
,
Vol. I. R
which was occupied by a number of squaws
in the service of the garrison. This sewer had
been made for the purpose of carrying off to the
creek, the waste water that had been used in
washing
.
The distance from its entrance to its
out-let
upon the bank of the creek, Peter
conjectured
to be about ten or twelve yards. It was
through this passage that he contemplated making
his escape. It was, indeed, so narrow, he
perceived
,
as scarcely to admit his body; and from
the daily flow of dirty water that passed through
it, it was an absolute puddle of mud and
filthiness
.
The softness, and spunginess, however,
which the latter circumstance occasioned, he
calculated
would facilitate his passage, by enabling
him the more easily to drag his body through.
The only obstacle that perplexed him, was a strong
iron grating that was fixed over its entrance. This,
he however was determined to overcome by some
energetic effort. His chief difficulty was in
persuading
the doctor as to the practicability of the
scheme. At length, when the latter perceived
that no reasoning would prevent Peter from
trying
it, he determined not to desert him, but to
assist all he could, although he anticipated all the
evil consequences of complete failure and
detection
.
In pursuance of this resolution, having secretly
provided a small bag full of provisions, and a
couple
of spades, they one dark night, about two
weeks after the doctor's rescue, when all the
garrison
,
except the sentinels, had gone to sleep,
scaled the low wooden fence that surrounded the
washer-woman's yard, and commenced their
operations
by digging a hole close to the grate,
sufficiently
large to admit their entrance. As the
ground was soft, and Peter an excellent
spadesman
,
this was only the work of about fifteen
minutes
,
and into the mud-bottomed pit he
plunged
,
without hesitation, head-foremost, dragging, by
means of a strong cord attached to it, the bag of
provisions after him. The doctor had now
nothing
for it, but to follow.
For the first three or four yards, they swam or
paddled, like ducks, in the stagnant water which
had here collected to the depth of eight or ten
inches, on account of some deficiency in its fall
towards the creek. But this was the easiest part
of their progress; for during the remainder, Peter
found the passage so small that it required all his
perseverance and strength, to squeeze himself
forward; which, however, he persisted in doing,
and at last, with incredible labour, and not
without
great fatigue, and soreness of both flesh and
bones, he arrived at the open air on the bank of
the creek. The doctor being a smaller man, found
less difficulty in passing, especially as the efforts
of Peter had cleared the way for him.
Although enveloped in a complete vesture of
mud and dirt, our adventurers did not wait to wash
themselves in the creek, but taking to the woods,
hastened on as speedily as the darkness and the
numerous impediments of the way would permit,
towards the Alleghany river. Daylight overtook
them while yet in the intricacies of the forest,
when being both hungry and fatigued, they thought
proper to enjoy some of such fare as their bag
afforded
,
and then to repose themselves for a few
hours. About noon they again proceeded, and
continued their journey till the evening; when
resolving
not to undergo the fatigue of another
night, struggling amidst brush-wood, swamps, and
fallen timber; they selected a place of shelter,
and by collecting together a quantity of dry
leaves, made themselves as comfortable a bed as
they could, on which their fatigue and long
wakefulness
,
enabled them to sleep soundly, till the
morning. After three days troublesome
journeying
in this manner, during which, they became
sometimes afraid of not being on their proper
course, they arrived at the Alleghany river, a
short distance below its confluence with French
creek. From thence they kept down the stream
of the river for upwards of four days, and it was
the ninth from their leaving Le Buf, before they
met with Charles, as already stated.
CHAPTER XV.
Survey his front, where wisdom sits serene,
And the bright flashing of his fearless eye;
That gallant port, that majesty of mien,
Which promise deeds of unsurpass'd emprise,
Such as to minstrelsy its fondest theme supplies,
And gains the palm the world may not deny.
Basket of Scraps
.
The
dearest to each other are often doomed to
part. It is one of the evils incident to humanity,
and one from which all the philosophy in the world
will not relieve us. The best way, therefore, to
meet the evil, is, to do it courageously, and
philosophize
nothing about it.
Charles Adderly, on this occasion, did so; and
in consequence, he succeeded in separating from
Maria, with a reluctant heart, it must be confessed,
but not with a desponding one.
His party, consisting of himself, Dr. Killbreath,
Paddy Frazier, Peter M`Fall, and Manhulseh their
Indian guide, commenced their journey on the
third day after Peter and the Doctor had arrived
at Frazier's. Besides the horses on which they
rode, they had along with them three others, two
of which were laden with Paddy's merchandise,
and the third with provisions and other traveling
stores. They were of course well armedfor in
those days, no one ever thought of attempting a
journey, of even a short distance, through the
Wilderness, without being properly prepared for
both defence and attack.
On the third day they crossed the Chesnut
Ridge, and encamped that night between it and
R 2
the Laurel Hill, in what is now called Ligonier
Valley. As they were about continuing their
journey
the next morning, they were unexpectedly
attacked by a small party of Otawas, whom the
French had despatched to scour the country in
pursuit of Peter and the Doctor. The savages,
however, had given their fire at too great a
distance
to do any serious mischief. Two of their
shots feebly pierced through a package of Paddy's
furs, and another slightly wounded one of the
horses. The rest fell altogether harmless. Each
of our travellers immediately took to a tree, and
kept up such a well-directed fire upon their
enemies
,
when any of them dared to appear in sight,
that the latter thought proper, about mid-day, to
withdraw, after having lost five or six of their
number, who were killed on the spot.
Our party then cautiously proceeded onwards,
keeping on all directions a good look out, which
obliged them to travel so slowly, that they only
reached the top of the Laurel Hill that night.
Here they encamped on a spot where they could
not be easily surprised; and Charles, equally with
the rest, took his turn in watching as sentinel
during
the night.
The savages, however, during the preceding
day had tasted so bitterly of their intrepidity, that
they had no relish for more of it, and they were
not molested during the remainder of their
journey
,
which they performed, without meeting with
any serious disaster, in about four weeks.
The account which Charles gave to the Ohio
Company of the fate of their expedition, which
he ascribed altogether to the jealousy and
management
of the French, made a great noise in the
political world, and produced much excitement
throughout all the colonies. But there was none
of them that took up the matter with greater
spirit
than Virginia. That state, indeed, did then,
as it does still, possess a high-minded and
courageous
population, that could not tamely submit
to any insult or encroachment upon their rights;
and the territory thus usurped by a hostile force
being then considered as within the bounds of her
charter, she felt herself called upon both to
demand
satisfaction for what had been done, and to
take measures for resisting such aggressions for
the future.
But, although the public mind continued,
during
the whole of the spring and summer
succeeding
the occurrences we have related, to receive
fresh and repeated provocations from Indian
incursions
upon the back settlements, especially in
the Virginian territories, yet the colonial
governments
thought proper to delay making any public
effort to restrain or punish these depredations,
until
they should receive instructions on the subject
from the government of Great Britain. They had
reason, indeed, to presume that the remonstrances
which they knew the British ministry would make
to the French government, would induce the
later
to recall, and, perhaps, chastise, their Canadian
servants for the outrages they had committed on
the subjects of a power with which they were
then in a state of peace and amity. At all events,
they wished to be fully authorized by their own
government to make whatever opposition they
should find necessary, whether by force or
otherwise
,
to put a stop to the unwarrantable
proceedings
of the French.
With respect to the hostile Indians, small
parties
of militia and volunteers were, indeed,
immediately
employed, but in a very inefficient manner,
against them; and for several months, the terror
and sufferings of the Virginian back-settlers
continued
daily to increase.
At length Mr. Dinwiddie, the Governor of
Virginia
,
received intelligence that the French
government
manifested a very suspicious reluctance to
give any satisfaction to the British on the subject
at issue, and he was authorized to use his
discretion
in bringing the aggressors to an account for
what they had done. A national war, however, at
that time was not to be wished; at all events, he
resolved not to act rashly in kindling its flames,
but to convince the world that every thing had
been done, consistent with the honour and dignity
of the British crown, and the prosperity and safety
of its subjects, to prevent such a calamity. He,
therefore, thought it expedient, before he should
have recourse to actual force, to send an envoy to
the commander at Fort Le Buf, to whose
instrumentality
the late outrages had been particularly
charged, for the purpose of demanding from him,
in the name of his Britannic Majesty, an
explanation
of his hostile conduct towards British
subjects
,
and some satisfactory security that it should
not be repeated.
It was, at that crisis, very difficult to find any
one properly qualified for such an embassy,
willing
to undertake it, a circumstance which, if the
nature of the country and the state of the times
be considered, will not be thought surprising. A
distance of several hundred miles through a
trackless
and rugged wilderness of woods, inhabited
only by nations of savages, the most of whom had
of late become inveterately hostile to the English
name, had to be traversed. No English white
man, it was thought, could then penetrate into
these wilds and return alive, unless by the aid of
a mere miracle; for even the traders, that had
formerly been rather invited than forbidden to
frequent
the country, and were in most instances
kindly enough treated by the natives, had latterly
been often plundered, and sometimes massacred,
for no other reason than their being English.
There were in Virginia, no doubt, numbers of
patriotic
and gallant spirits, whom danger alone could
not have deterred from the undertaking. But
various
other motives operated on their minds.
Many were opposed to the measure altogether, as
betraying imbecility, and want of promptitude and
wisdom. They exclaimed against the folly of
sending an embassy into the midst of a barbarous
race of men, who neither knew, nor cared for, the
sacred character of embassadors; and alleged,
that it was worse than madness, even if the
messengers
should happen to perform their errand in
safety, to expect any favourable result from the
enterprise.
No, said they, if we go at all into the haunts
of these savages, let us go sword in hand, and drive
them and their christian allies together, out of their
dens with the bayonet and the rifle. We should
negotiate with such enemies only with the mouths
of cannon.
Domestic concerns and family interference
prevented
others, who might not have the same
objection
to trying the effects of negotiation and
remonstrance
,
before the drawing of that sword, whose
unsheathing might involve two powerful nations in
all the evils of a tedious and sanguinary war.
In short, Governor Dinwiddie, after he had
decided
on the propriety of the measure, found so
much difficulty in finding any one qualified for the
hazardous service, willing to undertake it, that he
began to harbour thoughts of abandoning the idea,
especially as the winter season was approaching,
until the ensuing spring.
As he was one day in his private apartment,
meditating
with considerable anxiety on this subject,
he was informed that a very respectable looking
young man requested admittance to his presence.
The governor desired him to be shown into a front
chamber, where he in a few minutes attended him.
The governor, although, as we have seen, his
mind had been rendered uneasy by contemplating
the unfortunate aspect of a favourite and
important
measure, saluted the stranger with much
complaisance
;
for notwithstanding his youth, being
apparently not above twenty years of age, there was
in his manner and aspect an air of dignity and
intelligence
,
with which the governor was struck,
and before which any feeling of ill-humour that
might have arisen from the unpleasant nature of
the reflections from which he had been interrupted,
entirely gave way.
As this young man will make a considerable
figure during the remainder of this history, it is
presumed that a description of his appearance on
this occasion will not be unacceptable to the
reader.
His stature was exactly six feet, and his form a
happy medium between the usual slenderness of
youth and the more rounded muscularity of
manhood
.
His chest was already somewhat full and
expanded, as if to make room for a liberal and
capacious
heart. His limbs were in just proportion
to the rest of his frame, and so free and
unincumbered
in all their motions, as to give a peculiar
gracefulness to his gait and gestures. His
shoulders
were broad, but finely shaped, and
harmonizing
so well with the stateliness and just symmetry
of the other parts of his figure, as to impart to the
whole an extraordinary degree of dignity and
majesty
of mien; and indicating, at the same time,
strength, hardihood, and activity.
With respect to his countenance, if every there
was one that expressed true nobleness and
magnanimity
of soul, it was his. It was of the oval
form, with a remarkably high forehead, which was
open, serious, kind, and candid. His sparkling
blue eyes displayed the fire of passion, combined
with the coolness of wisdom, while the movements
of his eye-brows assured the beholder, that in every
contest the latter should gain the victory. His
nose was of a commanding agreeable form, neither
exactly Grecian nor Roman, but partaking partly
of both, and it was, perhaps, this feature which
most forcibly impressed the beholder with the idea
of his fearless intrepidity and undeviating integrity.
But it was in the expression of his mouth that the
benevolence, generosity, and tenderness of his
nature
were chiefly to be seen; for his were lips to
which no one could ever impute the utterance of
falsehood, calumny, or even unnecessary censure.
His chin was muscular, round, and full, but
agreeably
corresponding with the general contour of his
countenance. As to his complexion, it was at this
time slightly sun-burnt, but still affording a
pleasant
mixture of that fairness and ruddiness which
is so becoming in youth, and which generally
betokens
an originally healthy and still unbroken
constitution.
His dress was at once modest and genteel,
affecting
in no particular either to despise, or to be
fastidiously imitative of the fashion of the day. It
was neither gaudy, nor slovenly, but such as a
gentleman
who, while he does not despise his person,
seems conscious that his mind is his better part,
might be expected to wear. When we have said
this, and when we add that it was a
mourning-dress
,
(for this young gentleman had lately
sueceeded
to the ample estate of a deceased, tenderly
beloved, and much lamented elder brother,) the
reader will easily figure it to himself, without our
giving him more particulars.
He was a native of Virginia, and descended from
one of the most respectable families in that
province
;
but in the opinion of governor Dinwiddie
on this occasion, such a youth would have made
any family respectable. His name was
George
Washington
a name which is now synonymous
with virtue, and to pronounce which is to
eulogize
.
After the usual salutation was over, Mr.
Washington
presented an introductory letter from a
valued
friend of the governor, who immediately read
it as follows:
May it please your Excellency,
This letter will be handed to you by Mr.
George Washington, of Mount Vernon, a young
gentleman of whom I doubt not report has already
spoken favourably to you. For myself, I profess
to feel a high respect for his promising talents, and
a still higher for that steady conduct, unsullied
virtue
,
and strong sense of honour which have
hitherto
marked his character.
To speak thus decisively in behalf of so young
a man, may seem to your excellency, to be a
somewhat
overstrained recommendation, but if I know
any thing of the characters of men, I am convinced
that in giving credit to Mr. Washington for all the
virtues and talents my language may ascribe to
him, you will not find yourself deceived.
The ardour of his patriotic feelings, together
with his commiserating the distresses under which
our back-settlers now labour, and, no doubt, a
laudable
ambition to signalize himself in doing good
to his country, induce him to solicit what he is
grieved to find so many of higher name and
pretensions
have lately refusedthe appointment of
envoy to the French commandant at Le Buf.
Should it please your excellency to confide to
him the management of that arduous and
important
mission, I am persuaded, that young, and
consequently
inexperienced, as he is, you will have
no reason to regret having done so; for, I believe,
that if prudence, intrepidity, and perseverance in
the attainment of the public good can succeed,
whatever enterprise he conducts must be
successful
.
I have the honour to be, your excellency's
sincere
friend and most obedient, humble servant.
Why! Mr. Washington, observed the
governor
,
when he had done reading, this is really a
complimentary letter, but Mr.  is a good
judge of characters, and I believe he has not
mistaken
yours. Your brother was a brave man,
true to his country, and I think that you cannot be
inferior to him. When would it suit you to go on
this mission?
At a day's warning, whenever your excellency
orders
Supposelet me seethis is Tuesday the 23d
of October. In a week from this date could you
be ready?
To-morrowto-daythis hourand at all
hours, I am at the service of my country. You
are her monarch's representative; order me when
you choose. But if I might suggest any thing in
this matter, it would be promptitude and
expedition
.Your
excellency is aware that the season
requires
it.
Young man! my friend has not been mistaken
in his estimate of your character. Your ardour in
this case is wisdom. Your country has been for
tunate in giving you birth; for I perceive, if
heaven
spares you, that you will be both her blessing
and her boast. Had I known of you only two
months sooner, this mission might now have been
successfully terminated; but name your day, and
every thing shall be provided.
Vol. I. S
It is your excellency's right to name it.
Well, then, let it be this day week; your
commission and instructions shall be immediately
prepared. But, tell me, have you thought of the
dangers and difficulties?
I have thought of them seriously, sir.
And they don't make you hesitate?
Nothing, I trust, will ever make me hesitate
to do my duty.
I am satisfied, observed the governor. It
has been perhaps fortunate that the perils of the
undertaking have deterred others from engaging
in it whose services I should have gladly
accepted
.
The delay may not have been lost to our
country, since it has brought you forward to her
service; and that backwardness to serve in this
case, which I but half an hour ago lamented as an
evil, may in reality turn out to be a benefit. My
young friend, I shall now detain you no longer,
but shall be glad if you come to spend the evening
with me.
With your excellency's permission, I should
rather return to Mount Vernon to arrange some
matters, so that nothing on my part may retard
the expedition.
You can return to morrow; one day will make
no difference, and you will have sufficient time to
be back here in a week. If you should be a day
longer, it will not be charged upon you.
Your excellency will excuse me; I cannot
remain to-night, unless some public business
requires
my presence.
There is no public business to require your
stay, I acknowledge, replied the governor, but
I wish to enjoy your conversation, and cultivate
your friendship, so that you may be convinced
how much I esteem your gallant proposal to
embark
in this servicea single evening will, be of
no consequence.
I should, indeed, feel happy and honoured in
your excellency's society, observed the young
hero
,
but I am now to prepare for a public service
which requires expedition; and I confess that,
unless
my going off instantly to make preparation
will give you more displeasure than, if I have any
knowledge of your character, I think it will, I
should much rather depart: for I must ever make
it a rule, that when duty is to be performed, no
time should be lost upon pleasure.
My friend, replied Dinwiddie, be ever thus
proof against temptation. I esteem you the more
that you have resisted my wishes on this point.
Be as expeditious as you please, and may heaven
prosper your zeal! I shall try to imitate you in
getting every thing ready without delay.
Washington now withdrew, and immediately
hastened home to make the best use he could
of his time, in both arranging his private affairs
and in providing for the performance of his
public
duty.
When he was out of sight, Dinwiddie could not
help exclaimingAdmirable youngman! you will
yet be of more service to your country than a
thousand mines of gold!
CHAPTER XVI.
There is a tie, whose magic force
The power of lengthen'd years defies;
There is a thought whose stayless course
A dearer tide of life supplies,
Than gives to other thoughts their source;
And days of gloom may intervene,
Like ocean's wave its flight to stay,
And distant climes may come between
They cannotmust notcheck its way!
And there's a cord which love entwines
Unconsciously round kindred hearts,
Which length of absence but refines,
And death alone for ever parts!
Basket of Scraps
.
How it is that the female heart, when in love,
can more successfully control its affections, at
least the display of them, when their object is
present, and suing with all his might, for some
little symptom of reciprocal fondnessthan when
he is absent, and cannot witness, and,
consequently
,
cannot enjoy such endearmentsI will
not stop to explain; and, perhaps, for the very
good reason, that I cannot do it to my own
satisfaction
.
But I can state, that after Charles
Adderly's
departure from the Wilderness, Maria
Frazier
experienced that she possessed this feminine
quality in perfection.
He was not many hours gone, when his image
took such full and forcible possession of her mind,
that whether she dreamed by night, or meditated
by day, that image was still present with her. It
haunted her in her rambles, it engrossed her
studies
,
and disturbed her devotions; and whether
she ate, or drank, or walked, or slept, it would
never leave her, and what was in all respects as
extraordinary, she never wished it to leave her.
No, she cherished it fondly in her heart; it was
her only care, her only comfort, and her only joy.
Though she dared hardly venture to expect that
she should ever see him again, yet she felt that
without him the Wilderness was cheerless, life
insipid
,
and the world a blank. Her fears that he
should never return were great, but they arose not
from any doubt respecting the sincerity and
unchangeableness
of his love for her, but from the
numerous perils and obstacles which she knew he
must encounter and overcome before he could
retrace
the dread and savage-haunted wilds that now
separated them.
She, however, succeeded tolerably well in
concealing
these feelings from the observation of all
her friends, except Nancy, who, perhaps, on
account
of being actuated by some feelings of the
same kind, for a different object, but one also now
at a distance, the more readily suspected her
sister
;
or, if it be true, that the pangs of love are
always relieved by being poured into the ear of a
confidant, Maria may have voluntarily intrusted
her with her secret.
With respect to Nancy's own case, Dr.
Killbreath
had found means during his short abode
with her, not only to convince her that she
possessed
his heart, but also to obtain possession of
hers. In consequence of this, although the
feeling
with which she remembered the doctor was
not so very deep and acute as that with which
Maria remembered Charles, yet it was sufficient to
make her sympathize so sincerely with her sister,
as induced the latter to confide her sorrows, and
her love, to her secresy. Nancy returned the
S 2
favour by a reciprocal confidence, which, perhaps,
did more to keep alive the doctor's interest in
her heart, by occasionally affording her
opportunities
to talk of him, than any impression his
addresses
while with her had made.
Maria's affection for Charles Adderly did not
require any such stimulus of conversation to
preserve
it, during his absence, from decay. It was
an affection which no time nor distance could
diminish
,
for it was planted in a mind as constant,
tender, sincere, and unchangeable in its
attachments
,
as any woman ever possessed. It might,
perhaps, be for this reason, that, although she felt
more acutely, she talked less freely, on the
subject
of her feelings than Nancy. Nay, sometimes
she felt more enjoyment in meditating alone upon
her lover's perfections, as they appeared to her
imagination, than in conversing about them. But
often the disposition would vary, and she would
feel great satisfaction in being able to interchange
ideas concerning him with a friend and sister, of
whose perseverance in secresy she was fully
confident
.
Upwards of four months passed on in this
manner
,
and Maria had not heard from her lover, for
Paddy had not yet returned from Philadelphia,
and she was becoming very uneasy to ascertain
his safety.
Surely, thought she, if they had reached
Philadelphia
alive, Paddy would have been returned
before now, and I should have heard of Charles.
The Indians, alas! hated himthey may have
taken
himthey may have put him to deatha cruel
deathwhen Tonnaleuka could not be near to
save him. It is true the prophet has discovered
that the mauraders were disa pointed in their
attempt
near the Laurel Hillbut they may have
succeeded elsewhere, for it was a long
Wilderness
they had to traverse. Heaven grant that
my fears may be unfounded!
At length, to the great joy of all Frazier's family,
Paddy arrived, accompanied by Dr. Killbreath,
whose desire to revisit Nancy had rendered him
easily persuaded to join her brother in trading with
the Indians. They, therefore, brought with them
in partnership a large and valuable assortment of
goods, not only suited for the Indians, but also for
the French, with whom Paddy was desirous to
open a trade, because he expected that it would
be lucrative, and that it might be the means of
preserving their friendship, which he was very
anxious to preserve, since they were now become the
lords of the forest. As to the danger the doctor
was in of falling again into their hands, he believed
that it could be easily removed, by a present to the
commandant at Le Buf, with a declaration that the
doctor wished to settle as a trader in the
Wilderness
under the French protection.
Near the North Mountain they met with several
Indians who would, no doubt, have attacked and
plundered, and perhaps, massacred them, had some
of them not known Paddy, who speaking their
language
freely, managed matters so well with them,
that they agreed, for a present of a few blankets
and some trinkets, to escort him home.
If Nancy was rejoiced to see her dear doctor
come back again, he was no less so to find himself
once more safe under her father's roof, with the
prospect of being permitted to remain there
unmolested
by either the French or Indians.
But the great source of Maria's joy was the
assurance
she now had of her lover's safety. He had
transmitted to her a present of various books of
late publication, such as the works of Pope,
Thomson, Addison, and others, which he knew she
had not seen, and was desirous to peruse. There
were also other presents of considerable value, as
jewelry, dress, &c. which need not be particularized.
These had been intrusted to the care of Doctor
Killbreath
,
who punctually obeyed his instructions by
handing them to her in private. But the gift which
afforded her by far the greatest pleasure, was a
packet of letters written by her Charles's own hand.
In these letters he assured her of the unabated
fervour of his love, which rendered him extremely
anxious to return to the Wilderness, to be once
more in her presence. Duties of a very
imperious
nature, he said, compelled him to remain a few
months longer in Philadelphia, but he trusted that
during the summer he should be able to gratify the
most ardent desire of his heart, by visiting her.
In the mean time, he exhortedhe conjured her,
to constancy and perseverance in cherishing that
affection which it was his only consolation to know
she bore for him.
But, reader, you have, no doubt read many a
love letter, and many, perhaps you have yourself
both written and received. To detain you,
therefore
,
with a recital of the sentiments contained in
those of Charles Adderly, for the sentimental parts
of all love letters, which are always the nine
tenths of their contents, are very much alike,
would be no treat. But as love had made him
something of a poet, and he had enclosed a few
verses in one of these letters in praise of his fair
one, (a thing which every writer of love letters
cannot
do,) I shall take the liberty of submitting them
to your perusal. These verses although far from
being of first-rate excellence, are at least no worse
than the rhymes which many a love-sick
gentleman
has thought proper to string together in
compliment
to his mistress. But be they good or bad,
since Charles Adderly wrote them, I think I may
be permitted to print them.
To Maria.
Maria! nature's loveliest child,
Sweet floweret of the fragrant wild!
When first you met my ravish'd eyes,
How leapt my bosom with surprise,
To find that, in the desert waste,
Nature, with careless hand, had plac'd
The loveliest plant that ever grew,
To warm the heart, and charm the view!
Ah! few, but happy were those days,
When on your charms I sat to gaze;
With heart enraptur'd at the sight,
I sigh'd with passionate delight.
For ne'er could I believe before
That woman had such charms in store,
As so to bind the captive soul,
In passion's chains beyond control!
May fortune bear me soon again,
To where you tread the sylvan reign;
Where, blest once more, I'll view your charms,
Feel the sweet pressure of your arms,
As through your native woods we rove,
And give our hearts and souls to love:
Till then, my only thought thou'lt be;
Then think of meand none but me!
The summer months passed without any
remarkable
occurrence happening to affect the
fortunes
of Maria. Her habits of household rural
employments were attended to as usual, but her
secret thoughts were altogether occupied with the
idea of him who loved her so warmly and
tenderly
,
and whom she did not now affect to conceal
from herself, she loved with equal warmth and
tenderness The perusal of the books, but more
particularly the letters he had sent her, occupied
the chief portion of her leisure hours; and on some
occasions, but not often, she would indulge her
feelings by talking about him to her sister. On
such occasions, however she still took care not to
dwell long upon the dangerous subject, lest she
might express herself more ardently in his favour,
than her delicate views of propriety would
altogether
warrant.
It was one beautiful evening in November 1753,
the Indian summer being then in all its glory and
sweetness, that these two young women walked
upon
the bank of the Monongahela. Charles
Adderly
,
Dr. Killbreath, and some Indian
transactions
,
were the chief topics of their conversation.
I am not sure whether I could wish Mr.
Adderly
to visit us this fall or not, observed Maria
the French dislike him so much, that they might
instigate the savages to his destruction. Oh,
Nancy! what a barbarous and blood-thirsty people
we live among?
I can say but little, replied Nancy, in
favour
of the Indians when they go out to war, or
when they take prisoners, for Dr. Killbreath says
that they have then little mercy on men, women,
or children. But I think Mr. Adderly could be
here long enough without their knowledge; and
Tonnaleuka, you know, could protect him.
Tonnaleuka cannot be every where, said
Maria. He has often to be at a distance among
the contending tribes, giving them counsel, and
settling their disputes. And the Indians are far
more exasperated this season against the English,
than they ever were before. But it is before he
arrives here, that danger is chiefly to be dreaded.
If the savages find him crossing any of the
mountains
,
alas! I fear his destruction will be
inevitable
.
I am sometimes tempted to pray that he may
not venture to come, at least until these outrageous
times be past.
Truly, observed Nancy, it would be better
that he should not attempt to visit you, than that he
should be killed. But both Paddy and Dr.
Killbreath
say, that the white people would have no
occasion to fear so much from the Indians, if they
would only treat them kindly, and not attempt to
cheat them, or wrest their lands from them, as they
do.
But Charles Adderly never cheated them,
replied Maria, nor had he taken any land from
them by force when they attacked him last year,
and were going to sacrifice him. Ah! I fear much
for him, for the French now hate him thoroughly;
and from their hatred there is less chance by far,
of escaping than from that of the Indians.
It is hard to say, returned Nancy, whether
he would consent to do what Dr. Killbreath has
done; make friends of the French, and live here
under their protection. If he would do this, I
think all would be safe, and
No! exclaimed MariaCharles Adderly
never will stoop to such a thing. I know him to
be too dignified in his sentiments for that. He
considers the French the enemies of his country,
and from such he never will crave protection.
Alas! no, if he come at all, it will be either
privately
,
or publicly as their enemy; for the
savages
and they, I fear, have latterly carried their
ravages
into the English settlements too ferociously
and destructively, not to have made every one of
that nation their enemy.
Why, that cannot be! observed Nancy, for
Dr. Killbreath is English, and he now lives here
with us as the friend of the French.
The doctor's love for you, returned Maria,
has induced him in this affair, I am persuaded,
to act contrary both to his inclination and
judgment
.
He has become an exception to the
conduct
that all the rest of his nation will adopt, which
I know Charles Adderly will never become.
I'm sure you know, said Nancy, that Mr.
Adderly is as much in love, and as desirous to live
here, as Dr. Killbreath; and why shouldn't he as
well as the doctor prefer love to politics?
Because, said Maria, it would be preferring
private interest to public duty, which Charles never
will do.
La! now, cried Nancy, I cannot believe
that you think so. Don't you suppose that Mr.
Adderly would prefer you to all the French, and
all the Indians, and all the English into the
bargain
,
in the world?
I have no right, said Maria, to suppose any
such thing. Nay, if he did so, it would be very
wrong, and I do not think I should esteem him so
much if I thought him capable of it.
Now surely, returned Nancy, with a look of
incredulity, you cannot be serious. What harm
has Dr. Killbreath done by making friends of the
French? and sure I must like him the better for
doing it on my account, and I am persuaded, that
if Mr. Adderly's love for you would so far
overcome
his dislike to them, you could not be
displeased
.
You are much mistaken in your opinion of me,
said Maria, if you believe so. A strict adherence
to principles and duty, I shall for ever admire; and
I shall the more admire it, that it is accomplished
in opposition to self interest and personal
advantage
;
for the more difficult the performance of
virtuous
actions is, the greater must be their merit,
and the higher should be the approbation afforded
them.
Then you do not think that Dr. Killbreath has
done right? observed Nancy.
I do not undertake to judge the doctor,
returned
Maria. Duties are, perhaps, like almost
every thing else, in the strictness of their
obligation
,
capable of being modified by circumstances.
What may be imperiously incumbent upon one
man to perform, may be less so, or even not at all
so, upon another; and the same man may, in
different
circumstances, feel himself bound to act
differently
in respect to a general duty, if he wants to
act right. Dr. Killbreath in making peace with
the French, even while they are making war with
his countrymen, may have no design to injure the
latter; on the contrary, he may thereby have it in
his power to serve some of them. But Charles
Adderly has higher responsibilities to bear. He
has been already employed as a leader, and his
countrymen must expect more from him than from
many others. But Nancy, to cut short the
discussion
,
I am convinced that, in the present times, no
temptation will induce Charles, even in
appearance
,
and I believe that it is only in appearance
that Dr. Killbreath has done so, to court favour
from the French.
I know, said Nancy, that the doctor don't
like them in his heart; for when he heard of them
sending the Wiandots on their late Blue Ridge
excursion
,
it will be a murderous affair, said he
I wish to God the Virginians may give them a
thorough defeat!
It is, indeed, shocking to think of these doings,
returned Maria: what cruel hearts those men
must have, that can engage in them! I fear they
will not give over until the English are excited to
retaliation; and then, alas! what a terrible state
of things may we not expect to witness in this
country! But I hope Providence will avert the
calamity. My heart sickens to think of it. How
different from that secure and peaceful state of
society
,
which the delightful author I have in my
hand describes! Let us sit down, Nancy, and I
shall read for you the heart-cheering picture of
love, peace, and virtue, which the beautiful tale of
Palemon and Lavinia exhibits; it will drive away
Vol. I. T
the disagreeable reflections which the
contemplation
of those sanguinary horrors, of which we have
been talking, have excited.
They sat down beneath a tree which grew on a
shelving portion of the bank, and Nancy listened
with great earnestness, while Maria read with an
audible and sweet voice, and with a tenderness and
pathos of manner which shewed that her whole
soul was enrapt with the delightful strains in
which the poet of the Seasons has told his
sweetest
tale. She had just pronounced the following
exquisite lines,
He saw her charming, but he saw not half
The charms her downcast modesty conceal'd
When Nancy, happening to direct her attention a
little to one side, perceived a white man leaning
against a tree scarce two yards distant. She
immediately
started to her feet in surprise, crying
out
Oh, Maria! here is a white stranger!
Maria arose, considerably startled, and the
stranger
approached, with mildness, benevolence, and
admiration strongly expressed in his countenance.
Ladies! said he, I must ask pardon for my
delay in addressing you. But how could I
interrupt
the noble exercise, the refined enjoyment in
which I found you engaged! And in such a place
tooso unexpectedly! I have traversed the
wilderness
nearly two hundred miles without seeing a
white woman; and here to discover such as you
and so employed! Ladiesforgive me, if I say
my delight is equal to my astonishment!
Sir! replied Mariawe meet in this
wilderness
with so few gentlemen like you, that, if we
have on our part manifested any symptoms of
childish surprise at seeing you, we presume that
you have discernment and candour enough to
ascribe
it to its true causeour peculiarly secluded
condition; for these woods, that river, and the sky
above us, are the utmost extent and variety of
external
nature that we have seen since our birth.
But our father lives near at hand; he always makes
the sojourner in the forest welcome. If you have
no objection, we will lead you to his house.
Is your father's name Frazier? asked the
stranger.
It is, sir, was the reply.
I was informed that his residence is about this
place, and was just in search of it, when I
perceived
you, he answered.
An idea now crossed Maria's thoughts, which
made her change colour, and embarrassed her
manner more then even the sudden appearance of
the stranger.
He may be from Philadelphiahe may have
news for me (thought she);but I dare not ask
him;and she unconsciously heaved a sigh,
which was not unobserved by the penetrating
stranger, whose eye, indeed, since he first saw
her, had, in spite of all his efforts, been kept
steadily
fixed upon her. He would fain at this
moment
have inquired into the cause of her slight
agitation, but his delicacy, and an agitation which
he himself felt, keener, perhaps, than even Maria's,
prevented him, and they went towards the house
in silence. A few minutes brought them to the
lane, where they met Gilbert; and Maria
becoming
soon satisfied, from their conversation, that the
stranger was not from Philadelphia, the fluttering
of her bosom gradually subsided.
That, sir, is my father, said she, as Gilbert
approached. He soon saluted the stranger with a
friendly welcome, who cordially shook his hand,
saying,
I have heard of you, Mr. Frazier, and was
directed
to take your house on my way to Fort Le
Buf, where I am proceeding on public business,
by the order of the Governor of Virginia.
The high respect with which the stranger's first
appearance had impressed Gilbert, was, of course,
nothing diminished by this intelligence.
Ay, ay! Indian business, na doot, said he;
I wonner the Governor did na lang ere this, send
to inquire after thir things; for there hae been
unco fearfu' an' troublesome doings lately. I hope
noo, howsomever, that ye'll get it a' settled. But
come in, come inI wish I could accommodate
ye better; but amang thir woods, ye ken, it's no
like lievin' in a christian country.
Your kindness will far more than compensate for
any deficiency of accommodationGeorge
Washington
,
for such, Mr. Frazier, is my name, will
never be fastidious in this respect. If he has not
yet learned, he hopes he will learn, how to bear
hardships when the public service requires them.
In the mean time, to men who have, for several
nights past, lodged in the open woods, the shelter
of your roof will be a luxury; for I am not, you
will suppose, traversing this wilderness without
assistants and guides.
And whar are yere men? inquired Gilbert;
I'll send for them, an' try wi' heart an' gude
wull, to mak' ye a' welcome.
I left them about a mile up the river, where
they halted to refresh themselves, while, with my
rifle in my hand, I kept on our course before
them.
Your rifle! said Gilbert, seeing none in
Washington's possession; an' whar is it?
It is at the foot of a walnut tree, not far from
the place where I met your daughters; for on
perceiving them, I feared to alarm them by
appearing
armed in their presence, and dropped it
there.
I'll send my sin Archy to bring your men doon
the river, said Gilbert. He'll likely fin' the
rifle on his way. But come yoursel' into the
hoose, Mr. Washington, an' the women will hae
something comfortable for you, belyve.
I think I had myself better go back for the
rifle, said Washington; I can from thence call
my men together. It will save your son
unnecessary
trouble.
He accordingly retraced his steps as far back as
the walnut tree, where he sounded a horn, as a
signal for his company to come on, which was
immediately
answered from no great distance.
Archy, who, by his father's order, followed after
him, overtook him at that crisis, and was
informed
that he need proceed no further, for his
companions
would be present in a few minutes.
I'll push on, if ye please, sir, said Archy;
the sight of a white man in thir woods, since the
Indians have frightened away the traders, is a
pleasure we canna get every day.
So saying, he hastened onwards, and
Washington
returned to the house, desirous again to behold
the most beautiful and interesting female he had
ever seen.
T 2
CHAPTER XVII.
He came to the cot of the wild mountaineer,
And gladly its inmates receiv'd him:
He came with a tale which he told without fear,
And freely and well they believ'd him;
He came with a heart that was blithesome and gay,
And he wot not of love that could bind him,
But when from that cottage he went far away,
He left his gay heart there behind him.
Basket of Scraps
.
Maria
, who now knew the quality and errand
of the new visiter, received him, on his
entering
the house, with none of that embarrassment
which she had manifested before meeting with
her father. Her manner was kind and
respectful
,
but easy, graceful, and dignified. Her guest
however, was not so much at ease. He saw
before him the most perfect model of female
excellence
,
(and no man ever more ardently admired
such excellence,) of which he had ever formed
any conception; and he saw this where, of all
places in the world, he least expected to see it,
and under circumstances the most calculated of
any that could easily be imagined, to make an
impression
on his heart. How could he then, at this
moment, feel tamely cool and collected in her
presence! No; Washington's heart was made of
warmer materials, and his soul composed of more
amiable qualities, than to behold, unmoved, so rare
a combination of all those charms that form the
witchery of woman.
When he was seated with Maria and Nancy in
Gilbert's little parlour, and some light refreshment
placed before him, until a more substantial meal
could be prepared, Maria observing that he
scarcely
tasted any thing
Mr. Washington, said she, I should have
expected that traversing the woods would have
quickened the appetite more than it seems to have
done with you. I wish you would use some of
this fare. It is indeed rustic, but you will make
allowance for it, being the produce of the
Wilderness
.
I shall eat, since it will gratify you, he
replied
,
although I confess I have no appetite just
now. Yet think not, Miss Frazier, that it is
because
these cakes and that metheglin are
disagreeable
to my taste, that I use them sparingly.
Nothe choicest viands of city luxury could not
be more grateful to me. Ah! I feel, believe me
I do, that the very heart of the Wilderness can
produce attractions equal, nay, let me say
superior
,
to any I have yet met with in society.
Sir, said Maria, there must be a
refinement
in society, arising from a thousand
opportunities
and advantages enabling the people to
cultivate
it, that we do not possess here; nor can it
be expected that we should. What means, what
instructions, what examples, either to infuse and
culture taste, or afford the means of its
gratification
,
can we enjoy among nations of savages,
whose only object is to prowl the Wilderness, in
search of prey, or alas! too frequently, in search
of revenge.
And yet, said Washingtonin this very
Wilderness
,
it appearsforgive me for saying it Miss
Frazierbut it is truth; that you have been
taught both to relish and discriminate with a truer
taste, and sounder judgment, the refinements of
life, than the majority of even those women in
society who have had the advantages of the best,
tuition. I have met with none of them who
could have read with more apparent feeling and
enjoyment, than you did to-day, the delightful
tale of the lovely, the modest Lavinia, who, like
yourself, was the child of seclusion; and who,
like yourself, possessed as much, perhaps, more
real taste and refinement, than if she had been
brought up in courts. I must confess, Miss
Frazier
,
that from my first perusal of Lavinia's tale,
which was in my boyhood, I have been more
enamoured
of the idea my fancy formed of her
attractions
and virtues, than I ever was with those
of any other woman; and until
He was here interrupted by the arrival of his
party, whom Gilbert with great animation and
satisfaction
,
introduced into the apartment.
I am glad, said Gilbert, when he had them
all seated, to see sae many christians in my hoose,
an' speakin' sae as I can understand. It's like
getting
bock to the world again.
And I, said Mr. Vanbraam, who was to be
Washington's interpreter with the French, I am
heartily glad, after wandering ten or twelve days
as we have done, without seeing a house at all,
once more to get the walls of one round my sides.
So, Mr. Frazier, we have cancelled obligations in
this respect, I think.
I wish we could only cancel the debt of
mischief
we owe the French, and their red allies as
easily, said one Gist, who had acted as guide to
the party through the Wilderness. Mr. Frazier, I
have often heard the trader's talk of your living
down here, and many a time I wondered at your
hardihood, and cannot guess how you have
escaped
so long, unless it be by the aid of the
Mingo
prophet, or conjurer, that they talk about, as
protecting you. It's nation curious, Mr.
Frazier
.
It is, indeed, remarkable, observed
Washington
,
that amidst all their depredations and
barbarities of late, the Indians should have
permitted
a family so very much in their power, and
belonging to the nation they so much hate, to
remain
so long unmolested. You must assuredly,
Mr. Frazier, have some uncommon means of
conciliating
them?
I canna say, replied Gilbert, that I hae ever
used muckle means to please them, but I aye tak'
care no to offend them. I hae never yet cheated
or affronted any o' them, as the traders hae often
done.
I believe, said Washington, that the
injudicious
and unnecessary haughtiness, and, perhaps,
in many instances, fraudulent conduct of our own
people, have been the means of provoking these
sons of the forest, to resentment and cruelties
against us, that they would not otherwise have
displayed
.
It would be wise and fortunate, Mr.
Frazier, if all our back-settlers and traders, would
act so inoffensively towards them as you have
done. The intrigues of French jealousy and
ambition
,
would not then be so fatally successful as
they now are, in stirring them up against us.
Surely, observed Gist, you can't 'spose it
a sin of much heinousness to take from the
enemies
of the Lord whatever we can get, and in any
how we can get it. These savages are heathens,
the Lord's enemies. I expect, and I guess you
remember
the story of the children of Israel
despoiling
the Egyptians by borrowing, without
returning
,
according to the command of the Lord.
But we have no command of the kind, said
Washington, to treat the Indians so; and, Mr. Gist,
although you have been a trader among their tribes,
I hope, as you were not placed in exactly the same
circumstances as the Israelites, you did not feel
bound to imitate their manner of despoiling the
Egyptians, who, you will recollect, had been long
their tyrannical task-masters.
Ye're vera right, sir, observed Gilbertthe
Testament says, that the labourer is worthy o' his
hire, an' as the Egyptians would na' wi' their ain
will gie the Israelites their lawfu' wages, which
could na' be ta'en by force, they could na do
better
than tak' it by craftan' since the prophet
o' the Lord bade it, it could na be a sin, ye
ken.
We han't any express command, said Gist,
to despoil the savages, I grant ye. But are they
not heathens, and as wicked, and cursed before the
Lord, I guess, as the Egyptians. 'Tarnation to
them! han't they plundered, and robbed, and
massacred us, if they did not make us slaves!
This plundering and massacreing, said
Washington
,
have, indeed, unhappily taken place;
but I fear that they have been sometimes
wantonly
provoked by the misconduct of our own
people
.
The safety and tranquility of Mr. Frazier
here, in the midst of the Indians, is a proof of it.
He has had the old conjurer, Tonnaleuka, at
his back, I guess, said Gist. Unless the devil
had helped him, he couldn't, I expect, have so
long escaped his imps, and their tomahawks.
They say he's a nation'd curious old fish, that
Indian
prophet. I guess I shouldn't dislike much,
to see whether he has a cloven foot, like his
daddy
.
You may examine instantly, thou son of
levity
,
said a solemn and awful voice, which made
the blood almost freeze in the heart of the
startled
and terrified Gist, at the same time, the
majestic
and hallowed looking figure of Tonnaleuka
stood before him, with one leg advanced, as if to
invite inspection.
Look here, continued the prophet, is there
any mark of an evil spirit here? Examine me, all.
Is there any such mark about me? Where comest
thou from, thou mocker of sacred things? Thou
perverter of sacred oracles! Hear meI will tell
youfor I have been in your land. Is it not
called
the land of puritanism? Upon the river
Connecticut
,
do ye not call yourselves the servants of
Godthe enlightened children of the east?
Hearken to me, I will tell you what you are,
You are the children of mammon, the followers of
lucre, and the victims of witchcraft. It is you
that have the cloven foot. When upon the shores
of the Concord, and the Merrimack, I saw you
sacrifice your sons and your daughters as victims
to the spirit of evil, to the angel of darkness, as
your priest called him; how did my soul rejoice
in the pure religion of my native tribes! How did
I congratulate myself that I was none of you!
We worship, said I, one Great Spirit who made all
men, and desires the sacrifice of none. But these
irrational people of the east, worship Lucifer, the
deity of gold, and sacrifice to his kindred god, the
spirit of darkness, whom they call the author of
evil. How preposterous!
But hear me, son of deceit! thou who wouldst
despoil a people more upright and pure than thine
own, and think it no crime! Hear me, I can
At this, Gist, who expected some sudden
denunciation
,
and preternatural infliction of the prophet's
wrath, trembled greatly, and turned ghastly pale;
which induced Tonnaleuka to assume a look of
kindness and forgiveness, with which he thus
continued
:
Hear meI am an Indian, and can
forbear
to be angry when the Great Spirit forbids
anger
;
and for the sake of one here, he who is your
leader, whom he hath blessed, whom he hath
sworn to lead and guide in the ways of truth,
righteousness, and prosperity, he hath forbidden
anger.
And brother, said he, turning to Washington,
thou blessed of heaven! I will say to thee, thou
mayest go on thy way without fear. Thou hast
received a spirit of wisdom, and of virtue, to keep
thee right, and no one will harm thee; but thou
wilt, when thou performest thy errand, return to
thy home and thy people, in safety; and from thee
they shall learn what to do; and if they hearken
to thy words, they will prosper and become a
great people.
Brother, thou hast heard my words.
To this Washington answered:
FatherI am glad I have met with you. I
have heard of your virtues, and of your influence
over the Indians. You know that the object of my
mission at present, to the Wilderness, is to effect
a reconciliation with those of your nations, who
are hostile to us, and to put an end to the
intrigues
of your French brethren, in exciting them
against us.
FatherI thank you for your good will, and
the favourable sentiments you have expressed
towards
me, and I wish for your aid in
accomplishing
the pacific object I have in view; an object
which I know you must approve.
FatherMy instructions are to visit the
French, and to remonstrate with them; for we
look upon them as the chief source of our late
calamities, and blame them more than we do your
people. If we at all lift the hatchet, it will be
more to humble them, than to punish the Indians
whom they have deceived into the belief that we
are their enemies.
Father! The temper of our red brothers,
unless
when they are deceived or provoked, I do not
believe to be so cruel and malignant as I have
heard reported. You know that they have,
during
the last summer, done us great injury, by
destroying
our people and carrying off our property.
Hence it was natural we should think them
blood-thirsty
and inhuman. But they have permitted
our friend Frazier to live here in the midst of them
in peace, for many years, although he is of our
nation. I presume, therefore, that they are not
inveterately hostile to us, and that, if they were
only well informed as to our intentions towards
them, they would be our friends, and withdraw
their confidence from those who deceive them.
Father! you have heard me, and you may believe
that we do not wish to be at war with your
people
.
Brother, replied Tonnaleuka, you are a
wise man, and know the true interests of your
country. I have heard youI have listened to
you with great delight, as I would to the pleasant
sound of the summer's breeze, that refreshes the
forest when it whistles amidst the leaves of the
hazel
and the elder bushesfor it is refreshing to
hear the words of peace from a white man.
Brotherour white brother, Frazier, has lived
here long; and because he was peaceable we have
not disturbed him. The chiefs of thirteen nations
have, at different times, smoked the calumet with
him, and he has thirteen strings of wampum in his
possessionthe symbols of amity, and his security
from molestation. All your white men might sit
in tranquillity and safety, with as little fear and
concern
for our animosity, as our friend, if they would
only conduct themselves as he has done;for
hear me, brother, Indians can be kind friends, as
assuredly as you have found them to be terrible
enemies.
Brotherhear meall our tribes have not
declared against your nation. Naysome of them
Vol. I. U
wish you better than they do the French. The
Shannoahs, the Delawares, and the Mingoes, who
inhabit these parts, believe the French to be less
upright than you, and they have blamed the
Ottawas
,
and the Chippeways, and the Caughnewagoes,
and the Wiandots, and the other nations who have
lent themselves to your white enemies; for they
say,who invaded our territories, and built forts
among us first? Was it not the French? The
English are more numerous and powerful, and yet
they have been more moderate, and have kept out
of our hunting ground, or else come into it with
our permission. We should, therefore, wish the
English better than the French.
Thus, brother, are the Shannoahs, the
Delawares
,
and the Mingoes your friends. You are
now among them, and need fear nothing; and as
to the hostile tribes, they have, for this season,
withdrawn to their huts and their wigwams, and
will annoy you no more till the spring; and, if
you can persuade the French to be quiet, all will
be well; but, brother, the French are not inclined
to be so. You have heard my opinions. Receive
this wampum in testimony of my friendship. The
chief of my tribe, I doubt not, will also give you
one.
Brotheras you are peaceable, may you be
prosperous! So saying, he turned round, and
left the apartment.
The impression made on our travellers, by this
extraordinary Indian, was a mixture of
astonishment
and reverence. Washington had before
heard of him, as an eccentric man, with some
pretensions
to the spirit of prophecy, and with just
sufficient knowledge of the world and of mankind,
to enable him to impose himself upon his
barbarous
brethren as an inspired person; but he had
no idea of that dignity, that wisdom, that elevation
of manner, and commanding potency of language,
which scarcely ever failed to effect its purpose with
his auditors; and which, consequently, gave him
an unbounded influence over many nations of his
red brethren.
Washington was extremely desirous to make
inquiry
of some of Frazier's family, concerning what
they knew of the prophet's previous life, and the
means by which he had acquired that knowledge
of the world which he evidently possessed, in a
degree
far superior to any thing he had ever
expected
to find in an Indian. The best qualified
person
to give him such information, he believed, was
Maria; at all events, he felt she would be the most
agreeable; and was internally pleased with the
idea, that the making such an inquiry would afford
him an excellent plea for drawing her into a
conversation
,
perhaps, somewhat of a confidential
kind; and which she could have no proper
objection
to indulge him in extending to a considerable
length. She had left the room immediately on the
entrance of his companionshe could not,
therefore
,
instantaneously gratify his wishes; but he
resolved
to seize the first opportunity that offered
during the evening for that purpose; and in the
meantime, to refrain from asking that information
from her father or any other of the family which
would be, beyond measure, more sweet and
precious
when obtained from her lips. The noblest
of all poems has informed the world, that our good
mother Eve, was actuated by similar feelings
towards
the man she loved, when she withdrew, while
the angel communicated to him the interesting
story of the world's creation, in order that she
might afterwards enjoy the greater delight of
hearing
him repeat it. Thus it appears that the effects
of love upon the mind did not differ greatly sixty
centuries ago in Paradise, from what they did
about sixty years ago in the Wilderness.
As to the observations of the rest of the
company
concerning Tonnaleuka, when he had withdrawn,
they were expressed pretty much as follows:
By heavens! said Vanbraam, that is a strange
kind of a man! If it were not against all the rules
of Monsieur Bayle's philosophy, I protest I should
almost believe him to be really a prophet. He
must at least be a soothsayer. Hah, Gist! he gave
your yankeeism, with all its shifts and turnings,
a complete overset. I never hit a pigeon's crown
more fairly with a rifle shot, than he did your
witchcraft.
Tarnation to your rifle, and him too! cried
Gist, rather hysterically, and forcing into his
manner
an appearance of ease and unconcern, which
he really did not feel. What signifies his
gibberish
about the Merrimack and the Concord. I
guess he wanted to frighten mebut, faith, Elij'
Gist ha'nt got so squirrel a heart as to flinch at a
pop-gun. But it's nation curious, after all, I
expect.He's an odd fishand I an't sure
whether
he mayn't be Satan, or not. His bear-skin
moccasins may have hidden his cleft foot.
Whether his foot be cloven or not, replied
Vanbraam, his sudden appearance, I believe, clove
the contents of your
cranium
, as the philosophers
call it, down to the very
cella turcica
of the
learned
Voissius; and I doubt the saddle itself has been
shattered, for it is plain that your brain has not
yet resumed its proper position in it.
Curse your philosophy, and your Latin!
exclaimed
Gist. You would fire a squib at me too,
I guessbut I expect you an't primed enough,
Mr. Interpreter! Tarnation to it! but if my head
wan't bothered with that conjurer, and your
Latin
,
I could twirl back your jokes till your ears
would ring again, I guess, as easily as I could
crack a hazel-nut.
Ay! and as easily as you lost your wager this
morning, replied Vanbraam, by shooting the
squirrel through the tail instead of the head. Pro
pudor! Master Aimwell!
Pro devil! cried Gist, considerably nettled;
I tell you, MonsieurI guess I can aim as well
as youtarnation to you! I'll stake you five
guineas
,
here they are, true spades, I guess, and as
good metal as ever had the king's head on them
down with as many now! Mr. Washington, you'll
hold the stakes. I'll shoot for them with any man
in the company, except yourself, at a hundred
yards distance, through the size of a crown-piece.
Vanbraam, I guess now I defy you for the yellow
boys.
Defy me at hitting a mark at a hundred yards!
Gist, that you sha'nt, returned the interpreter.
If it were a needle's point instead of a crown
piece, I'll take you up. Here is the coin. Mr.
Washington will say when and where.
At this moment Mrs. Frazier entered to equip
the table for dinner, and Washington observed:
At present, my friends, this good lady is about
furnishing you with other employment, in which,
I hope, you will have no objection to engage.
To-morrow morning, if you wish to try your skill,
you may do it with all my heart; but I would
recommend
you to do it from a nobler motive than
the winning of a wager, I mean the honour of
victory
.
You will, therefore, be pleased, each of you,
to take back your money; and let us have
to-morrow
a friendly contest for the character of the
best marksman: I shall myself try a hand in the
sport.
No, sir, said Vanbraam, I shall not engage
to contend with you; Gist is my antagonist.
U 2
Nor I, said Gist; I guess we would come
off devilish losers in that matter. But, sir, I han't
no objection you should try the winner.
As you please, said Washington; but if the
day be suitable for travelling, we must not occupy
much of it in amusement.
We shall only take the best of three hits, sir,
and then attend you, said Vanbraam.
Mrs. Frazier's good fare now smoked upon the
table, and the party soon applying themselves
pretty vigorously to its enjoyment, the
conversation
was discontinued.
During the repast, Paddy Frazier and Dr.
Killbreath
arrived from a hunting excursion, and took
their seats. The former, after the meal was over,
informed Washington that the governor of Le Buf
was dead, and that an officer named St. Pierre
commanded there in his place; that in a few days
a council of the chiefs of some tribes, mostly
friendly
to the English, was to be held at a place called
the Loggstown, about thirty miles down the river,
and that all the hostile tribes, except the Wiandots
and Caughnewagoes, had removed to a
considerable
distance westward, to spend the winter, with
the intention, however, of recommencing in the
spring with more than their former force and
ferocity
their depredations upon the frontiers.
At the present time, said he, the only
danger your company can have to encounter will
arise from the Wiandots and Caughnewagoes, part
of whom are yet encamped between this and Le
Buf, and their chiefs are to attend the council
at the Loggstown.
But on account of the nature of my mission,
I have a right, observed Washington, to demand
a safe-conduct for my followers from the French,
which I suppose those Indians will respect. It is
true, the obtaining that safe-conduct may be
attended
with difficulty and loss of time. It would
not be safe for any of my men to venture singly to
the fort for that purpose. It will, therefore, be
better to keep together, exert prudence, and trust
to Providence for the issue.
There is a small fortification, returned
Paddy
,
lately erected at Venango, not much above
sixty miles from this place, commanded by a
Monsieur Joncaire. Let me see, I think I could
be there to-morrow night, for I am well acquainted
with the road; and the third day from this, I think,
barring accidents, I could meet you at the
Loggstown
with a safe-conduct. In the meantime, we
can
start
Dr. Killbreath in a canoe to king
Shingiss
,
about twelve miles down the river, with
information
that you are here. He will afford you
all the protection he can, for he is the most steadily
attached to the English of any chief in the
country
.
Washington immediately perceived the
propriety
of acceding to those proposals; and Paddy,
who required no other preparation for the journey
than merely to throw on his belts, and a small
wallet of provisions, and to see that his rifle was in
order, received his instructions, and was off in a
few minutes. Dr. Killbreath also set out the same
evening in a canoe for king Shingiss' residence.
The roads being bad, in order to relieve the horses
of part of their burthens, he took a great
portion
of the baggage with him, which was placed
under the care of three of Washington's men,
named Stewart, Currin, and McGuire, who
accompanied
him in the canoe.
It was not till after making these arrangements,
that Washington enjoyed the opportunity he so
much desired of conversing with Maria on the
subject of Tonnaleuka, or, if the reader will have
it so, on any subject she might think proper to
permit. At length, various occasions having
caused
the apartment to be vacated by all except
Maria
,
Nancy, and himself, he addressed them, not,
it must be confessed, without feeling some slight
agitation at his heart, which, however, he soon
overcame.
Ladies, said he, next to the astonishment
I felt at first finding you in this Wilderness, my
greatest surprise has been to see that it contains
so extraordinary a man as Tonnaleuka; the
Indians
cannot surely be quite destitute of
intelligent
men, when they have such an instructor.
I am sorry to say, observed Maria, that
the Indians, although they have often benefited
by his counsels, are, universally, through all their
tribes, too inveterately attached to their ancient
habits, to derive advantage from his instructions;
nay, so great is their antipathy to all kinds of
knowledge not communicated to them by their
ancestors, that whenever he has offered to open
to their youth any of the stores of his information,
they have uniformly forbidden him; and, I
believe
,
that our family is the only one in the
Wilderness
in which his benevolent efforts to
communicate
knowledge to the uninformed mind has
been thankfully received.
Then I see the mystery explained!
exclaimed
Washington, almost involuntarily; no
wonder
,
extraordinary maiden, that your mind is so
superior, when with your own fine natural talents
you have had such an extraordinary instructor!
Pardon me, Miss Frazier, I have, perhaps, said
too much; but it is really singular and pleasing
to meet with such minds as I have met with here!
Sir, said Maria, I know not what may be
the privileges of your sex in society; but, if I may
credit the authors I have read, they have always
been accustomed to work upon the vanity of ours
by praising our excellence beyond all rational
bounds; and, I believe, the daughters of
refinement
have always permitted them to indulge this
display of their good manners at the expense of
sincerity, perhaps, because they knew the exact
value to place upon it. But as here, in the forest,
we have no means of ascertaining this value with
equal precision, I think our safest method will be
to dispense with the custom altogether, and
tolerate
,
from those who converse with us, only such
language as is conformable to truth and nature.
I, therefore, wish
Oh, Miss Frazier! said Washington,
interrupting
her with considerable emotion, Oh,
believe
me, if I have offended your delicacy, it was
done involuntarilyand let me say in my own
justification, that I never spoke insincerely to
flatter
either man or woman; and that, concerning
you in particular, I have not expressed halfah!
I will notI dare not express half, what I think
your merits
Stop, sir, said she, I will not impeach
your sincerityI believe you incapable of uttering
opinions you know to be unfounded; but in this
instance you are perhaps too premature in your
conclusionsa little more time, a little more
acquaintance
,
might show your first impressions to
be erroneous. I will accuse you, therefore, of
nothing but incaution, to which I request that so
far as respects your opinion of me you will plead
guilty, and let us end the discussion.
Incautious in expressing that opinion,
replied
Washington, I may have been; but
certainly
not in forming it, for, alas! I cannot resist
the evidence of my senses.
Well then, observed Maria, let the matter
rest so; we esteem each other too highly, I hope,
to contend about nice distinctions; you have
acknowledged
your want of caution in one
particular
:
this is as much as I can ask for. I have no
right to turn your confessor, and require you to
inform me of every little foible and mistake into
which you may have detected yourself falling.
Tonnaleuka's character is a public one, and,
therefore, a fair subject of investigation. We
began with it, I believe, and if you can
animadvert
upon it without complimenting mine, I have
no objection to join you on the subject; for there
is scarcely another in the world that could afford
me more satisfaction.
I am desirous, observed Washington,
cautiously
avoiding the tempting, but forbidden topic
of her praise; I am desirous to know from what
sources this singular man has drawn his
uncommonly
extensive information. A philosophera
prophetand a savage!how can we reconcile
the co-existence in one individual of characters
so apparently contradictory to each other?
But, reader, I have given you enough of this
dialogue; during the remainder of which our
heroine
detailed to Washington all she had learned
of the prophet's early life, and opportunities of
acquiring knowledge. You, however, know all
about this already. I will not, therefore, tease
you needlessly by repeating an already-told tale.
I shall only mention that, during this conversation,
the whole heart and affections of Washington were
irreclaimably given up to Maria, and that,
although
the gratification he enjoyed was great, it
was dearly enough purchased by the irretrievable
loss of his heart's tranquillity.
CHAPTER XVIII.
There is a high and mystic spell,
With which great minds supremely sway
O'er those of grosser mould;
Whose nameless potency obey
The coward and the bold,
Nor of its source aright the history can tell.
On human fate in darkest hour,
Its beams of light can fall,
And some its intellectual power,
Before whose dazzling beam they cower,
The might of magic call.
Basket of Scrape
.
There
is many a fair lady in America, who, I
doubt not, will think it a great pity that the
illustrious
character, who had thus become a captive
to Maria's charms, should have been fated to throw
away the ardent affections of his manly heart upon
one who could not return them. Such a one will
regret much, that he had not visited the
Wilderness
a year sooner, when the probability would
have been, that he should then have gained that
ascendancy over her feelings which Charles
Adderly
now possessed. Nay, there will be some
inclined to challenge the accuracy of our heroine's
taste and discernment, in not, at once, giving the
preference to her new loverwhom we know now
to have been born to the glorious destiny of
establishing
a new and triumphant era for the rights
and dignities of man! If ever, indeed, a
deviation
from the rigid line of constancy in love could
admit of apology, it would have been in this
instance
:
but Maria Frazier, like the noble-hearted
youth who had now become devoted to her, was
resolved never, with her knowledge, to do any
thing that should require apology. In justification
of her discernment, we will say, that she clearly
saw all Washington's merits; and although she
could not foresee all his future greatness, she
esteemed and respected him as much as if she did.
At all events, had he been even then the
conqueror
of Cornwallis, and the emancipator of half
the world, devoted, ardently devoted, as his whole
soul was to her, he could not have made her
change in her attachment, or waver in her
constancy
,
for Charles Adderly.
But Washington knew not this; nay, he knew
not that any one possessed those affections, for
which he felt that he could sacrifice every
consideration
but one to obtain. For to him there was
something more dear, more sacred, than the
dearest
,
the sweetest throb that could ever warm his
heart, or give pleasure to his existencemore
dear than life, more dear than famemore dear
than even that Maria, whose loveliness had
enchanted
his feelings into a sense of bliss he had
never before knownit was his
Duty
. This was
the polar star that guided all his actionsthis was
the moving spirit within him, to whose dictates he
was resolved that every prospect, every feeling,
and every wish of his existence, should bend.
Had he known the state of Maria's mind, ere he
permitted her charms to imprint themselves so
deeply on his heart, as almost to attain an
irresistible
influence over his destiny, it is probable
that he would have had resolution enough to have
successfully combated against their power, and to
have preserved that freedom which he now,
almost
without a struggle, yielded to their
fascination
.
He did not, however, yield blindly, and
without reflection, as many lovers do. He yielded
because he conceived it to be his duty, to give up
those youthful affections, which he felt were yet
unappropriated, to one whom Providence seemed
to have thrown in his way as the most suitable,
since she was the most lovely, and he believed the
most virtuous of her sex, to whom he could
attach
himself, and to one of whom he knew that he
ought, sooner or later, to unite his fate.
Being now upon important public business
which required despatch, he thought it would be
wrong to make such a delay at her father's house
as would justify him in making a declaration of
his feelings, or even attempting to engage her
affections
by any attentions of such a nature as
might have that effect. After his public duty
should be performed, and his public functions
expired
,
he would then be master of his own time,
and of his own movements, and without
obstruction
from any duty, he could return to the abode
of his Maria, woo her affections, tell her how he
loved her, and solicit her to become the wife of
his bosom. These were the dreams of love in
which this young hero now delighted to indulge;
these were the captivating pictures of future
felicity
,
the endearing scenes of domestic bliss, when
Maria should be his own, which his fancy loved
to form; and amidst all the cares, the dangers,
and the toils of the arduous enterprise he had
undertaken
to conduct, these ideasthese visions
of Maria, love and happiness were his solace, his
joy, and the bright reward which he hoped would
crown all his labours.
Although the emotions of his mind had kept him
long sleepless after his retiring to rest, yet he was
early awake; and soon had the three companions
of his journey who remained with him, namely,
Vanbraam, Gist, and one Jenkins, at work, fixing
the horses, and preparing to move onwards. Their
good host, Gilbert, however, thought it would
never
Vol. I. X
do to let them depart without breakfast; and
he pleaded so hard that they should delay till it
was prepared, that he gained his point, and Nelly
put it in a state of forwardness.
In the meantime, according to their agreement
the preceding night, Vanbraam and Gist, tried
the accuracy of their rifles, and the steadiness of
their eyes, upon a mark at a hundred yards
distance
,
which each pierced so dexterously that it
was difficult for Washington to allot to either the
victory. The distance was enlarged to one
hundred
and fifty yards, when, after several trials,
Vanbraam gained a slight advantage, and Gist
was obliged, though with great reluctance, to
relinquish
the contest.
At length, they set forward, and Washington
for the first time in his life, felt what it was to
separate from the object of a tender love. He
heaved an involuntary sigh as he bade her adieu,
and although she perceived it, and suspected its
cause, (for she was too sagacious to be easily
deceived
in this matter) she in a very calm, but
kindly and respectful manner, wished him a safe
and prosperous return from the perils of his
undertaking
.
Thank you, Miss Frazier, was all he said;
but he mentally added, Oh! may heaven soon
restore me to her lovely presence, and, for her
sake, grant peace to the Wilderness she
inhabits
!
A few hours brought them to the Shanapin's
town. Here, with the eye of a soldier, he
beheld
the point of land where the Alleghany and
Monongahela meet; and was the first person to
be struck with the eligibility of the situation for a
fort, on which afterwards Du Quesne, and fort
Pitt, were successively built. This was in
consequence
of the French erecting the former of
these fortifications, the spot which soon afterwards
became the great object of contention between
the two most powerful nations in the world, each
adopting the opinion of Washington concerning
it, as being the position which more than any
other westward of the Alleghany mountains, was
calculated to give its possessors the command of
the largest portion of country.
Having spent some time in estimating the height
of the banks, and the breadth of the rivers at
this place, he accompanied Shingiss, king of the
Delawares, who had here met him with ten or
twelve of his warriors, to his residence, situated
about two miles farther down the river, upon the
bank of Chartier's creek, and near the place
where Charles Adderly had been defeated. Here
he found that doctor Killbreath's party and the
baggage, had arrived safe. It was near the
evening
,
when he reached this place, but as he was
desirous to view the ground on which our hero's
disasters had taken place, Shingiss accompanied
him to the spot, with doctor Killbreath, who
having
acquired a considerable knowledge of the
Indian language, acted as his interpreter.
Here he saw the remains of the hasty
fortification
that Charles had attempted to construct, and
perceived some of its logs yet stained with the
blood of several of those who fell in defending
it. Shingiss also pointed out to him the spot
where Charles slew the young Indian chief,
Carrawissa
,
and gave him an account of the
desperate
encounter between them, of which he said
he was an eye-witness, in such terms as raised
Charles's heroism to a considerable height in the
opinion of Washington; and, indeed, the whole of
what he heard and saw, impressed him with a
very exalted idea of his character, both as a
man and a soldier.
The Indian mode of fighting, described to him
on this occasion, by skulking and keeping up an
irregular fire from behind trees, or from
ambuscades
,
forcibly struck his mind as being the only
one suited for that woody country, and the only
one by which its red warriors could be successfully
combated. He perceived, therefore, that Charles
Adderly, had, in a military point of view,
committed
a great error in attempting to defend such a
frail fortification, when the thickness of the forest
offered his men, in every direction, infinitely
securer
covers for defence, as well as more eligible
points from which to attack. He conceived that
he ought to have ordered them to screen
themselves
in the woods as soon as the assailants
appeared
,
and from behind trees or ravines, to take
off by a sure and steady fire, any enemy that
should approach them.
The next morning, in company with Shingiss,
and a few of his warriors, Washington, and his
whole party proceeded to the Loggstown, which
was about sixteen miles farther westward. Here
a number of the chiefs had already assembled,
among whom he distributed the presents he had
brought from Virginia, for that purpose. These
presents were received graciously, and
Washington
was assured, that he had nothing to fear for
his party, as all the chiefs present wished to be
on friendly terms with the English. A large
wigwam
was constructed for him and his men, around
which, some of Shingiss' warriors assisted in
keeping guard, for fear of any surprise during the
night.
The next morning, several other chiefs, and
sachems, among whom were those of the
Wiandots
,
and Caughnewagoes, who were hostile to the
English, arrived. These hostile chiefs, however,
on being informed that Washington had come to
the council for the purpose of making peace with
the French Indians, after which, he was to
proceed
to Le Buf, to make peace with the French
themselves, accepted of his presents, and
promised
to listen to his proposals without
molesting
him.
A council feast was now prepared, at which
Washington and his party, were invited to
partake
;
after which, all the chiefs smoked the
calumet
with him, except those of the hostile tribes,
who said that they could not do so until they knew
the terms of peace he should offer; and until their
allies, the French, had accepted of them, and
ratified a treaty.
At length, the council was organised, and
Kustaloga
,
the chief sachem of the Mingoes, being
declared its president, he addressed Washington
as follows:
BrotherYou are welcome to our assembly.
Our father, the governor of Virginia, has shown
his wisdom in sending you to make peace with
the red nations, and their white allies. I shall
rejoice when I hear that you have prevailed on
them to bury the hatchet, and, as you are a
prudent
man, I doubt not that you will be
successful
.
BrotherFor my part, I have been always
friendly to your nation. I did not approve of
the French building forts in our country, without
our consent. But, brother, hear me. I will speak
my mind freely, concerning both your nation, and
that of the French.
There was a timebrother you cannot deny
itwhen neither the French nor you, made any
pretensions to our lands, nor disturbed us with
your disputes. We then lived in peace, where
our fathers had lived, for more than a hundred
generations, and every man hunted the deer and
X 2
the buffalo, without danger from the
encroachments
and attacks of strangers.
At what time, brother, either you or the
French obtained a right to our lands, I cannot tell;
but I believe never. If you were then, honest
men, you would withdraw into your own bounds,
and not attempt to usurp our property. Is not
this right?
Brother, I have not heard so much complaint
against your nation as against the French. I have,
therefore, generally sided with you, although many
of us think that if you were not afraid of the
French, you would encroach upon us as much as
they have done; and, as to the enemies you have
among our red brothers, they say that your people
to the east, in New-England, have been more
bitter against us than even the French were.
This may be true, but you yourself no doubt know
whether or not.
But, attend me, brother, I do not like the
French; I speak with sincerity; and I say it,
although
the Wiandots and the Caughnewagoes, their
allies, hear me. But the French themselves know
it.
[1]
[1]
From this to the asterisk in page 248, is taken nearly
verbatim
from Washington's Journal of this mission.
Brother, listen to what I told the French
commanders
lately at Le Buf, when I was sent by
my tribe and the Delawares to dismiss them off
our land.
Fathers! said I, I am come to tell you your
own speeches; what your own mouths have
declared
.
Fathers! you in former days set a silver
basin before us, wherein there was the leg of a
beaver, and desired all nations to come and eat
of it, to eat in peace and plenty, and not be
churlish
to one another.
Now, fathers, by the edge of this dish I lay
down a rod, that if any person be found to be a
disturber, you may scourge him therewith, and
even if I should get foolish in my old days, I desire
you not to spare me. And if you should be in
fault, fathers, should not the rod in justice be
used upon you as well as upon others?
Now, fathers, it is you who are the disturbers
in this land, by coming and building your towns in
it, and taking it away unknown to us, and by force.
Now is it not you who should bear the infliction
of this rod?
Fathers, we kindled a fire a long time ago, at
a place called Montreal, where we desired you to
stay, and not come and intrude upon our land. I
now desire that you may despatch back to that
place, for be it known unto you, fathers, that this
is our land, and not yours.
FathersI desire you may hear me in
civilness
.
If not, we must handle that rod which was
laid down for the use of the unruly. If you had
come in a peaceable manner like our brothers, the
English, we would not have been against your
trading with us as they do. But to come, fathers!
and build houses upon our land, and to take it by
force, is what we cannot submit to.
Fathersboth you and the English are white
we live in a country between you, and the land
belongs to neither of you. But the Great Being
above allowed it to be a place of residence for us;
so fathers, I desire you to withdraw, as I have
done our brothers, the Englishfor we will keep
you at arm's length. I lay this down as a trial for
you both, to see which will have the greatest
regard
for it, and that side we will stand by, and
make equal sharers with us. Our brothers, the
English, have heard this, and I now come to tell
it to youfor I am not afraid to discharge you off
this land.
I then gave him back his wampum, that our
friendship might be at an end.
Hear me, brotheryou will see why I dislike
the FrenchTheir general made me this reply.
Now, my child, I have heard your speech.
You spoke first, but it is my time to speak now.
Where is my wampum that you took away, with
the marks of towns in it? This wampum I do not
know, which you now give me to discharge me off
the land. But you need not have put yourself to
the trouble, for I will not mind it. I am not afraid
of flies or musquitoes, and Indians are no better
than these. I tell you, down that river I will go,
and build there as I have been ordered. If the
river was blocked up, I have forces sufficient to
burst it open, and to tread under my feet all who
oppose me, together with their allies; for my
force is as the sand upon the sea-shore.
Therefore
,
here is your wampumI fling it at you.
Child! you talk foolishly. You say, that this
land is yours, but there is not so much as the black
of my nail of it yours. It is my land, and I will
have it; let who will say against it. You may buy
and sell with the English, as you pleasebut the
land shall be mine. If your people will be ruled
by me, they may expect kindness, but not
otherwise
.
I then asked him what he had done with the
English prisoners that the Chippeways had taken
last year. He replied,
Child, do not concern yourself about this
matter
.
You think it a great hardship that we took
those people. But we sent them to Canada to
inform
the governor of what the English intend
against us.
Brother, I have told you all. Take this
wampum
and let me hear you.
Washington received the wampum and
replied
BrotherI am glad to meet my brothers here
in council. I thank you for this wampum, and for
the good-will you have manifested for my nation.
I have been ordered by your brother, the
governor
of Virginia, to acquaint you, that I must
proceed
,
with all possible despatch, to visit the French
commandant, and to deliver to him a letter of very
great importance to your brothers, the English;
and, I believe, also to you, their friends and allies.
I was desired, by your brother, the
Governor
,
to call upon you, the sachems of the nations,
to inform you of my errand, and to ask your
advice
and assistance how to proceed by the best
and nearest road to the French. You see,
brother
,
I have got thus far on my journey.
His honour also desired me to apply to you
for provisions, and for some of your young men to
conduct us on our way, and to be a safe-guard
against the French Indians, who have taken up
the hatchet against us. I have spoken thus
particularly
to you, brothers, because his honour the
Governor wishes to treat you as his friends and
allies, and holds you in great esteem.
To confirm what I have said, I give you this
string of wampum.
*
Massakeukas, the chief of the Wiandots, now
addressed the presiding sachem.
Brotherif you will hear one who speaks
plainlyone who flatters no person, you will
attend
to me. I approve not of these proceedings;
this low submission to an English emissary who is
sent here to sow dissention between us and our
French allies.
Brotherdid you think I would listen to
your abuse of my friends, and not rise to reply? I
knew the French commandanthe is now dead.
I heard so but yesterday, and while his memory is
yet green in my mind, I will not hear it traduced,
unanswered.
Brother! He was a man of truth. He often
told me that the designs of the English were to
engross
the west, as they have already engrossed
the east, for their people. I believed him; for I
have seen enough of the English on the banks of
the Genessee and the Mohawk not to know their
intentions against us.
Brotherthe general no doubt told you the
same. Why did you not believe him? Why will
not king Shingiss nor queen Alliquippa believe
him? Because your minds are full of the stories
of the English traders who come down the river.
And who are those English traders? What kind
of men are they? Are they not spies upon our
country? Have you not found them out, and have
you not often acknowledged them to be cheats,
impostors, and liars? Brother, have you ever
found truth in any of them! NoI will answer
for you; and I will say that sooner will you find
the waters of the Ohio flowing back over the
Alleghany
mountains to mix with the great sea on
the east, than find honesty in any of their traders
that come among you.
BrotherI do not think we should grant an
escort to send the enemies who are now in our
power, in safety to the French. The French are
tender-hearted, and will not put them to death.
These men will be only burthensome to our
allieswho will not thank us for sparing them.
Let us, therefore, act wisely, and not be
timid-hearted in the matter. Let us teach the
English to send no more of their emissaries as
spies among us, under the pretence of friendship.
I know their nation too well not to suspect that
there is some treachery in the pretensions of this
manwhom, if you do right, and act prudently,
you will, with all his companions, immediately put
to death. If not, you will at least, order them to
return, at once, to their own homes.
Brother, you have heard my proposalis
there not wisdom in it?
This proposal, in its most murderous tendency,
was warmly supported by several orators of the
Wiandols and the Caughnewagoesone of the
latter
of whom fiercely exclaimed
What, brothers! when the serpent is in your
bosom, will you fondle with him till he sting you!
Will you, like children, sport with the glittering of
his scales, till he infuses his destructive venom into
your hearts, when at a single stroke you might
crush him to death, and free yourselves from
danger
,
and the reproach of folly!
BrothersLet us sieze these men, and
sacrifice
them to our wrath. It will gratify our allies
it will strike terror into our enemies, and save
ourselves
from many future calamities.
Kustaloga, Shingiss, and their party, opposed
these violent councils to the utmost of their power,
but as the Shannoah chiefs had not attended the
assembly according to expectation, they were
likely to be overcome by the weight and fury of
the French party. The followers of the latter,
therefore, who wished for the destruction of the
white men, conceiving that it would be inevitably
determined on, attempted to surround them, and
beat off the Delawares, who firmly kept their
ground as their protectors. A considerable
clamour
and confusion took place, and blows would,
no doubt, have soon been exchanged, the
consequence
of which would, in all probability, have
been the destruction of Washington and his
followers
,
as their enemies appeared far more
determined
to carry their point, than their friends, when
the approach of the prophet Tonnaleuka was
announced
.
He hastily entered the area, which might be
called the council ring, with fire flashing from his
eyes, his hair streaming in the wind, and his hands
and his awful wand extended forward, as if he
were rushing to arrest the vengeance of heaven ere
it burst upon their devoted heads. Silence and
order had taken place the moment he was
announced
,
and now all eyes were immoveably fixed
upon him, and the boldest in the council
perceiving
that displeasure and wrath were marked in his
countenance, sat aghast and breathless to hear
the annunciation of his errand.
Brothers, brothers! he exclaimedWhat
were ye about to do? Thank the Great Spirit that
he has in mercy arrested your impious hands.
What! would you destroy the favourite of
heaven
!
would you slay the chosen of Maneto! for,
know! short-sighted mortals that ye are, this very
man whom ye have denounced, and were going to
sacrifice as an impostor and a spy, has been born
to fulfil destinies which will benefit all mankind.
The whole of this waste wilderness will yet
bloom and flourish, in consequence of his great
deeds and heroic virtues.
Shrink, brothers, and shudder at the thought
of what you were going to do!for had you done
it, it would have brought a terrible perdition, the
unutterable pangs inflicted by the wrath of the
Great Spirit upon you. Repent for your intended
crime, be thankful for your providential escape. I
will pray for you, and you will be forgiven.
Oh, Maneto! he cried, directing his looks,
and lifting his holy wand towards heavenOh,
Maneto! Thou who hast graciously preserved
these people from the crime of murdering him
whom thou hast selected from among men to
execute
the benevolent designs thou hast in view for
the world, they repent that they intended it; and
they implore thee for forgiveness. Oh! assure us
that thou hast forgiven them. What sign shall we
ask from thee that they are forgiven? Oh,
Maneto
!
let this be the sign! Shew the enemies of
this, thy chosen one, that he is so especially
under
thy protection, that thou canst turn the hearts
of even his worst enemies, in his favour. Let a
message come from the French to their allies in
this council, ordering them to forbear from
injuring
him or any of his companions during their
present sojourning in this country! Grant this
now to take place, oh Maneto! so that all who
see it, and all who may hear of it, may see that he
is under thy care, and that it will be both
impossible
for any one to harm him, and criminal to
attempt
it.
At this moment, to the astonishment and
conviction
of every one present, Paddy Frazier
entered
the council ring, with a written paper
addressed
to the chiefs and warriors of all the nations
in alliance with the French, desiring them to
respect
,
and hold sacred, the person and effects of
George Washington, and those of his suite, so that
neither shall be in any manner annoyed or injured,
while employed in either proceeding on, or
returning
from their present mission to the officer
commanding
the fort and forces of his most Christian
Majesty at Le Buf, on pain of any infringement
upon this order being considered as a breach of
whatever treaty or treaties may exist between
the offender and his most Christian Majesty
aforesaid
.
This document was signed by Le Gardeur
de St. Pierre, commanding officer at Le Buf.
It may be here mentioned, that Paddy had
accidently
met this officer at Venango, and obtained
from him the above passport without difficulty.
Vol. I. Y
Maskakeukas, and the other hostile chiefs now
expressed their sorrow for their rashness, and
withdrew all further opposition to the friendly
intentions
of Shingiss and Kustaloga in favour of
Washington.
The council then broke up, and our adventurers
remained for the night at Loggstown, enjoying the
hospitality of Kustaloga, and the protection of his
tribe.
CHAPTER XIX.
Danger is glory's fancied world,
Whose golden sands and amber seas
To dastards are unknown;
Where never tributary breeze
Their banner has unfurl'd,
And to that wild and brilliant zone,
Which vulgar souls can never know,
The sons of glory call their own,
T'is theirs, and theirs alone to go,
Till through long years of pain and toil,
They reach its shorethey tread its soil;
Then on their native land, its splendours they bestow.
Basket of Scraps
.
Several
circumstances, chiefly owing to some
difficulty which Kustaloga had in finding certain
strings of wampum that he wished to return to
the French, as an evidence of his withdrawing from
all dependence upon them, occurred to detain
Washington some days, very much against his
inclination
,
at the Loggstown.
At length, on the last day of November he and
his whole party proceeded on their journey,
attended
by several Indian chiefs in the character of
companions, rather than protectors, as it was
believed
that no protection was at present needed.
They took the way to Venango, which was then
the nearest French station to the Ohio, and
arrived
there on the fifth day, without meeting with any
thing particularly disagreeable, except bad
weather
;
a circumstance, which formed indeed but a
small obstacle to so resolute a mind, and so
healthy
a frame as Washington's, in the performance
of his duty.
Here he was politely received by a Captain
Joncaire, who commanded at this station, but who
did not possess sufficient authority to treat on the
subject of governor Dinwiddie's letter. From
this man, who appears to have been both a free
liver, and a free speaker, using wine and oaths in
equal abundance, Washington became fully
apprised
of the intentions of the French, in respect to
the country in dispute.
Having become pretty mellow over his cups,
while he treated our party with a flowing and
jovial
hospitality, he told them without reserve that
it was the intention of his government to take
possession
of all the country round the Ohio.
We are resolved to do it, said he, and by
Gd! we will do it. We know that you English
can raise two men for our one, but you're so
dd slow in your motions that you never can
make head against us. We hear that some of your
families design to settle at Shanapin's town in
the spring; but we'll soon pick them up, by
heavens, and then to Quebec with them, to ease
their consciences of the job!
[2]
[2]
See Washington's Journal.
As no business could be done at this place,
Washington re-commenced his journey as soon as
possible, for the fort at Le Buf, to which
Joncaire
ordered a small party of soldiers to escort
him. The fort was about sixty miles distant, and
the difficulty of travelling, owing to the excessive
rains and snows that had fallen, and the
numerous
mires and swamps over which they were
obliged
to pass, in order to avoid the creek, which had
become so high and rapid as to render its passage
impassable, was so great that they were upwards
of four days in reaching it.
The commander at Le Buf had very shortly
before assumed that station, upon the death of the
late general. He received Washington with great
complaisance, but declined taking his business
into
consideration until he should consult the
commander
of the neighbouring fort, who was
immediately
sent for. It was four days before the affair
was settled, and an answer to governor
Dinwiddie's
letter received. This answer, we are
informed
by the history of the times, was far from being
satisfactory, containing no indication whatever on
the part of the French, to withdraw from the
contested
country; but the whole management of
Washington in the arduous and hazardous
enterprise
of thus ascertaining, in an official manner,
their real sentiments and intentions, merited and
obtained from all classes of his countrymen, the
warmest approbation and praise.
Having obtained this document, which was to be
decisive of the question of peace or war between
the two crowns, he lost no time in commencing
his return homewards, as he knew the public mind
anxiously waited to learn the result of his
enterprise
.
The disappointment of his hopes in securing
peace to his country, preyed greatly upon his
mind, for, unlike the generality of young men
possessed
of high military ardour, his heart sickened
at the contemplation of these calamities, which
war, and especially war with savages, never fails
to inflict upon humanity. In the present instance,
in particular, he could not help feeling an agony
of soul at the idea of the evils to which she, whom
he loved better than the whole world, would,
during
the approaching troubles, be peculiarly
exposed
.
Oh! may heaven protect her from the
calamities
with which she will, too soon, be
surrounded
!
he mentally exclaimed; `alas! that, for her
own sake, she would consent to be mine, that I
might transplant her to a more secure abode. But
if she will not consent, may I have power to watch
over her safety, and protect her, even should it be
Y 2
unknown to herself, from misfortune. Sweet,
sweet will be the employment, if I can only make
it comport with my public duty. My country, my
country! yes, thy welfare must be the first object
of my solicitude. Oh Maria! my dearly beloved
maiden, forgive me, if even to thine, I prefer my
country's happiness. Oh heaven! I feel, alas,
that I am scarcely sincere in saying so; but thou
wilt pardon my weakness, if I am insincere; for
thou knowest that I love that maiden more
ardently
alas!
grant that it may not be more ardently
than I love my country.
In this state of mind, agitated by both love and
patriotism, Washington bade adieu to Le Buf,
and descended the creek, on the banks of which
it was built, in a canoe accompanied by another
containing the baggage and two or three of his
people, the horses, being almost worn out with
fatigue
,
having been sent, unloaded, under charge
of his other companions some days before, to
proceed
at easy journeys to Shanapin's town, and
there await his arrival.
Snow and rain, frost and thaw, had alternately
for many days rendered the weather extremely
disagreeable, and his passage down the creek, in
consequence of its swollen and rapid state, was
both dangerous and fatiguing. Several times the
canoes were almost staved against rocks; and
frequently
becoming fixed upon shoals, all hands were
obliged to get out and remain in the water for an
hour at a time, struggling to drag them over.
Often the ice had become solid from shore to
shore, and they had either to break their way
through it with immense labour, or carry their
canoes over land to where they might again float.
In all these labours, Washington performed more
than double duty, and set an example to his
followers
,
not only of mental perseverance, and
fortitude
,
but of indefatigible and astonishing
personal
exertions.
At length, on the sixth day after starting from
Le Buf, the canoes reached Venango at the
confluence
of the creek with the Alleghany river.
Here meeting with their horses, for weakness,
and the badness of the roads, had prevented them
from getting any further, Washington thought it
prudent to abandon the canoes, lest they should
become fixed in the ice, which was now every day
threatening to lock up the river. The horses
were therefore loaded with as much of the
baggage
as they could well carry, and every man also
with a pack, in order to get along with as little
delay
as possible. The weakness of the horses,
however
,
rendered their progress so slow, that
Washington
,
impatient once more to see Maria, and
forward his despatches, and conscious that there
was no use in personally waiting on the slow
motions
of his party, delegated to Vanbraam the
charge of bringing them to Frazier's house, where
he intended to remain till they arrived.
He then threw off his usual clothes, wrapped
himself in a watch coat, slung a pack upon his
back, in which he had secured his necessary
papers
and provisions, and with his rifle in his hand
and a dagger at his side, hastened onwards,
accompanied
by Paddy Frazier, equipped and
armed
in a similar manner. They journeyed briskly and
boldly amidst woods, through thickets, over
morasses
,
and swollen rivers, and deep ravines, for two
days, when they fell in with a party of three French
Indians, who had laid an ambush for them. These
fired at our travellers when only about twelve
yards distant, but miraculously missed them.
Paddy
immediately killed one of these men, and
Washington
gave chase to another, whom he soon
overtook
and made prisoner. This fellow
acknowledged
that he had taken a deliberate aim at
Washington, and could scarcely believe his senses
when he saw that he had missed him, for, he said,
it was the only aim he ever recollected to have
taken at six times the distance without striking his
object.
Paddy catching at this idea, resolved to work
upon the superstitious feelings of the Indian, and
boldly asserted that Maneto had made Mr.
Washington's
body impenetrable to any ball that should
ever be fired with gunpowder; and that the Indians
might as well aim at one of the stars, with the
expectation
of piercing it, as at him. As this
prisoner
was set at liberty the next day, he circulated
Paddy's information through all his tribe, from
whom it soon spread among the neighbouring
nations
;
and that Washington possessed such a
miraculous
property is to this day believed by many
of them.
Two days after escaping the foregoing peril,
they encountered another, from which it required
more dexterity, and infinitely greater presence of
mind to extricate themselves. They had gained
the Alleghany river about two miles above
Shanapin's
town, nearly opposite to an island, now called
Wainright's Island. From the cold they had
endured
,
they expected to find the river so
completely
frozen, that they would have no trouble in
passing over. But instead of this, they found its
waters greatly raised, and carrying down, in a
rapid
stream, large masses of ice, which passed
along with so much velocity as to threaten every
thing they should encounter with destruction.
Pass the river, however, they knew they must,
otherwise the chance was, that they would soon
be discovered by bands of the hostile Indians,
whom they had every reason to suppose were
now pursuing them; and there was no way for it,
but by a raft, to make which they possessed no
other tool than one very indifferent hatchet. To
men like them, however, no difficulties are
insuperable
.
To work they set, and in something
less than a day they had a raft constructed of logs
fastened together with hiccory withes, on which
they ventured to commit themselves to the flood.
In pushing it across the stream with their poles,
they had great difficulty in keeping clear of the
large fragments of ice that were rolling down with
appalling fury, as if they would dash the frail
structure to which they had now committed their
safety, to pieces. In defiance of all their efforts,
it at length became entangled with a huge mass,
which got underneath its edge, and drove it
onwards
.
Washington with his pole made a violent
effort to clear it from this mass, by using his whole
strength to push it aside, when, unfortunately, the
pole slipped from under him, and he fell into the
flood in a depth of more than twenty feet of water.
He struggled for several minutes with the stream
and the blocks of ice that were passing around him,
and sometimes over him, but his efforts would
have been fruitless, and he would have been lost
to a truly bereaved world, had not his companion,
with great dexterity and considerable risk,
contrived
to introduce under his breast one end of
his pole, which Washington instantly seizing, drew
himself within reach of the raft, and immediately
sprung upon it. At that instant it broke asunder,
and Paddy Frazier was in a moment under one of
its logs in the water. The impulse of the stream,
however, soon moved the log from above him, and
he arose to the surface; but unable to stem the
current with the same strength that Washington
had exerted, it was fast driving him away, when
his heroic companion, forsaking the log on which
he floated, sprang after him, with his pole in his
hand. He fortunately caught him just as the
current
was carrying him under the edge of a large
sheet of ice that jutted out from a point in the
island. Here he held him upon the surface, by
the assistance of his pole, while he broke away the
edge of the ice until it became thick and strong
enough to bear his weight. By an astonishing
effort
of activity he then placed himself on it, and
assisted Paddy to follow. In a moment more they
were both on the island.
We are safe now, thank God! cried Paddy,
as soon as he came in contact with the solid earth.
I never got such a cold dip in my life before.
But I hope, sir, I didn't hurt you by striking the
pole under your breast.
Thank God, indeed, for such an escape!
said Washington, it has been truly miraculous;
had we missed driving upon that ice, we should
have been both lost. As to my breast, there is no
injury done. The stroke hurt me a little at the
time, but I feel nothing of it now. But I am glad
that you have kept your senses so well. I expected
that you would have altogether swooned away on
reaching the shore; you have really a stout heart,
Mr. Frazier.
Not so stout as you, sir, replied Paddy, it
has undergone but one dipping; had it, like yours,
undergone two, I think it would now have been as
cold as the ice we have just left. But our
difficulties
are now over, and I expect we shall be
comfortable
at my father's fireside in a couple of
hours.
Then let us walk swiftly, said Washington,
who indeed longed much to be there. Brisk
exercise will keep us from freezing, in spite of
our wetness.
They accordingly hastened onwards, and found
no difficulty in getting off the island, as, on its
eastern
side it approached very near the land, from
which it was then only separated by a narrow and
strong bridge of ice.
As they walked fast, and as Paddy knew the
best and nearest road, they were seated at his
father's fireside in a shorter time than he had
predicted
.
Refreshments, and a change of raiment
for each, were soon produced; and Washington,
having ascertained that the papers contained in
the pack which had been securely fastened to his
shoulders, had suffered no damage, felt himself,
after the dangers and difficulties he had
undergone
,
more than usually disposed to enjoy
thankfully
to enjoy, the happiness of being under the
same roof, and in the presence of the sweet
mistress
of his affections. He had even the
satisfaction
to hear her express her fervent gratitude to
heaven for his escape from the perils that had
surrounded him; and he could not help blessing
her in his heart, for her sympathy and kindness,
and congratulating himself for having excited
them in a bosom so pure, so intelligent, so tender,
and so lovely.
Ah! thought he, this indeed is happiness
worth having suffered something for. Surely she
must feel for my welfare an interest warmer than
mere friendship could inspire, when she has so
little hesitation in expressing it. If, indeed, she
were the child of artificial cultivation, I might
have some reason to distrust the sincerity of this
manifestation of her sympathy for me; but she is
altogether the child of nature, and of truth, and
I must believe that she feels all, perhaps more
than she expresses. At all events, I will indulge
the idea of her affection for me, for it is comfort,
it is solace, it is happiness!
Thus it is, that love can blind minds of the most
acute and accurate discernment. The very
easiness
and freedom from embarrassment, with which
the beloved object expresses an interest in our
concerns, are often fondly mistaken for marks of
passion, when they denote nothing more than
friendship and respect; and the smiles of the
fair one of our hearts, when only excited by
humanity
,
or politeness, often deceive us into a
belief
of a reciprocal affection, which only
increases
our disappointment, when we discover the
unhappy
mistake.
Washington, indeed, did not, on this occasion,
assure himself so fully of the nature of Maria's
feelings towards him, as to be without doubt that
they were of that tender description, he would
fondly have believed; neither did he break
through the resolution he had formed, of not at
this time making a formal declaration of his own
feelings for her, so that he voluntarily deprived
himself of the only means he could have of
ascertaining
hers. But he acted so from motives
of delicacy towards her; and also from a wish to
make his public duty now the chief, if not the
only
object of his attention; although he felt that
he could not make it so of his solicitude.
The next day this resolution met with a trial
of its strength and firmness, to which, had it not
been formed in such a mind as Washington's, it
must have yielded.
The day, though cold, was considerably more
calm and settled than any that had for some weeks
preceded it; when, shortly after breakfast, the
beloved of his soul invited him to take a walk.
Yes, readerthis was temptation! Maria invited
him to walk in company with her to Alliquippa's.
How did his heart beat at the idea! Did he refuse?
Nohe could not. But to keep his resolution of
not disturbing her with his passion, if it should be
in the least disagreeable to her, he was
determined
;
and he had fortitude enough to withstand any
temptation to do at present, what he was
conscious
could with more propriety be done at
another
period.
Sir, said she, as they walked along, the
Indian Queen we are going to visit, has from my
infancy, been one of my most disinterested friends,
and greatest favourites. She is attached to the
cause of your nation, and when she heard of your
business at the Loggstown, and at Le Buf, she felt
a little mortified that you did not visit her on your
way to those places. She has conversed with me
several times about you, and desired me, as soon
as you should return, to accompany you to her
residence. I promised I should, and I now go
with you in consequence of my word. As I
believe
you do not speak Indian, I will, if you have
no objection, be your interpreter.
Objection to your being my interpreter! Miss
Frazier. My delight willbut pardon me, I must
restrain the expression of my feelingsI do not,
indeed, speak Indian, and shall, of course, be glad
of your assistance. As to this queen, your
brother
has given me an account of her partiality for
our cause; and I should think myself deficient in
my duty, if I did not call upon her to pay her
my respects, and confirm her favourable
sentiments
towards us; for I fear we shall soon require
as many friends in this quarter, as it is in our
power
to make.
I hope, said Maria, that your people will
not push matters to extremity, for war is a
shocking
calamity; and I trust the Indians will be more
guarded for the future, not to provoke your
people
,
since they see you are about to take it up
seriously
.
Indeed, Mr. Washington, if the French
had only let them alone, half the excesses they
Vol. I. Z
committed last summer, would not have taken
place.
We blame not the Indians, observed
Washington
,
so much as the French. The designs
of the latter are not perceived by the poor
deluded
savages. It is their schemes of political
ambition
and aggrandizement, which will drive us
into war. Oh, Maria! ere the nations draw
the sword, I wish you were safe out of this
Wilderness
.
And why do you wish so? observed Maria,
affecting a tone of simple surprize. Here live
my parents, and to run away from them, you
could not suppose either pardonable, or
practicable
.
I only speak the simple wish of my heart,
returned Washington, and that too without having
any rational or excusable grounds, on which to
explain it. The time may comebut pardon me,
I will not trouble you with my anticipations. You
might not feel them agreeableand alas, they
may never be realized!
I do not wish to inquire into any of your views,
whether personal or political, that you may desire
to conceal, observed Maria. But that they are
all rational, and not only excusable, but laudable,
I have confidence enough in your wisdom and
integrity
,
to believe without any explanation. None,
therefore, is necessary. But yonder is the queen's
residence. She will, I expect, be waiting our
arrival
.
Her Shannoah majesty received Washington
very graciously, although she gave him a slight
reprimand for not visiting her, as he had
formerly
passed so near her residence.
But brother, said she with a smile, I
suppose
you thought a woman's friendship of very
little
consequence to your nation.
Washington assured her that he had a high
respect
for her character, and a sincere desire to
cultivate her good will on behalf of his
countrymen
.
When I before passed this way, said he, I
did not know that your wigwam was so near me;
besides, I had not then, as I now have, an
interpreter
to enable me to converse with you. But as a
proof of my regard, I hope, mother, that you will
accept of some presents I shall send you, as soon
as my baggage, which I expect daily, shall arrive
at Mr. Frazier's. In the mean time, receive these
few rings, in token of my personal regard, and
this string of wampum, as a cement to the amity
between you and my nation.
The queen, on her part, presented him with a
wampum, thanked him for the rings, and the
presents
he had promised, and assured him that she
had always felt a high regard for his countrymen;
and that, on his account, that regard should for the
time to come, be still higher. Washington took
his leave, and returned to Frazier's with Maria,
much pleased with the result of his visit.
CHAPTER XX.
How dear is the heart-warming throb of delight,
When after long seasons of absence and pain,
The maid he adores greets the fond lover's sight,
And close to his bosom he clasps her again.
Savelabour
.
When
they were about midway on their road
towards
Frazier's, they perceived a company of
apparently
thirty or forty men, and as many horses laden
with baggage, winding slowly down the bank of
the river. Washington immediately conjectured
them to be a second party which he had heard the
Ohio company contemplated sending this season,
to make another attempt to take possession of
their territory. There was, at least, no doubt of
their being English, and Maria and he, somewhat
quickened their pace to approach them, which
they perceived they could soon do, as the road on
which the strangers travelled, joined theirs at no
great distance before them.
When Maria had advanced so near as to be able
to distinguish their persons, she suddenly stopped,
and, by her change of colour, betrayed
considerable
emotion of mind. She however,
recovered
instantly, and although Washington had
noticed
her confusion, he did not consider it any thing
extraordinary, as he ascribed it to the timidity
natural to so secluded a female, when
approaching
so large a company of strangers.
Fear nothing, Miss Frazier, said hethese
are friends, and will offer us no injury.
I fear nothing, said she, I know they are
friends, and that she here suddenly held her
peaceas at that instant, she saw that the
person
who appeared to act as the leader of the
company
,
had perceived them, for he had turned his
horse, and was riding swiftly through the brush
towards
them.
She assumed all her self-command, and said in a
low voice to WashingtonThis is Mr. Adderly,
who commanded the Ohio expedition last year. I
am glad that he has arrived before you left us, so
that you may become acquainted with each other.
I am glad of it too, for I have heard much in
his praise, replied Washington.
By this time Charles had approached, and
alighted from his horse, and Maria, with great
effort
,
assuming the appearance of an unrestrained
but composed cordiality of manner, shook him by
the hand and welcomed him. She then added,
This, Mr. Adderly, is my friendMr.
Washington
,
from Virginia.
Charles, with an involuntary coldness in his
manner, saluted Washington, and drily observed
that he should always be glad to meet with any
friend of Miss Frazier.
Washington's manner, however, in a moment
dispelled this coldness, as with great sincerity and
even warmth, he said
Mr. Adderly! I am really rejoiced to meet
with you, for, by both public and private report, I
have had the means of ascertaining the worth of
your character; and I trust that, as the affairs of
the west have attracted the attention of us both,
we will be able to render each other assistance in
protecting it from the enemy, and promoting the
views of our country in effecting its settlement.
Mr. Washington! replied Charles, the
testimony of the public voice in your favour,
Z 2
since you so gallantly embarked in the arduous
mission to Le Buf, is too flattering for me to
repeat
in your presence, but is, in reality, I believe,
still short of what you deserve. I shall, indeed,
rejoice in your friendship! and now, Miss Frazier,
may I ask how it has fared with youandand
your father's family since I saw you. I meanI
meanno matter, said he, with a smile, for he
perceived his own emotion, and hastily threw it
off. How have all your friends beenNancy
and Paddy, and Doctor Killbreath?
None of us, she replied, have met with
any serious accident; although I must confess
that we passed the last summer in great alarm and
anxiety on account of the Indian outrages that
were committed on the border-settlers.
But I trust your family has nothing to fear,
observed Charles: Is not Tonnaleuka still your
friend?
Still as firmly as ever, she replied; but
even he, you know, cannot always control the
unruly dispositions of revengeful men.
Happy would it be for this region if he could!
observed Washington. The calamities our
borders
suffered last summer would not then have
stained its annals. But, Mr. Adderly, may I ask,
what is the object of this present enterprise of
which, I presume, you are the leader?
I am, indeed, intrusted with its management,
replied Charles; for notwithstanding my former
misfortunes, the Ohio Company have ventured
again to place confidence in me. They
supposed
,
I believe, that I had learned wisdom by
experience
;
but I confess, Mr. Washington, that if I
did not know that the hostile Indians are retired to
their winter abodes, I should feel almost as
awkwardly
fixed with the handful of men, I now have,
as I did last year.
The company ought to have furnished you
with a force adequate for the designs they
contemplate
,
returned Washington. What
number
of men have you?
I have about forty, pretty well furnished with
arms and stores, it is true; but if it had not been
that I calculated, when I started, upon the season
being favourable for our operations, by keeping
the great force of our enemies at a distance, I
acknowledge, I should not have been willing to
venture here with fewer than ten times as many.
As to our intentions, they are pretty much the
same as they were last yearnamely, to take
possession
of the country in the name of his
Britannic
Majesty, and on behalf of his good cousins and
loving subjects, the Ohio Company.
You intend, of course, to fortify yourselves?
replied Washington.
Of course, returned Charles; and if we can
only manage to effect that before the French or
Indians attack us, I believe we shall do pretty
well; otherwise our success may be the
counterpart
of last year's. But we have daring hearts
and stout hands, few as they are; and we will do
our best, and providence may favour us.
I sincerely pray that it may, said
Washington
.
But could not the company have raised a
stronger force for the occasion?
No, sir, it was with difficulty we could
collect
the followers we have. Few are at present
willing to embark personally in a warfare against
warlike and barbarous savages, who treat their
prisoners with such horrible cruelty; and had it
not been supposed that your mission was likely
to have the effect of preventing opposition to our
measures, at least, from the French, who were at
the root of the disasters of the last season, we
could not have mustered our present number.
Have you concluded where to build your
fort? asked Washington.
Not absolutely, replied Charles; I am at
this time left much to my own discretion in the
matterlast year the ground was prescribed to
me. If you have examined the country, Mr.
Washington, I should be glad to have your advice
in this particular.
For various reasons, replied Washington,
I would prefer the forks at Shanapins to the
height at Chartier's creek, where you made your
former attempt. But this is too military a subject
of conversation to be relished by Miss Frazier. If
you have no objection, therefore, to postpone it,
I shall, on a more convenient occasion, give you,
at full length, my reasons for this opinion.
I was myself beginning to think, said Charles,
that we had unfortunately fallen upon a subject
that could not afford much entertainment to Miss
Frazier. I therefore approve of your hint; but
shall be glad to hear you upon this matter at any
other time that may suit you.
Gentlemen, observed Maria, a useful
topic
of discourse can never be disagreeable to me;
and I beg you not to change your subject on my
account.
It would be more becoming at present, said
Washington, to converse on matters on which
you can join us; and you cannot but suppose that
we feel the impropriety of two young men
engrossing
to themselves the conversation when
there is a lady present.
When young gentlemen suppose that their
gallantry may be doubted, returned Maria,
they may, with propriety enough, be anxious to
show it off by their pointed politeness to our sex.
But, in the present instance, this anxiety is
unnecessary
,
for I do not harbour the slightest
suspicion
against either of you in this respect.
Your generosity then gives us credit, said
Washington, for what in reality we did not
lately
appear to possess; and it would be the height
of injustice to you if in return for such generosity
we should exclude you from our conversation
nay, let me add, Miss Frazier, it would be
cruelty
to ourselves.
I perceive, replied Maria, that you now
want to make up for your supposed deficiency in
politeness; but since you are gallant gentlemen,
and this is the course of gallantry, I must submit.
You may, therefore, go on in a full stream of
compliment. I will listen to you.
You will also forgive us, I trust, Miss
Frazier
,
replied Washington, if in wishing to pay
that respect which we owe to your sex, we
express
ourselves so that you may wrongfully
imagine
us insincere; I protest, on my own part, and
I think I may with safety say, on the part of Mr.
Adderly, that we have neither uttered, nor intend
to utter, any thing concerning you but with
sincerity
.
Compliment I beg leave to remind you is
often truth; nay, to deny it, is sometimes to deny
justice.
And Miss Frazier, will surely admit,
observed
Charles, that in the present instance, we have
offered her no more civility than both as a friend
and a female she had a right to expect.
At this moment they came up with the Ohio
Company's party at the junction of the roads, and
Charles had to express the last words of his
remark
in rather an under voice. He had scarcely
finished it, when Peter M`Fall approached Maria
with his hat off, and making a low, but very
respectful
bow, addressed her:
Now, by the powers! mistress, but I am glad
to see you living again; for I thought the savages
had killed every soul of a christian in the
Wilderness
.
We are not all killed yet, you perceive,
Peter
,
she replied. But you are welcome back
to the woods, and I am really glad to see you
looking
so well.
Looking well, returned Peter, raising his
frame to an erect attitude, and putting on what
he supposed to be one of his most agreeable looks.
Ay, by my troth, and Peter M`Fall was born to
look well. Sure, didn't my own mother tell me
so when I was no bigger than your knee, may it
plase your ladyship.
I mean that you look healthy, Peter, said
Maria.
Healthy, replied Peter, somewhat
disappointed
.
And is that all! But by my sowl, I
think doctor Killbreath would be a better judge
of that than your ladyship. It would be a
devilishly
different matter as to my looking well. But
does your ladyship know whether the doctor be
living, or roasted by the Indians yet?
He is still living and well, replied Maria,
and I believe is just now to be found at no great
distance.
Then, by the holy piper! I suppose he's at
our father's houseI must run to see him;
exclaimed
Peter,Master, it is only to give me
leave for a minute or two, that I may get on
before
these lazy turf drivers, and shake the doctor's
ould bone for himmaster, just say the word now,
and let me offa wink will do it.
There is no use for such haste, said Charles,
you will see the doctor presently.
Och! now just give me the wink, master,
persisted Peter, my heels are so itchy to run,
and my hand so itchy to shake the doctor's fist for
him, that, by my faith! the devil a step can Peter
wait longer on the company, that may crawl after
after me through the woods as slow as a hangman's
march, if they please!
Peter was about starting off at full speed, for he
perceived, or what to him was the same thing, he
imagined he perceived, an approving glance
twinkle
in Charles's eyewhen he received a heavy
thump upon the shoulder, which made him
exclaim
Blood and thunder! who's that? and turning
round, he seized Doctor Killbreath in his arms.
By the holy Bridget! doctor! he cried,
lifting him fairly off the ground, and swinging him
round him with great exultationbut I see you
have life in your ould bones yet! The savages, bad
luck to them! haven't fried the grease out of you
yet. By my sowl, I thought when you were such
a fool as to come back to them here, that they
would have made you into a cinder long ago; for,
I knew, if they took you again, you wouldn't have
Peter McFall to stand at your back, and whisk
you through a kennel like a half-drowned cat, out
of their reach. Arrah, doctor, Saint Kenan be
praised! you have flesh and blood on you yet!
When Peter had finished this rhapsody, he
relieved
the doctor from his grasp, and placed him
again on the earth.
Faith, Peter! cried Killbreath, when he
had recovered wind enough to articulatethe
Indians would have spared me to little purpose if
you had kept me much longer squeezed up in
those horrible clutches of yours. It would have
been only exchanging burned bones for broken
onesor being calcined to a cinder, for being
crushed to a mummy!
Why, sure now, doctor, returned Peter
sympathizingly
,
I didn't hurt your ould carcass.
The devil take me, if an Irishman at the fair of
old Wicklow would have thought any thing of such
a hug.
Hug! cried the doctor, rubbing and twisting
his sides, which still ached from the pressure of
Peter's grasp; why, the hug of a bear would be
but a trifle to such squeezing. I would as soon be
crushed in a cider press.
Och! now, doctor, be asy, and give me your
fist for ould times, cried Peter; never mind the
squeezing; it was only an Irish welcome for your
Pennsylvany bones. Och! botheration to it, if I
would give the toss of a ha'penny for these cold
dish-water meetings between ould friends, that
scarcely touch the skin of each other's fingers.
So saying, he gave the doctor's hand such a squeeze
as made him roar out, and absolutely brought tears
to his eyes.
By the great Columb! continued Peter,
somewhat sorry for his rashness, but I thought,
doctor, that you were made of better stuff. I
really believe I have splintered your knuckles for
you. Arrah, now! if you would live more on
potatoes instead of apples, you would have stouter
bones, dear doctor. But tell me now, how is your
sweetheart, the pretty, plump, black-eyed lass of
the woods here, that you used to toast at your
oyster suppers in Philadelphia?
Hush! cried the doctor, in an under voice,
say nothing, dear Peter, say nothing about this
matter; you'll see her shortly, but be mum. I'll
tell you again all about it.
He then caught Peter's arm, and they set off
together for Frazier's house, where the whole
party soon arrived, and Gilbert and Nelly had
once more the pleasure, of which they did not fail
to inform their guests, of beholding some of the
blood of Maughrygowan under their roof.
Towards the evening of the following day,
Vanbraam
arrived with Washington's baggage, and
the rest of his followers. The presents promised
to the Shannoah queen were given over to the
care of Paddy Frazier, who immediately
proceeded
to her residence, and delivered them to her
majesty; and Washington prepared to leave
Maria
and the Wilderness, which was now to him the
dearest spot in the world, the next morning.
Before
he set off, however, Charles Adderly had
proceeded
with his party to take possession of the
forks at Shanapins, where Washington's reasoning
had convinced him of the propriety of erecting
the contemplated fort. These two young heroes
took farewell of each other, impressed with the
strongest feelings of mutual respect, but little
knowing that they were each other's rivals in a
matter on which each felt, at that time, that his
whole life's happiness depended. It is true, that
Charles, on meeting Maria and Washington
together
in the woods, as we have seen, had permitted
a transient suspicion on this subject to alarm his
mind, which his manner had almost betrayed; but
his confidence in her fidelity, on a moment's
reflection
,
returned, for he knew she had once loved
him, and he believed what the prophet had told
him, that whom she loved once she would love
for ever; and this confidence was fully confirmed
by the ease, candour, and cordiality of
Washington's
manner of addressing him. The subsequent
conversation which he held with this
eminently
gifted young man, inspired him with a respect
for his talents and judgment almost approaching
to reverence, and he resolved to follow his advice
in every thing he had suggested to him for the
management
of his present enterprise.
Vol. I. 2 A
Just before Washington set off, he seized a
favourable
occasion for a short private interview
with Maria.
Miss Frazier! said he, I must now bid you
farewell for a time. Permit me, before I depart,
to present you with a small volume of poems, one
of which is with me, next to some of the passages
of your admired Thomson, the most favourite
piece of poetry in our language. This copy has
for many months past been my constant
companion
.
Its author was one who was greatly
enamoured
of that sylvan seclusion which you here
enjoy in such perfection. He was also one who
keenly felt, and sweetly described the tenderest
and sweetest of all passions. I have marked with
a pencil those passages of my favourite poem;
which I shall often recall to mind when at a
distance
from you; and oh! may I request that, for
my sake, you will frequently read them. They
will depict to you the feelings which, until I see
you again, will strongly agitate this bosom.
Farewell
!
and may heaven protect you from all
dangers
!
So saying, he pressed her hand gently,
and departed.
CHAPTER XXI.
This shadowy desert, unfrequented woods,
I better brook than flourishing peopled towns.
Here I can sit alone unseen of any,
And to the nightingale's complaining notes
Tune my distresses and record my woes.
Oh! thou that dost inhabit in my breast,
Leave not the mansion tenantless;
Lest growing ruinous, the building fall,
And leave no memory of what it was.
Shakspeare
.
The
book which Washington left with our
heroine
was a handsomely bound copy of Shenstone's
Poems; and the passages he had marked for her
attention she found in that most tender and simple
of all poetical effusions, the Pastoral Ballad. The
reader, I trust, will have no objection to peruse
them. They were as follows
Now I know what it is to have strove
With the torture of doubt and desire;
What it is to admire and to love,
And to leave her we love and admire.
When forc'd the fair nymph to forego,
What anguish I felt at my heart!
I thoughtbut it might not be so
'Twas with pain that she saw me depart
She gaz'd as I slowly withdrew,
My path I could scarcely discern;
So sweetly she bade me adieu,
I thought that she bade me return.
The pilgrim that journeys all day
To visit some far distant shrine,
If he bear but a relique away,
Is happy, nor heard to repine.
Thus widely remov'd from the fair,
Where my vows, my devotion, I owe,
Soft hope is the relique I bear,
And my solace wherever I go.
Had not Maria been before convinced from the
conduct of her illustrious visiter that he loved
her, these stanzas, combined with his manner of
bidding her farewell, would have left her no room
to doubt on the subject. The circumstance
grieved
her. She respected, she esteemed, she almost
revered those talents and virtues which she
perceived
that he possessed in such an eminent
degree
;
but love was what she could not afford him.
Another object engrossed all her passion and
tenderness
exclusively and unalterably; and to
Washington
to
him, whom she believed to be
possessed
of every quality that could ennoble man, and
whose warmest affections, she doubted not, were
now devoted to her, she could only spare ardent
friendship and heart-felt admiration. Yesshe
could, and did also, yield him pityfor loving
passionately
as she herself did, she could easily
imagine
how miserable she must have been, had she
loved in vain. Much, therefore, much did she
grieve for one so worthy, whom she knew must be
wretched from the same cause.
How rejoiced I should be, she would say to
herself, if this excellent, this admirable young
man could place his affections on some one who
had affections at her own disposal to give him in
return. I know, alas! how much the happiness of
life depends on this; and if ever man deserved
happiness, it is he. But he is now gone; and I
trust absence, change of scene, and the bustle of
business, may weaken the unfortunate attachment
he has here imbibed; and providence, I hope, will
throw in his way one worthy of him, and both
capable
of exciting in his bosom the tenderest
feelings
of love, and of returning them. Oh Charles!
thou object of my first and only love! it is my
study, it is my duty, it is my delight to be true to
thee. Thou art the chosen of my hearta heart
that never, never will choose another.
Charles having encamped his men at Shanapins
town, and marked out the ground for the fort,
returned
the next day to visit his Maria.
Sweet, sweet is the intercourse between two
young and virtuous lovers, who are aware of
possessing
,
unchangeably and entirely, each other's
affections
.
But although such intercourse be sweet
to them, the detail of the conversations by which
it is carried on is seldom so to others. It is the
presence of the beloved object, the thousand
nameless charms which each sees in the other, and
which no other can see, much less describe, or
even if described, could feel, far more than the
sentiments or language which they utter, that
constitute
the delight, the ecstasy of their private
interviews
,
and their solitary rambles.
For this reason I will refrain from relating to
the reader the many conversations that now took
place between Charles Adderly and his Maria, at
their secret and confidential meetings. There
was one, however, which I shall relate, because it
touched upon a topic, of which the reader may
require
some explanation, namely, the cause of that
nuptial ceremony, for which Charles so ardently
sighed, not taking place, although, with a secret
view to its accomplishment, he had brought with
him, as chaplain to the expedition, a person
qualified
for its performance.
2 A 2
Why delay my happiness, my love? said he.
There is now no obstacle to its accomplishment
there is no reason for its delay. You talk of
my father's sanction. Tonnaleuka has infused the
idea into your mind that it is necessary. But,
Maria, believe me, it is not. When the vows are
once uttered, you are then my wife in defiance of
human power or opposition.
I know. replied Maria, that by the
institutions
of your country, your father could not
dissolve
our marriage. It is not that which I dread;
but I dread the displeasure he would manifest, and
justly too, at its taking place without his
knowledge
and consent. No; I never will become the
wife of any man who, by making me such, will
displease his relations.
But I have no reason to suppose that my father
would be displeased, at least if he knew you as I
do, I am persuaded he would not, at your
becoming
his daughter.
But, Charles, said she, smiling, do you not
remember that he does not know me? or, if he
did, how are you sure that he would estimate me
as highly as you have been pleased to do? No
he might look upon, what you have thought
proper
to call my worth, in a very different light;
and in place of being an acceptable
daughter-in-law
,
if we were to marry under present
circumstances
,
the probability is, that I should be
considered
by him as an intruder into his family, and
treated, and perhaps deservedly so, as such.
Believe me, Maria, he returned, that I
know my father well. I am his only son; and he
has ever been the kind consulter of my happiness.
When the sacred knot is tied, he will not seek to
dissolve it, not so much because he would know
the thing impossible, as because he would know
that it would make me miserable, permanently and
supremely miserable!
But, suppose even this indulgence, she
replied
,
or rather, this forgiveness on his part to take
place, in consequence of parental tenderness, even
after you had acted disrespectfully towards him,
by marrying without his knowledgethink of it,
Charles!would not so much goodness be a high
aggravation of your offence, in being guilty of
such disrespect to so kind a father? No, Charles,
I cannot bear, I will not consent, that you should
act so unworthily, so little like yourself
Ah! too rigid, too austere girl! he
exclaimed
;
you place too much importance upon this
matter of my father sanctioning our nuptials. It
is but a trifling consideration
How, Charles! she said, interrupting him;
O do not let me hear you call behaving
disrespectfully
to your father, and such a father as, I
doubt not, yours is, a trifling consideration.
Surely
your good sense and filial affection have
yielded
,
in this instance, to your wishes.
Oh Maria! understand me before you
condemn
me. I respect, I honour my father, as much
as ever son did a parent. But surely, in
comparison
to spending, perhaps, another long year of
privation from the bliss of calling you my own,
the taking of this step without his knowledge,
under
circumstances so difficult to procure it, if it
be at all an aberration from duty, is but a trifling
one. O consent, my love! Depend upon my
assurance, that you have nothing to fear from the
measure.
Were I to be so weak as to comply with your
wishes, said she, it might indeed happen that
your father would not be absolutely inexorable.
He might not for ever cast you off from his
affections
for our fault. But still, Charles, we would
have committed a fault. We would have given a
kind and tender parent cause of offence; which
would ever afterwards be, at least to me, and let
me say, I believe also to you, a source of
uneasiness
.
He might forgive our error; but I am
convinced
that we ourselves never should forget it.
O! let us not commit it, if we want to be truly
happy with each other. Let not impatience cause
us to do wrong. Providence may yet remove all
obstacles to our union. We may yet be happy
without being guilty; or, if we should not, let us
at least never be guilty, and then we never will
be thoroughly unhappy.
Lovely maiden! exclaimed Charles, struck
with admiration at the purity of her sentiments,
although so much in opposition to his wishes;
you are too good, too angelical in your principles,
as well as in your charms, for an erring mortal like
me. But I will be guided by you. If I have not
virtue to resist temptation to error, I will learn it
of you. You will be the monitor of my mind, as
you have been the charmer of my eyesyou will
instruct me, as you have fascinated meyou will
excite me to virtue, as you have warmed me to
loveand, in the end, make me happy in the
approbation
of my own conduct, as I now am in the
admiration of yours!
A day or two after the foregoing conversation,
Charles retired from the camp at Shanapins to a
favourite walk, for meditation, which he had
discovered
on the bank of the Monongahela. It was
one of those days of sunshine which sometimes,
even in the month of January, chequer the
unsteady
climate around the head of the Ohio, and
make a ramble, at that usually inclement season,
inviting. The air was considerably warm; and,
although in hollow places that were shaded from
the rays of the sun, there were still lodgements of
unmelted ice and snow, yet the general aspect of
the country showed that there had been a thaw of
several days continuance, as in all exposed
situations
the snow had disappeared, and again
displayed
the surface of the earth clothed with a
variegated
garment of undecaying herbage and
withered
leaves. The broad, and at this time, full stream
of the river flowed majestically past, exhibiting by
reflection, the reversed images of the high and
headlong banks on either side, hanging pendulous,
with all their woods upon them, within its glassy
bosom.
Charles sat down upon a protruding fragment
of stone, which formed the basement of a high
rock that arose from the margin of the stream.
He became soon absorbed in contemplating the
charms of his Maria, and comparing the superior
happiness he should enjoy in these solitudes, with
her for his daily and faithful companion through
life, than, without her, in the midst of all the
gaieties
,
grandeur, pleasures, and luxuries, that
ingenuity
has ever invented for the gratification of
social
life. In such a situation, when impressed
with such feelings, a romantic mind can hardly
refrain
from becoming poetical; and Charles, as we
have seen, had already moistened his lips at the
Castalian fount. He therefore, on this occasion,
drew out his memorandum book and pencil, and
noted down the following lines, addressed to the
Monongahela.
Fair stream! though deep in forest glooms
Thou roll'st thy Indian-haunted tide,
Upon thy bank a maiden blooms,
The gem of nature, virtue's pride!
Let others choose the joys supplied
By art, on Thames' or Liffey's shore,
Give me upon thy sylvan side,
With her to liveI ask no more.
Fair stream! though never poet's lay
Hath bade the world thy name revere.
Though history's page refrains to say
What heroes fought and conquer'd here
Than Tweed's or Tyber's banks, more dear,
Is thy unchanted shore to me;
And warm'd to rapture, more sincere,
I worship charms possessed by thee!
For in seclusion's peaceful shade,
Fair nature oft delights to show
Some flower or gem, or beauteous maid,
Too lovely for the world to know.
Thus woodland roses often blow,
To bless with sweets the desert wild,
And thus, from thee my raptures flow,
Maria, nature's fairest child!
He had scarcely completed these stanzas, when
he heard the sound of footsteps approaching him,
and soon the form of Tonnaleuka, whom he had
not seen since his return to the west, stood before
him.
Hail to thee, my son! said the prophet. I
am glad to see thee yet safe. But thou comest in
an evil hour to visit this land, for thy safety will
be endangered. Thy enemies are vigilant and
strong, and they will soon become active. Still
thou art welcome! and I hope the great Being
will protect thee from the perils thou art doomed
to encounter.
Father, replied Charles, since my arrival,
I have longed much to see you. The dangers
you speak of, I have anticipated from the enemy.
But if they arrive not, before we have raised our
defences, I will not fear them. The season, I
expect
,
will till then protect us.
Do not deceive yourself, said the prophet;
the season will not protect you, neither will
your defences; and your numbers are insufficient.
But prepare your ramparts with what haste you
can. From behind them you may at least treat
for safety, if you cannot fight for victory. My
son, I came to warn you, that you may be wary,
for your foe is stronger than you.
Father, replied Charles, you are ever kind
to me. You have been my deliverer. You
would now be my guardian. But oh! my soul is
sad, my life is weary, and I almost wish to die.
You possess the power, if any earthly being
possesses
it, to procure me relief from my troubles.
May I crave your assistance, for alas! what good
will protecting me from destruction do, if my
existence
is to be miserable!
Father, I lovethou knowest it. Thou
knowest
how ardently, how devotedlyah no; thou
canst not know that. No one can know what I
feel for the loveliest, the dearest of maidens!
Fatheron revisiting the Wilderness, I
rejoiced
,
for I thought that she would then become my
own. I brought with me one qualified, according
to our custom, to join us in marriage. But alas,
she, at this time, refuses to unite her fate with
mine. Now, when she might make me happy,
she will not, and misfortune may interfere, alas!
I much dread it, to prevent us from ever again
enjoying
such an opportunity. You, you alone, my
father, whom she reveres as a messenger of God,
can alter her determination. Oh! let me implore
thee to interfere. Let me beg thee, as thou
valuest
my happiness and my regard for life, to show
her that she is unnecessarily cruelto show her
that she is too austerely scrupulous in respect to
matters of but trifling moment, when compared
with the privation to which she condemns me.
Son, replied the prophetI know the
desire
of your heart. I also know her
determination
,
and I approve of it. You are too impatient,
my son, and you are wrong. She is prudent, and
I rejoice that she is so. Were she your wife,
think you, would she not be exposed during the
coming troubles, for alas! I see them
approaching
fast, to perils and calamities, from which, in her
private, obscure situation, as the daughter of
Gilbert
Frazier, she will be exempt?
Think seriously, my son, and if you do so,
you will, if your love be for her welfare, and not
your own gratification, approve of her resolution,
and attempt not to seduce her from it.
Father, replied Charles, eagerly, and
greatly
agitated. Can youOh, heavens! how can
you torture me, by affecting to doubt the purity,
the disinterestedness of my love for that angel!
Prefer her welfare to my own gratification! Ah!
if my heart did not tell me that I did so, I would
tear it from my body, and cast it to the wolves to
be devoured, or to the more cruel Chippeways, to
be consumed in the flames of their animosity.
But, father! could she not be my wife, and live in
security?
No, my sonnot, at least, with equal ease
and propriety. If she were so connected with
you, she would have responsibilities upon her,
from which she is now free. Besides, I know her
objection is on account of your not possessing
the sanction of your father. She knows herself
to be pennyless, and she is not ignorant of the
value which men of the world, like your father,
place upon wealth. She has a right, therefore,
to anticipate his displeasure both to you, and to
herself, if she should encourage you to a
clandestine
union.
My son, I know all this; and can you ask me
to bid her do wrong? Nay, if you solicit her with
your eyes open to all these things, I must accuse
you of preferring your own gratification to her
welfare.
And, hear me, my sonshould your
solicitations
succeed, you would soon afterwards, when
the evils I predict should come upon you,
severely
condemn your own rashness.
Oh, father, forbear! cried Charles, your
words make me wretched! Tell me what I must
do?
With respect to Maria, said the prophet,
exert patience; and with respect to your
enemies
,
circumspection. This is my counsel.
With respect to the enemy, I shall follow it,
replied Charles, and with respect to Maria, I
shall endeavouryes, I shall exert patience,
although
it should kill me.
Then, my son, receive my blessing, and may
the great father lead you safely through the
perilous
times, that are drawing near! Farewell! be
prudent and be patient.
So saying, Tonnaleuka ascended the banks, and
left Charles fixed to the spot, in a stupor of
intense
feeling, compounded of admiration,
disappointment
,
and grief almost approaching to
despair
.
In a short time, however, his agitation
began
to subside, and making a great effort to
recover
at least the appearance of serenity, he
returned
to the camp, in order to encourage his men
to expedition in forwarding the intended
fortification
.
END OF VOLUME I.My Brother,
I am glad you are come back so soon.
My sisteryour wifewas cast down in your
absence
.
But I could not blame herfor I
remember
when Shanalow, my husband, went first to
hunt, after our marriage, I was disconsolate, and
dreamed every night of evil till he returned. He
is now gone to his fathers, and shall never more
return. But he died of a breast-wound fighting
the Otawas, and our whole tribe has praised
him.
Brother! you did well to bring these people
your wife will be better pleased with a woman of
the east, than with my squaws. You will tell me
at another time, why the rising sun gives a fairer
skin than the setting.
Brother! I shall order provisions for your
people. But your wife wishes for your
conversation
.
I shall detain you no longer than to request,
that until the Great Spirit makes you a father, you
will be free to tell me your wants, and use my
wigwam and my people as your own.CHAPTER I.
Then might you see on earth the warriors lie.
Whose limbs robust could every toil defy;
Inur'd the weight of ponderous arms to bear,
Inur'd on fields the hostile steel to dare.
Deep in their flesh the bidden furies prey.
Tasso
.
The
warning which Tonnaleuka had given
Charles to be circumspect in regard to the
enemy
,
was not lost upon him. He employed Paddy
Frazier as a scout to hover round the French
station
at Le Buf in order to watch their motions
and give him the earliest intelligence of their
design. He also kept four or five of his men
constantly employed in ranging on horseback,
those quarters of the country from which he could
be suddenly attacked, while the whole of the
remainder
were busily engaged in digging trenches,
and preparing long pointed stakes to fix in the
ground to form their stoccade fortification. From
the friendly Indians he at first rceived
considerable
aid in forwarding his works; but in a few
days he began to perceive their ardour in his
behalf
to diminish; and suspecting that they had
imbided some unfriendly feeling towards him, he
thought proper to visit king Shingiss, and
expostulate
with him on the subject.
His Delaware Majesty stated to him, that he
still preferred his nation to the French, but as he
was now imitating their conduct by building strong
holds in the country, many of his people began to
fear that these might, some day, be used against
them, instead of the common enemy.
Charles assured him that his strength never
would be employed against his friends; but that
such of the tribes as remained true to him should
always experience his gratitude; and if his nation
should wax strong in the country, which he
doubted
not, it would during the next summer, so as to
overmatch the French, those, who now adhered
to him in his weakness, would be amply
compensated
and protected from their enemies.
The result of this interview was, that Shingiss
promised to remonstrate with his people, and
exhort
them to befriend and assist the English as
usual. They became in consequence somewhat
more carnest in the aid they afforded, and by their
assistance, in about five weeks after Charles's
arrival
,
the trench was dug, and piles planted around
the two most exposed sides of the intended fort.
The other two sides being skirted by the rivers,
did not require a trench, and the piles for their
circumvallation were getting ready with all
possible
despatch.
Matters were thus situated with our
adventurers
,
when Paddy Frazier arrived in haste one
evening with intelligence, that a large body of
French, consisting, as he conjectured, of between
four and five hundred men, collected from various
forts, were proceeding rapidly down the course
of the Alleghany river, to attack them.
This intelligence was indeed alarming, as their
defences were as yet but slight, and the few
Indians
1*
who were present, were of very doubtful
fidelity. Charles, however, determined to put a
bold face on the matter, and resist his enemies as
long as he could, with little hope indeed of
victory
,
but with the expectation of forcing them, if
he must capitulate, to grant him honourable terms.
He despatched a messenger to Shingiss,
requesting
the aid of the Delaware warriors. Shingiss
attended personally with about thirty men, being
all he could muster on the emergency. When he
arrived, he addressed Charles
You suspected me, brother, said he, of
want of fidelity to your interests. Brother, I
promised
you my assistance in your needyou now
shall have it, for I never broke my word. You will
never tell your great king of the east, that
Shingiss
was a deceiver, because I expect you will tell
truth.
Brother, I have reasoned thus: I will join the
English now, because I am pledged to it. The
French are more powerful and will beat usbut
then we will only be beaten, as brave men often
arewe shall not have broken our words like
cheats and cowards.
Now, brotherI am ready to obey you.
All Charles's force was now concentrated
within
the entrenchments; and every man was in full
expectation of a speedy and severe conflict. They
kept all night on the alert one half only retiring
to rest at the time. During the night, however,
they were left undisturbed; but the morning
scarcely dawned when they perceived the woods
at the distance of little more than five hundred
yards, glittering with the arms and uniforms of the
French soldiers.
In a short time, a man approached with a white
flag, who was admitted into the entrenchments.
He said he was sent to demand from Mr.
Adderly
an absolute surrender of himself, and all the
men and stores under his command to Monsieur
St. Pierre, the officer commanding the troops of his
most Christian Majesty at Le Buf, in return for
which his own life, and the lives of all his
followers
,
should be protected from the power of the
Indians, although they must submit to be sent to
Canada, perhaps to France, as prisoners of war.
Charles at once rejected these terms. If we
were absolutely beaten, thought he, they could
not ask for a submission more disgraceful. In the
name of God and our country, we will try them.
If we beat them off, it is well. If not, it is only to
submit when we can do no better.
His refusal was scarcely communicated to the
French commander, when the trumpets sounded,
and the attack commenced by a heavy fire of
musketry opening upon the English, from which
their defences were so incomplete as to afford them
but a very imperfect shelter. They fought,
however
,
with great bravery, returning the fire of their
enemies with such promptitude and steadiness,
that they dared not advance to storm the works,
as was their first intention.
Neither party had any cannon, as the French
understanding that the English had none, did not
choose to spend time in transporting any over such
a difficult country as lay between Le Buf and
Shanapins, lest the British might become too well
fortified before they attacked them. The whole
of this forenoon was, therefore, spent in the
interchange
of a severe and unintermitting fire of
musketry
,
very destructive to both sides. The French,
it is true, saved themselves as much as they could
behind trees, which afforded them almost as secure
a shelter as the unfinished stoccade did the
English
.
Their numbers, however, and the
necessity
they were under of making frequent
movements
,
rendered them more exposed than the
English
.
They had, therefore, considerably the
worst of it during this period of attack.
Monsieur St. Pierre, therefore, about one o'clock
in the afternoon, resolved to change the mode of
combat. He accordingly drew off his men from
the reach of the English fire, and dividing them
into two parties, ordered Captain Joncaire to
proceed
with one of them out of view of the enemy,
towards the Monongahela, and under cover of its
high bank, which varied in height from twenty to
thirty feet above the common surface of the river,
to proceed down, by the water's edge, to the
point at the junction of the two rivers where the
English station was yet unprotected. He took
himself the charge of the other division which he
conducted, in a similar manner, under shelter of
the Alleghany bank. It was calculated that both
divisions would reach, nearly at one time, the
defenceless
quarters of the English position. If not,
however, as either party considerably
out-numbered
the force to be attacked, the one which
arrived
first, was to lose no time in waiting for the
other, since it could not be far off with its
assistance
.
St. Pierre's own division came first to the attack,
but on scaling the bank which was considerably
steep, nearly thirty of his men were killed by a
well-directed fire from the English, and the rest
shrunk back under cover of the bank. Another
minute, however, brought forward Joncaire's
division
,
who made good their destination, not, indeed
without some loss, which, however, they severely
repaid by a dreadful volley upon Charles's men,
who were now without shelter. That instant St.
Pierre's men also leaped upon the contested
ground; and Charles, seeing that further
resistance
would only bring useless destruction upon
his followers, submitted to necessity, and
surrendered
himself and his party prisoners of war.
In this second disastrous conflict which Charles
had conducted against the enemies of his
country
,
he lost nealy half his men. Five or six
others were wounded, and he himself had one of
his thighs slightly injured by a musket ball. Of
his Indian auxiliaries, ten or twelve, among whom
he particularly regretted king Shingiss, were
killed
.
The French had between forty and fifty
slain, and nearly as many wounded; but their
victory
was decisive, and the object of their
expedition
completely attained.
The French commander now resolved to keep
possession of the ground he had taken, both as
furthering the views of his government in
extending
their line of forts from Quebec to New
Orleans
,
and as being the most eligible position
from which he could not only overawe the
English
Indians, but check any future attempts that
the Ohio Company, or even the British nation,
might make upon this country.
He immediately set his men to work, assisted by
a great number of Indians, to finish the fort which
the English had begun. During the ensuing
spring, this post assumed a very formidable aspect,
under the name of Fort Du Quesne, overawing
any of the Indian tribes that might still harbour a
secret partially for the English, and for several
years setting even the whole power of the
British
in America, at defiance.
St. Pierre, at once, perceived the advantage
of ingratiating himself with the neighbouring tribes,
and drawing them off from the English interest.
He therefore set all the Delawares, whom he had
made prisoners in the late battle, at liberty, and
king Shingiss being now dead, he had no
difficulty
in forming an alliance with his successor.
Not having accommodations for the English
prisoners at Du Quesne, he in a few days after
the battle, sent the greater number of them under
a strong escort, to Le Buf. But Charles was
detained until his wound should be so far healed
as to permit him to travel without inconvenience.
He was kindly enough treated by the French
commander, who permited him to retain all his
private baggage, and afforded him every
accommodation
for his personal comfort, that the
circumstances
of the place could afford.
Charles bore his misfortunes stoutly, for his
conscience
told him that he had done all that man could
do, to avoid them. His employers had not
furnished
him with sufficient force to effect their
designs
,
and hence they failed, and failed too,
without
occasioning any great disappointment to his
anticipations. But he did not blame the
company
.
They had given him all the force they could
muster for such an enterprise, and his own
anxiety
to have business once more in the vicinity of
his Maria, together with an ill-judged notion that
the inclemency of the season might protect him
until he should be fortified, and receive additional
succours from the eastward, had induced him to
accept its command.
The state of Maria's mind, on hearing of his
defeat, he had found means to ascertain from
Tonnaleuka
,
who visited him a day or two after the
battle.
The prophet informed him, that on first
hearing
that the French were about to attack him with
an overwhelming force, she, and indeed the whole
of the Frazier family, manifested great agitation
and alarm for his safety; but as soon as it was
understood that he had escaped with life, she
became
resigned and thankful; for she knew that
to be a prisoner of war in the hands of
Europeans
,
although it might be a disagreeable and
troublesome
,
yet it was not a dangerous, nor could it
be a permanent matter. She, therefore,
consoled
herself with the hope that all might yet be
well.
The French commander knew nothing about
Charles's intimacy with the Frazier family, nor
even of their partiality for the English interest.
He knew them indeed to be British subjects, for
he had often heard of them; but he had also heard
of their long residence in the Wilderness, and of
their peaceable demeanor; and he conceived that
from long association with the Indians, they must
have thrown off much of their European
manners
and partialities. It did not appear that they
had, in any manner, assisted the English in
their late attempts to gain a footing in the
country
,
farther than by entertaining some of their
sojourners, and trading with them, which they
were in the habit of doing with individuals of
every nation who visited them. As to Paddy's
agency in behalf of Charles's cause, it was
conducted
by that wily woodsman, with so much
adroitness and secresy, that no one in the French
interest suspected him. He was, therefore,
without
hindrance, permitted to trade at their forts,
with which he continued to maintain as free and
uncontroled an intercourse, as before these
transactions
.
As to Tonnaleuka, although the French
commandant
had too much of the philosophical
scepticism
of his countrymen in his disposition, to
place much confidence in his prophetical
pretensions
,
yet he respected him as a man of
extraordinary
talents and information, and courted his
friendship and good will with considerable
assiduity
,
on account of the great influence that he knew
him to possess over the native tribes. The
prophet
was therefore under no restraint in his
intercourse
with the different forts; and
consequently
,
very few matters of importance were agitated,
either there, or in any of the Indian councils, with
which he was not acquainted.
In a few weeks, Charles Adderly being quite
recovered of his wound, Monsieur St. Pierre
thought proper to send him under a guard of six
soldiers, to his fellow prisoners at Le Buf. This
was a movement very much against Charles's
inclination
.
He wished to remain as near as
possible
to the residence of Maria; and he had
during his confinement consoled himself with
the hope of obtaining permission, on his
parole
,
to occasionally visit Frazier's family. He
had, however, to submit to the will of his
conqueror
;
and he departed from Du Quesne in
company
with his guard, with a heavy and reluctant
heart, about the beginning of February, 1754.
The weather was cold and dry, with about two
feet depth of snow on the ground; but the party
were hardy and lively, and tolerably well
equipped
for the journey. They proceeded on merrily
and carelessly, for nearly two days, without
meeting
with any accident; but on the evening of the
second, when they reached the bank of Bear
Creek, between thirty and forty miles from Du
Quesne, their progress was unexpectedly
arrested
by a volley of musketry fired by men in
ambush
,
which killed four of the guard upon the
spot. The assailants immediately leaped from
their concealment, with loud cheers; and to
Charles's infinite surprise and delight, he beheld
his friends Paddy and Archy Frazier, Peter M`
Fall and Dr. Killbreath. Paddy, the Doctor, and
Archy, threw away their rifles, and seizing each
a loaded musket from the fallen Frenchmen, gave
instant chace to the two survivers, who, the
moment
their companions fell, had taken to flight,
without thinking of Charles, or waiting to see
whether they were attacked by Indians or
white men. But Peter ran directly to loosen the
cords that bound his master's wrists; Charles,
however, ordered him first to call his companions
back from the pursuit, saying, there has already
been slaughter enough here. It will now do no
harm to allow these two poor fellows to escape.
Arrah! Master, now, my honey, never mind
them, said Peter. Who knows but they might
come and fire a backshot at us, before we could
get home; and then the devil take us, if the
chance wouldn't be that some of us wouldn't get
home at all, at all. By the piper, Doran! who
broke the hangman's neck at the foot of the
gallows
,
master, but our boys must send lead into their
wheezans.
By this time, however, Charles was loose, and
he hastened himself after the pursuers, whom he
was easily able to trace, by their tracks in the
snow. He had not run far, until he heard two
or three shots fired, and again loud cheers rang
in the air. He soon arrived at the spot, and found
to his unspeakable chagrin, that the objects of his
solicitude had received their death wounds.
My friendsI heartily thank you for the
service
you have rendered me, said he. But
would it not have been as well to have spared
these poor men! Was not your object fully enough
accomplished before their destruction?
No, sir, replied Paddy Frazier. When I
manage a thing, it shall never be half done, or
else the devil is in it. Our object was, no doubt,
to rescue you at all risks, but it was also, to do it
without any risk, if we could. And do you think
Vol. II. 2
that there would be no risk in permitting these
men to escape? If we did not pursue them to
death, they might have pursued us, by our tracks
in the snow, to discovery; which might one day
have terminated in the destruction of at least some
of us; perhaps of your humble servant, my
precious
self, who knows! for it as certain as that
snow lies there, that they would have discovered
and told our names to our good friends, their
complaisant countrymen. Nay, they might have
taken a more speedy revenge, by sending, from
some convenient place, a couple of balls after us,
one of which might have lodged in my own
groin, where, Mr. Adderly, I assure you I would
have conceived it no agreeable guest. In short,
sir, by shooting them, I breathe easier, and am
likely to breathe longer.
There may be some truth in your
observations
,
returned Charles; and as the deed is now
done, it will do no good to argue its propriety.
Let me again assure you of my gratitude for your
exertions in my behalf. I only wish that the affair
could have been managed with less bloodshed
but that may have been impossible.
Arrah, master! cried Peter McFall, it has
been done snugly. I knew Paddy was the boy
could manage it. Och! long life to his mother
that put such an eye in his head when she bore
him. By the great Brian! master, if he couldn't,
at half a mile's distance, shoot your nose off
without
touching your face!
Why Peter, now when I think of it,
exclaimed
Charles, how, in the name of wonder,
are you here? I thought you had been quietly
lodged in Le Buf long since.
Arrah! master, now be asy, said Peter,
winking significantly; can't you keep a bit of a
secret; sure I told you before that there are more
ways of getting out of Le Buf than by the door.
What! then I suppose you escaped through
the kennel again! said Charles.
No, your honour. By my sowl, the devil
couldn't now escape that way, replied Peter; it
is now a wooden pipe, that you could scarcely put
your fist in. But I scaled the walls, may it please
your honour, like a lark, and swung down the
tother side like a swallow, and so bade them adieu,
to eat their own meal and potatoes; though the
devil a morsel of oatmeal or a good Irish potato
did Peter ever see among them, my honey!
In short, by dint of patience and interrogatories,
Charles ascertained that Peter, finding from an
alteration in the structure of the drain which had
been before so propitious to him, that he could do
no good by its means, resolved to discover some
other. He for several days prosecuted his
investigations
,
and exercised his ingenuity to no
purpose
.
But he was resolved not to be baffled in
his design. Escape he must, he had repeatedly
sworn to himself, if he should some night blow out
the sentinel's brains in order to effect it. This
would be a rather dangerous scheme, he thought,
and therefore, after long balancing on the subject,
he preferred one which only presented him with
the trifling hazard of beaking his neck.
He had taken notice of a long line of jack-cord,
which reached from the top of one of the piles of
the stoccade to an iron staple fixed in the gable
of one of the store-houses. This line had been
placed there for the purpose of airing and drying
the clothes of the garrison. This cord, partly
from its smallness, and partly from long exposure
to the weather, had become rather weak to bear
the weight of such a man as Peter; but he
instantly
conceived that if it were doubled, it might
answer
the use he intended. In order to ascertain
this, he took an opportunity, when he was
unobserved
,
of relieving its end from the staple, and
having doubled it, he found it, after repeatedly
trying his weight upon it, quite sufficient for his
purpose. He again secured it in the staple, until
night should give him an opportunity of
commencing
his operations; and in the interval searched
for and found a large iron hook, to the one end
of which, when the hour was favourable for his
design, he attached the cord, and by repeatedly
throwing it up to the top of the stoccade, he at last
dexterously fixed it upon the pile round which the
other end of the cord was bound. He now, by a
great effort of strength, slung over the piles a small
bag of provisions, and then, with the agility of a
cat, ascended to the top of the stoccade, from which
he at first intended to let himself drop down. But
the height was too fearful. He, therefore, drew
over his cord, and fixing the hook more firmly
than when he ascended, he committed his safety
to it, and in a few moments reached the ground on
the outside, without injury. Then shouldering his
bag of provisions, he whistled adien to Le Buf,
and in about a week found himself seated by
Gilbert
Frazier's fireside. Hence it was that Paddy,
who projected and conducted the scheme of
Charles's rescue, obtained him as a bold and
zealous
auxiliary.
CHAPTER II.
Oh, Anna! think'st thou time or space
Can ever change a love like mine;
Can from my mem'ry e'er efface
Charms there impress'd so deep as thine!
No; I may suffer and repine,
While round my head life's tempests roll;
To death itself I may resign,
But thou shalt triumph in my soul!
Savelabour
.
A short
time brought Charles to the residence
of his beloved. Oh! how comfortable, how
happy
he now felt as he sat by her side and gazed
upon her charms. Here he beheld himself so
suddenly, so unexpectedly, freed from the midst
of his misfortunes, and placed in that very spot
where of all the world he most wished to be, and
in the presence of her whose society alone could
yield him true happiness, that the whole almost
appeared to him as if it had been the effect of
magic
.
What luxury on earth was equal to this!
what could he wish for more! The bliss of
pleasure after pain he now enjoyed for a few
days almost to intoxication; for in the romance
of his feelings, in the intensity of his joy, his
gratitude
,
and his love, he buried every recollection of
past pain, except such as served to make present
enjoyment sweeter; and as to any anticipations of
future evil, they could no more gain his attention
than a true-bred Yankee could forget charging
for
value delivered
.
2*
But Maria did not feel so perfectly at ease.
Rejoiced as she was at his escape from his
enemies
,
she greatly feared his falling again into their
hands, for she knew that under present
circumstances
he could not in the Wilderness enjoy that
perfect safety she wished for him. His enemies
she believed would soon hear or suspect
something
of his rescue, and would no doubt use all
their powerful endeavours to discover the place
of his concealment. She endeavoured to impress
these truths upon her lover's mind, but he, for the
first two or three days, would give toleration to no
feeling that possessed the remotest appearance of
being a drawback upon his present enjoyment.
At length his enthusiasm of delight began
somewhat
to subside; or, to speak more correctly, to
become reasonable; and she succeeded in
convincing
him that his only security against being
retaken by his enemies, would be close
concealment
,
or else flight from the Wilderness. The
latter expedient she acknowledged was, at this
season of the year, rather difficult and dangerous.
The weather was inclement, and he might perish
in a storm; or, as the mountains were covered
with snow, an attempt to cross them might lead
to his discovery, by exposing the tracks of his
footsteps to the enemy.
Removal from the vicinity of his Maria was,
indeed, at this time a disagreeable step, which
Charles was happy to have some reasonable
excuse
for avoiding.
My love, said he, banish me not from your
presence, and I will adopt any other means of
security
I
will conceal myself in any other manner
you may prescribe.
You are aware, said she, that as soon as
the French suspect your escape, they will search
for you here. They will naturally suppose that,
if you be at all in the Wilderness, your
countrymen
will know something of you. I wish you to
disguise deeply, remove to some distance from
us, and visit us but seldom, at least until the heat
of the pursuit after you shall abate. Tonnaleuka
will furnish you with a retreat, for he knows all
the fastnesses and lurking places of the forest. Our
family will take care to supply you with every
thing they can to render your asylum
comfortable
.
Oh, Maria! this is almost banishment, he
replied; it will drive me to some solitary shade
where I will be deprived of your presence.
But it is necessary, in your present
circumstances
,
said she, to submit to this
inconvenience
,
unless you wish to be again captured;
and the sooner you submit, my Charles, I will
feel the sooner at ease in regard to your safety.
O Maria! speak ever thus to me, and I will
do any thing you wish. But, bethink you, my
sweetest maiden, there is not, there cannot be,
much danger of my being here searched for so
very soon as you apprehend. There is not one
of my escort now living to tell the story of my
rescue. It will be many days before any
suspicion
of it takes place at Le Buf, and many more
before that suspicion is communicated to Du
Quesne. Even then, the enemy will not be
certain
whether the whole party may not have
perished
,
either by intense cold, or by some
marauding
band of treacherous Indians. In short, my
too timid love, I do not believe that the pursuit
after me will be either very eager, or of long
continuance
.
It may turn out as you say, replied Maria;
but it may also turn out otherwise. This is the
danger; and to guard against misfortune upon
which we can calculate, however remote may be
its appearance, is surely wise and prudent. O
Charles! be prudent, for both our sakes. O!
relieve
my mind, and without delay betake yourself
to disguise and concealment.
I shall do as you wish, said he. For your
sake I will dive into the thickest of the woods,
into the depths of caverns, for concealment. Only
let your mind be at ease, I will vanish from
danger
,
although in doing so, I shall be banished
from you. I will attend Tonnaleuka wherever he
chooses to lead me.
Now I am satisfied, Charles, said she; all
will be well. Under the prophet's care you will
be safe. He will be here this night, and shall
direct
your proceedings.
That evening Tonnaleuka, as Maria had
foretold
,
visited them.
My son, said he to Charles, you are once
more out of the power of your enemies, and it
only now requires prudence to keep you so. My
son, I rejoice that this maiden has prevailed on you
to follow my directions. If you be ready, follow
mebut first bid that maiden farewell, for you
will not see her for many weeks.
Oh, father! he cried, what do you require
of me! Why separate us long? What necessity
is there
My son, said Tonnaleuka, I have
promised
to her, that if you obey my directions, I will
be responsible for your safety; and I will not
endanger
my word by exposing it to risk. Your
obedience will be voluntary; but if, by following
your inclinations, you bring evil upon yourself,
then I shall be blameless. Now, my son, choose
whether you shall be ruled by me, or by your own
imprudent wishes.
Charles looked at Maria with an expression
which asked, shall I go?
Mr. Adderly, said she, this hesitation is
unbecoming, it is weak. Haste, attend the
prophet
,
if you regard my peace of mind, or your
own absolute security. Alas, Charles! since you
will have me to express myself so, I feel every
hour an age, till I know that you are beyond the
reach of your enemies.
I go, dearest of maidens! and I promise to
obey the prophet. But, O! let me ask one
request
.
If there be danger in my coming to thee,
surely there can be none in thy visiting me. Will
the distance not be too far to allow me sometimes
to see thee in my concealment?
It may happen that I will visit you, she replied.
But if I should not, you may assure yourself that
it will only be lest my going might excite suspicion
of your retreat. Farewell then!be patient, and
submit to temporary inconveniences. The
prophet
is your friend, and O! may God be so too!
Farewell! he said; and he pressed her hand
to his burning lips, and followed Tonnaleuka out
of the apartment.
It was a beautiful moonlight frosty night. Ten
thousand fiery stars sparkled in the heavens, and
the pure cold snow glittered on the earth. The
queen of night coursed, in all her splendour,
steadily
and majestically along the smooth blue
starstudded
arch that overcanopied the sober and
chequered
horizon of mountains and vales, clothed in
a party-coloured covering of dark trees, and
silvery
shining snow that lay extended beneath. The
rivers and rivulets were all frozen as hard as iron,
and the movements of every terrestrial object
seemed to be arrested, except the shadows of
trees, and rocks, and mountains, which flitted
around as Charles and his conductor went forward,
as if to yield them way, or pay them respect as
they passed by.
Tonnaleuka led the way, and Charles followed
in meditative silence. They kept nearly
northward
,
along the right bank of Turtle Creek. The
stream soon became enclosed between high
mountains
,
and they crossed on the ice to its left bank,
along which they proceeded about half a mile; when
suddenly taking a path that led in an easterly
direction
up a high hill, on gaining its top, they kept
along the ridge which it formed, still in an easterly
course, for half a mile further. They then struck
suddenly to the left, and descended into a deep
valley, at the bottom of which they crossed a small
run, near a place where it was almost overarched
by a huge rock, which formed the rugged juttying
face of the opposing ridge. They passed up the
bank of this stream underneath this fearful arch,
to which the solemn rays of the moon now
imparted
an aspect impressively awful, for about two
hundred yards, to a place where the continuity of
the rock became interrupted by a deep ravine,
into which they turned. For a few moments they
ascended a small path, until about half way up the
left side of this ravine, when they came to a large
rock, which seemed to obstruct their farther
progress
.
Here the prophet spoke to Charles for the first
time since they had left Frazier's.
Now, my son, said he, you will see my
favourite
retreat when I wish for concealment.
There are only two individuals, besides myself,
who know it, and in these I can repose implicit
reliance. You will be the third; consequently the
confidence I have in you cannot be small; and the
security you will here enjoy from either French or
Indians, will be as great as even your Maria could
desire. Within is the lodging I am about to afford
you, till you can leave the Wilderness in safety.
its entrance, except by those who already know
it, can only be found by a miracle.
So saying, Tonnaleuka caught hold of a branch
of a small pine tree, that seemed to be growing in
the angle formed by the rock and the side of the
acclivity, and pulling it downward, he separated
the upper side of the root some distance from the
earth. He let go his hold, and the tree remained
in this posture.
Follow me! said Tonnaleuka, as he
ascended
to the gap, which this separation of the tree
from the earth had occasioned, into which he
lowered
himself by a flight of ten or twelve rugged
stone steps, until he came to a kind of
landing-place
,
or lobby, having a smooth earthen bottom.
Remain here a few moments, until I strike a
light, said Tonnaleuka, and he proceeded into a
dark passage, in what direction Charles could not
tell, but of considerable length he conjectured,
from the distance at which he soon heard the
sound of his retiring footsteps, while he himself
remained awkwardly enough watching the oblique
rays of the moon, that with great effort cast down
a very feeble light to where he stood. In a short
time, however, he perceived the glancing of light
at a distance in the subterraneous passage, and
Tonnaleuka soon returned with a flaming taper.
My son, said he, when he approached, draw
the rope which winds through that pulley.
Charles did so, and the root of the tree instantly
returning to its place, closed up the aperture by
which they had entered, and the rays of the moon
were no longer visible.
The prophet now led the way through a long,
narrow, and rather damp passage, which at length
brought them into a large, dry, and airy chamber,
with a comfortable floor somewhat more elevated
than the passage. In an angle of this apartment,
to the left of its entrance, the embers of a
woodfire
not quite extinguished were seen, on a
convenient
hearth, which possessed a species of funnel
that carried away the smoke by an outlet, which
Charles afterwards discovered to be into another
ravine, on the opposite side of the ridge from that
on which they had entered.
The furniture was simple and scanty,
comprising
no articles but such as were of prime
necessity
for the comfort of one, or, at most, of two
individuals
.
There was indeed a bed and bedding,
not much inferior to some of those possessed by
Gilbert Frazier. A plain table, two or three
chairs, a small stool, a large chest, a cupboard, two
or three shelves, with scarcely any cooking
utensils
,
constituted the remainder of what Charles
Adderly now observed in this subterranean
hermitage
.
Sit down, my son, said Tonnaleuka; you
are now in my abode. I must warm it. The
cheering flame shall blaze forth in a few minutes.
He withdrew into the passage, but soon
returned
with several billets of wood in his arm, which,
to the great comfort and exhilaration of Charles,
who had begun to feel rather discontented, chilly,
and vapourish with his situation, soon began to
crackle from the impulse of the glowing element,
and to enliven the chamber with its animating
rays.
My son, you perhaps need refreshment, said
the prophet. I shall supply youfor within this
cavern there is enough for all present wants.
Father, I require none, said Charles, but
I acknowledge that I need repose, for my mind is
overpowered with sadness.
And what grieve you for? asked the prophet
Is it because you are not now a prisoner in Le
Buf or Du Quesne? Or is it because you are not
now in Gilbert Frazier's, exposed to the risk of
being
again captured and exposed to the vengeance of
your enemies? Are you sad, my son, because you
are safe? If so, you are here without restraint,
and may rush again into danger, if it will give you
pleasure.
But, my son, you have promised to be ruled by
me, and it is the wish of her whom you love that
you should be so. Will you vex her by your
imprudence
,
by your breach of word? Know you
not, that your enemies are powerful and
numerous
in the country; and if you should fall again
into their hands, think you, that they would treat
you with indulgence? No, my sonbe wise,
render
yourself content here for a few weeks. You
will want for nothing necessary to human life.
Food, drink, a bed to lie on, and books to read,
you shall have as liberally as the Wilderness can
afford. But for your own sake, and for the sake
of one still more beloved, I request you to
reconcile
yourself to a temporary privation of her
society
,
and of the external world.
My son, I offer you foodI wish you to
partake
of it; but if you prefer retiring to rest, go,
and may the blessing of the Great Father
accompany
you!
Charles preferred retiring, and requested the
prophet to excuse his apparent dissatisfaction with
his residence, as he in reality felt both mind and
body overcast and indisposed. To-morrow, he
hoped, he should recover the serenity of his mind,
and be able to express, with cheerfulness and
cordiality
,
the obligations he owed him as his kind
deliverer.
Talk not of obligations, my son, said the
prophet. My duties are my obligations, and for
performing them, I require no thanks. Ah! my
Vol. II. 3
son, how miserable I should have long felt a life,
whose misfortunes have been severer than any you
have yet experienced, had it not been, that among
my red brethren I have often found the means of
doing good! But your mind is oppressed.
Repose
,
I hope, will relieve you. I will show you
where to seek it.
He took up the light, and conducting Charles
a few yards into the passage through which they
had before passed, turned to the right into a small
recess, much more comfortable and clean in its
appearance than the large apartment. Here he
beheld a bed prepared for his reception, with a
small table and a chair, both exhibiting very rude
workmanship, but suitable enough for the place,
and the purposes intended by them.
The prophet having pronounced a short
benediction
upon his guest, retired, and Charles was
about throwing himself into bed, when he
perceived
,
beneath the bedclothes, a letter addressed to
himself. He opened it, and seeing that it was
from Maria, with feelings of great emotion he read
as follows:
Dear Charles,
My persuading you to submit, at this time,
to a residence in a dark subterraneous cell, is a
proof how anxious I am for your safety. You
will, no doubt, feel your situation lonely and
disagreeable
;
but I hope the necessity for it will not
be of long continuance; and, in the meanwhile,
in order to relieve its tediousness as much as
possible
,
I shall send you a supply of such books as I
possess, best suited for your entertainment. You
may be also assured, that our family will let you
want for nothing in their power to afford you
comfort.
Oh, Charles! how little are the men and
women
of society aware of the dangers and
calamities
that often visit the most remote and secluded
condition! How have their philosophers and their
poets praised, in strains of enthusaism and
rapture
,
the virtue, the tranquillity, and the
happiness
,
to be found in retirement! Ah! they
appear
to forget that human passions, and, therefore,
human crimes and human miseries, are ever, in
such places, more violent and fierce, because
more unrestrained and unmodified by the salutary
customs and institutions of society!
But, Charles, the object of my writing to you,
is to encourage you to an exertion of patience in
your present solitude, and not to magnify the evils
to which it is exposed, by making contrasts, for
which my inexperience renders me incompetent.
But these times of calamity, I trust, will not
always last. Providence will yet moderate the
storm, and grant this Wilderness a restoration of
that calm which it once enjoyed. Till then, let
us shelter ourselves, as much as possible, from the
fury of the times, and be content with privations,
if we can only thereby secure safety. I am aware
that this advice will not be relished by your
adventurous
spirit; but it is because I dread that
spirit, fearless and rash as I know it to be, leading
you into fresh dangers, that I am so solicitous for
your present confinement. If it will in any degree
enable you to support that confinement, I have
here no hesitation to repeat the assurance, which
you already have, of the unalterable nature of my
affection for you.
Let me be assured in return, that you will
bear your present lot without repining, and you
will contribute much to my ease of mind;and,
that heaven may protect you, and hasten over
these times of danger and distress, is the fervent
prayer of your
Maria
.
Yes! thought Charles, when he had finished
this letter, I am happy. Ah! what can make
me otherwise, when I possess the affections, the
sweet, the pure, the tender, the faithful affections
of such a lovely being! Oh heaven! it would
indeed, be criminal to repine at thy dispensations,
when thou hast granted me this! This is ample
remuneration for all sufferingsthis is balm for
every wound!O thou good Providence that
hast thus granted me the first wish of my heart,
make me truly grateful for such a consolation,
such a blessing, amidst my misfortunes!Yes, I
will assure the dear maiden that I will not repine
I will assure her that I am happy, and that she
has made me so!
The weight and weariness upon his spirits, of
which he had complained so much to Tonnaleuka,
were now gone; and, instead of anxiously
wishing
to relieve his mind of the thoughts that
crowded
upon it, he now wished to indulge them, and
to prolong, by a protracted wakefulness, the
delightful
sensations which they afforded him.
If he had possessed writing materials, a glowing
reply, as warm as love and gratitude could
dictate
,
would soon have extended itself, in black
and white, upon the table before him. But this
pleasing spectacle he could not enjoy until the
next morning, without interrupting Tonnaleuka
either in his devotions or his repose, for he
reasonably
enough supposed, that by this time the
prophet was engaged in one of these. He had,
therefore, nothing for it but to hurry into bed,
and fall asleep as fast as possible, in order to
annihilate
the time that must elapse before he could
enjoy the felicity of pouring out his soul in a
letter
to his beloved.
CHAPTER III.
'Tis love like this, in young and faithful hearts,
The nearest bliss to heaven on earth imparts:
For holy, sweet, and full, without alloy,
Nought but the fear of parting to annoy,
If time would only cease his onward flight,
Nor wing away those moments of delight,
When mutual happiness each throb attunes,
And heart with heart, and soul with soul communes,
When fearless joy wafts free o'er passion's wave,
With the first feelings sacred nature gave,
The Fall's dread curse would threaten then in vain,
And Paradise would bloom on earth again!
Waltham
.
Tonnaleuka
was surprised in the morning to
see Charles in such good spirits, although he at
once conjectured the cause, for he had himself
been the bearer of Maria's letter, and had
deposited
it where it had been found.
You have benefited much from your night's
repose, I perceive, my son, said the prophet.
Yes, father; replied Charles, I am much
better than I was last night. But, father, could
you oblige me with materials for writing?
I can, my son. It will be a pleasant
amusement
for you. I am glad you desire it. By
reading
and writing, I trust you will be able to spend
your time here without feeling it tedious and
uncomfortable
.
I shall try to do so, father, replied Charles,
who having possessed himself with pen, ink, and
paper, retired with a light heart to his
bed-chamber
,
to write his epistle.
I will not insert this elaborate address of the
enamoured Charles to his beloved in these
memoirs
,
3*
because, although it did not contain a
sentiment
which was not the sincere dictate of his
heart, and for the sincerity of which Maria did not
give him full credit, yet I am aware that there is
not one reader in twenty but would consider it
absolute bombast. It is, indeed, frequently
impossible
for enthusiastic lovers, like Charles, when
communicating by letter to the mistress of their
hearts, the fervours of their passion, to write
common
sense, at least what common readers can
receive
as such: for, like all other classes and
communities
of men, lovers have a technical language
of their own, to themselves the prettiest, and
sweetest, perhaps, of all languages; but certainly
the least rational, and intelligible, to the rest of
the world.
Charles having finished his letter, put it into the
hands of the prophet, who promised that it should
be conveyed to Maria that very day.
With respect to your servant's safety, my
son, said the prophet, I have thought it
necessary
that something should also be done; for if left
long to himself so near his enemies, his rashness
will inevitably expose him to the risk of being
recaptured
.
Father, replied Charles, the certainty of
his safety would indeed give me pleasure, and I
shall be thankful for whatever your wisdom may
think proper to do for him.
It may be, said the prophet, that he will
be unwilling to obey my directions. Your
authority
may be necessary to induce him thereto.
Write to him that it is your will he should obey
me, and I will provide for his safety. I cannot
bring him here to conceal him, or to receive your
commands, because I wish not the secret of this
cavern to be known to one of his careless and
unguarded
disposition.
You are prudent, father, replied Charles,
and you are right. I shall write to Peter, that
in obeying you be obeys me, and that on pain of
my displeasure he must attend to your directions.
Charles wrote accordingly, and shortly
afterwards
Tonnaleuka set out on a visit to Frazier's.
In order to prevent any of Charles's enemies from
suspecting, on account of the termination of the
tracks of footsteps in the snow at the pine tree,
that there was any lurking-place near it, he
continued
to extend these tracks onwards quite over
the ridge, by now taking a circuitous route to
Frazier's
.
Having delivered Maria's letter, he took Paddy
Frazier aside and explained to him his views with
respect to Peter McFall.
I have myself been a little alarmed on this
subject, observed Paddy, lest that fellow's long
tongue should some time or other betray to the
French the whole affair of Mr. Adderly's rescue.
His discovering on himself only would be of
little consequence, as the world could jog on
pretty well without him; and besides, you know
it would be altogether his own businessthough I
don't wish the blockhead to get into a scrape
either. In short, father, I agree with you that,
for the general good, we must get him out of the
way as soon as possible.
Have you not certain trading concerns at
Gist's plantation, on pretence of managing which
we could send him there? asked Tonnaleuka.
It is a good thought, father; replied Paddy,
I have a package of otter and minx skins, that
I wish immediately conveyed to Gist's. Father,
I think we can despatch him with them; nay, I
shall go with him every yard myself, and fix
matters
so with Gist as to have our loose-tongued
Irishman detained there for a few months at any
rate, by which time it may please fortune to turn
up something for our benefit.
This scheme was agreed upon, and Peter was
summoned before Tonnaleuka.
My son, said the prophet, here is a letter
requiring you to perform some services I have in
view for you. Will you have any objection?
Now, by the powers! prophet, replied
Peter
,
isn't that a strange question? don't you see
my master bids meoch! may the blessing of
Bonna-Margery be on him! But, prophet,
may I make free to ask you just where you have
stuffed my poor master out of the way? for sure
wouldn't Peter attend to him and all his errands,
if it should be running in and out of the devil's
dungeon, or even a catamount's den in this
Wilderness
.
I know your regard for your master,
observed
the prophet, and hence it is that I am
persuaded
you will cheerfully undertake the performance
of an errand on which he wishes you immediately
to proceed. As to your master's present residence,
my son, I am not at liberty to reveal it. But I
may assure you that he is quite comfortable and
safe.
Arrah, now, dear prophet! but you know
every thing. You know where my master is.
Now, if you would only tell me, so that I might
set my eye again on him; who knowsbotheration
to it! if we couldn't dash our brains together, and
find out some methodnever fear us for that, dear
prophet!of making our way to swate
Philadelphy
again, God bless her! but I wish my master
and myself were once more snug under the wooden
roof of her long beef market, my jewel!
But, my son, observed Tonnaleuka, on
your present errand Paddy here will accompany
you, and you will assist him as your master
desires
,
in his trading designs. Will you start
tomorrow
,
and Paddy will have matters prepared
for your journey?
This moment, your honourif I may call a
prophet, your honourOch! now, any moment,
I'll obey my master's ordersbut where must I
go?
Paddy will give you every information, said
Tonnaleuka. Follow his directions, and expect
my blessing and your master's approbation.
By the jingo! cried Peter, two excellent
things these, for a poor fellow like me. Arrah,
now, master, be asyand just tip a little bit of a
prayer, and a blessing with it, for me every night.
Priest Balgruddery,oh, the Virgin bless him!
used to do so. It saved poor Peter a deal of
trouble
when he was in Ireland, your reverence; and
if you'll just do the same for me in this wild
country
,
Och! how I'll skip over it any where your
worship and my master please to send me.
I'll remember you in my orisons, replied the
prophet. But you must now for some time
follow
Paddy's directions. So saying, Tonnaleuka
departed.
Horses horns! exclaimed Peter, when the
prophet was gone; horses horns!he'll
remember
me in his horses horns! What the devil
is that, Paddy? If horses have horns in this
country
,
by the great Columb! but it's more than they
have in Ireland, my boy.
He said his orisons, which is Indian for
saying
mass, returned Paddy. It is only
asses
and stags that have horns in this country. But,
Peter, we must be off by sunrise to-morrow.
I have a parcel of peltry and furs you must
asassist
me to take to Gist's plantation. It is only
about a hundred miles up the river. Your
master
wishes you to remain there, where he
intends
you shall see him, probably in a couple of
months.
See him in a couple of months! exclaimed
Peter. Why, sure now, he may be in heaven
before that time, and Peter in purgatory, and I
may never see him at all
Very likely, replied his consoling
companion
;
or might it not just as readily happen that
you should both go to purgatory together?
By my faith, said Peter, and sure that's
just what I would like. But my master has never
a purgatory to go to. Why, didn't you know he's
a Protestant, my jewel?
And that will save him from the devil's flail,
you think? said Paddy. Don't they say they
thrash poor sinners in that purging hole of yours,
till their sins are beat out of them?
Och, Paddy! cried Peter, none of your
jeers nowfor it's only when we don't pay the
priest well enough to say mass for our souls,
heaven
bless them! that the devil thrashes them: but
it's for their good after all, as my mother used to
say.
Well, Peter, it may be so; we'll not dispute
about this matter, just because we know nothing
about it. Only you need not expect to meet your
master at either Gist's or purgatory, for two
months at least. So you must be content to wait
for him at whichever of the two places you first
find yourself. But take care, that in neither place
you mention any thing about our rescuing him
from the French. It will do Gist no good to hear
it, and as to the devil you may meet with in
purgatory
,
he must know already all about it, from the
clattering of the half dozen Frenchmen we sent
there.
Peter promised to attend to this salutary
caution
;
and every thing being that evening
prepared
for their journey, they set forward with the
dawn the next morning for Gist's habitation, where
Paddy left his companion to fall in love with one
of Gist's daughters, which he swore by St.
Patrick
he would, if he were obliged to remain there
only the half of the time prescribed to him.
I have been actually informed that Peter did, in
this instance, literally keep his oath, and
permitted
the charms of the fair Esther Gist entirely to
obliterate from his recollection those of Molly
M`Nickle. So much, dear reader, for the
constancy
of man!
Paddy returned to his father's, after little more
than a week's absence, with his mind entirely at
ease, as to the present security of both Charles
Adderly and his man Peter from the power of the
French. He had, indeed, in a short time
afterwards
,
reason to congratulate himself on Peter's
removal; for the French had begun to entertain
some suspicion as to the fate of Charles's escort,
and had employed a number of Indians to range
the whole country in search of information
concerning
them. Some of the remains of the French
soldiers were at length found, very much mangled
and torn by wild beasts, but still in a condition to
admit of their being identified. Suspicion was, by
Paddy's sly management, fixed upon some of the
Delaware Indians, who were supposed still to
harbour
a secret partiality for Charles Adderly and
the English interest. It was even believed, that
Charles was yet secreted among them. Their
chiefs were in consequence summoned to Fort Du
Quesne, in order to undergo an investigation, and
answer to charges founded on these surmises
before
the French commandant.
They attended cheerfully, and replied to all
questions with such promptitude, and freedom
from embarrassment, that St. Pierre, persuaded of
their innocence, was about to dismiss them, when
Swanlamis, their king, addressed him:
Father! you called us here to answer an
accusation
of treachery and murder. Father! we
abhor treachery, and we never slay those with
whom we are at amity. We first return the
wampum
of peace, we break the calumet, and we sing
the war-song in public, ere we abrogate treaties.
Have we done these things towards you? It is
injurious
,
therefore, to say that we killed your
people
at the time you were our brothers, and when
we professed friendship for you. Father! it was
wicked in you to suspect us. It shows you could
do such things yourselves, if your occasions
required
them.
Father! you must think better of us, and not
judge of our integrity by your own, if you wish to
preserve our friendship. The English were more
manly than you. They once charged us with
coolness, but never with treachery; for they knew
that before we should injure them we would warn
them, and return their wampum. Shingiss thought
himself bound to them, and he died fighting for
them.
Father! we will do so for you, if you act
generously
.
If not, we will remove afar off to the
English lands southward, and lift the hatchet
against you.
What we want you now to do, father, is, to
tell all the tribes that we are innocentthat we
scorn treachery, and that you are sorry for having
suspected us. We will then forgive your
rashness
,
and smoke with you as if this matter had not
happened. We can resent vengefully, but we can
also forgive readily. Father, choose ye!
St. Pierre, partly from motives of policy, and
partly from a sentiment of generosity towards men
whose feelings he thought it was but just to soothe
by some concession, replied
My brotherthat your people have been
wrongfully accused of this deed, I believe. But
the accusation did not originate with me. It has
been circulated by many mouths; and I thought
it was your due to afford you this opportunity, if
you were innocent, to justify yourselves to all
men. I am glad you have been able to do so, and
I hope that every one will be as satisfied as I am.
BrotherI will inform all our allies that you
are innocent; and, for the trouble I have given
you, I shall order you a present of rum and some
blankets.
The Indians, perfectly satisfied with this result,
left the garrison in great good humour with their
allies.
The search after Charles and Peter M`Fall,
whose escape from Le Buf was, soon after it
took place, known at Du Quesne, was carried on
for some time, in the neighbourhood of both forts,
to no purpose. It then slackened, and at length
was altogether abandoned as fruitless; and Maria
began to feel quite at ease in respect to her
lover's
security.
He had written to her often, and in every letter
pressingly solicited a visit from her. O my love!
he would say, let your presence but for once
bless the cell to which you have condemned me
it will then be endeared to me, and I shall feel
happy!
At length, as soon as she was assured that all
inquiry after him was relinquished by his enemies,
she yielded to his request, and accompanied the
prophet to his cavern. Charles was sitting beside
a tolerably comfortable fire, with his head
reclined
upon the table, meditating upon her when she
entered. The prophet had gone on, as was his
Vol. II. 4
usual custom during a time of snow, to continue
the tracks to the other side of the ridge, until they
joined a frequented Indian path about half a mile
distant. She, therefore, entered her lover's
apartment
alone, and her light footsteps along the
passage
had not aroused him from his meditations.
Mr. Adderly! said she. He looked up, and
scarcely believing his senses, started to his feet,
and approached her.
Ah, Maria! he exclaimed; blessed girl!
and I indeed so happy! Have you come at last, to
cheer your Charles amidst the solitude of his
dungeon
?
I have ventured said she, with the
permission
of Tonnaleuka, to indulge you at this
time, because I believe that the danger of my
visit
leading to your discovery, is now much
diminished
.
I thank God that you have so long
escaped
;
for your enemies were much inflamed at the
slaughter of their companions, and, for some time,
very ardent in their search after you. Oh, Charles!
it was well that you had such a place of refuge.
Were you now to fall into their hands, I fear that
in their rage, they would at once consign you to
destruction!
Be not alarmed for that, my love! said he.
I might, indeed, if now in their power, be more
strictly confined, and perhaps more harshly
treated
than before my escape; but they would have
no plea for endangering my life. European usages,
you are aware, my too timid girl, acknowledge
the right of every prisoner of war, except he be
on parole, to regain his liberty by any means he
can.
It may be so, she replied; but what power
is there here, in this Wilderness, to constrain their
compliance with these usages? Alas! may we not
fear that the example of the Indians would
reconcile
them to the destruction of an obnoxious
prisoner
;
and it is reported that they have lately
used horrible threats against you, on account of
the loss of their men.
They may have done so, said he; but,
Maria, here you know there is no danger, and if
you would only sometimes bless me, as you do
now, with your presence, I think I could become
content to pass my days even in this dungeon.
Oh! if we had but had the good fortune to have
united our fatesbut I will not now annoy you
with this subject. Onlyonly promise to visit
me often, and I shall here be happy!
Alas, Charles! she replied, if it were not
imprudent, I would feel but too much inclined to
visit you. But I must be cautious, and indulge
neither my wishes nor your own to the
endangering
of your safety.
And will you deny me? he cried; Oh,
surely
you cannot, merely on the cold calculation of
some trifling, some scarcely-to-be-imagined
danger
,
deny me the only enjoyment that can make
my abode herethat could make my existence
any where, tolerable. Oh Maria, deprive me of
your society, and you will bid me at once
despair
!
Be calm, Charles! said she, I have no
intention
to exclude myself entirely from you; but
my visits must not be frequent, and they must only
be when Tonnaleuka permitsfor it is he whose
wisdom has hitherto regulated all my conduct,
better than I myself could have done.
I will then weary the prophet with prayers,
said he, and he will not refuse to indulge me in
the only happiness my soul is now capable of
knowing.
Tonnaleuka, she observed, will only do in
this matter what your safety and my case of mind
will thoroughly warrant. I wish you to expect no
more from him, my Charles. Oh! would to
heaven
,
that you were safe again with your friends in
Philadelphia!
And banished from thee, my Maria! Ah, how
can you wish to drive me so far from you! Here,
even here, in this dungeon, enclosed in the bowels
of the earth, I feel happier, because I am near
thee, because I can often hear of thee, and
perhaps
sometimes see thee, than if I were in the
midst of my friends, surrounded with all the smiles
and the pleasures of social enjoyment, without thee.
Alas, Maria! will the day never come when I shall
introduce thee to those friends, to that social life,
which thou art so eminently formed to ornament
and enjoy? How would my friends rejoice in
thee! how would society admire thee, and how
would I exult, and adore thee! Oh Maria, if
thou wert once mine, all this beatitude would
soon be our lot!
Charles, said she, you are too visionary,
you are too sanguine of what the world might think
of me. You have been pleased to think well of
me yourself, and hence you think every person
else must do so. Restrain these flights of fancy,
these poetical dreams of yours, and look at what
is more likely to be the world's estimate. It may
gaze at me, but so would it gaze at any savage
from the wilderness, for strange sights I am told
will always draw its attention; and as to your
friends, they would be likely to say, `It was
indeed
an unlucky day for poor Charles, when he
first went among the savages, to get himself and us
entangled and burthened with this woman, who is
come amongst us without a pennya rude,
uncultivated
daughter of the desert. The loss of the
expedition he conducted, was not to him, and to
us, such a provoking misfortune as this!
Maria, Maria! said Charles, pressing her
fingers to his lips, Oh, have done with such a
picture! it will not beit cannot be so! oh, I
swear to you it will not! So beautiful, so
intelligent
,
so gentle, so sweet-tempered, so
goodhearted
,
so
Stop, sir! said she, with a smile, I will
help you out with it; you were going to sayso
angelical! so celestial! so immaculate!I
declare
,
Charles, I already know the whole cant,
and you may save yourself the trouble of
repeating
these elegant phrases. If you wish me often
to visit you, I desire you will speak common sense
to me; for I assure you that, although I have been
brought up in a country of savages, I am not
absolutely
a fool.
Alas, Maria! you are too severe with me.
Oh! believe me, I speak truth when I say, that my
words have never expressed to you half the
admiration
of my heart for your beauties and your
virtues
.
But, forgive me if I be too warm. My
heart is now open to you, and, by heavens! I
cannot
help it. My love! here he again pressed
her hand to his glowing lips, while, with a sigh,
he continuedOh! my love, little do you
indeed
know what this heart feels for you!
I am aware, said she, unconsciously
returning
his sigh, that you love me, Charles; and
hence I can well know what you feel, for, alas!
my own heart feels too fondlytoo stronglythe
softness, the tenderness, the fervency of true love.
But we must change the subject. I came here to
soothe your feelings, to allay your impatience
under
confinement, and to encourage you, all in my
power, to support it; and not to dissolve you into
weakness, or reduce you to foolishness. I would
have you to be resolute, to be manly, and rational;
and restrain these inordinate emotions, which only
4*
the feeble-minded and the effeminate will permit
to overcome them.
My monitress! lovely inspirer of all my
generous
sentiments, I will be swayed by thee. Thy
rules of conduct shall direct me, and thy
suggestions
of propriety shall give me law. I will arouse
myself to fortitude, since thou bidst me. I will
bear, and I will try to bear without repining, the
delay of calling thee mine, which fate has
prescribed
,
perhaps, as a punishment for my excessive
love. When thou seest me getting weak, Oh
Maria
!
only tell me, and I will be strong if I should
die under the effort.
Here the approach of Tonnaleuka was heard,
and Charles had just let go her hand, which ever
since her entrance he had held in his, when the
prophet appeared.
Hail to you, my children! said he, I am
glad that you can yet meet in safety. But, alas!
dangerous times are coming upon the Wilderness,
when the two most powerful nations on earth will
combat here, and make the most secret depths of
the desert ring to their very entrails with the fury of
their combats. But, my children, I will not shock
you, now when you are happy, with a description
of the evils that are approaching, for I trust that
you will both escape the desolation they will
entail
upon multitudes. Here, at least, in the worst
of times, I expect there will be found by the meek
and the humble, safe shelter from storms that will
level to the dust the mighty and the renowned!
My children, be of good cheer, for after the fury
of this storm is expended, one of the powerful
nations will yield, and to those who survive here,
an age of peace and happiness shall arrive,
bringing
days more prosperous and bright than ever
before shone upon the desert. Then shall come
to pass the saying of the Hebrew oracle, `The
Wilderness and the solitary place shall be glad
for them; and the desert shall rejoice and
blossom
as the rose.
Father, said Charles; that the recent
transactions
in this country will occasion a war to break
out between Great Britain and France, I doubt not.
Great troubles will consequently be here, for this
neighbourhood will naturally be one of the first
scenes of the fierce contentionand oh! that this
fair, but tender flower of the forest could be
removed
to a more secure soil before that stormy
period commences! Father, do you not think
that this could be accomplished? Could she not
accompany me?
My son, said the prophet, interrupting him
there are many obstacles in the way. If ever
it be accomplished, it must be done with a strict
regard to all the rules of propriety. At least, my
son, if I can influence the actions of this child of
my instruction, she never will yield for one
moment
to consult inclination or even to yield to
terror
in the commission of any act that may exhibit
the faintest shade of offence against feminine
propriety
;
and let me add, that I believe her
determination
to act properly and becomingly in all
cases, and in defiance of all inducements to the
contrary, is as firm and unalterable as I could
wish it.
Therefore, my son, although she loves you,
and although the horrors of war may here assail
her even to destruction, yet, except under
circumstances
wherein no duty can be broken, no
principle
either of religion, honour, or decorum
infringed
,
you may solicit her to fly with you from
the scene of evils, but I am persuaded you will
solicit in vain.
My son, until the Great Father shall entitle
you in the opinions of men to be her protector,
which you are aware, under present
circumstances
,
cannot take place, it will be well if you
refrain
from disturbing her with solicitations to
which she cannot yield, since there would be
impropriety
in her doing so.
Now, my children, it is time for you to
separate
.
Daughter, attend me: I wish to conduct
you home while it is yet day.
Maria arose, when her lover catching her by
the hand, exclaimed, Ah! are you going to leave
me? But it must be. O! let me beg, in the
presence of this our good father, that you will
soon indulge me with another precious visit!
It will be whenever our father pleases,
returned
Maria, looking at the prophet with an
expression
of countenance which very much
favoured
Charles's request.
It will then be, when both safety and
propriety
combine to permit, said Tonnaleuka. But,
my son, continued he, addressing Charles, be
comforted: her absence will not be unnecessarily
protracted.
Then, farewell, my beloved! cried Charles;
and may the Great Guardian of all purity
protect
you in every peril, and assist you through
every difficulty!
Farewell, Charles! said she; may he
likewise
be your protector!and they separated.
CHAPTER IV.
Beneath a moving shade of fruits and flowers,
Onward they march to Hymen's sacred bowers:
With lifted torch he lights the festive train
Sublime, and leads them in his golden chain;
Joins the fond pair, indulgent to their vows,
And hides, with mystic veil, their blushing brows.
Darwin
.
Shortly
after the foregoing visit of Maria to
her lover's cavern, the first marriage that ever
took place between the children of Britain in the
Wilderness, was celebrated. As the parties to this
nuptial treaty have already been in the reader's
presence, and have, I trust, made upon his mind,
if not a very deep, at least not an unfavourable
impression, I shall take the liberty, for which, with
all the humility possible in an author, I crave
indulgence
,
to expend a few pages in relating some
of the circumstances connected with a transaction
which had, upon these parties, the very important
effect of binding them together for life.
To keep the reader no longer in suspense as to
the happy couple, I shall broadly name them, viz.
Andrew Killbreath, M. D., late of the city of
Philadelphia
,
and Nancy Frazier, eldest daughter of
Mr. Gilbert Frazier, of Frazier's-Field, at the
forks of Turtle Creek and the Monongahela.
After this precise annunciation, there can be no
mistake as to the identity of the persons: I shall
therefore go on to show the marriage.
The bridegroom, that is, the Doctor, was, as in
this case became him, the grand spring in moving
the whole machine of the matter. He had long
solicited the hand of the fair Nancy, and she had
been nothing loth to let him have it. Besides this,
her father and mother, and every one else that had
any thing to say in the affair, had assented to her
becoming the Doctor's wife; and the latter had,
for many months, found only one obstacle in the
way of his getting possession of the desired
premises
,
which was, the want of some proper
person
to perfect the deeds. The arrival of the
Chaplain that accompanied Charles Adderly's last
expedition, seemed to remove this obstacle, and to
offer to the Doctor the prospect of immediate
happiness
.
But the Doctor found in this matter, as
many another clever fellow in this precious world
had done, that there is, as the old saying has it,
many a slip between the cup and the lip.
I had at the time more important business on
hand, otherwise I should have related the
Doctor's
joy on finding so desirable a personage as the
Chaplain along with the expedition, and the
measures
that he, in consequence, adopted to avail
himself of that lucky circumstance. There is,
however, no time lost, and I beg leave now to
atone for the omission.
Now, Nancy, said he, running to his fair one,
as soon as he learned that the Chaplain was
forthcoming
,
and taking her asideNow, my dear,
there need be no longer any delay of our
happiness
.
Mr. Adderly has brought a clergyman with
him, who can make us man and wife. If you will
consent to it, I shall talk to his reverence on the
subject, and engage him to perform the ceremony,
as soon as you shall think convenient. But, O!
my dear, let it be soon!
Have you spoke to my father about it yet?
asked Nancy.
No, my love; but I am sure he will have no
objection. You know he has long since said that
he had none to our marriage, provided we had a
clergyman convenient to perform it. Now we
have a clergyman, Nancy, and I expect your
father
will keep his word.
I expect so too, said she; and if he has no
objectionthenthenBut you and he for it,
Doctor!
Oh, my dear! give me a sweet kiss for that,
said the Doctor. I will immediately converse
with your father, and have the happy day
appointed
.
You may do as you think proper, was
Nancy's
reply. He took another fervent kiss,
pressed
her hand softly, and hastened away, with great
animation of manner, in search of Gilbert.
If Gilbert had at all any scruples on the subject,
it arose from this clergyman not being a
Presbyterian
.
It was unfortunate, he said, that he
should belong to the prelacy, wha had only
cleared
aff a sma' part o' the abominations o' the whore
o' Babylon, as the worthy gospel minister o'
Maughrygowan, Alexander Carmichael, used to
say. These scruples, however, soon gave way
before the weight of the Doctor's rhetoric, and
Gilbert consented,, that on that day month the
learned Doctor should become his son-in-law.
The Doctor thought, perhaps justly enough,
that there was no good reason for waiting to such
a distant period; but Gilbert stated, that one
month was the exact length of time which had, on
appointing the day, been fixed for himself to wait
for the attainment of Nelly's hand; and insisted
that the Doctor was capable of exerting as much
patience as he then was, and that he should now
submit
to do so. The Doctor, not being able to do
better, acquiesced, sagaciously observing, that the
longest month would have an end.
But, alas! if either the Doctor or Gilbert had
possessed the spirit of prophesy, they would not
have agreed to such a distant period; and
Tonnaleuka
,
who might perhaps have set them right in
the matter, was not consulted.
The capture of Charles Adderly's follower
happened
in the interval; and before the
heavilymoving
month had gone past, the ill-starred
clergyman
had been obliged to take up his quarters in
Fort Le Buf.
The Doctor and Nancy were much afflicted at
this untoward accident, this dashing of the cup of
bliss out of their hands, when it had almost
approached
their lips. But the Doctor was a man of
sense; and, therefore, instead of sitting down, and
uselessly lamenting his misfortune, he set his mind
to work to discover how he should best repair it.
But first, having a good deal of mettle in his
composition
,
he resolved to convince his mistress of it,
by inflicting a blow of some kind upon the French,
in revenge for the injury they had done him. He
accordingly joined, heart and hand, in the scheme
which Paddy had projected for the destruction of
Charles's escort. Soon after this exploit, however,
he began to think, that from the French themselves
he might obtain a remedy for his misfortune. Their
Chaplain, he conceived, must be as capable of
making husbands and wives as any other Chaplain;
and, although he should use the form prescribed
by the Romish church, yet that form would still
be a christian one, and would, if it erred at all, err
only on the safe side, by using too much ceremony
instead of too little. To get bound to his Nancy,
was the great object for which he longed; and, if
he could only get this Catholic priest to do it, if it
should be a little overdone, he could readily
excuse
him.
Monsieur d'Abbeville had been too long a
military
priest, and was too deeply versed in
Montaigne's
Essays, to feel any great scruple of
conscience
in performing a piece of service, of the
kind the doctor wanted, to two young lovers in a
Wilderness
, although they should be heretics.
He therefore consented without hesitation to
spend a merry night at Frazier's, and make the
doctor happy.
There was another obstacle, however, which
the doctor found more difficulty in removing.
This was the conscientious scruples of both
Gilbert
and Nelly, in assenting to the marriage of
their daughter by one of the priests of Antichrist.
The doctor had anticipated this; and, therefore,
besides exerting all the artillery of his own
eloquence
,
he took care to secure the powerful aid
of Paddy's, who, in a few conversations, drew over
his mother to the side of the lovers.
Gilbert stoutly maintained his integrity for some
days, but at length yielded rather to the
importunities
and entreaties of his whole family, than to
his own conviction on the matter, observing
Weel, my bairns, gin ye will marry, e'en in
the name o' Gracious, do sae, an' dinna teaze
me mair aboot it. It is better to marry than to
burn, Saint Paul says; an', feggs, gin ye didna
marry noo wi' my wull, ye micht do waur in spite
o' me. I dinna like them limbs o' the pope. But
they ca' themsel's Christians, though the fule fa'
me! gin they ken aucht aboot it; yet syne ye
maun gang thegither, its better to be married in
their gate than no be married ava. It was an auld
saying in Maughrygowan, `O' twa puddles, aye
choose the cleanest.'
Vol. II. 5
In consequence of this reasoning on the part of
Gilbert, every obstacle was removed, and the 17th
of MarchPatrick's day, dear reader! a day to
which Gilbert's heart was always partialwas
fixed for the wedding.
The preparations for celebrating a day so
important
in the annals of Gilbert's family, occupied
the attention of his whole household for nearly a
week. Gilbert, having once given his assent to
have the thing done, resolved to put forth his
might to have it done genteelly, and therefore
spared no pains on the occasion. Paddy also
greatly exerted himself; and as he was at this
time on a more than usually intimate footing with
the officers of the garrison, for, ever since the
affair
of Bear's-creek, he had been extremely
assiduous
in cultivating their good will, he procured
from their stores a supply of luxuries which could
not then have been elsewhere procured in the
Wilderness. He had, also, with the view of
ingratiating
himself still more firmly into their good
graces, invited several of them, and two or three
of their ladies, to the ceremony; having resolved
in his own mind that the festivities of the day should
conclude with a ball.
As to the part which was assigned to Maria in
these preparations, they were both zealously
undertaken
and efficiently performed. The
regulation
of the bride's dress, the decoration of the
room, the arrangement of the table economy,
and such like, were what principally came under
her management. As to Mrs. Frazier, every
good house-wife, who has had to prepare a
marriage
feast, knows that she had a thousand things
to do, and it has been satisfactorily ascertained,
that she neglected none of them.
In short, the great day at length came, and just
about the hour of noon, the holy man,
accompanied
by five officers and three ladies, came
gaily to the door.
Nancy was enclosed in a small room with Maria,
who was decorating her for the occasion, when
she perceived this merry party advancing past the
window.
Oh, Maria dear! she exclaimed, there
they are! what shall I do? I never shall be able
to face those impudent looking officers, and funny
looking ladies. Oh, I feel already ashamed!
Fear nothing, said Maria; it is a trying
occasion
,
I acknowledge; but I am convinced you
will go through it creditably. Why, Nancy, you
really look so well that you need not be ashamed
to show yourself in any place, or before any
company
.
But they will be all looking at me, returned
Nancy; Oh! how will I stand it! If none but
our own family were to be present, I could do well
enough, I believebut such a number of
strangers
!I
wish Paddy had been far enough when
he asked them.
You must have courage, Nancy, observed
her sister; the two or three first minutes will
carry you over the whole difficulty. The first
look at you will give these people a favourable
impression; and they will not, for civility's sake,
you may depend on it, after that, attempt to stare
at you, at least with any rudeness or intention to
hurt your feelings.
I wish the affair was over altogether!
returned
the bride.
I myself wish it, I assure you, said Maria,
both for your sake, and my own, for I
anticipate
that it will be too jovial a scene for my taste.
But, Nancy, we must have courage, and perform
our parts as well as we can. Your part, I am
aware, will be by far the most difficult; but I am
persuaded you will acquit yourself properly. Keep
up a good spirit; you will get through it more
easily than you expect.
I shall get through it, replied Nancy, I
know I shall, but then I doubt it will be with a
great deal of blundering; for I really know
nothing
about such a matter.
Nor is it necessary, I presume, said Maria.
I should suppose, that it is the priest's duty to
inform you. Every young woman who is going
to be married is not supposed to be acquainted
with the forms of the ceremony. The contrivers
of these forms must, therefore, have provided for
this circumstance.
There is no help for it now, said Nancy; I
must just do my best, but I could almost wish that
I had not to undergo the trial.
Why, are you not getting a good man and a
fond lover for your husband? observed Maria,
and will not that atone for any little temporary
inconvenience of this nature. But, believe me,
you will not feel half the confusion you expect.
At this moment her mother entered to inquire
if Nancy was ready to be introduced to the
company
.
A few minutes more made her so, and
blushing like the dawning of morn, this fair
wood-nymph was attended by her still fairer sister
into the presence of the gay French ladies and
gentlemen, who were burning with curiosity to see
them. Expecting only to behold raw, clownish,
and coarse girls, little superior either in
appearance
or cultivation to the squaws that performed
their menial services, how great was their
astonishment
,
when these connoisseurs saw entering
their presence, in simple, neat, and elegant attire,
two beautiful females, so attractive, and yet so
modest, that they might have passed for Diana
and one of her nymphs come from the classic
plains of Greece to hunt in this unknown
Wilderness
.
Immediately a thousand bows were made, and
a thousand compliments paid by the officers, with
all the rapidity and volubility of true Gallican
politeness
.
The French ladies also received our
two buds of the forest with politeness and good
humour, although they could not but be conscious
that they were surpassed by them in all those
charms and graces of person on which they, in
reality, had some reason to value themselves.
Nancy understood a little French, but Maria
spoke it almost as freely as English. She,
therefore
,
took the burthen of conversing with these
ladies upon herself.
Why, Miss Frazier, observed Madame de
Vamploise, this is really a novel and charming
scene to which we have been invited. I should
not have missed the delight of being here to-day
for the world.
The business of this day is, indeed, said
Maria
,
altogether a novelty here. I believe that
nothing of the kind has before taken place in these
woods. The singularity of the situation, and other
circumstances, for a wedding-party, it is natural
should make some impression on your mind; and,
as you have no doubt the good nature to view
some things with indulgence which you cannot
altogether
approve, so you may, perhaps, on
account
of not having expected much to give
satisfaction
,
be inclined to yield to what is really
tolerable, more credit than it deserves.
I see nothing, returned the French lady,
but what the most fastidious would acknowledge
to be delightful; and the occasion is so
interesting
a
beautiful young woman going to be married
to a fine looking young manreally, Miss
Frazier
,
the whole is charming! What say you,
Madame
5 *
Joncaire, is it not charming? But the bride
herselfI must have her opinion.
Nancy sat silent, pretending not to have noticed
this intimation to join in the discourse, while
Madame
Joncaire observed
It is, indeed, admirable! and in the wild woods
too!who would have dreamed of such a thing!
and such a place, and such people!Why,
Madame
de Vamploise, I am really charmed! But
I wish to hear the bride's opinion of the matter.
My dear, said she, addressing Nancy, will you
favour us
Nancy, finding that she was compelled to speak,
replied, with as much good humour as she could,
to her garrulous companionsI have not had
sufficient means of judging how these things should
be, to know whether we are here likely to
conduct
them right or wrong. But we shall do the
best we can to make you and the rest of our
company
comfortable.
La! now, returned Madame De Vamploise,
this is not what we want to know. We want to
know, my dear, how you like your present
situation
We
are so charmed with it, that we hope
you too feel happy. Why, I remember when I
was myself going to be marriedIt was at
Bourdeaux
,
a very gay place, I assure youhow I felt!
for the whole world was presentand Monsieur
de Vamploise was so gay and agreeable, not like
the dry, prim, Dutchman-looking piece of gravity
that he now is
Heh! what say you now, my chucky? cried
De Vamploise, who had heard these flattering
observations
of his helpmate, as she intended he
should. Why, to be sure I was always pleasant
but, as to your Dutch comparison, my dear
Why shouldn't a Dutchman be as pleasant as
another
man? Answer me that, my spouse!
Here the priest interposed. No catechising,
I beg of you, said he. It is my province to be
inquisitor; and I will inquire of our fair bride
here, whether you, Madame de Vamploise, have
given her fair play in your discourse, for I know
it is seldom that you give it to any body.
How so! Monsieur d'Abbeville?
demanded
the lady.
Because you unmercifully exert all your
powers
against us, returned the priest, when one
half of them would be as much as we could have
any reasonable chance of resisting. But, apropos,
I think we had better have this ceremony
performed
before dinner, and then we shall be at ease,
and have nothing to do afterwards but enjoy
ourselves
.
Nobly said, your reverence! exclaimed
Monsieur
de Vamploise; I second your motion.
What says the bridegroom?
I have no objection, replied the doctor.
We are in this matter under the priest's control.
Let him regulate it as he chooses.
Well, then, returned the priest, we shall
prepare.At that instant the sounds of horses'
feet were heard at the door, and the ceremony
was delayed. Paddy Frazier in a few minutes
introduced two travellers to the company, by the
names of Mr. Washington and Mr. Vanbraam.
Joncaire and De Vamploise had seen
Washington
before, and immediately recognised him.
What! I am really glad to see you, Mr.
Washington
,
exclaimed Joncaire, as he shook him by
the hand; you remember Venango yet, I hope?
Very well, replied Washington; and I
remember
you too. You have kept your words good
with respect to Shanapins, I hear; but no
matter
,
it is the fate of war, and the sword devoureth
one man as well as another.
You remark excellently, Mr. Washington.
But I hope you are not come among us this time
with any proposals to drive us from this pleasant
country. By Gd, all the treaties that can ever
be penned in Virginia, will not induce me to leave
it!
You may rest at ease on that subject at
present
,
observed Washington. I come here on
no official business; I am merely a private visiter.
Then let us drive public concerns to the
devil
,
for this day at least, Mr. Washington. We are
come to a wedding, and have nothing to do here
to-day but to be merry. I hope you will have no
objection to join us?
Washington had been hastily informed by Paddy,
previous to his entering the room, of what was
going on. I will have no objection in the world,
he observed in reply to Joncaire. He then hastily
proceeded to pay his respects to each individual in
the room. When he came to Maria, he for a
moment
changed colour, and trembled so, that, had
he not possessed an unparalleled command over
himself, which enabled him suddenly to check his
agitation, it would not have failed to betray itself.
As it was, however, Maria alone observed it. She
slightly blushed at the circumstance, which his
keen eye perceived, and from thence imbibed a
hope, a delusive hope, of the nature of her
feelings
towards him.
He hastened to seat himself beside the
bridegroom
,
with whom, in order to divert the current
of his ideas, so that he might the more easily join
in the good humour of the company, he entered
into a lively and interesting conversation on the
topic of this being the first christian wedding ever
given in so remote a part of the country.
The priest having now put on his sanctified
vestments, and all other matters that he deemed
essential to the ceremony being adjusted, he
ordered
the doctor and his betrothed to kneel
together
before him. The whole company also
kneeled
;
when, having gone through what Gilbert
considered
the profane and idolatrous ceremony of the
mass, he proceeded to the more interesting and
essential one of receiving the mutual vows of the
bridal pair, and then, with as much haste as the
forms of his church permitted, he pronounced them
to be husband and wife, and desired the doctor to
imprint the seal of the sacred union upon his wife's
lips. The doctor eagerly obeyed; the priest
imitated
him, and every man in the company
followed
such a laudable and agreeable example.
CHAPTER V.
So peaceful rests without a stone, a name.
What once had beauty, titles, wealth, and fame,
How lov'd, how honour'd once, avails thee not,
To whom related, or by whom begot;
A heap of dust alone remains of thee,
'Tis all thou art, and all the proud shall be.
Pope
.
This
important matter being so happily
accomplished
,
the whole company felt disposed for the
enjoyment of hilarity and mirth. The sly
inuendo
,
the smart repartee, and the loud laugh, now
exercised the wits and amused the fancies of all
present, until, by the exertions of Mrs. Frazier
and Maria, assisted also by Archy, a plentiful and
luxurious dinner smoked upon the table.
The French showed themselves as good at
eating
as they had been at jesting, and, for about
twenty or thirty minutes, appeared to have as keen
a relish for Mrs. Frazier's dainties as for their
own jokes. To this full and comfortable repast
succeeded a liberal supply of excellent wine,
(whether Champaigne or Burgundy, I have not
been informed,) procured by Paddy from the
garrison
,
to the soul-cheering qualities of which, the
increased gaiety and jollity of the company,
particularly
of the French part of it, soon bore
testimony
.
An inclination for dancing soon became the
consequence
of this overflowing of the spirits; and,
as Paddy possessed a violin, and both Vanbraam
and he were tolerable performers, the strings were
soon screwed to their proper pitch, and away went
the merry Frenchmen to the regions of airiness
and joy.
After becoming somewhat relieved and
composed
by this first irregular and rather violent
explosion
of their bounding spirits, they proposed a
more civilized and rational set of dances, in which
the ladies should bear a part. A regular cotillion
was soon got up, for which Mr. Washington had
the good fortune to secure Maria as his partner.
But I will not detain the reader with a formal
description of the amusements of this evening;
during which, the noble appearance and
accomplished
manners of Washington rendered him a
great favourite with the French ladies, while the
uncommon beauty, and the thousand graces that
sparkled round Maria, excited the unbounded
admiration
of the officers. Washington was happy
for Maria, studious to give him no cause of
uneasiness
,
paid him every attention, and spared no
pains to render his situation agreeable; and he
could not but fondly cherish the idea, that if such
partiality did not proceed from love, it might be
brought to end in it.
Indeed, so pointed was the attention which
these two young people paid to each other this
evening, that the French, both men and women,
observed it, and became satisfied that
Washington's
present visit was altogether a visit of love.
The officers, therefore, although they were aware
of his political standing and influence as their
enemy, felt no inclination, at the present time, to
inquire farther into his business in their
neighbourhood
.
They envied, indeed, his good fortune in
making an impression, as they supposed he had
done, on the heart of so lovely a being as Maria,
but this was an envy attended rather with a
feeling
of felicitation than of animosity towards him;
for they were persuaded that he was worthy of
her, and at that moment felt, perhaps
unconsciously
,
a sincere wish for the welfare of both these
interesting objects of their admiration, and would
have had no objection to have spent another
merry
day at Frazier's, in order to witness their union.
Joncaire, who was the only one of the French
present who could speak English, during the
evening
took occasion to banter Washington on the
subject.
I think, Mr. Washington, said he, that it is
in your power to afford us another agreeable day
like this, by giving Monsieur d'Abbeville another
job Suppose you detain us for to-morrow. By
my faith, we will take it as a great kindness.
There is nothing more remote from my power
at present, I assure you, sir, replied Washington.
I cannot see how you could have fallen upon
such a conjecture.
No conjecture, returned Joncaire, could
be more natural. Who could look at that young
lady without admiration? By heavens! if I were
a young fellow like you, I could notnay, pardon
meas it is, I cannotand my wife says that she
feels the same sentiment towards you. Upon
honour
,
Mr. Washington, if I did not see that you
are otherwise engaged. I should become jealous of
you. See that leering dame of a wife of mine,
she cannot keep her eyes off you.
It is yourself, sir, I perceive, that she is
looking
at, observed Washington, following the
direction
of the lady's eyes. But will you not hurt
her feelings by the levity of these observations?
No, no, returned the other, she's too
cunning
a puss for that. Besides, you may be easy,
sir, and speak freely; for curse the word of what
we say will she understand.
An idea of retorting upon Joncaire, at least of
diverting the conversation from its original topic,
now occurred to Washington. If she is so
partial
to me, said he, as you mention, you may
really bless your stars that you secured her before
I saw her, for positively, if she were not the
property
of another, I should try to make her my own.
Ha! ha! exclaimed the light-hearted
Frenchman
,
there for you now! I knew she had hit
you with her sharp glances, Mr. Washington,
although
you alleged that she had cast them at me.
By heavens! sir, you perceive that her eyes are
like the quills of a porcupine.
That is a strange comparison, returned
Washington. I rather think they are like the
stars in the firmament.
Ha! sir, you are too sublime for me. Here
they were interrupted by De Vamploise, who
wished them to engage in another dance.
The sports and enjoyments of the night were
kept up until the moon arose, which was about
one o'clock in the morning, when the French
departed
as gaily as they had come, and a couple of
hours found them snugly deposited in their
comfortable
couches at Fort Du Quesne. But before
the half of that period had elapsed, all Gilbert
Frazier's inmates, without excepting the bride
and bridegroom, were as comfortably disposed of.
Washington was up with the dawn, for his heart
was far from being at such ease as either to invite
repose or make it refreshing when it came.
`Alas!' thought he, as he walked out on the
margin of Turtle-creek, `if this most lovely of
created beings refuses my love, how wretched I
shall be! My heart destitute and forlorn, shall
bleed at the desolation of its hopes; but it shall
be still more miserable at the thought of the
troubles
and dangers with which, if she will not leave
Vol. II. 6
this Wilderness, she will soon be surrounded.
War! shocking and barbarous war with savages,
will ere long penetrate to these wilds; and Maria,
oh, Maria! how I delight to name thee!Oh, how
wilt thou escape its fury! But I will urge, I will
entreat, I will implore thee to fly with me while
there is yet time, while thou art yet safe, and
before
the coming tempest bursts around thee. Oh,
with what eagerness I should march in the ranks
of those brave men who shall be sent here to drive
the enemies of my country from their usurped
fastnesses
,
if I were sure that she who is dearer to me
than life, would not suffer in the conflict. But I
will prevail on herO heaven! grant that she
may consent to become my own, that I may lodge
her in a place of safety.'
In such contemplations this ardent and
illustrious
lover spent upwards of an hour. He returned
to the house, resolved to watch the first
opportunity
that should offer, to make known to the dear
mistress of his affections his whole mindhis fears
his wisheshis warmth of admiration, and his
sincerity of love.
Maria had arisen. He met her smiling sweetly
in all the blooming charms of maiden
youthfulness
.
She was busied preparing breakfast, and
as she went through the various movements of
household economy required by the occasion, he
perceived in every turn and every gesture, a
gracefulness
and ease, which showed that she could
render any task becoming and interesting, and
that she was peculiarly fitted to preside with
dignity, propriety, and grace over all kinds of
domestic
concerns.
Oh, that she were once the mistress of my
household! thought her adoring lover; how
doubly sweet and delightful would then the shades
of Mount Vernon be to me! It may be so; I may
yet be so happy; and the time may not be far
distant. To-day, to-day, I am resolved I shall
ascertain
the state of her feelings. Oh, God of
heaven! grant that they may be favourable.
But an unforeseen circumstance prevented him
for that day from becoming, as he had resolved,
certain on this point. The breakfast had been
delayed nearly an hour on account of the bridal
pair, who were rather tardy in making their
appearance
.
At length they were forthcoming, and
Mrs. Killbreath, covered with blushes, received
the salutations of Washington and the rest of the
family; and cheerfulness and gaiety prevailed
throughout the conversation, with which they
seasoned
the most comfortable, because generally
the most simple and domestic of all meals, the
breakfast.
This meal, however, was scarcely over, when
the cheerfulness and satisfaction of the party,
especially
of Maria, became overcast, by a message
from queen Alliquippa, with intelligence that she
had become suddenly very ill, and was not expected
to live many hours; and that, conscious herself of
her approaching end, she had requested to see
Maria before she died.
Maria immediately set out in obedience to this
summons. When she arrived at the wigwam, she
found the queen just recovering from a strong
convulsive
fit which had left her much exhausted.
She was, however, sensible of the presence of her
favourite, and pressed her hand in token of the
satisfaction she enjoyed from her visit. Maria
wept over her, for she felt that she was about to
lose for ever one of her dearest and most valued
friends.
Her grief seemed grateful to the queen's mind.
The violent tremors and emotions that agitated
her nearly exhausted frame somewhat subsided;
and the power of articulation, which appeared to
have been gone for ever, returned for a space,
and enabled her to say
Maria, my daughter, thou art kind. It pleases
me to see that thou lovest me. But do not grieve
too much. Some day thou wilt follow thy
mother
.
Here the sounds, although continued,
could not be distinguished, and the weeping Maria
replied:
My mother! my ever affectionate and kind
mother! thou art going to leave me. I will
indeed regretbitterly and long will I regret, thy
departure, for thou wert ever good and kind to
thy daughter. Oh! canst thou not bless me
before
thou goest?
In a faint murmur the queen prayedOh,
Maneto, bless my child! Immediately the
muscles of her body became slightly agitated
with a short-continuing convulsion, during which
the soul fled its frail tenement; and on its
subsiding
,
Alliquippa was found to have returned to
her original dust.
Maria kissed the cold inanimate lips of her
deceased
friend, and withdrew in great agitation.
The Indians, especially their females, loudly
lamented
this public calamity that had befallen their
tribe. Alliquippa had, indeed, been always much
beloved by them, for the indulgent, kind, and
parental
manner in which she had at all times
exercised
her authority. For some months past she
had intermeddled very little with public affairs.
The French influence in the country, since their
establishment at Du Quesne, she was unable to
resist, and she could not without breaking her faith
with the English, join in promoting it. Besides,
since the death of king Shingiss, to whom she had
in reality been much attached, she more than ever
hated them as being the cause of his destruction.
Her tone of mind, and strength of body had ever
since that fatal event been gradually and
perceptibly
declining; and, although her last mortal
attack
of sickness was sudden, yet that depression
of the spirits, that wasting of the frame, which,
ever since the battle of Shanapins, had been
visible
to every observer, could not fail to impart the
opinion that she was hastening to the world of
spirits
,
the happy land where the brave and the
upright
,
the faithful and the affectionate, shall meet
to enjoy each other's society for ever, undisturbed
by the warwhoop, or the song of slaughter and
revenge
;
where men shall no longer pant for each
other's ruin, where no blood shall be shed, except
that of the deer and the buffalo, and warriors shall
be proud of no exploits but the destruction of the
wild beasts of the forest.
When the account of Alliquippa's death reached
Frazier's, Washington and Paddy set out for the
purpose of bringing Maria home. As the latter
choosed to remain some time at the wigwam, for
the purpose of showing the Indians his respect for
their deceased queen, he left the task of
conducting
his sister home altogether to Washington.
Had her mind been in its usual state, her lover
could not have wished for a more favourable
opportunity
of making known to her his wishes; but
his soul was of too delicate a nature to obtrude
upon her, in her affliction, that disclosure of his
feelings and desires which he longed to make.
During their walk, therefore, the conversation
chiefly turned upon the history and character of
the deceased.
You will not be surprised, Mr. Washington,
said Maria, that I feel so much for the loss of
this Indian princess, who has been to me ever
since my infancy, the most constant of friends, a
companion in pastime, a sister in tenderness, and
6*
a mother in affection. By this stroke of fate, I
really feel bereaved of a long cherished source of
happiness.
It is, indeed, replied Washington, a great
trial for a sensible and grateful mind to witness
the death of a beloved object, and one too from
whose affection it has been accustomed to derive
happiness; and these trials must still be most
severely
felt in the days of youth, when the
frequency
of their occurrence has not in any manner
strengthened the heart against their impression.
But, Maria, you know the duty of resignation to
the will of heaven. I need not teach it to you; it
is enough to remind you of it; and what is duty,
you are aware, should, at all times, obtain the
preeminence
over feeling.
You are right, Mr. Washington, she replied.
I know it is my duty not to repine at such a
dispensation
.
I therefore do not repine. But it
would be unnatural, nay, I believe it would be a
breach of duty, not to feel for the irreparable loss
of such a friend.
To feel is, indeed, natural, said
Washington
;
nay, not to feel would argue an insensibility
of heart, unamiable, offensive, and culpable. But
you, Mariaah! you do not possess this; but
butforgive meI would say, that you should not
call this loss irreparable. Providence can repair
it tenfold for you. Ah, Miss Frazier! you can
never want friends. Every one who sees, who
hears youbut I will not now talk so. I wish
to say, that I do not blame your manifestation
of feeling on this occasion. Nay, it pleases me
to behold it. I esteem you the more for it. Oh,
Maria, Maria! I would have you to consider me
as one who has never seen any thing connected
with you but what he must esteem, and
Mr. Washington, said she, interrupting him,
I will be candid, and confess that I believe you
esteem me, even more than I deserve. But you
are not acquainted with all my weakness of heart,
my frailty of disposition, and, shall I add, the
errors
into which I am conscious of having fallen
Accuse not thyself unjustly, said a voice
behind
them. They turned round, and beheld
Tonnaleuka
.
Child, accuse not thyself unjustly,
continued the prophet; I know every action of
thy life; I know each affection of thy heart; nay, I
know almost the very thoughts of thy soul; and I
know thou art as innocent and pure as the nature
of thy species will permit; and, hear me, maiden,
if there be on earth a being of human origin who
can match thee in purity and excellence, it is the
youth who now stands by thy side.
Prophet! said Washington, I pretend not
to
Hear me, my son! interrupted the prophet,
for I am sent for, and must, in haste, go to
conduct
the obsequies of the queen whom this maiden
deservedly loved as a mother. I know something
of mankind, even in the state you call civilization;
and I know something of you, and can compare
you with your brethren, and if I should ascribe to
you more qualifications than purity; if I should
ascribe to you prudence, courage, humanity,
greatness
of soul, and true love for your fellow-men,
and all these in as high a degree as ever man
possessed
,
I would not ascribe them wrongfully; and
if heaven spares thee to thy country, the opinions
of mankind will confirm my words.
My son, hear further. I would caution thee
to protect thy heart. I know it to be in danger of
suffering the pangs of disappointment. Beauty
and worth may inflict a wound which they cannot
cure. Adieu, my children! So saying,
Tonnaleuka
hastily proceeded towards the wigwam,
leaving Washington and Maria greatly struck with
the plainness and oracular abruptness of his
language
and manner.
Alas! ejaculated Washington, almost
unconscious
that Maria heard him, he knows too well
the state of my heart! but what can be the danger
to which he alludes? Disappointment! alas, it
may be so; I may not be capable of inspiring her
withbut, Miss Frazier! said he, suddenly
recollecting
him, I am raving, forgive memy
concerns
I will not obtrude upon you this evening, as
you may be desirous of devoting it to sorrow for
your lost friend. Let me only entreat that you
will not indulge the softness of grief to the injury
of your health; and that in reflecting upon one
lost friend, you will remember that there are many
yet left you.
I thank you, Mr. Washington, said she, for
the consoling idea; and shall be careful to bear
the goodness of God to me in this respect
constantly
in mind, so that, instead of murmuring at
my lot, I trust I will be enabled to feel grateful.
Amidst such discourse, the road to Frazier's
house was soon passed over, and Maria retired for
the rest of the evening to her apartment. Here,
after long meditating upon the friendship and the
worth of Alliquippa, her thoughts fondly turned
upon Charles Adderly, the warmth, the fervour,
the faithfulness, the devotedness of his passion for
her, the consciousness of which had now become
the great solace of her existence, and the return of
which had entwined, or rather identified itself with
all her feelings.
Oh, Charles! she exclaimed, in the fervour
of her meditations upon him, while thou livest I
know I shall never be destitute of a friend. Oh,
heaven! protect this object of my first and only
lovefor if he were snatched from me, then
then should I indeed be miserable!
Her reflections next reverted to Washington.
I cannot but perceive, thought she, that this
excellent young man loves me. If, indeed, it were
God's will, I should wish that it were otherwise;
for, although I may esteem, I may admire, his
numerous
and engaging accomplishments and eminent
virtues, yet I cannot return him love for love. My
heart cannot be his: it is too sincerely and
exclusively
given up to another. Oh Washington,
Washington
!
for thy own sake, excellent, admirable
young man! how fervently do I wish that thou
wouldst fix thy affections upon one who could
return
themfor thou art worthy of being beloved
alas, I know itand yet I cannot love thee.
She would then reflect upon the transitory
nature
of all human enjoyments, cares, and feelings.
How happy did I long feel, she would say,
in the possession of the parental affections of
that kind and amiable being who is now no more.
Never more will she smile upon me, and press me
to her bosom; never more shall I listen to the
words of instruction, to the lessons of virtue, that
flowed from her lips! Alas; those lips, and the
warm heart that beat in that bosom, are now cold
and insensible, and will soon mingle with their
kindred earth. Never more will they feel the
glow of affection, or utter the words of kindness.
Never more will they contrive benefits for me, or
speak comfort to my soul. But why do I say
never
?
Is there not another, and a happier world,
wherein faithful friends, who are thus separated,
are destined again to meet, and enjoy each other's
society for ever? Yes, thanks to the great Deity,
there is such a world! My departed friend
believed
itTonnaleuka believes itmy parents have
taught me to believe itthe sacred oracles of our
faith confirm itthe heavens, and the earth, and
the whole face of nature show itand all our
harassed
feelings, our disappointments, and
misfortunes
;
our bereavements, our pains, and our
sorrows
of this world, all find consolation and solace
in the idea. Glory to God for it! I will cherish,
I will dwell upon the sweet reflection, and
anticipate
,
even here, the delights of a future existence!
In this manner did Maria spend this evening;
while Washington endeavoured to divert the
anxiety
which the obvious import of Tonnaleuka's
oracular expressions occasioned in his mind, by
trying to explain it away, or at least to attach to it
such a degree of uncertainty as might still keep
open the door for hope.
The prophet says, that I am in danger of
suffering
the pangs of disappointment, thought he. But
he may not mean the kind of disappointment which
I most dread;he may not mean the
disappointment
of that devoted love I bear for this young
woman. Or, if he does mean it, how can he know
the revolutions of the female heart? He may be
aware, or may imagine, and perhaps, alas! too
truly, that she does not at present love me. But
surely, if this be even so, I may still hope for some
good to arise from my assiduities, from the
fervency
and fidelity of my passion, of which it must now
be my study to convince her. She has a good
heart, and will not bear to see me drag out a life
of continued misery, when it is in her power to
relieve
me. I will trust in Providence, and hope
that He who moveth all hearts, will turn hers
towards
me.
The next day, Washington attended to witness
the funeral of Alliquippa. She was dressed in the
full costume to which she was accustomed in the
days of her greatest glory. All the great men and
warriors, together with a numerous company of the
females of her tribe, were present; and her
successor
,
who was named Susquelooma, a near
relative
of Swanalow her husband, and who had for
some time past been entrusted with the
management
of the public affairs, attended as chief
mourner.
The bier on which she was carried to the grave,
consisted of two long poles, joined together by
a rude structure of wicker-work, covered with
leaves. Tonnaleuka, as the prophet of the tribe,
walked before the procession, with his sacred
wand extended forward. The corpse followed,
and close to if the chief mourner; then came the
sages and elders of the tribe, and then the older
and more celebrated warriors; after them, the
younger and less celebrated, all in pairs. The
females
of the tribe then succeeded, also in pairs,
taking precedence according to their age, or
rather
according to the order of Tonnaleuka, who
had arranged the whole proceeding. Washington,
and those of Gilbert Frazier's family who
attended
,
closed the procession.
They had about half a mile to go to the burial
ground, which was a little way up the side of a hill
fronting the southeast, not far from Turtle Creek.
Here they had dug a grave in such a form, that
when the body was laid in it, the feet were
considerably
lower down than the head; and as it was
turned somewhat upon its right side, with the face
to the rising sun, it appeared to lie in a gently
reclining
,
rather than a horizontal posture.
When the procession reached this last abode of
mortality, and placed the bier with the corpse
upon it alongside of the grave, Tonnaleuka,
waving
his wand in the air, addressed the assembly.
Brothers and sisters, before you commence
your funeral dance, before you convey your
beloved
queen into her last dwelling, and sing over her
the song of your sadness, listen to my words.
You appear all to be healthy just now, and
full of life, and many of you, no doubt, promise
yourselves the enjoyment of a long existencefor
there are many of you yet young. But listen to
me. What avails health, or youth, or the full tide
of flowing blood, when Maneto says you must die?
Then disease or accident, or perhaps the hatchet
of war, does its duty; and then we return, as the
queen our sister has done, our bodies to the earth
of which they were made, and our souls to the
Great Spirit who made them in a manner he has
not revealed to us. Why, then, should we be
proud of this life, or seek to render any of our
fellow-mortals
,
who may enjoy its transitory
existence
,
miserable?
Alas! listen to me. The existence is but
transitory
,
whether it be of joy or of misery, that we
can experience here. She who lies there, I have
seen young, happy, admired, and beloved. Many
of you have also seen her so. Think of it,
brothers
and sisters: does it not appear as if it were
but yesterday? But look at her now! Where
are the smiles which drew warriors after her?
where are the graces which captivated
counsellors
and chiefs?where is that dignity of mien,
and that authority of expression, which both men
and women delighted to obey? Alas! they are
to her as if they had never been, and to us their
existence is like a shadow, passing only through
our recollection, as if we had but seen it in a
dream! Such will be the fate of the sensations of
all herenay, of all mankind! We are but the
insects of a day: the fleeting hour of sunshine
passesthe night of death comes, and we are no
more! So rapid, and of such little consequence,
is our present existence.
But listen to me, brothers and sistersThe
manner in which we use that existence is of
consequence
.
And why? Because there is another;
and one to which we must immediately proceed,
and receive the reward of bliss or of wo, as we
have here earned it.
Listen again! Ye grieve for Alliquippaye
think she has been unfortunate, in being thus
separated
from you whom she loved to reside among.
But hear meshe has been fortunate in the
transition
,
because she was virtuous, and
good-hearted
,
and did her duty, and for these things her
spirit
is now receiving a glorious recompense from
the Almighty Maneto!
Then, brothers and sisters, what I would now
advise you to do, is thisWhen you think of her
who lies here, let it be to imitate her virtues. You
will never then have cause to fear the approach of
deathNay, the sooner he comes, it will be the
better for you, as you will thereby the sooner
obtain
the reward of your good conduct from the
justice of the Great Father, who will then receive
you into his favour.
Now, brothers and sisters, you may perform
your solemnities, and bury your queen. I go to
worship the Great Father.
So saying, he waved his wand three times
towards
heaven, blessed the assembly, and departed.
Susquelooma now took upon him the direction
of the proceedings, and the death-dance was
immediately
commenced. It consisted, in all the
warriors marching one after another in an
extremely
slow and solemn gait, somewhat like that
adopted
at military funerals in Europe, nine times round
the bier, each warrior as he came to it pausing,
to spread his arms over the corpse, and then
raising
them and his face to heaven, as if to say,
Here on earth is the body, but there in heaven
Vol. II. 7
is the soul; then turning quickly upon his heel,
and drawing both hands slowly from his heart, to
represent the disunion of soul and body, he
clasped
them again firmly within each other as he
moved
away, in order to show that they should be
again united.
The body was now lowered into the grave, into
which the leg of a deer, the wing of a dove, a pair
of moccasins, and a string of beads, together with
some twigs of spice-wood and leaves of the
sprucepine
,
were also thrown.
Susquelooma and several other chiefs then
chanted the death-song, which Tonnaleuka had on
this occasion prepared for them. It was, as nearly
as I can versify it in our language, as follows.
During its singing, a number of the warriors
proceeded
to cover the body with earth in the usual
manner.
An Indian Funeral-Song.
We lay her in earth whom our sad hearts deplore,
Where the dust of her fathers was buried before,
And where, in our turns, we shall all of us lie,
Ere we pass to our sires in the regions of joy!
Oh! once she was beautiful, sportive, and young,
So sprightly she danced and so merrily sung,
Nor thought, in the midst of her joy and her mirth,
That thus her last covering should be the cold earth!
We lay her low hereshe whose charms could engage
The hearts of the warrior, the sachem, and sage:
Ah! think of her now, all ye valiant and gay
The charmer of hearts is a cold piece of clay!
How bright were the virtues that glow'd in her breast!
How sweet was the kindness her visage express'd!
In true love her constancy ne'er was surpass'd,
And for Shanalow's sake she was firm to the last.
But ye of her tribe, ye Shannoahs, deplore,
She who rul'd you with love, now will rule you no more:
Oh! remember her longand with tears in your eyes,
As ye pass, strew with spice-wood the ground where she lies!
The soft-growing spice-wood is sweet to the smell,
The evergreen pine-leaves will constancy tell
Then both we shall scatter as tokens, to prove
That the sweets of her mem'ry we ever shall love!
The body being now covered, and the grave filled
with earth, a heap of stones was piled upon it, in
order to mark it out, so that any of her tribe
passing
by, might know where to pay the customary
honours to the remains of one who had been long
beloved and respected amongst them. The
procession
then returned to Susquelooma's wigwam,
where it dispersed, and Washington took his way,
with Paddy, Archy, and Dr. Killbreath, to
Frazier's
.
Maria had not gone to the funeral, as she
conceived
that witnessing the solemnities would only
have exposed her spirits, which were now
beginning
to recover their tone, to a fresh and
unnecessary
depression. It was not, however, until the
afternoon of the following day, that Washington
took occasion to make to her an open avowal of
his sentiments and wishes. He asked her to walk
out with him along the bank of the river, as doing
so, might tend to remove that degree of
melancholy
which still evidently pervaded her mind.
She readily complied, and they set out together.
It was one of those premature spring days which
sometimes, in Pennsylvania, enliven the generally
severe month of March, and from their novelty,
together with the fair face of verdant nature which
they disclose just unveiled from the long
protracted
covering of winter's snow, make a ramble, for
a short distance, very inviting and agreeable. On
this occasion, Washington and his fair companion
felt their hearts warmed and expanded as they
beheld
the symptoms of reviving nature that
bloomed
around them, although they were conscious that
before the spring should set really in, storms of
wintry fierceness would again overcast and deform
this fair face of things, and nip in the bud the
young plant that now rashly attempted to peep
forth, and leave it in a blasted and undone state to
repent its temerity.
Washington intentionally directed their steps
towards the walnut-tree, beneath whose branches
he had first stopped to gaze upon those charms
that had been fated to make such an impression
upon his heart.
Here, Maria, said he, when they arrived at
the spot, is the place where I first beheld you;
and from that moment to this, the image that you
then impressed upon my mind has never for one
instant left itAh! never, never will it leave it!
Mr. Washington, said she, I hesitate not to
credit your assertions; for I know that your mind
is superior to the common custom in which the
gay part of your sex, I am informed, indulge
themselves, of seizing all occasions to flatter ours,
even often at the expense of truth. And because
I believe you, and esteem you so sincerely as to
feel an ardent desire for your welfare, I will
candidly
say, that I am sorry you should have viewed
me in the light you have done.
O Maria! he interrupted her, do not use
these chilling expressions. How can you, if you
esteem me, and wish for my welfare, regret that
which has afforded me the sweetest sensations of
my life! that which, although it has, indeed,
occasioned
me many hours of painful anxiety, has,
nevertheless
,
been the delight of my existence, the
sacred charm which has often buoyed my hopes
into rapture, and presented to my enamoured
view the lovely vision of felicity which it might
be my lot to enjoy! Oh Maria, do not say you
are sorry for this!
Alas, Mr. Washington! she replied; if I
respected you less, I might feel less sorrow on this
subject. But you deserve to be happy, and to
make you so, the woman of your choice should
be capable of loving you with an ardour equal to
your ownwith an ardour of which I feel, and
must for ever feel, myself incapable. In short,
sir, it is my earnest wish that you should bestow
upon a more suitable object, those affections of
which I am but too conscious I am not worthy.
Not worthy! he exclaimed; not worthy of
my affections! Ah, then, what woman on earth
can be worthy of them? Oh Maria! I have seen,
I have been acquainted with many females; and
if I were to make, in your hearing, the
comparison
which my fancy has often formed between
you and the fairest, the best of them, your
modesty
would not tolerate it. You would not listen to
me;you would command me to be silent. Alas!
to draw the picture which my imagination has
formed of your person and your virtues, would
excite your incredulity, and subject me to the
suspicion
of insincerity. But with you, with none,
will I ever be insincere. Oh! if you cannot
Sir, said she, I must interrupt you. If I
thought you could be insincere in any of your
professions
,
I would abandon every good opinion I
have hitherto had of mankind. I must, therefore,
believe that you do entertain the exaggerated and
erroneous opinion of my good qualities which you
mention. But this is owing to the generous
impulse
of your nature, which has led you astray,
and induced you to give me credit for excellences
which I do not possess. Permit me to say, that
you do not know me sufficiently to judge of me
accurately. If you did, it might relieve us both
of much uneasiness. You would see the necessity
of forming a better choice; and, because I know
7 *
that it would contribute to your happiness, I should
rejoice that you had done so.
Maria! he exclaimedOh, tantalizing girl!
Another choice, did you say! No; let heaven
hear me! I swear that, unless thou dost
peremptorily
and finally refuse to be mine, I shall never
form another choice; and even then, should that
ever be, which heaven forbid, my choice may be
the dictate of duty, but I never shall be impelled
to it by that warm, that irresistible feeling of heart
and soul, which urges me to sue thee to become
the partner of my love, the mistress of my
fortune
,
the fondly-cherished wife of my bosom, the
dear, the sweet source of all my earthly
happiness
.
O Maria! wilt thou not yield to it?
wiltthou
not become mine? This Wilderness is an
unfit
Mr. Washington, said she, excuse me; but
I must speak, to undeceive youoror rather to
remind you, that I have already said I can feel for
you every thing but lovealas, thatthat alone
is impossibleand without love, how could I
assent
to the proposals with which you honour me.
No, sir, I will submit it to your own feelings
without my heart, would my hand be worth
accepting
?
Time, time, my sweetest of maidens! cried
her lover; time, and my long-continued anxious
assiduities, would excite your gratitude; my
sufferings
on your account, oh! they must surely
excite
your pity; and gratitude and pity would soon
produce love. Oh, Maria! you would not be long
so cold, so indifferent, so cruel towards one so
devoted
to you, as you expect. You could notit
is not in your nature
Ah, sir! said she, you know not, you
cannot
know, my feelings on this subject. You may
charge me with crueltyalas, sir, I am not cruel.
That I feel pity for you just now, heaven is my
witness; but that I never can feel love, heaven
also knows.
Maria, you talk mysteriously, cried he.
Indeed
,
my love, I cannot understand you. You
pity me, and you will never love me! But,
enchanting
maiden, although you say it, I will hope
against it; and trust that time will soften your
heart, and dispose it towards
Never, never! I cannot be she
exclaimed
,
evidently much agitated.
Oh! use not these cruel words, said he,
interrupting
her affectionately; I will not ask you
at present to be mine. I will have hopeI will
have patienceBut, O! fly this Wilderness, my
beloved, for there will soon be no safety for you
here. Oh Maria! this circumstance is at present
the great, the immediate object of my solicitude.
The legions of a powerful nation will soon carry
their thunders into this forest to root their
enemies
out of it. The conflict will be dreadful; and
oh! to what accidents wilt thou not be then
exposed
?
If thou wilt not fly from peril as my wife,
let us persuade the whole of thy friends also to go.
I will yield them shelter. I will bestow upon them
comfort and abudance in a pleasant asylum,
where thou, whose safety is more dear to me than
the air I breathe, wilt have nothing to fear from
the evils of war.
Sir, she replied, you are kind and
generous
;
but it is your nature, and does not surprise
mefor what virtue could you display that would
surprise me! Yet I would not do myself justice
if I did not express my gratitude for the friendly
solicitude and liberality which has dictated this
proposal: but I cannot see that my father's
family
are in such danger as to induce their
removal
from a place where they have so long resided,
and where they have often, in the worst of times,
of late years, experienced safety.
The war that is now threatened, observed
Washington, will be quite different in its extent
and consequences from any they have yet seen;
and as the savage tribes that will be engaged in it
are much exasperated against every thing British,
no doubt its ferocity will be greatly aggravated
beyond any thing that has yet arisen from former
wars in this country. Your family will, therefore,
be more exposed than formerly. Ah! Miss
Frazier
,
I indeed tremble for your safety, unless you
can be prevailed on to leave this place before the
bloody era commences.
Mr. Washington, she replied, peculiarly
circumstanced as my father's family is in respect
to all the parties who are likely to engage in the
war you anticipate, I do not suppose, that, unless
some of them take an active part in the quarrel,
there is much danger of our being molested. With
the French and Indians we are now on terms of
intimacy. Our feelings and affections are with
the English, it is true, and the French may suspect
this, yet so long as we join neither party, I think
that neither will injure us. But you may lay your
proposal for our removal before my father. With
his determination in this matter I must of course
comply; but your solicitude on my account must
be kept altogether out of view.
I will try this expedient, said he; I may
prevail with your father, and by this means have
the satisfaction of securing your safety, to effect
which was the great object of my present visit to
the Wilderness.
Maria again expressed her thanks for his
solicitude
in her hehalf. They then returned to the
house, and Washington soon found an opportunity
of laying his proposal before Frazier.
Gilbert had long enjoyed so much safety amidst
the various tribes of warring Indians, and felt
himself
at the present time, so secure in the friendship
of both the English and French, in the event of the
war of which Washington spoke, taking place, that
with the strongest expressions of gratitude to that
gentleman for his generous offer, he declined
accepting
it, and refused to remove.
God has aye been gracious to me, said he, in
reply to Washington's reasoning, since I cam' into
thir backwoods; an' though a' ye represent in sae
freen'ly a manner may be true, yet I wunna noo
mistrust his providence; for ye ken hoo the
prophet
reprimanded the godly Asa for trusting in the
strength o' Egypt an' no' in the arm o' the Lord.
In addition to the piety of Gilbert, the wishes
of Washington were, in this instance, opposed by
the policy of Paddy, who observed that if they
even should consent to remove, it would, under
present circumstances, be impossible to do so
without the knowledge of the French, who would
inevitably prevent them.
The day we should attempt it, said he, you
may rely on it, a troop of horse, and a tribe of
Indians
,
at the very least, would surround us, and
force us to take up our abode, not in our own
dwelling again, it is true, but in Fort Du Quesne;
so that all we should gain by the attempt would
be to make them enemies who are now our friends.
No, he added in a whisper to Washington, I
think we can be of more service to the British
cause by remaining here, and keeping on good
terms with their enemies, for then, you know the
opportunity for a little stratagem in war may be
more conveniently watched.
Washington finding that he could not prevail on
the family to accede to his wishes, and feeling that
his duty to his country required his immediate
return
to Virginia, resolved, before his departure, to
do all that remained in his power to effect for the
safety of his beloved, when he should be far
distant
,
by informing Tonnaleuka of the approaching
dangers, and obtaining from him a promise to be
her protector.
That very evening Paddy Frazier procured him
an interview with the prophet, who seemed to
enter into his views on the subject more fully and
readily than either Gilbert or Paddy.
My son, said Tonnaleuka, when Washington
had made his statement, I know there will be an
alarming time in this quarter, and I fear that that
young woman will be peculiarly exposed. But make
your mind easy. I will think of your generosity
towards her, and her friends, and shall not be less
solicitous for their safety than yourself. Hers, in
particular, you may be assured I shall watch over
with all the anxiety and care you can wish. Ah,
sir! think you I can be indifferent to the fate of
her who has grown up from her infancy to what
you now see her, under my tuition and care! Be
satisfied, I will protect her as I would the apple
of my eye.
Give me one more promise, my father, and I
shall be satisfied, said Washington; promise me
that if thy power should fall short in protecting
her, for thy will I do not distrust, thou wilt give
me the speediest intelligence of whatever
misfortune
may befall her, so that no time may be lost
before I can fly to her deliverance.
I promise thee this, replied the prophet.
And since thy country will soon need thee much,
go now, attend to her call, and take my blessing
with thee, and may heaven preserve thee long for
the benefit of millions!
Thank thee, father, and farewell! replied
the hero, and they separated.
The next morning Washington bade a tender
adieu to Maria, and, accompanied by Vanbraam,
left her abode with a heavy and anxious heart,
and pursued his way to Mount Vernon, where he
arrived in about two weeks, without meeting with
any accident.
CHAPTER VI.
What! shall the foes whom oft our arms have humbled,
Now triumph o'er us with impunity,
And scorn that power at which they oft have trembled!
No, no, by heavens! we are as brave as ever.
And soon the proud destroyers of our brethren
Shall feel that we have weapons to avenge them.
Savelabour
.
The
intelligence of Charles Adderly's second
defeat, and the establishment of the French in
the fort at the head of the Ohio, had reached the
Atlantic cities, and excited a great ferment over
all the country east of the Alleghany mountains,
several weeks before Washington's second visit to
the Wilderness. It was indeed the anxiety for
Maria's safety which this intelligence naturally
occasioned, and the anticipation of the national
war which he saw would be hastened on by this
affair, that accelerated his visit ere the winter
was over; for he had not, at first, calculated on
paying it until the spring opened, in order that,
if Maria consented to accompany him to Virginia,
the state of the country, the weather, and the roads,
would be better adapted for travelling. Before
he set out for the Wilderness, his exertions and
influence tended much to excite his native colony
to take the lead in those active measures which
were about to be adopted for the infliction of
British
vengeance upon the French aggressors; and
when he returned to Mount Vernon, he had the
satisfaction to find that a regiment of four hundred
regulars had been raised by the authority of the
Virginia legislature, for the express purpose of
proceeding
against the enemy as soon as the season
would permit. Of this regiment he had himself
received the commission of lieutenant-colonel; one
Mr. Fry, a military gentleman, supposed to be
well acquainted with Indian affairs, having been
appointed Colonel.
Hostilities were not yet formally declared
between
Britain and France; but the British
secretary
of state had written to governor Dinwiddie
that his cabinet considered the attack of the
French upon the Ohio Company's people, and their
fortifying themselves in Du Quesne, as
equivalent
to the commencement of hostilities on their
part; and that therefore his majesty's colonies
should conceive themselves at full liberty to
attack
and drive off the aggressors by any means in
their power.
In consequence of this authority, Dinwiddie
indulged the zeal of young Washington, who
earnestly
solicited permission to march against Du
Quesne as soon as the country was fit to be
travelled
.
His chief inducement for this urgency
was, that by information he had received from
Paddy Frazier, he knew the French works at Du
Quesne were yet incomplete, but were every day
getting stronger, and as soon as the season
opened, the garrison expected to receive from
Canada a strong augmentation of its force. If
the early part of the season should therefore be
permitted to pass away without attacking the
French, the probability was that they would soon
become in all respects, so strengthened, as to set
any force the colony could send against them, at
defiance.
Washington was extremely anxious for the
capture
of this fort, for many reasons; but the one
Vol. II. 8
which operated, perhaps, the most powerfully
upon his heart, was, the idea that by such an
event, the seat of war might be kept at a distance
from the residence of Maria. Le Buf, Presqu'
Isle, and the plains of Canada, would then
become
the theatre of contention; while, by
possessing
Du Quesne, its neighbourhood would
enjoy
tranquillity, as too much employment would
be given the enemy in the country of the St.
Lawrence, to allow them either leisure or means
to disturb that of the Ohio.
True policy also called for this promptitude of
action which he recommended, as a small force
might now accomplish what in the lapse of only a
few weeks, a formidable army might find
impossible
.
If you wish to drive the French from Fort Du
Quesne, said he, in a memorial to the governor;
if you wish to save our border-settlers from the
depredations and horrors which the savage allies
of our enemy meditate against them as soon as
the season will permit their irruptions, you will
attempt it without delay. Time passes on, the
day fast approaches when the Indians will strike
their winter-tents, and prepare for war and
devastation
.
The enemy which supports and
encourages
them to mischief, is every day strengthening
himself. While he is yet weak, the means you
can already command, may drive him from his
strong-hold, afar from our borders, and compel
the barbarous tribes, who do his bidding, to
remain
quietly in their own forests, without daring
to search for human victims upon our frontiers.
If, on the other hand, you delay till the fort
on the Ohio is completed, and until it shall be
filled
with troops and stores from Canada, the
favourable
moment will have departed for ever, and
the power of a nation may not then be able to do
what could now be done by that of a colony.
In consequence of these representations,
Colonel
Washington was authorized to proceed, about
the middle of April, with about two hundred
regulars
and some militia, with all possible dispatch,
to attack Fort Du Quesne, if he found it
adviseable
,
with that force; if not, he was to throw up
entrenchments and wait the arrival of Colonel
Fry, with the remainder of the army, who would
hasten after him as soon as it should be ready for
marching. By this measure, it was expected that
if the French could not be driven from this
station
,
the hostile Indians would at least be
overawed
into tranquillity; and any of the tribes that
still felt a predilection for the English,
encouraged
to declare themselves.
The young hero lost no time in availing himself
of this permission, and something less than two
weeks found him encamped at a place called the
Great Meadows, a few miles eastward of the
Laurel
Hill. Here finding an eligible position, he
determined to erect a fort, for the purpose of
protecting
his horses and provisions, and also of
securing
a retreat for his men in case of disaster.
This strength, from the haste and circumstances
under which it was erected, he called Fort
Necessity
.
While his soldiers were employed at this work,
being anxious to ascertain the real condition and
strength of the French garrison, and whether they
were apprised of his approach, he set out on foot,
accompanied by Vanbraam, both drest as Indians,
in order to reconnoitre their position. When he
arrived at Turtle Creek, he found that Paddy
Frazier had just come that very day from Du
Quesne, and was therefore able to give him all
the information he could wish. The circumstances
he reported, however, were not very encouraging.
The circumvallation of the Fort was not indeed
entirely finished on the sides towards the rivers,
nor had the garrison yet received any ordnance
from Le Buf; but a day or two before, a
reinforcement
of nearly five hundred men had
descended
the Alleghany river, and a large supply of
cannon
and other warlike stores from Canada was
reported to be on its way, and daily expected.
With respect to Washington's approach and
intentions, Paddy rather believed that the French
were yet ignorant. At all events, he had heard
nothing said of them while he was in the garrison,
but he proposed to return the next morning, and
by some means to make himself more certain on
the subject.
During the evening, Washington had the
pleasure
of enjoying in private, a short conversation
with the beloved of his soul; but he found her
heart as much averse to love as formerly,
although
he pleaded his passion more
energetically
and eloquently than ever. She, however,
with the view of soothing his wounded feelings,
and rendering her refusal of his proposals as
little
oppressive upon his mind as possible,
expressed
so warmly what she really felt, esteem for his
virtues, and admiration of his talents, that although
he forbore to urge her further, he could not
forbear
to cherish some sweet hope that the day
might come when, even contrary to her own
expectations
,
she might feelshe might
acknowledge
,
that she loved him. Alas, he knew not
how intensely and steadfastly she loved another:
and alas, by her kind and amiable, but
ill-judged
anxiety to save him from the mortification of
a harsh refusal, she prolonged those hopes with
which his soul was loth to part, and
unintentionally
,
encouraged that fallacy of expectation in
his bosom, which, because it was destructive of
his peace, she would have given any
consideration
to remove.
In the morning, as Washington, in order to pass
the time which was now become heavy on his
hands, wandered along the bank of the river, his
steps almost involuntarily led him to the spot
where he first beheld Maria.
Here, said he, as he leaned against the
walnut tree, here it was that, while standing in
this spot, that vision of light so unexpectedly
burst upon my view! There she sat, as fixed to
this place I listened to the tones of her
enchanting
voice. Ah! I will never forget that moment
when she looked up and showed me a
countenance
of more than mortal beauty, such a
countenance
as my imagination in its romantic
moments
had often attempted to depict, but had
never before seen, and till then, had despaired of
ever seeing. Oh! what varied sensations both of
joy and misery have I since sustained! But, alas,
little of joy appears now to be before me. I
might have been happy had I never seen her:
but nothank heaven I have seen her, I have
conversed with her, although it has ruined my
peace; for such an idea, such a lovely idea, as
her image alone could impart to my soul, was
necessary
to make me happy. She refuses me,
alas, but she esteems me, and the time may come
when her heart may be disposed to love; for
heaven surely could not have made her so
essential
to my happiness, without ordaining her for
me!
My son, I could wish thy hopes to be
better
founded, said a voice. He turned, and
beheld
Tonnaleuka beside him.
Father, thou knowest the maiden, said
8*
Washington. Ah! tell methinkest thou, can
her heart ever be mine?
`'My son, replied the prophet, the chances
are now against thee, but the fates may in the end
be favourable. I will neither desire thee to hope
nor to despair.
But hear me, my son, there is a person
concealed
in these woods from the enmity of the
French. He is of a generous and daring mind, a
Briton like thyself, and like thyself, a soldier. He
has heard of thy coming with an armed force, and
longs to join thee against the enemies of his
country
.
Wilt thou receive him?
With great pleasure, and a hearty welcome,
replied WashingtonMay I ask his name?
Charles Adderly, returned the prophet.
I am glad of it, said Washington. He is
a young man of indeed a gallant spirit, and will
be a real acquisition to me. I have often of late
wondered where he was concealed. I heard of
his rescue from the French, and could not think
he had made his way to Philadelphia, otherwise
it would have been publicly known. But where
shall I see him?
Let me first inquire when you intend
returning
to your army? said the prophet.
To-night I believe; as it is moonlight, I think
I need not delay longer.
Then to-night, at ten o'clock, he shall here
meet you, if that hour answers, said
Tonnaleuka
.
I shall make it answer, returned
Washington
.
Then, farewell, my son, said the prophet,
and he disappeared in the direction of Turtle
Creek; and Washington returned to the house, to
enjoy the luxury of conversing with Maria,
although
he knew that he must avoid the subject of
love. She had walked out, however, and he could
not ascertain, or at least he had too much
delicacy
of feeling to inquire, in what direction; and he
passed rather a tedious and melancholy afternoon,
in company with Gilbert Frazier and Mr.
Vanbraam
.
But although Washington did not find his
beloved
,
yet, reader, I will tell you where she had
gone. It was to the place where her heart was
treasuredthe cavern of her lover. She had paid
several visits to this place of late, and had
indulged
Charles in some very pleasing and interesting
interviews; but she had taken care never to
mention
to him any thing concerning the addresses she
had received from Washington, as she conceived
that such information would only give him
unnecessary
pain. Tonnaleuka had been equally
guarded
on this subject, so that Charles had no
conception
that the chief under whom he was about to
volunteer his services to his country was his
rival
;
and Washington, on his part, was altogether
ignorant that the young volunteer for whom he
felt such a high respect, was the only obstacle
between
him and his soul's chief desire.
Tonnaleuka had, previous to his meeting with
Washington at the walnut tree, as we have just
related
,
informed Maria of Charles's wish to join
the troops at Fort Necessity. He had also
informed
Charles of the vicinity of Washington, and did
not object to his joining him as he considered it to
be the safest and most elegible means by which
he could be relieved from his confinement, and
get out of the Wilderness. As to Maria she had
been always in the habit of offering no opposition
to whatever the prophet approved. The matter
was therefore decided on; and she now went to
the cavern in compliance with her lover's request
to see her before his departure.
Ah, my love! said he, as they conversed
together
,
I almost feel inclined to reject that
liberty
,
and to forego that honourable service, which
is now open to me, since they will be purchased
at the dear rate of leaving thy vicinity, of
depriving
myself of these sweet visits with which thou
hast made my asylum happy. Oh Maria! honour
calls mebut how can I think of removing so far
from thee?
Charles! she replied, I indeed feel uneasy
at the thought of your being again exposed to the
hazards of war. But it is perhaps your duty,
Tonnaleuka approves of it, and he knows better;
at least, he can judge more cooly on this matter
than I can. I pray that God may watch over your
safety
And oh! he replied, may he watch over
thine, thou lovely, but tender plant, whom I must
thus leave exposed to all the rude storms of a
barbarous
forest! But my absence shall not be long,
my lovewe shall soon advance forward under
our prudent and heroic leader, and root our
enemies
out of their strong holds.
It is a comfort to me, she replied, that
you will be under such a chief. I know him, my
CharlesI have heard Tonnaleuka speak of his
qualities, and I am persuaded that if wisdom can
command success, and virtue deserve it, it will
follow his standard. But, oh Charles! he may
be successful, and yet thou be lost, lost to thy
Maria
.
Alas! alas! I cannot help trembling when I
think of the numerous accidents of war to which
thou wilt soon be exposed.
Fear not, my dearest, my best beloved! said
Charles, much affected at this manifestation of her
concern for his safety. Fear notthe God whom
thou servest, and who made thee so pure and so
lovely, will preserve me for thy sake.
I will never cease to pray fervently, she
replied
,
that he mayand, although I cannot help
suffering fear lest misfortune should assail the
betrothed
of my heart when he becomes so exposed
to danger, yet I will not distrust either the power
or goodness of that God, who, I know, is as able
to save in the whirlwind as in the calm. And, oh
Charlesmay I conjure you never to cease to
trust in him, and implore him to be your guide, as
well as your guard.
Maria, my sweetest love! said he, it is
my duty to do so; and since thou desirest it, it
shall be my study, it shall be my pleasure, my
Oh, Charles! she hastily replied; I trust
that it has always been thy pleasure. Oh, say
not that it is to gratify me that you would make
it so.
Maria, hear me, my love! said he; I have
never yet been insensible to the delight that arises
from worshipping God, and I hope I never shall.
But to obey thy injunction is in itself a pleasure,
distinct and rapturous, which until my heart
ceases
to beat it shall keenly feel; and even the first
of my duties, the worshipping of my God, shall
derive additional pleasure from thy commanding
it. Oh Maria! do not think me profane when I
say that religion appears to me more lovely when
it is recommended by thee.
They now heard the steps of Tonnaleuka
advancing
.
My children, said he, as he entered, you
are now about to separate. Let it be with
fortitude
and resignation. The will of heaven
respecing
you cannot be yet known. But repose
confidence
in your Great Father, and serve him; and
whatsoever accidents may befall you, be assured
that, although they may produce temporary
distress
,
they will in the end result in your lasting
advantage. Such, such, will ever be the happy
fate of those who, amidst all trials, maintain their
integrity.
This, my children, is my advice. I wish you
to attend to it.
For you, my son, this night at ten o'clock
your chief will await your coming to the place
where I will conduct you. Be ready, therefore,
to meet himand study to love and obey him, for
he is worthy of love and obedience. I would also
say, imitate his virtues; but they are inimitable.
And now, my daughter, said he, to Maria
Bid this young man farewell, and come along
with me. I doubt not but heaven will again grant
you to meet, and perhaps at no distant period.
God grant it, said CharlesThen since it
must be so, farewellfarewell, my love!and
while he imprinted an ardent kiss upon her hand,
she returned a faint farewell.
She then left the cavern with Tonnaleuka, who
accompanied her until within sight of her father's
house, where she arrived a little before sunset,
much to the gratification of Washington, who
began
to fear that he might not see her before his
departure
;
and even felt his mind agitated with doubts
that she might have absented herself on account
of his presence.
He could not help, therefore, manifesting his
satisfaction at her return, by indulging in a
sprightliness
and gaiety of conversation to which, during
the whole day, he had been a stranger.
Miss Frazier, said he, I was beginning to
despair of seeing you before I set off. You seem
to be like the great huntress of the Grecian
mythology
,
who esteemed the shades for nothing so
much as their concealing her from the eyes of
visiters
.
I have always, in good weather, she replied,
been fond of the woods, although I did not seek
them to-day, I assure you, for the purpose of
avoiding visiters; and with respect to those who
now honour us with their presence, they are the
last in the world towards whom I should be
disposed
to act the part of the shy Diana. No, no, sir,
they stand too high in my estimation for that.
Notwithstanding which, returned
Washington
,
you have for the last six hours at least,
exclusively
favoured the rocks and the streams with
your company, to the great disappointment and
vexation of us your poor visiters, who have been
the whole afternoon fretting and pining so much
at your absence, that we could have wished
ourselves
changed into rocks, and trees, and fountains,
if so we could have enjoyed your presence. But
it was perhaps as well, as we now enjoy it the
more sensibly, on account of having so severely
felt the want of it.
I am really glad that I can make any
atonement
for my fault, replied she. But methinks,
Mr. Washington, that if the company had suffered
so very much from my absence, it would hardly
exhibit the contented, good-humoured, and
sprightly
countenances I now behold.
It is only when you are present, that you can
perceive such happy countenances, said he,
smiling.
I acknowledge it, she replied; I have not
the power of seeing through hills and rocks, and
cannot exactly behold felicity any where but in
my presence. In some cases, however, it may be
right to judge of the past by the present; and if
so, I cannot suppose that any of you here have
been very unhappy this afternoon.
Ah, Miss Frazier! returned Washington
you know that the minds of men are variable;
and you have yourself seen plants drooping in the
rain, that have almost instantaneously erected
their heads, and become lively and gay in the
sunshine
.
I have seen such appearances, she replied;
and I believe, sir, that you have not erred in
resembling
them to the fickle tempers of mena
strange race of beings, for so assiduously avoiding
whom, I cannot but give the woodland goddess you
spoke of, some credit.
I acknowledge you have the advantage of me
in this respect, observed Washington. I
cannot
retort upon you; for I know no one of the
gods who ever thought of avoiding women,
otherwise
I might eulogize his firmness, although I
confess
that I would heartily condemn his taste. But,
alas! Miss Frazier, to speak seriously, it was cruel
to deprive me of your company to-day. My stay
here must be very short, and I wished to have all
my friends in this place around me while it lasted.
O! would to heaven that every member of this
family were now at Mount Vernon, safely
removed
from the havoc and distress which barbarous
war has destined for this quarter of the country.
But I trust God will protect you, if I cannot.
Ye were aye frienly an' kin', Mr.
Washingington
,
observed Gilbert, an' hae a gude
religious
heart o' yere ain, whilk I'm muckle mistaken
if God dinna bless to abundant satisfying, as oor
minister at the Juniata used to say. Ah! it's a
pleasing sicht to see a soldier wha fears naethin'
but to offend his God; an' I doot na but he'll, in
every strait, remember your trust in him, an' keep
you in the hollow o' his hand, and under the
shadow
o' his wings. For me, syne ye hae ta'en up
the sword in a gude cause, to stop the ravages o'
thir French an' Indians on oor christian
neighbours
,
I'll aye pray for your success.
Soon after this, Paddy returned from the
garrison
.
Washington walked out with him, and
received
the following intelligence.
Some Indians have informed the Governor
this very day, said he, that you are
approaching
with several hundred Virginians to attack the
fort. The whole garrison has in consequence
been, during the afternoon, in commotion; and I
waited a couple of hours longer among them than
I intended, in order to see what measures they
would adopt. After holding councils of war,
making
speeches, and drinking wine in abundance,
they at last resolved to detach about a hundred
men to watch your motions, impede your progress,
and send you to the devil, I suppose, if they can.
These fellows started at a quick pace about an
hour and a half since, under one Major
Jumonville
;
and may heaven send them all safely into
your clutches.
I must then return immediately to my camp,
in order to prepare for their reception, said
Washington.
Wisely said, replied Paddy; but you must
take care not to fall into their hands on your way.
Let me see; they have taken the northern route, I
suppose that they may come upon you from behind
though heaven only knows what they mean. I'll
watch them, however, and give you timely notice
of their movements.
We must now set off, and endeavour to avoid
them as well as we can, observed Washington.
The night will favour us, in case they come upon
our course.
There are private and near paths, said
Paddy
.
Let me think a momentcan I not procure
you a guide? Doctor Killbreath, or Archy
Nothe Doctor's too ignorant of the country, and
Archy is ablockhead. I had better conduct you
Vol. II. 9
myself, till you're out of danger; and then, trust
me, sir, I shall soon scent the designs of the
Frenchmen.
This, I believe, is the best arrangement,
replied
Washington. I thank you, Mr. Frazier,
for your zeal. I hope it shall yet be in my power
to reward you.
As you choose for that, said Paddy.
The sooner we are off now the better,
observed
Washington. If Mr. Adderly were here,
I think we might proceed immediately.
Mr. Adderly! returned Paddy; does he go
with you?
I am told that such is his desire, said
Washington
.
You will find him a brave fellow, observed
Paddy; worth a dozen Frenchmen, so long as
he has nothing to do but to fight. But as to
warcraft
,
sirwhy he can no more think of
overreaching
an enemy, than of cheating a creditor.
He will make a daring soldier, but a confounded
bad leader.
He has honour and courage, replied
Washington
.
He has also talents and education of the
first-rate kind; and if he disdains low cunning,
permit me to say, that it is only what every great
leader should do. Foresight, prudence, coolness,
fertility of invention, and promptitude of
execution
,
which are the great requisites of a
commander
,
are in no respect akin to fraud and
deception
.
But we will not waste time on this subject,
Paddy: is it near ten o'clock?
Paddy, pulling a watch out of his pocket,
observed
,
Let us see what this madam says: I just
set her by the dial at the garrison to-day. The
moon's pretty clearI can discern it: it appears
to be within about ten minutes of ten.
We must then be off, said Washington
Let us call Vanbraam, and bid adieu to our
friends.
So saying, he hurried into the house, bade a
hasty
farewell to Maria and the rest of the family, and
set out for the walnut tree, followed by Vanbraam
and Paddy. Tonnaleuka, and Charles had
arrived
there a few minutes before them. The two
young heroes received each other with a warm
and hearty greeting; and the prophet pronouncing
his benediction upon them, left them, and they set
forward, Paddy leading the way, at a vigorous
pace, for Fort Necessity.
CHAPTER VIII.
Yet cautious as in foeman's land,
Lord Marnion's order speeds the band,
Some opener ground to gain;
And scarce a furlong had they rode,
When thinner trees, receding show'd,
A little woodland plain.
Just in that advantageous glade,
The halting troops a line had made,
As forth from the opposing shade
Issued a gallant train.
Scott
.
Paddy
continued to guide our party through
unfrequented paths, and often no paths at all,
amidst an uninterrupted and silent forest, and over
hills, and precipices, dingles, vales, ravines, and
creeks, until he deposited them in Fort
Necessity
,
a distance of nearly seventy miles, in
little
more than twenty four hours after their leaving
Frazier's. During their journey they had neither
seen nor heard any thing of the French
detachment
,
nor had any intelligence concerning it
reached
the Fort.
The whole of that night, however, Washington
took effectual measures to prevent a surprise, and
the next morning Paddy Frazier, together with
several other scouts were sent to range the
country
in search of the enemy.
As a few days before, Washington had the
misfortune
to lose by sickness, one of his officers, a
captain, named Stewart, he had now an
opportunity
of manifesting his regard for Charles Adderly
by bestowing upon him the vacant commission.
Charles, therefore, now felt himself in that
honourable
situation of life, which was perfectly
suited
to his ardent and romantic disposition. He
was now a soldier, and an officer in the service
of his country, and under a leader who honoured
him with his friendship, and for whose
pre-eminent
talents and virtues he was impressed with
the most profound admiration and respect.
It was about nine o'clock at night when Paddy
Frazier entered Washington's quarters, with
information
concerning the enemy. He had
discovered
them about mid-day, ascending the western
side of the Laurel Hill, and he kept them in view
the whole afternoon, until he saw them encamped
in a narrow defile several miles eastward of the
hill, and only about two hours march from the
Fort.
Paddy described the ground on which
Jumonville
had encamped his men, in such a manner,
that Washington immediately perceived the
practicability
of seizing, during the night, upon the
heights that surrounded them, and surprising them
into a surrender in the morning, perhaps, without
bloodshed. He accordingly, without delay, placed
himself at the head of about two hundred men,
and proceeded to the spot. It was on the margin
of a small brook, and consisted of a flat piece of
ground not more than fifty yards wide, covered on
both the east and west by high and abrupt hills,
which rendered it one of the best places that could
be found for concealment, but one of the worst
for escape.
After silently and cautiously reconnoitering the
ground, Washington detached nearly one half of
his troops under the charge of a trusty officer, by
a circuitous route through which they were
guided
by Paddy Frazier, to take possession of the
9*
western height, while he himself with the
remainder
occupied that on the east.
During the night his humanity prevented him
from attacking the French; for he reasonably
expected
that when they should, in the morning,
perceive
themselves so completely hemmed in by a
superior
force, without any means left for either
escape
or resistance, they would surrender without
giving occasion for unnecessary slaughter.
His expectations were, to a great extent,
although
not altogether, realized. The French,
indeed
,
were much astonished when the dawn
discovered
to their view the adjacent heights
glittering
with the weapons of war, and the British
colours
floating at intervals all around them. Their
commander, however, who was of a brave, but
rather rash temper, felt more chagrin and
irritation
,
than despondency at the circumstance. He
rejected Washington's summons to surrender at
discretion; and with the very forlorn expectation of
throwing the Virginians into some confusion
which might facilitate his escape, he ordered an
attack to be made upon a company which
guarded
the lower entrance into the defile. This
company
was under the charge of Charles Adderly,
beside whom Paddy Frazier happened then to
have stationed himself.
Damn that scoundrel Jumonville! cried
Paddy
,
as soon as he observed these motions of the
French. He'll sacrifice his men to his madness,
and give us trouble too. But I'll pop a ball into
his cap, to teach him sobriety.
The next instant Paddy's rifle was at his eye,
and Jumonville's brains were scattered on the
ground. The attack in consequence of this
accident
was suspended, and, after some little
parlying
,
the French surrendered themselves
unconditionally
prisoners of war, and were soon lodged in
Fort Necessity.
The sun of prosperity seemed for several days
to brighten more and more upon the British cause.
The day after capturing the French detachment,
the remainder of the Virginian regiment, that was
to follow under Colonel Fry, joined their
companions
;
but the Colonel had died on the march,
and, very much to the satisfaction of all his
soldiers
,
the sole command now devolved upon
Washington
.
The number of his troops was also
augmented
a few days afterwards, by the arrival of
two regular companies, one from the colony of
New-York, and the other from South Carolina;
for by this time all the colonies had become
interested
in the struggle, and resolved to support
Virginia
in her efforts against the common enemy.
Having now a force of nearly six hundred men,
tolerably well appointed with every material for war
except cannon, of which, however, he knew that Du
Quesne was also destitute, Washington resolved to
proceed westward to the attack of that post, or if
that should be found imprudent, to cut off
whatever
supplies might be sent to its aid from Le
Buf or Canada. At the very worst, he
conceived
that he could at least seize upon some
favourable
position which he might fortify, as a
countervailing
strength, and where he could maintain his
ground, and keep the enemy in check, until he
should be reinforced from the east. A scarcity of
provisions, which began to be felt in his little
army, was the only thing that gave him uneasiness,
and seemed to call for a postponement of his
design
.
But he trusted that a supply would soon
follow him, as he had expressly and urgently
written
to Governor Dinwiddie on the subject; and
he feared much that even a short delay might
allow
the Canadian reinforcements to enter Du
Quesne, and thereby ruin every prospect he might
have of dislodging the enemy from thence, for that
campaign.
In the mean time, he knew that Paddy Frazier,
who had returned to his father's the day
succeeding
the capture of Jumonville's party, was keeping
an active and vigilant eye upon the proceedings
of the French. He therefore felt confident that
they could take no step of importance, or receive
any considerable accession of force, without his
obtaining the speediest intelligence possible on the
subject. So long as Paddy was silent, he had, in
consequence, a right to presume that the French
were yet unrecruited and inactive.
These reflections, and his extreme solicitude to
clear that quarter of the country of the French,
induced him to proceed; and about the latter end
of June, he commenced his march westward with
all the troops he had, except one company, which
was left to protect the fort from any surprise. On
the second day of their march, however, when
they had proceeded only a few miles to the
westward
of the Laurel Hill, Paddy Frazier met them
with intelligence of such a nature as to stop their
further progress.
He said, that the French having only two days
before received their long-expected supplies from
Canada, had already, with a force of nearly a
thousand
Europeans and as many Indians, commenced
their march to meet the British, and could not be
more than half a day's journey distant.
Under the circumstances in which his army was
then placed, Washington considered that this was
indeed alarming intelligence. Their bread was
altogether exhausted, and their supply of meat was
become very scanty. If the French should by
any means get to the eastward of them, which, by
the aid of the Indians, who were well acquainted
with the country, and their own superior numbers,
they might easily do, any supply of provisions or
other stores that might be sent from Virginia,
would inevitably be intercepted, unless convoyed
by a stronger escort than there was any reason to
expect would accompany it.
As, however, Washington was very reluctant to
commence a retrograde motion solely on his own
responsibility, however necessary it might be, he
thought proper to call a council of war, before
which he laid all the circumstances of their
situation
,
and his own opinion as to the necessity of
a retreat.
God is my witness, said he, in concluding his
address to the council, that there is no one here
who feels more reluctant to embrace such a
measure
than I do. My whole heart has become bent
on relieving this country from the influence of the
French; for while they rule here, I know well
that Indian outrages will never cease to afflict
our frontiers, and entail upon our back-settlers a
precarious and wretched existence. But we must,
at present, yield to the imperious mandate of fate.
The force of the enemy is overwhelming. In
Fort Necessity we may be able to defend ourselves
until our friends send us succours, which we have
every reason to expect cannot now be long
delayed
.
Thus, gentlemen, I have laid before you the
real nature of our situation, and the measures
which it appears to me the preservation of our
troops require us to pursue. I now submit it to
your decision, whether to adopt the disagreeable
alternative of returning to our fort, which I have
recommended, or of pushing forward or remaining
where we are, and thereby tempt destruction,
either from the hand of the enemy, or the more
terrible one of famine.
The council, after a very short deliberation,
resolved
unanimously that a retreat was necessary,
to afford them any chance of avoiding capture or
destruction. It was therefore immediately
commenced
;
and Fort Necessity saw them again
enter
its ramparts, about four days after they had
left it.
There was only one individual in the whole
band who felt the disappointment occasioned by
this unfortunate turn of affairs, as acutely as
Washington
himself, and he did so because his feelings
arose from the same cause: this was Captain
Adderly
.
With hopes highly elated in his breast, he
had expected in a few days to have been again
stationed beside his Maria, not as an absconder,
who feared to show his head above ground, but as
an avowed soldier of his country, able to protect
the object of his affection from any species of
insult
,
whether offered by christian or savage. Now
he had to retreat from the superior force of that
enemy, whose control in the country was the only
obstacle to his happiness.
Washington's feelings ran much in the same
strain, only he had an additional burthen of
public
solicitude and grief for the miseries to which
he saw that thousands of his countrymen would,
in consequence of his failure in this enterprise, be
doomed. He, however, even at this early period
of his career, began to practise, in an
extraordinary
manner, the virtue of self-command, for
which he afterwards became so remarkable. At
this time, when his heart's tender affections were
undoubtedly stronger and more tried than ever
they were during any subsequent period of his life,
when he cherished an ardent desire to be near his
Maria, and to perform every thing that promised
to secure her safety during these times of trouble
and peril, he never permitted her idea for one
instant
to interfere with his duty to his country.
No; although no man ever loved woman more
fervently and tenderly than he loved Maria, yet
still his country was the mistress to whose service,
whenever she pleased to call upon him, he
resolved
to devote himself in preference to any other.
As he expected soon to sustain an attack at the
post he now occupied, he kept his men busily
employed
in improving its strength. Its defences,
which were of the stoccade kind, had been hastily
erected, and were very incomplete, and he had
not yet been able to deepen its trench sufficiently
to offer much obstacle to the enemy. His troops
were all zealous, however, in obeying his
directions
,
and exerted themselves so industriously, that
every hour appeared to add to their security. The
officers themselves made great personal exertions
on this occasion, and with great alacrity set the
common men an example of manual labour.
Among others, Charles Adderly had one day
wrought very perseveringly at the trench, when
feeling fatigued towards the evening, and wishing
to enjoy, for a short space, the luxury of
meditating
in solitude upon Maria, he descended a
steep declivity, at a small distance from the fort, to
the edge of a brook which there worked its
silent
passage beneath a verdant covering of hazels
and alder bushes.
On a small grassy bank he threw himself down,
beneath a canopy formed by the intertwining
branches of these shrubs, the luxuriant foliage of
which scarcely permitted the rays of the sun, at
that time setting in great magnificence, to reach
him. But if they had reached him, all-glorious
and strikingly beautiful as the appearance of that
luminary then was, it could not have attracted his
attentionfor that attention was now firmly
riveted
upon an object to him more attractive, lovely,
and endearing, than any other created being he
could behold.
Alas, thought he; and am I doomed to be
cut off from her presence? Is she fated thus to
reside within the reach and under the power of an
enemy, whose outrageous and ruffian tempers are
but too well known? Ah! what troubles and
persecutions
will she have to suffer, if her enchanting
beauties should happen to excite the passions of
any of these lawless and unrestrained Frenchmen?
Oh, my God! there is distraction, there is frenzy
in the idea. Heaven preserve her from such
trials!
Ah, then, you don't like Frenchmen, don't
you? exclaimed a voice suddenly; and before
he had time to get on his feet, two men had
rushed
upon him. He, however, by a rapid exertion of
strength, soon got one of them beneath him; but
the other was about plunging a dagger into his
body
,
when he was forcibly seized round the waist
by a man who lifted him, dagger and all, into the
air, exclaiming
By Jasus! two to one is foul play, my honey
would you kill the gentleman?Ah! blood and
thunder! is it my master, you thieves? was the
next exclamation; then, to the devil with your
damned carcass!
That instant the suspended Frenchman was
dashed violently upon the ground, and the next
his own dagger was buried in his heart.
Huzza for old Ireland! cried the victor,
whom the reader must have perceived was Peter
M`Fall. Now, master, for the other rascal!
Not so fast, my brave Peter, cried Charles,
he calls for quarter.
By the holy Bridget! then I'll quarter him in a
jiffy, returned Peter, attempting to strike at the
Frenchman. Charles's body, however, acted as a
shield, and Peter though he made several efforts
could not effect his purpose. At length Charles,
in an authoritative manner, said
I order you, Peter, to desist and leave this man
to me. You see he is disarmed, and defenceless.
It would be murder to kill him!
Murder to kill a Frenchman! exclaimed
Peter
by
my sowl that's a new doctrine! But if
he was the devil, you may save him if you wish
it, my honey! But what will you do with him?
I will have you, said Charles, to throw
down that weapon, and catch him by the
shoulder
or the neck, if you think proper, only don't
strangle him, and push him before you to the fort
yonder, where we will dispose of him as may be
found suitable.
Peter leapt upon the captive as a tiger would
upon his prey, and seizing him by the collar with
his right hand, drove him before him in great
triumph
,
occasionally giving him a shake, and a kick
upon the breech with his knee, while the
Frenchman
,
very much to the delight of his tormentor,
roared out piteously for mercy.
Upon his examination at the fort, the prisoner
acknowledged that he and his slain companion
had been sent forward, by Monsieur De Villiers,
who was at the head of an army of French and
Indians, amounting to nearly two thousand men,
to reconnoitre the position and strength of the
British under colonel Washington; and that they
had the whole of that day been concealed in the
hollow where they had fallen in with captain
Adderly
,
and only waited for the coming of night to
approach nearer the works, and explore them
more minutely. He also stated that the French
Vol. II. 10
army could not be far distant; and if they did not
delay for the return of their spies, they might
advance
to attack the fort the next day.
To account for the unexpected and timely
approach
of Peter M`Fall to his master's rescue, I
must inform the reader that Mr. Gist, to whose
house it will be remembered, he had been
conveyed
by Paddy Frazier for the purpose of
keeping
him out of the way of mischief,
understanding
that provisions were scarce, and
consequently
dear at the fort, had, while the main body of
the troops were absent on the excursion that has
been mentioned, visited the garrison in order to
dispose of some of the productions of his farm,
and had been there informed of Charles
Adderly's
situation in the army. He communicated
this intelligence to Peter, who immediately
resolved
to rejoin his master. He accordingly bade a
tender adieu to the fair Esther Gist, whose charms
had made him forget those of Molly M`Nickle, and
starting for Fort Necessity, which was not more
than fifteen or sixteen miles distant, arrived,
as we have seen, just at the critical moment to
save his master from destruction. He at once
resumed, very much to the satisfaction of both
parties, his old station as the faithful and
favourite
servant of Charles Adderly.
CHAPTER VIII.
At length the fresh'ning western blast,
Aside the shroud of battle cast;
And first the ridge of mingled spears,
Above the bright'ning cloud appears;
And in the smoke the pennon's flew,
As in the storm the white sea mew,
Then mark'd they, dashing broad and far,
The broken billows of the war
Wide rose the battle on the plain,
Crests rose, and stoop'd, and rose again.
Scott
.
The
information which the captured
Frenchman
had given of the vicinity of the enemy, was
found the next morning to be correct. The day
had scarcely dawned, when Washington received
intelligence from some of the out-posts that the
hostile standards were approaching, and that the
woods to a considerable extent, seemed to be
alive with French and Indians. The garrison was
immediately under arms, and every man at his
station
,
expecting a severe conflict, but resolved to
do his duty, so that if the enemy should prevail,
they should pay dear for their victory. Their
defences were far from being complete. The
trench had not been altogether cut round the
stoccade, in a few places it was barely marked
out, and in none was it so deep as to be an
effectual
barrier to the assailants. The stoccade was
itself very imperfect in many places, there being
yet several gaps entirely destitute of stakes. The
hostile force was at least three to one, and was
equally well appointed in all the implements of
war. But brave men, although they may see
danger
,
never lose courage; and Washington with
great promptitude and coolness, made such
judicious
arrangements for receiving the assailants,
that confidence was inspired in every one of his
men, and even hopes of victory began to actuate
their bosoms. In order to animate them still
more, their heroic commander, after each
company
had received its instructions, and taken its
station, addressed to it a short speech, reminding
the soldiers that upon their valour and good
conduct
that day, the safety of a thousand innocent
Christian families upon the frontiers depended.
Think, said he, in some of these short
addresses
,
on the consequence of our being
defeated
on this occasion. Hordes of merciless
savages will be let loose upon your defenceless
wives and children, who will riot in their
destruction
,
and will, ere they send their miserable
victims
to eternity, inflict on them every species of
torture they can invent. Oh, I therefore conjure
you, my fellow-soldiers, to be steady and strong
to-day, and if possible, save your country, and her
children, from such calamities.
As the enemy was advancing in a direction
where the ditch was, to a considerable extent,
between four and five feet deep, Captain
Adderly
was there stationed with about a hundred
marksmen, who were instructed to conceal
themselves
by remaining in a stooping posture until
their adversaries approached so near that there
would be no danger of their fire missing them,
when they should open it with as sure and steady
an aim as possible. Each of these marksmen
was supplied, in addition to his rifle, with a
loaded
musket, so that the party could without
intermission
,
pour upon their enemies two
successive
discharges; or if it should be necessary,
meet them at the point of the bayonet. The
remainder
of the troops kept within the stoccade,
ready also to give the foe a fiery and deadly
salute
,
whenever he should venture near enough.
These dispositions on the part of the
Virginians
,
were scarcely made, when the savage
warwhoop
was heard between nine and ten o'clock
in the morning, and at the distance of about six
hundred yards from the ditch, the enemy halted,
and a volley from a thousand muskets was
instantly
poured upon the stoccade. Some of the
badly
fixed piles were overthrown, and five or six of
the Virginians killed by this discharge. They,
however, coolly reserved their fire for some
minutes
,
until the assailants, encouraged by this
forbearance
,
advanced rapidly to within about a
hundred yards of the ditch, when captain
Adderly
gave a preconcerted signal to his marksmen,
and that instant a hundred Frenchmen pressed
the ground. They paused for a moment, and
were inclined to fall back, but De Villiers
supposing
the Virginian rifles to be now unloaded,
urged them forward to storm the fort, when they
were again saluted by a volley from both the ditch
and the stoccade, which levelled nearly a hundred
and fifty more of them to the earth.
De Villiers now conceived it prudent to avoid
that fatal ditch, and attack the fort in an other
quarter. He accordingly drew off his men from
the reach of the Virginian fire, which movement
allowed Adderly's marksmen an opportunity to
reload unmolested. The enemy now keeping at
a respectful distance from the fort, marched
towards
its southeast quarter, where they hoped to
find it more easily assailable. But when opposite
this quarter, although they perceived its ramparts
to be less complete than elsewhere, yet being
ignorant
of the depth of the ditch that fronted it,
*10
they for several hours, manifested a shyness to
approach, lest similar volleys to those they had so
fatally experienced from Adderly's men, should
issue from it. They, however, kept up an
irregular
and very inefficient fire from behind the
shelter
of trees and long grass, upon the garrison,
which the latter seemed to take very coolly and
patiently, never returning it except when some of
the Indians or French came within hitting
distance
of their marksmen.
Towards the after part of the day, as if this
apparent
contempt shewn by the garrison, had at last
roused and irritated him to greater boldness and
energy of action, De Villiers came rapidly on with
his whole force, seemingly resolved to take the
place, cost what it would. But here, also,
captain
Adderly's marksmen lay in wait for him. They
discharged their rifles, as before, but the enemy
had not come in such a compact body, and
therefore
,
although they lost a number of men, and
were for a moment made to recoil, they soon
recovered
their order, and pushed forward
regardless
of danger. Even a second volley, although
it told fatally upon them, was not sufficient to check
their progress, as their whole force, Indians as
well as French, seemed to be inspired with an
absolute
contempt of destruction.
In a minute, the enemy had gained the edge of
the ditch, and the rifles of Adderly's men were
unloaded
;
but their bayonets were fixed, and a
cheveaux-de-frise of that formidable weapon
instantly
presented itself against them, over which
it was impossible for the French to proceed.
About a hundred bayonets, however, could not
defend the whole trench against such a number of
enemies as now assailed it, and several strong
parties
of the French were, in a moment, at other
points attempting to cross it. These were
instantly
attacked with a heavy fire from the stoccade,
notwithstanding which, upwards of five hundred,
led on by De Villiers in person, had succeeded in
descending into the ditch, and would, perhaps,
have made their way into the fort, had not
Washington
promptly charged them, at the head of
about one hundred and fifty men, with fixed
bayonets
,
before they could ascend to the level
ground. This charge was assisted at a very
critical
moment by a well directed fire from the
NewYorkers
,
who were stationed within the stoccade.
De Villiers, was, in consequence, obliged to
withdraw
,
after leaving between fifty and sixty of his
men dead on the spot.
Captain Adderly, much about the same time,
had driven off the party with which he had been
engaged. Not content, however, with this
advantage
,
his impetuosity induced him to follow the
enemy upon the open space. He accordingly
sprang out of the trench, and calling on his men
to follow him, he was obeyed. The enemy, who
were at least three to one against him, turned
upon him, and his small band would, in all
probability
,
have been cut to pieces, had not
Washington
perceived their danger, and with the
hundred
and fifty Virginians that had driven off De
Villiers, flew to their aid, and the enemy thought
proper to retire to the shelter of the woods, which
they did in tolerably good order; not, however,
before Captain Adderly and Monsieur Joncaire
had met in single combat, and the latter had been
hewn to the earth, receiving a dreadful fracture in
the skull, of which he died a few days afterwards.
Both Washington's and Adderly's parties now
returned to their old stations, as pursuing a hostile
force upon exposed ground, who were so much their
superior in number, and as well furnished for
battle
as themselves, would have been absolute
madness.
A cessation of the attack now took place, and
Washington had time to inquire into the real
posture
of affairs. Between sixty or seventy of his
men were killed, and upwards of a hundred so
badly
wounded as to be incapable of service. The
enemy were repulsed, it is true, but there was every
probability that the attack would be renewed the
next day; and if the assailants should happen to
direct their force to the quarter where the
shallowness
of the trench would permit them easily
to pass, the fort must fall. If, on the other hand,
they should be too much intimidated by the warm
reception they had just received, to renew their
attempt to storm the place, and should content
themselves with blockading it, and cutting off its
expected supplies, the surrender of the garrison
must be equally, nay, perhaps more inevitably
certain, as it did not possess, at that moment, more
than three days scanty allowance of provisions.
The only chance of extrication from these
difficulties
,
Washington conceived would be a
renewal
of the attack by the enemy upon the same
points on which they had already made it. This
would afford his troops an opportunity of again
repulsing
the assailants, and perhaps compelling
them to abandon the enterprise. It was,
therefore
,
his great object to prevent them from
discovering
the weak parts of his defence; and he
accordingly
ordered that, during the night, these should
be particularly guarded from the approach of spies
and reconnoiterers.
While he was making arrangements for
preventing
a surprise, a trumpeter approached from the
French, who were encamping in the woods, about
eight or nine hundred yards distant, demanding a
parley, and permission for an officer to enter the
fort in order to negotiate for its surrender.
Washington promptly refused to grant the last
request. He declared that he would permit none
of the enemy to enter the fort without detaining
him there as a prisoner; and that if the French
commander was serious in his desire to negotiate,
he must give a passport for a British officer to
proceed
to his camp for the purpose, and also his
written parole for his safe return. Washington's
caution in this matter arose from his
unwillingness
to expose the incompleteness of his works to
any of the enemy, and it also occurred to him that
this request for negotiation might be a contrivance
of De Villier's to discover any assailable quarter
for a new attack.
De Villiers, however, granted the parole
required
,
and Captain Adderly was appointed to wait
upon him, and ascertain the terms he had to
propose. These terms being very little short of
absolute surrender, were quite inadmissable; and
Washington instructed Charles to inform the
French commander, that unless he greatly
humbled
his views, and moderated his pretensions, an
attempt to negotiate was only useless trouble, and
should be no longer attended to.
This reply induced Villiers to conceive that the
British were more confident of being able to
resist
him than he expected. He therefore in a
second message, did lower his tone considerably,
offering to permit the garrison, both officers and
privates, on giving their parole not to serve in this
country again during the continuation of the
present
contest, against the French, or their allies,
permission to return to their several homes, with
such provisions as were necessary for their
journey
,
but without any of their arms or military
stores.
Tell Monsieur De Villiers, said Washington,
after hearing these proposals, that he very much
mistakes both our situation and our dispositions,
if he calculates on our accepting such terms.
The only terms I shall accept are these,That
we shall be allowed the honours of war, permitted
to retain our arms, baggage, and stores of every
kind; and also to take our own time to march
without
molestation back to Virginia.Rather than
capitulate on any other conditions, I shall bury
myself and every man who shall adhere to me,
amidst the ruins of our Fort. De Villiers need
not, therefore, trouble me with any other answer
than an acceptance of these terms.
When Captain Adderly reported this reply to
De Villiers, that young Washington is an
obstinate
commander, said he, but I see he is a
brave one;and I believe I can make nothing
more of him, without considerable slaughter.
Let him have his terms, therefore, in the name of
heaven, so that I may get him out of this part of
the country.
The capitulation was accordingly drawn up in
French, and afterwards translated into English,
when it was signed by the officers on both sides.
The next morning the British removed all their
stores out of the fort, and with their colours flying,
their music playing, and the troops marching in
military
array, they evacuated it, and paraded at some
distance beyond the French encampment.
As their horses were chiefly either killed or
captured during the engagement, they were
unable
to carry off all their stores. They,
therefore
,
to prevent them from falling into the hands
of the French, destroyed the greater portion,
preserving
only what they could bear away on their
shoulders. They then continued their march
homewards, and in about three days after leaving
Fort Necessity, arrived at the inhabited parts of
Virginia.
All ranks of Colonel Washington's countrymen
were highly pleased with the bravery and good
conduct he had displayed during these
transactions
;
and, indeed, the whole party received
great applause for their spirited and gallant
behaviour
.
When the legislature met, they
expressed
their satisfaction at what had been done,
by presenting a sum of money to be distributed
among the soldiers, and passing a vote of thanks
to Colonel Washington and the officers under his
command, for the credit which their conduct had
reflected on their country.
To this vote of thanks, Washington, in the name
of the officers, made the following reply:
We, the officers of the Virginia regiment, are
highly sensible of the particular mark of
distinction
with which you have honoured us in
returning
your thanks for our behaviour in the late
action
;
and cannot help testifying our grateful
acknowledgments
for your high sense of what we
shall always esteem a duty to our country and the
best of kings.
Favoured with your regard, we shall
zealously
endeavour to deserve your applause, and by
our future actions strive to convince the
worshipful
house of burgesses how much we esteem their
approbation, and, as it ought to be, regard it as
the voice of our country.
Signed for the whole corps,
GEO. WASHINGTON.
[1]
[1]
See Marshall's Life of Washington.
Although, as is natural to suppose, the applauses
bestowed on this young hero, on this occasion,
strengthened his predilection for a military life,
yet, shortly after this, some untoward
circumstances
took place, which induced him to
relinquish
it for the present, and to retire to a private
station. These were owing to a controversy which
arose between the officers commissioned by the
king, and those commissioned only by the
governors
of the colonies, concerning rank, the former
claiming precedence over the latter of the same
grade, when acting together in the same service.
I shall not here enter into the merits of this
controversy
,
which is detailed fully in the histories of
the times, and which was one cause among many
others that prevented more effectual measures
from being taken against the French during the
remainder of this campaign.
Colonel Washington and Captain Adderly took
part with the provincial officers in the discussion
of this matter; and as those holding commissions
from the crown at length carried their point, these
two gentlemen retired from the service, and many
of the Virginian officers followed their example.
Governor Dinwiddie addressed several letters to
Washington, pressing him still to hold his
commission
,
in reply to which he asserted his unabated
attachment for military employments, and his
undiminished
desire to serve his country when she
needed himBut, said he, I can only serve
with pleasure, when it is in my power to do so
without dishonour.
He indeed perceived that his remaining in the
service at this time would be attended with very
little advantage to the public; for although Great
Britain had now declared war against the enemy,
and large European succours were expected soon
to arrive in the colonies, yet the councils of the
latter were so distracted, and their resources so
badly managed, that it was easy to see that no
enterprise
of importance would be undertaken
against the French this season.
De Villiers, indeed, had on his part given
occasion
for none; for, satisfied with having driven
Washington out of the Wilderness, and, perhaps,
conceiving it imprudent to maintain a station so
near the borders of the British settlements as Fort
Necessity, he relinquished it the very day after its
capture, and retraced his steps back to Fort Du
Quesne.
Some Indian ravages, it is true, were towards
the latter part of the season, committed on the
back-settlers of Virginia and Pennsylvania; but,
considering the failure of Washington's
expedition
,
the frontiers suffered infinitely less than might
have been expected. That very expedition, it is
presumed, although it had failed in its primary
object, had given both the French and the Indians
such a severe sample of what they would receive
from British vengeance, if they should arouse it,
by too much provocation, to the exertion of its
full strength, that they thought proper to exercise
some caution and forbearance towards them, at
least until the season should be so far advanced,
that the colonial troops could not again take the
field. It may be also mentioned, that, after
Washington's resignation, one Colonel Innes
obtained
the command of the Virginia regiment,
which being recruited and joined by several
companies
of regulars from Maryland and North
Carolina
,
presented to the view of the Indians a force
which, although it undertook the performance of
nothing important, was still sufficient to keep them
in such awe as to restrain their depredations.
Although the court of London, as soon as it
found that reasoning would have no effect in
causing
that of Versailles to relinquish its claims upon
the Ohio country, did not hesitate to draw the
Vol. II. 11
sword in order to accomplish that end; yet no
European troops were sent to assist the colonies
to drive the intruders off the contested ground for
several months after the war was declared, and
during the whole of the autumn of 1754 and the
following winter, the French remained
unmolested
in the possession of the Wilderness.
The family of Frazier continued as usual to
follow
their employments undisturbed by the French,
with whom Paddy managed to keep on the most
cordial footing. The assistance he had rendered
Washington never became suspected, and both
he and Dr. Killbreath continued to trade with
them and the Indians as freely, and with as little
fear, as if they had never taken any part with
their enemies. As to the Indians, the friendship
of Tonnaleuka secured theirs to the family, and
except the disappointment which Gilbert felt from
the bad success of his countrymen, he had, on this
occasion, no cause for uncasiness; at least he felt
none from apprehension of either his own security
or that of his family.
With respect to Maria's feelings on hearing of
the transactions at Fort Necessity, the uncertainty
under which she laboured concerning Charles
Adderly's fate, gave her great uneasiness, but that
uneasiness was confined to her own breast.
Perhaps
on that very account it was the more
painful
;
and, although she was not without hopes,
still her fears of some misfortune having taken
place would sometimes amount almost to agony,
and she would have given any consideration to be
assured of his safety; nay, such is often the
intolerable
nature of suspense, that, if the worst had
happened, she would have made almost any
sacrifice
to know it. At length fortune had
compassion
upon her, and relieved her anxiety by
throwing
in her way a Philadelphia newspaper, which
Paddy had procured from an Indian who had
wrapped it round some articles of spoil, of which
he had plundered one of the Pennsylvanian
settlers
on the frontiers, about the latter end of
autumn
,
when several marauding parties of the
savages
,
as has been observed, ventured to make a
few predatory excursions. This paper contained
the following paragraph, which communicated joy
to her soul.
It is with great pleasure that we announce the
arrival in our city of that gallant young man,
Charles Adderly, who commanded the party sent
out in the beginning of last winter, to take
possession
of the lands belonging to the Ohio Company,
in our western wilderness, and upon which the
French garrison of Le Buf committed the daring
outrage which has been often mentioned in our
paper in terms of indignation, and which we
rejoice
that our mother country has at length
determined
to chastise, in a manner becoming her rank
and dignity among the nations.
Mr. Adderly's friends had been for several
months uncertain of his fate, and their joy on being
again blessed with the society of one so much
valued
and beloved, after he had, as many supposed,
fallen a victim to savage revenge and cruelty, will
not be easily imagined. This gentleman's
adventures
in the western wilderness, during the last
winter, we are informed, have been of the most
singular and romantic character. Until the
appearance
of the gallant Washington in that
quarter
gave him an opportunity of joining his
countrymen
,
he owed his safety only to concealment in
the lonely dells and darksome caverns that abound
in that dreary wild. Great, indeed, must have
been his sufferings, and miraculous his escapes,
during the inclement season he was obliged to
seek shelter in such lurking-places.
We trust that Mr. Adderly, or some of his
friends, will one day favour the public with a
narrative
of his adventures, during his excursions to
the west. We are persuaded that there are none
but would feel extremely interested in the perusal
of such a work.
The information thus obtained having
tranquillized
Maria's mind concerning her lover's safety,
and no accident of a serious nature occurring to
her during the winter, she passed it with as much
satisfaction and ease of mind as in Charles's
absence
could be reasonably expected. This
absence
,
however, it must not be denied,
occasioned
her many an hour's anxious meditation; and
when in good weather she would take a ramble
through her native woods, often would the
recollection
of her Charles's image melt her into
tenderness
.
On such occasions, often did she recall
to her thoughts the beautiful lines of Shenstone,
with a very slight alteration, so descriptive of her
own feelings:
Dear regions of silence and shade!
Soft scenes of contentment and ease,
Where I could have pleasingly stray'd,
If aught in his absence could please.
CHAPTER IX.
Oh! thou pale orb that silent shines,
While care-untroubled mortals sleep!
Thou seest a wretch that inly pines,
And wanders here to wail and weep!
With wo I nightly vigils keep,
Beneath thy wan unwarming beam;
And mourn in lamentation deep,
How life and love are but a dream.
Burns
.
There
is, perhaps, no class of beings in the
world more apt to be tormented with incidents
that are at cross-purposes with their wishes, than
lovers. It would be easy to prove the truth of
this assertion by a thousand examples; but it
would be too tedious a business. I shall, therefore,
not prove it all, unless the following statement of
some perplexities that befell Charles Adderly
shortly after his return to Philadelphia, be
received
as a proof.
The joy of his father and mother on seeing their
only son, whom they looked upon almost as if he
had been restored from the grave, once more safe
under their roof, was such as tender parents will
readily conceive. They in a few days invited a
large party of their numerous friends, for the
friends of the rich are always numerous, to a
splendid
ball and supper, in celebration of the joyful
occasion. This brilliant party consisted of some
of the most distinguished and fashionable families
then in Philadelphia. Its ladies in particular
comprised
almost all that was beautiful, gay, and
engaging
11 *
the city; but amidst the whole
fascinating
ing group, there was one object whom every eye
singled out as the most worthy of admiration.
This was Miss Arabella Walworth, niece and
heiress
to Robert Walworth, Esq. reputed to be the
most opulent banker in America. This young
lady had been the only child of John Walworth,
a West India merchant, who died in Jamaica about
ten years before her appearance in the gay
assembly
of which we are speaking, and had left her the
sole heiress of a property said to amount to
between
thirty and forty thousand pounds sterling.
She had lost her mother about three years
afterwards
,
and her uncle, the banker, had for the last
seven been her only guardian and protector.
Charles's father had long contemplated this
young lady as an eligible match for his son, and had
even gone so far as to secure the banker's
acquiescence
.
Although the old gentlemen had thus
easily arranged the matter between themselves,
they had not as yet imparted their scheme to the
young people; and Mr. Adderly now thought that
it would be but fair to give them an opportunity of
getting fond of each other, by which means the
match would be rendered much more agreeable,
and easily effected. Mr. Walworth, who knew
little about the influence of the tender passions,
being one of those cold-blooded, good sort of
honest
money-making men, who never feel any of
the sweeter and more endearing impulses of life,
would have gone less ceremoniously to work, and
would have had the deeds of matrimony signed,
sealed, and delivered without delay; for, said
he, in reply to some observation of old Adderly,
recommending a more cautious mode of
proceeding
,
I can see no objection that the parties to this
contract can have to perfecting its obligation,
since they must, each of them, on the first
inspection
,
be convinced of getting value received. But
as it is a kind of business in which I have no
experience
,
being now in my fifty-ninth year, without
having ever bargained for a wife, I will leave it to
your management, for you must know better what
is needful to be done in the premises. Only I
wish you to make every reasonable despatch, lest,
by keeping the bargain in suspense, Arabella may
miss a profitable market.
There is no danger of that, replied Charles's
father; your niece, you may be assured, will for
these ten years to come, be as disposable a
commodity
as any of her kind in the province. But
you may depend on it, Mr. Walworth, that I too
anxiously wish her to become my daughter-in-law,
to delay its accomplishment any longer than the
nature of the transaction will require.
On the night of the ball already mentioned,
Charles's father and mother used every
contrivance
in their power to draw the attention of the
young pair towards each other.
The greatest favourite I have in the room,
would his mother observe, and, I believe, the
best young lady in the city, is Miss Walworth.
I have always thought her an uncommonly fine
girl, would his father reply; eminently
beautiful
and accomplished, and mistress of nearly forty
thousand pounds in ready money, besides her
expectations
from the banker. Charles, I shall be
glad if you secure this young lady for your partner
to-night.
If she will consent to it, replied Charles very
complaisantly, I shall do so; for I really believe
her to be a very amiable young woman.
And don't you think her also handsome?
asked the father.
Very much so, replied the son, carelessly.
Have you ever seen any woman you thought
more so? said the father.
That is rather an embarrassing question,
returned
Charles, in some confusion, for he thought
of his Maria; I request time to reflect on an
answer
.
Well, Charles, no matter about an answer; I
wish to see her your partner to-night, at any rate,
observed his father.
If it be in my power, sir, said Charles, you
shall be gratified.
He accordingly did, in the most polite manner,
request the fair lady to dance with him, and was
honoured with her compliance; and many a
gallant
youth that night envied his felicity.
Charles, indeed, found her society during the
whole evening extremely agreeable and
interesting
;
and his native politeness towards the sex,
independent
of a wish to gratify his father, induced
him to pay her the most pointed attention. But
even at that moment, the image of the sweet maid
of the Wilderness reigned triumphant in his soul;
and as he reflected that, while he was thus
surrounded
with splendour and enjoyment, she might
be a prey to misfortune, perhaps the victim of
lawless
passion and barbarity, he became thoughtful,
and more than once, in the midst of his gaiety and
mirth, heaved a sigh, which his father, who
observed
all his attentions to Miss Walworth, perceived
with great satisfaction, as an indication that she
had already made some impression upon his heart.
As to the young lady, she, unfortunately for her
own peace, drew a similar conclusion. She saw
Charles Adderly; she had heard of his military
exploits, as they had been eulogised in the official
communications of Washington. He was just
such a man, he was just such a hero, as she
wished
should love her; and she felt, from this night
she too unequivocally felt, that she loved him.
But, although in every respect admirable and
highly finished, both in beauty and
accomplishments
,
yet, even if his heart had been disengaged,
she was not exactly the character that Charles
Adderly
could have loved. Her manner seemed
rather
to challenge and claim admiration and homage
by an assumption of dignity, and a display of
conscious
superiority, than to attract and warm into
fondness by an irresistible combination of faultless
loveliness, unaffected sweetness, amiable humility,
and the thousand nameless and bewitching graces
that shone from both the person and the mind of
Maria Frazier.
Charles, however, was pleased with the
preference
which this high beauty of the world of fashion
in his native city manifested for him, on this
evening
,
over the many agreeable young men who
fluttered
round her, and sighed to obtain from her an
approving smile.
As they sat together during an interval of
dancing
,
a young man named Morley, of good
connexions
and large property in the city, who had
been long enamoured of Miss Walworth, and had
lately made some unrequited declarations of his
passion, approached and saluted them. Charles,
who had formerly been intimate with this young
man, invited him to sit beside them.
Perhaps my presence will only spoil the
agreeable
import of your conversation, said Morley,
looking rather discontentedly at the lady.
If you think so, sir, she replied, you know
what best becomes you to do. I presume Mr.
Morley has more good-breeding than to offer his
presence where he imagines it is not wanted.
I beg pardon, Miss Walworth, he replied;
it was only my fears of being an intruder that
suggested the idea. I hope Captain Adderly does
not conceive me one. If he says the word, I shall
retire.
I am perfectly satisfied with your presence,
observed Charles; neither do I believe that Miss
Walworth feels it disagreeable. You must, indeed,
Mr. Morley, be much altered since I knew you, if
you have become an unpleasant companion.
I have no objection to the gentleman's
company
,
said Arabella; but he himself seemed to
think that we did not want it. Did you not think
so, Mr. Morley? I must have you to speak
candidly
on the question.
I really did think then, my fair catechizer,
said Morley, that you might have something of
a confidential nature to discuss, which my
presence
would interrupt: I therefore expressed the
idea, so that if it happened to be correct, I might
at once relieve you of the interruption; for I
assure
you, my friends, much as I value your
society
,
I do not wish to enjoy it at the expense of
your satisfaction.
Well, let us drop the discussion, said the
lady; and since Captain Adderly has no
objection
to your company, and you seem to desire his,
I have no right to interfere between you. But,
perhaps, gentlemen, you would both feel more
comfortable in my absence.
Oh, Miss Walworth! observed Charles, how
can you think so? Surely you do not suppose that
my late residence among the Indians has made
me such a savage as that?
Nofar be it from me, she replied, to
think so. But there are some young fellows who,
I believe, have never been five miles out of the
bounds of Penn's city, whose manners frequently
appear as if they had been altogether bred among
savages.
Miss Walworth, said Morley, who felt this
remark to be levelled at himself, if my
inconsiderate
expression has offended you, I recant it.
But noit was truthI really perceive that my
presence has disagreeably interrupted the
enjoyment
of more pleasing company.
Whether I prefer the company of others to
yours, or not, she replied, has, surely, Mr.
Morley
,
nothing to do with my assertion as to the
savages
I have seen bred in Philadelphia; for, I
assure you, I have seen some in this city so rude,
that, although their friends and their fortunes may
sometimes gain them admission into good
company
,
I would, for my part, rather see one of the
wild Chippeways stalking into my presence.
You are too severe upon the youth of your
native
city, observed Charles, who felt for
Morley
,
as he perceived him much mortified;
surely
,
Miss Walworth you do not include us all in
your remarks?
God forbid, she exclaimed; the same
Paradise
that contained an angel, we are told
contained
also a serpent. But what say you, Mr.
Morley, she continued, smiling in that
gentleman's
face, in order to relieve his chagrin, which
she saw had been as highly excited as she wished;
what say you, my friend, would it not be for the
advantage of some of our young people, ladies, I
believe, as well as gentlemen, to visit the savages
to get their city rust rubbed off? Pray, Captain
Adderly, what kind of women are
those
squaws?
Have you ever seen any of them you thought
handsome? But, Mr. Morley, be pleased to be
seated, and then Captain Adderly will let us hear
of those Indian women.
Miss Walworth, I am all complaisance to the
commands of the fair, replied Morley, seating
himself beside Charles. One smile from
beautiful
lips will always remove from my mind the
impression
of a thousand frowns.
Ah! you are very good-natured, I know,
she returned; but, my dear sir, you look so well
in the pet, that it would be a pity you should not
sometimes fall into it; and then again you are so
much improved on your recovery, really it is
delightful
to see you go through the process of a
little
ill-humour. But let us bear of the squaws?
Do they ever get angry, Captain?
Angry! observed Charles, no, no, Miss
Walworth, they leave that for their husbands.
That's right, said Morley, I wish our
pretty
white ladies would also do the same. How
charming they would be!
It would be very unfortunate, sir, returned
the lady; especially if all our white men were
so difficult to keep in order as you. Captain
Adderly
,
do the savage men ever get angry?
Very frequently with each other, replied
Charles; but seldom or never, I believe, with
their women.
Thank you, sir, she observed; hence at
once is seen the reason why the squaws are so
good-natured. I'll warrant you, if they had some
of our Philadelphia bucks among them, they would
soon change their tempers. But you didn't tell
me if they are handsome?
Ah! Miss Walworth, replied Charles, you
must excuse me there. My eyes, I believe, have
too much Christian partiality in their vision, to be
a proper judge in this matter; and present beauty
I have ever felt blind-folding in its qualities.
I understand you, sir, she returned smartly;
although it is odd, too, that beauty should have
upon you an effect so different from what it has on
other people, who generally accuse it of too much
brightness. Yonder are some ladies opposite to
us, from whose countenances I will undertake to
say, that Mr. Morley will acknowledge he sees
light issuing; and let him converse but five minutes
with any one of them, he will protest that her eyes
dart flames. How then, sir, could they blind-fold
you?
Perhaps by excess of light, returned Charles.
Men, you know, have been struck blind by
lightning
.
But yonder is the signal for another set.
Miss Walworth, have the goodness to honour
me
So saying, he arose, bowed to the lady, who
gave him her hand, and whispering to Morley to
follow with a partner, he led his fair companion
smiling towards the dancing part of the company.
But joy on earth is never lasting. A few hours
rolled round, and the merry revellers of this gay
party were obliged to separate. They
accordingly
hastened to their respective homes, where on
their dull couches, (such are the contrasts of
human
life) they sought repose from the fatigue of
joy, and concealment from the admiring gaze of
the world.
A close intimacy was now cultivated between
the families of Adderly and Walworth; the heads
of which, with great satisfaction, conceived that
their plans for a still closer connexion, were on the
fair way of being soon accomplished. Not a week
passed but reciprocal parties were several times
given at both houses. Mrs. Adderly never
seemed
so happy as when she had her son to
accompany
her on visits to Arabella; and Arabella never
permitted any other engagements to interfere with
her returning these visits. Charles, on such
occasions
,
frequently found his presence expected to
accompany her both in coming and going; and
very often, so familiar did their intimacy during
the autumn become, he was put in requisition to
Vol. II 12
attend her, in her carriage to short excursions into
the country. There they often recreated
themselves
amidst groves, and shady bowers, and by
the banks of purling brooks, and all the tempting
situations for love; and Charles, it must not be
denied
,
frequently found his natural fondness for the
sex in such situations excited to a passing feeling
of something like tenderness for the fair companion
of his dangerous rambles. But he meritoriously
held fast to his heart's integrity. Meritoriously
did I say! Alas! he had no merit in the affair. It
was his feelings, feelings of affection and passion
interwoven with his very existence, that kept him
constant to his first and only love. What, if he
felt his heart warm at the soft seducing glances,
and love-speaking blushes of the universally
admired
beauty of the gay world, who indulged him
with so much of her society! What, if he felt a
keener throb than usual beating at his heart, as
leaning on his arm she would, perhaps
involuntarily
,
press it to her bosom! There surely was
nothing of infidelity in it. There might be
weakness
in it, but it was the weakness of human
nature
,
and but momentary. One single reflection
upon the charms of his distant Maria would calm
the storm, restore him to strength, and to those
feelings of true love that he delighted to cherish.
It must not, however, be concealed, that in some
of those unguarded moments, his natural
politeness
was perhaps exceeded in the warmth of
expression
with which he complimented his fair and
tempting companion. But these compliments,
although
often taken for more than they really
expressed
,
by the young lady who wished them to
express more, were never intended by Charles to
express even half their literal meaning; and were
sometimes more than half repented of ere they
were fully uttered. It must also be said in his
justification, that had he conceived Miss
Walworth
would have looked upon them in any other
light than as the mere dictates of that
common-place
gallantry and politeness, due by all men to a
fine woman, he would have allowed no temptation
to induce him to utter them.
He was all this time not aware that he was
looked
upon by the whole city as the favoured and
fortunate
candidate for Miss Walworth's hand. His
pointed attentions to her, and the exclusive
preference
she so publicly gave him over all her other
admirers, were of themselves sufficient to give rise
to this opinion, which was now become the
current
report and firm belief of all the gossips of the
day; but it was also so strongly corroborated and
almost confirmed by the fact transpiring, whether
by accident or design is not material, of the lady's
guardian and the gentleman's father, having
actually
agreed upon the conditions of the match,
that the most skeptical on the subject could not
at last withhold their assent to the truth of the
report.
Matters were thus circumstanced, when one
day Charles went to pay his usual visit to Mr.
Walworth's. The servant informed him, that
Miss Walworth was in the drawing-room. He
ascended the stairs without ceremony, and, the
door of the drawing-room being a little open, he
had scarcely reached the landing-place, when he
heard the young lady saying in a voice rather
above her usual tone to some person in the
room
It is a matter, sir, that cannot concern you.
I have a right to bestow my affections, yes, and
my hand too, upon any person I chooseand if I
have preferred Captain Adderly, it has been my
own pleasure to do so, and I hope, sir, I am not
accountable to you for my preferences or my
conduct
.
Charles paused for a moment, uncertain
whether
to advance or retire; he would have done
the latter, but he had already advanced too far,
for the lady, who was walking about the room,
happened that instant to see him, and exclaimed
Ah, here is Charles himself coming!
He hastened forward, while she held out her
hand, which he gracefully saluted, and turning
round, made a bow to his friend, Mr. Morley,
which was returned with a dry and rather
offensive
nod.
Captain Adderly, said the lady, assuming an
air of great irritation and triumph, that
gentleman
has just had the impertinence to question me
as to the disposal of my heart, and to complain of
the preference I have given you, as if I were not
my own mistress, and could not bestow my
affections
upon whom I please. He has, indeed,
teazed
me this some time past, with his ridiculous
addresses
,
in a manner that I am determined to
tolerate
no longer.
I hope he has not insulted you? asked
Charles.
No, he has not exactly insulted me, she
replied
;
his language is of too whining a nature for
that. But I wish to God he would, for the future,
refrain from annoying me with his importunities.
I will here repeat to him, that I shall give my
hand to whomsoever I chooseand I will add,
that his presence can be at present dispensed
with.
I shall, then, proud fair one, bid you good
morning, said Morley. But I must first state
to Captain Adderly, that I have no quarrel with
him; and, heaven knows! it is still further from
my wishes to have any with you. My only fault
has been, in spite of myself, loving you too
sincerely
;
a fault which I shall, if possible,
endeavour
for the future to correct. But if I should
not be able to do so, believe me, I shall not, at
any rate, disturb your peace with the man you
prefer.
So saying, he made each of them a polite bow
and withdrew.
Oh, my Charles! cried Miss Walworth,
throwing herself upon a chair, you know not,
although
I ought to have told you, how much I have
been lately teazed with that young fellow.
Charles scarcely knew what reply to make to
such an address. It unequivocally insinuated that
she regarded him as her favourite lover, an idea
which she had never before conveyed in such
express
terms. Her conduct had, indeed, often
manifested
that she entertained such an idea. But
he had ventured to hope, especially as he was
conscious of having never made any direct
declaration
of love to her, that he must have been
mistaken
in his construction of her conduct. Her
conduct
and language were now, however, both too
plain for mistake, and he felt embarrassed, not
knowing whether he should undeceive her at
once with respect to his feelings, or let her
discover
them more gradually by his future
deportment
towards her. Both were harsh, and, after
the intimacy he had himself so imprudently
cultivated
with her, perhaps ungenerous measures, and
grating to his feelingsbut the last was certainly
the least so, and he determined to adopt it.
Miss Walworth, said he, what the nature
of your intercourse with Mr. Morley has been,
you know it is no more my right to inquire than
it was his to interrogate you about your intimacy
with me. I would be equally culpable with him
12*
if I were to do so; and you would be equally
entitled
to resent my conduct.
How, Charles! she cried, can I
understand
you? Do you not speak mysteriously? Is
it not in my power to prefer you to him, and have
I not done so? Has my conduct not all along
shown it? Have you not, therefore, privileges on
which he had no right to presume?
I acknowledge, said Charles, that you
have a right to regulate, according to your own
pleasure, the privileges you allow your friends,
and I cannot but feel grateful at the superior
confidence
you seem willing to repose in me, and I
can at least make this return for it, that I will not
betray it.
What means this? she muttered with a tone
of surprise and some irritation, this cold chilling
return! the privilege I allow
my friends!
Is it
Captain Adderly that speaks so!
Here she became much agitated, and for a few
moments continued silent. At length relapsing
into tenderness, and bursting into tears, she cried,
Oh, Charles! surely I have not deserved this
from you. You, from whose attentions I have
derived so much pleasureyou, to whom I have
given up my heartto whom I have now exposed
all my weakness. Alas! have I been deceived
by your professions! If so, I am indeed
miserable
!
Be calm, Miss Walworth, returned Charles,
greatly moved, and willing to soothe herfor at
that moment he had not the heart to increase the
pangs he had already inflictedAlas! be
composed
,
my dear madam; whatever professions I
have made, they may have been mistaken, but I
assure you that they never were intended to be so.
Here the propriety of resolving not to encourage
her delusion recurred to him, and he added, For
the future my conduct shall lead to no mistake.
Miss Walworth, I shall leave you now to become
tranquillized, and believe me, it shall afford me
great pleasure to hear that you have succeeded.
So saying, he bade her good morning, and was
retiring when she caught him by the arm, and
exclaimed
Oh, Charles! Charles! do not leave me thus,
without some assurance that you love me; for,
alas! you have raised a doubt.
How different is this woman from the mild,
the modest, the retiring Maria! thought he, and
he was at once determined how to act.
Excuse me, Miss Walworth, he replied;
from my soul I pity you, but I can assure you of
nothing more at present.
Thenthen she cried, what means that
covenant concerning us, into which your father and
my uncle have entered?
What covenant? asked Charles, with
surprise
.
Is it possible that you know not of it? said
she.
I assure you, upon my honour, I know nothing
of it, he replied.
Ah! then, I am doubly deceived, said she.
My uncle spoke of it as a marriage treaty, and
I presumed, alas! what errors have I not
presumed
,
that it was your doing.
Miss Walworth, by heavens! I believe you
have indeed been deceived! he cried, with
considerable
fervour. The innocent, the
unmeaning
pleasure I took in your company may have led
to all these mistakes; but I shall now endeavour
to correct them. May heaven forgive me, I
really
believe I have sinned against you. But I will
stay no longer, lest I repeat my fault. So
saying
,
he hurried from her presence.
The next morning, Charles, availing himself of
a pressing invitation he had received from a friend
who lived near Bristol, about twenty miles up the
Delaware, set out on horseback for that place.
There he remained for about a week, and had
time leisurely to weigh his past conduct. He
could not recollect any thing for which he could
seriously condemn himself. He had, indeed,
frequently
complimented Miss Walworth in terms of
high eulogy on both her personal charms and
elegant
manners; but then she really deserved his
encomiums, and he had no conception that she would
place any more value upon them than what they
were merely worth, namely, the light, airy, and
often
unmeaning and unreflecting expressions of a gay
and thoughtless mind telling a beautiful young
woman how pleased he was with her society, but
neither telling, nor intending to tell more.
This was the sum of his offending; and if it was
venial in itself, surely he was not answerable for
any misconstruction that either she or the world
might put upon it. He was sorry, indeed, on her
account, that such a misconstruction had taken
place, but the only thing he could now, do to
repair
the unintentional injury he had done her,
was by avoiding her society, to undeceive all
parties
,
as to his views in having courted it. With
respect to his fidelity to Maria, he had nothing
for which either to accuse or applaud himself.
He felt the constancy of his unspeakable love for
her unshaken; but for this he claimed no praise,
as he knew that it was a constancy which could
only fail when the life-blood ceased to animate
his heart.
He returned to the city on the seventh day,
after
leaving it, in obedience to a summons from his
father. A few hours after arriving in town,
feeling
a disposition for meditation and study, he
retired
to his apartment without having seen his father,
whom necessary business had kept out during the
whole evening. Before he was long there,
however
,
his father entered, with a countenance more
solemn and stern than he had ever recollected
to see him assume. He placed a light he had
brought in his hand, deliberately and silently
upon the table, and seating himself upon a chair,
drew out his pocket-book, from which he took
a paper, and also laid it on the table. After
returning the pocket-book to its place, and
adjusting
himself a little more commodiously on the
chair, he at length spoke, but it was not to give
his son a kindly welcome from the country
it was to reprimand him for going there.
Sir, said he, it appears that you took your
flight at the very time you should have attended
to make your explanationst o a beautiful young
lady, whom, by your pretensions and professions,
you have betrayed into the belief that you loved
her, and thereby succeeded in making an
impression
on her heart. Your departure under
such circumstances, is looked upon, and I am
sorry
to say, with an air of great probability, as an
intended desertion of this young woman: and the
whole city is now crying out shame against you
for such perfidious conduct. Have you aught, sir,
to say in extenuation of your fault?
My father, replied Charles; it grieves me
to hear you address me in such language, and it
grieves me still more to think that you have been
capable of suspecting, may, of accusing me of
perfidy
to any person. But I have this consolation,
amidst the misfortune of your displeasure, to be
conscious that the charge on which it is founded,
is unjust; and the only thing I can say in
extenuation
of the fault you mention, is, that it never was
intentionally or knowingly committed.
What say you? asked his father with
surprise
:
Did you never make love to Miss
Walworth
?
answer me, honestly, as you value my
favour or my displeasure.
I will answer you honestly then, my father,
said Charles, I never did.
You never did! What then meant all your
attentions
to her, your perpetual running after her
company, gallanting with her, flattering her, and
complimenting her beauty and numerous
excellent
qualities, of which it is well ascertained, that
you were not sparing?
Father, replied Charles, pardon me if I say
that you are too well acquainted with the
manners
of the world, not to know the true value and
import of such compliments, as in the thoughtless
hours of amusement and gaiety, our sex has been
long in the habit of paying to the other, and which
the other has long been in the habit of receiving
as unmeaningly as they are given. Beyond such
common-place compliments, I assure you I have
never gone in my intercourse with Miss
Walworth
;
and allow me to justify myself by saying,
that in paying her these compliments, I conceived
that I had done nothing but what, from the
customs
of society, her youth and accomplishments
entitled her to expect from any man who had any
pretensions to good-breeding.
So, after all it appears, returned his father,
that the amount of your attentions towards her,
was mere good-breeding.
So I consider it, replied Charles.
But it seems that both the young lady, and the
whole city, consider it otherwise, said his
father
.
Both the lady and the city must be mistaken,
then, observed Charles, although in
consideration
of the lady's feelings, I will say so to none
but you, to whom, alone, I am anxious to justify
myself.
Certainly you know the meaning of your own
conduct best, observed the father. But, pray,
how did it happen that you paid such unusual
attention
to one to whom you now profess your
heart to have been indifferent?
Ah, sir, said Charles, may I remind you, that
the intercourse which called for these attentions,
was not, at first, of my seeking; and through its
whole continuance, it is with extreme reluctance,
I say, though it be only to the ear of a father from
whom I wish to conceal nothing, that I was more
sought after, or else fortuitously thrown into her
company, than would many a time have been my
choice.
This statement may be correct, observed his
father in a somewhat more kindly tone, and I am
sorry for it, although it pleases me to find that
you have yet done nothing to deserve the censure
which is gone abroad against you. But, Charles,
I had set my heart upon your marrying this young
woman. I wish anxiously to see you established
in life; and in the whole city, I do not know a
match that would be more advantageous to you,
nor could I imagine that any could be found more
attractive. Her uncle is also desirous to form the
connexion, and we had gone so far, on the
presumption
that no objection could arise on your
part, as to arrange the conditions of the
marriage
articles. The reason of my not
communicating
this to you, was, that I expected every day
to receive an application from you on the
subject
,
which would have been the most natural
course of proceeding, and by far the most
agreeable
to all parties. I am sorry that the proposal
must originate, at last, with me; for as matters exist
now, I perceive that there is no other expedient
left. Your consent is alone wanted, to effect a
union which must give great and permanent
satisfaction
to all concerned, and on which the whole
community had lately set their eyes and
expectations
.
What say you, my son, will you consent to
marry the richest and most beautiful young lady
in the city, whose love for you is now so
unequivocally
declared, that ever since the day of your
supposed desertion, she has not appeared in
company
,
nor, as that letter on the table states, left
her bedchamber. But you may peruse it, sir, it
is from her uncle, and I hope it will make some
impression upon your mind.
THOMAS ADDERLY, Esq.
Dear Sir
The progress we have made in the
transaction, in which your son and my niece were
to be the parties disposed of, had induced me to
hope for a speedy and final settlement of the
affair
;
but I am sorry to say, that owing to some
misadventure on the part of your son, the
bargain
is likely to fail on your side. My niece,
which was the part of the concern for which I
stood engaged, is still substantial and ready for
delivery
,
when the equivalent shall be forthcoming,
and the demand made.
Your son, it appears, after having, by much
management, embezzled the esteem or love, or
heart, or whatever you women's-men choose to
call it, of my niece, has become a defaulter and
decamped from the premises, leaving her in a
very destitute and forlorn state. She will not
leave her own chamber; and as she scarcely makes
use of an infant's allowance of nourishment, I
fear that her health will give way, if it has not
already
done so, under the pressure of this
unexpected
shock.
As the head and principal manager of the firm
from whose deficiency in the stock of proper
conduct
,
our present embarrassments have arisen, I
call upon you, as you value the honour and
standing
of your establishment, as well as the credit
and prosperity of ours, to make all exertions to
procure the needful, and by promptly acquitting
yourselves of your obligations, relieve us out of
our present distresses.
Your due attention to these matters, is
earnestly
requested at as early a day as you can
command
.
I am, with proper consideration, your most
obedient
servant,
Robt. Walworth
.
I am, indeed, sorry that Miss Walworth has
taken this matter so much to heart, said Charles,
replacing the very classical epistle he had been
reading upon the table. But I cannot see why so
much blame should be attached to either you or
me in the affair. For my part, I stand pledged to
her for the performance of no engagement
whatever
;
and, my dear father, pardon me, when I
make use of an expression, which I apply solely
to this banker's interference, I have no notion
whatever of being in this manner bullied into a
marriage.
Charles, observed his father, more mildly
than he expected. This letter is addressed to
me. Its style may not be exactly what a pupil of
Trinity College would consider suited to the
subject
,
but it conveys explicitly enough the meaning
of the honest man who wrote it; and is designed
only to call upon me, who have pledged myself to
forward the intended connexion with all my
influence
,
to exert that influence in procuring your
consent to it. Now, Charles, what I have to say
on the subject is this: I know that love can never
Vol. II. 13
be produced by an exertion of authority, or by the
use of threats, and since you have satisfied me that
you have not, as is reported, acted meanly towards
Miss Walworth, I am not now disposed to use
either. But I would recommend you to think
seriously
,
and as a man of feeling, upon the situation
of the lady who has evidently become attached to
you; and I know so much of the tender passions,
that I have more reliance upon your becoming
impressed
favourably towards her on account of what
she feels for you, than from the fear of any threats or
displeasure I might exercise to enforce your
compliance
.
I wish you, therefore, my son, not to drop
the intercourse you have lately held with her.
Visit her as before, that you may put a stop to the
malicious exultation of those who now feel a
triumph
in her supposed desertion, and if possible,
incline your feelings to think tenderly of her.
I shall visit her, my father, replied Charles,
in obedience to your commands; but I trust that
your good sense will not, in the mean time, require
any further promise from me.
Charles accordingly did visit her. He found
her melancholy, discontented, and irritable;
evidently
suffering under the tortures of wounded
pride, as well as of disappointed love.
Captain Adderly, said she, you have given
that coxcomb Morley a triumph over me, which it
was ungenerous in you to allow. But that is of no
consequence; this triumph I can well bear, nay,
I can bear without much agony the scandal of
tea-tables
,
and the contempt of the world, that you
have procured me, but I cannot bear your disdain
without sinking under it. It is now too late to
say that I do not love you, but I will entreat
nothing
from you. It is kind in you to visit me.
It may rescue me from the contempt of my
enemies
;
and on your part, it shows compassion,
but, alas! what is compassion from you without
love?
Charles occasionally visited this young lady
during
the winter; but he took care not to take the
same liberties with her as formerly. She for a
time continued rather to decline in health, as his
visits, cold and formal as they were, inspired her
with just sufficient hopes to add the pangs of
suspense
to those of disappointment. At length
Charles supposed that, if all uncertainty in respect
to him were removed from her mind, her reason
might assist her pride to overcome her tenderness,
and produce her recovery.
He accordingly, one day that he felt very much
affected with her condition, addressed her in a
more confidential tone than usual.
Miss Walworth, said he, I have for some
time past, been impressed with the idea that you
really believe I feel some aversion towards you.
But I assure you, I have no such feeling. I am
not blind to your various excellences. I see them,
and I esteem and admire themnay, there is only
one of your sex in the world who possesses more
of my admiration. Ah! if it were not for her dear
image pre occupying all my heart, it might, in all
probability, have been long ago yours, for next to
her, I am persuaded you are the only woman
whom I ever saw, that I might have been brought
to love. But after having seen her, it is
impossible
I can ever love another. Thus, Miss
Walworth
,
you see the esteem I have for you, by the
confidence I now repose in you; and you also see
the utter impossibility of my having returned you
that tenderness and affection with which you have
been pleased to honour me. But, believe me, I
never for a moment felt disposed to triumph over
you on account of your showing me your
attachment
.
Such feelings, I know to be beyond our
own control; and because you must be convinced
that they are so, I hope you will be the more
ready to pardon my seeming indifference for those
attractions which the whole world acknowledges,
and to which I never was blind.
I feel, alas! said she, `that these feelings
are indeed beyond our control. I thank,
sincerely
thank you, for this confidence. I see now
the barrier that separated us, and perceive that it
can never be overcome. I shall try, therefore, to
struggle with my destiny; and I trust shall yet be
able to view you in a light, in which, I believe,
you will afford me reciprocity, that of a true and
faithful friend.
Happy, happy shall I be ever to consider you
such, he replied; and I pray heaven soon to
restore you to that health and tranquillity of mind
which will promise me the long enjoyment of such
a blessing.
Miss Walworth did speedily recover after this
period; and I may here mention, for my reader's
satisfaction, that the constancy of the enamoured
Morley, who, instead of triumphing, as she
supposed
he would, at her disappointment, had really
sympathized in her affliction, and had stood her
advocate amidst all the slander that was heaped
upon her, made such an impression on her mind,
that she rewarded him with her hand about a year
after the recovery of her health and tranquillity. I
may also add, that her affliction having had the
salutary effect of curing her of a great portion of
her pride, she became an excellent wife, a tender
mother, and an amiable member of society.
CHAPTER VIII.
Sooner shall the eagle of heaven be torn from the stream of his roaring
wind, when he sees the dun prey before him, the young sons of the bounding
roe, than thou, O Cathmor, be turned from the strife of renown.
Ossian
.
The
pleasing sensations experienced during the
spring months, when nature resumes all the
fascinating
softness and beauty of her original youth,
it has been long and often observed, have a
wonderful
effect in disposing the minds of all,
especially
of lovers, to unusual tenderness and
fervour
.
Affections that seemed before to be as
strong, faithful, fond, and endearing, as the human
heart is capable of feeling, appear now to become
at least more restlessly and actively so; and
separation
from a beloved object, which the force of
reason might, at other times, have enabled us to
endure, in this seductive season becomes often
intolerable.
It was, perhaps, owing to this mysterious
influence
of the sweet season, that Charles Adderly,
although it ertainly could not be said that his
affection
for Maria had sustained or was capable of
sustaining any increase, in the spring of 1755, felt
unusual anxiety to behold her. To inform his
father
of his wishes, with a view to obtain his
permission
to return to the western woods, he knew
would be fruitless; and might be injudicious, by
affording a motive, in case of any favourable
opportunity
offering to facilitate his return, of
forbidding
him to embrace it.
13 *
Charles secretly contemplated the occurrence
of such an opportunity, in the march of a British
army to act against Fort Du Quesne, the landing
of which on the shores of America was every day
expected. Nor was it long until he heard the
joyful
intelligence of a respectable armament of
European soldiers under General Braddock
having
reached the shores of Virginia, with the
avowed
intention of proceeding against the French.
He immediately solicited, and not, it is true,
without
some difficulty, obtained his father's consent to
join this army as a volunteer. Elated with the
prospect of soon again seeing his beloved, and
assisting
to expel the enemy from her
neighbourhood
,
he hastened to Alexandria, where Braddock
had agreed to meet a convention of the different
governors of the colonies, in order to settle the
plan of the campaign.
Here Charles met with his former commander,
Colonel Washington, whom Braddock, anxious to
employ in the intended service, had appointed one
of his aids-de-camp. This gentleman's friendship
and influence soon procured for him the
appointment
of captain of one of the Virginia ranging
companies, that were to be attached to the army,
and Charles being thus fixed to his satisfaction,
impatiently awaited the day when the troops should
be ordered to march.
After various, and to Charles, extremely
vexatious
delays, occasioned by the difficulty of
obtaining
sufficient supplies of provisions, waggons, and
other articles necessary for the expedition, the
army, at length was put in motion, and proceeded
to a fort at Will's Creek, afterwards called Fort
Cumberland, which was the most western post
then held by the English on the continent. From
this place there was no road on which the
waggons
could pass, and it began to be feared that the
delay which would be necessary to cut one through
such an exceedingly woody and rough country,
would allow the enemy time to collect such a force
as might endanger the success of the enterprise.
The army, however, courageously struggled with
all obstacles, until it had advanced as far as the
Great Meadows, where the difficulties of the way
were found to increase so much, that General
Braddock, who had at first rejected the advice of
Washington to carry only such baggage as could
be taken forward on horses, and to leave his long
dilatory train of waggons behind, was now
compelled
to adopt it so far as to bring onwards only
the light waggons and tumbrels.
Still anxiously aware of the necessity of
expedition
towards securing the success of the
enterprise
,
Washington also advised the general to press
forward, with all haste, with a chosen body of
troops, and only such stores, artillery, and
ammunition
,
as were of immediate and prime necessity.
His reasons for this advice were, that their
accounts
informed them that the French were now
weak on the Ohio, but were in momentary
expectation
of reinforcements; that during the present
drought, these reinforcements could not pass down
the Alleghany river, but, that if the march were
protracted by waiting to bring forward the whole
army and baggage, sufficient rains to raise the
waters
might come on, by which means the garrison
at Du Quesne might receive their expected
succours
before it should be attacked, and might in
consequence be able to set all the force of the
expedition
at defiance.
These considerations agreed well with the fiery
temper of General Braddock. Twelve hundred
of his best troops were accordingly selected, at
the head of whom he proceeded with what
baggage
and military stores could be carried on
horses
and in a few light vehicles, as rapidly as
possible
to the place of destination. With the
residue
of the army, Colonel Dunbar was left at the
Great Meadows, with instructions to follow with
them and the heavy baggage in the rear, by slow
and easy marches.
It was about the latter part of June when this
select corps moved from the Great Meadows.
It proceeded on with as much celerity as the
numerous
impediments of the country would permit;
but, although divested of every unnecessary
incumbrance
,
and although the soldiers were
encouraged
to high alacrity and zeal by the almost
certain anticipation of soon lodging themselves in
Fort Du Quesnefor neither General Braddock
nor his regular troops, could suppose that there
was any enemy then in the country able to resist
themyet it was not until the eighth of July that
they came within sight of the ford below Turtle
Creek, where they were to cross the
Monongehala
.
Here they stopped a few hours to refresh
themselves before they should attempt the ford,
expecting the next day to be in possession of Fort
Du Quesne.
How did Charles's heart beat, when casting his
delighted view over the expanse of this noble
river
,
he beheld the smoke curling from the
dwelling
of his Maria, and thought that in a few hours
he might fold her to his bosom. There was also
another individual in the army of still higher rank
and eminence than Charles, whose heart equally
throbbed when he beheld the spot which
contained
this sweet flower of the Wilderness; this was
the noble-souled Washington, who loved Maria
with a passion never exceeded in faith, fervour,
intensity, and disinterestedness, by any that ever
man felt for woman. But although the heart of
this truly devoted lover, as from a distance he
contemplated
the abode of her who reigned within
it, felt a throb as warm, and keen, and rapturous as
any that could be felt by Charles, yet that throb,
though equally rapturous, was not equally
unmingled
with sorrow, for he, alas, anticipated no
affectionate
embrace, no tender glance indicative of
mutual love, and reciprocal gratitude to heaven
for the joyful meeting. The delight of again
beholding
and conversing with her, and perhaps, a
hope that he might not converse in vain, (for what
lover feels not such hope) however, actuated
and inspired his mind, and he also trusted that now
was come the time when she should be no longer
endangered by the vicinity of a lawless and savage
foe.
But this young hero felt a sadness intermix
itself
with these feelings of delight, which sadness
arose not altogether from his consciousness of not
possessing Maria's love. It was greatly
occasioned
by some circumstances attending the march of
the army that was to expel the foe from her
vicinity
;
for he knew the wily nature of the foe, and
he grieved much to see the rashness of the
general
by whom that gallant army was led on to the
encounter.
When at Will's Creek, he had taken the
liberty
to caution the general on this subject. In place
of marching carelessly along, in one body, through
a thick forest, every where intersected with dells
and dingles, and ravines, affording lurking places
for an ambushed enemy, he earnestly
recommended
that scouts and rangers should be sent forward
on the course of their march, to scour the
country
,
by which means any ambuscade that might be
formed for them would be discovered, and
perhaps
rooted out, before the army came upon it
unawares.
Braddock who, although a brave man, seems to
have been very deficient in that prompt sagacity
which is necessary to form a good general,
despised
this advice; nay, it is said, that he had the
littleness
of mind to reply to it in terms of
contempt
for the youth and inexperience of him who
gave it.
Washington, whom love, patriotism, humanity,
and every generous motive that can actuate the
mind of man, rendered zealous for the success of
the enterprise, easily forgave these contemptuous
expressions; but when he reflected on the
dreadful
consequences of a defeat, not to the army
alone, but also to the country, and to her whom
he loved above all earthly things, his heart all
resolute
,
courageous, and fearless as it was, sunk
within him, and he could not help feeling a
presentiment
of some fatal result, against which their
leader seemed too careless or too haughty to
provide
.
Alas! thought he, as a few days before the
army left the Great Meadows, he contemplated the
appearance of the gallant and well-disciplined
soldiers of Britain, as they moved before him
through their various evolutions on parade; into
what destruction may not the imprudence of your
commander plunge you! Ah, what will avail your
unrivalled discipline, and your invincible courage,
if his headstrong rashness acts as your evil genius,
and drives you foolishly, barbarously, and
uselessly
into some abyss of ruin, where neither courage
nor discipline can serve you! And you, my
country
,
of what dreadful consequence would such an
event be to you. Your peaceful citizens would
then, indeed, feel tenfold the horrors that they
have ever yet felt, from the bloody tomahawk,
and the scalping-knife of the rapacious and savage
foe. And thou, O thou beloved of my heart!
thou fairest, purest, dearest object of this visible
creation! ah, it may be that thou wilt be the
first to suffer! alas, it may be that thou hast
already
suffered for the friendship of thy family
towards
me. Or, oh God, it may be that some
lawless, licentious Frenchman may have been
excited to horrible lust for the possession of thy
incomparable charms, and may have made thee
the helpless, perhaps the mangled victim of some
diabolical deed! Oh God! Oh God! support me
under the agony of such an idea!
The blood quickened in his veins at the
horrid
thought; and the force of these disagreeable
contemplations, taken altogether, produced upon
his frame, manly and vigorous as it was, such an
effect that he fell into a raging fever. While he
was labouring under this malady, the troops
marched
,
and the commander-in-chief, who,
notwithstanding
he contemned his advice as to the
management
of the expedition, esteemed him highly,
left strict injunctions upon him not on any
account
to follow them until he should be
recovered
.
The second day after their departure,
however
,
although his fever still continued, and the
physician declared that his adhering to the army
would endanger his life, his anxiety of mind
concerning
the fate of the expedition, which was now
hastening towards the residence of his beloved,
was such, that no consideration could prevent him
from following it, which he did in a covered
waggon
.
Both duty and love impelled him to this step.
For he had within him a feeling which told him
that it might be in his power, if not to prevent the
general from adopting rash measures, at least to
lessen their disastrous consequences. This
violent
effort restored energy to his mind, and he
overtook the army the day before it reached the
ford at Turtle Creek. From the south bank of the
Monongahela, on which the troops had descended
for the last four or five days, having before
crossed
the river above the Youhiegany, as he beheld
the undisturbed appearance of Frazier's dwelling,
his hopes whispered that all was yet safe with its
inmates, and he became greatly tranquilized, and
resumed the performance of his duty on
horseback
.
While stationed here, and until the van had
about half crossed the ford, not an individual in
the army dreamed of meeting with any
opposition
until they should reach Du Quesne; for as
to Washington's feelings on the subject, they arose
from a sagacious calculation of the advantages
which the imprudence of Braddock would allow
to the crafty foes he was to encounter, if they
should lie in ambush for him, rather than from
any prophetic certainty that there would be an
ambush laid. Nay, he at this moment, began to
entertain strong hopes that the enemy might, on
this occasion, contrary to their usual practice,
neglect to profit by the advantage which was thus
afforded them.
These hopes, however, were but short lived.
His anticipations of the worst were but too soon
fatally realized, and this joyous and high-minded
army experienced, at this place, a disaster which
sent half their number, and their rash general
along with them, to eternity; and from which, it
required all the wisdom, energy, and heroism of
Washington, to rescue the remainder.
But before proceeding to detail the
circumstances
of the celebrated and calamitous battle
which occasioned this disaster, I beg permission,
in order to give the reader a clearer view of it, to
describe the ground on which it was fought.
The stream of the Monongahela, at this place,
runs nearly from east to west, while that of
Turtle
Creek, issuing out of a narrow and deep glen,
enters it from the northward. This glen widens
in its approach to the river, in consequence of its
western ridge diverging from the creek, and
gradually
swelling backwards from it, from a quarter
to half a mile. It continues this bearing of its
summit, at a similar distance from the
Monongahela
,
for about half a mile down it, throwing off,
as it descends towards it, three or four
well-marked
,
but gently declining tables of fertile land, the
lowermost of which forms a level bottom of
considerable breadth, extending along the river
where the ford is situated. About three quarters
of a mile below Turtle Creek this bottom ends,
the banks here becoming high and precipitous,
which is their general character on the north side,
and for a considerable way also on the south,
until
they reach Pittsburgh, where Fort Du Quesne,
at the time of the transactions here narrated, the
reader need scarcely be reminded, was situated.
It was on the first of these tables, or flats of
land which arises from that adjoining the river,
that the principal destruction of Braddock's troops
took place, and the spot is, at least half a mile
below
the mouth of Turtle Creck. Its breast, or
front towards the river, is a steep acclivity,
elevated
from twenty to thirty feet above the adjacent
flat, and embraced between two gullies running
nearly parallel to each other, about three
hundred
yards apart, and forming a square portion of
ground of eight or ten acres, gradually ascending
backwards for eight or nine hundred yards, to
where another table elevates its front above the
battle-ground, somewhat behind which, the high
summit of the sky-covered ridge overtops all.
Vol. II. 14
It was in these gullies that the Indians laid their
fatal
ambush, amidst trees, long grass, thickly
growing
shrubs, and various other kinds of close
concealing
undergrowth, which completely screened
them from the view of their victims. The ground
itself was covered with long grass, interspersed
with many trees, but containing very little
underwood
.
The vegetation on the subjacent
bottom
was much of the same description, being
perhaps a little more thick set with brush and
undergrowth.
Standing at the present day on this ground,
which is now called Braddock's Field, a most
pleasing landscape, not very extensive it is true,
but certainly very romantic, variegated, and
comfortable
in its aspect, strikes the view. To
the north, the ridge already mentioned, rises
above youto the west, the view down the river
is limited by the high banks also already
mentioned
.
Directly south, the broad expanse of the
Monongahela, about a half a mile over, lies
glittering
before you, while from its further bank,
the bank on which Braddock's army halted
before
attempting the ford, the land rises gradually
and fertilely, without leaving an extensive margin,
as it does on the north side.
To the eastward the eye can ascend the river
for about a mile and a half above Turtle Creek,
for which distance, as the banks gradually
withdraw
from the river on each side, they impart to
the fancy of the spectator a scene resembling
some of the more comfortable descriptions of a
highland glen, given by some of the late
romantic
writers of Scotland.
But perhaps the most picturesque feature in the
whole landscape, is the winding stream of Turtle
Creek, above whose junction with the
Monongahela
,
the highland-looking glen just mentioned,
properly begins. This stream issues, as has been
said, from a glen northward of the river. When
it first flows out of the gap of the glen, its course
is about south-west; but, when within a quarter
of a mile of the river, it changes its direction to
the south-east, forming by that means a kind of
peninsula or point of land, lying between it and
the river, in the shape of a triangle, which triangle
consists altogether of a level river bottom of
rich land of three or four hundred acres, and is
the identical spot where our friend Gilbert
Frazier
had made his residence.
The wild and sylvan appearance of this
interesting
valley in Braddock's Times, is now
changed by the hand of industry to one more
rural
and more gratifying to the eye of the
philanthropist
.
In those times one solitary dwelling,
that of Frazier, was alone to be seen. Now, on
both sides of the river, as far as the view can
extend, numerous pleasant residences, some of
which are even elegant, surrounded with
flourishing
plantations, decorate the scene, and suggest
pleasing reflections to every heart that wishes
well to humanity.
CHAPTER XI.
To tell red Flodden's dismal tale,
And raise the universal wail;
Tradition, legend, tune, and song,
Shall many an age that wail prolong;
Still from the sire, the son shall hear,
Of the stern strife and carnage drear
Of Flodden's fatal field;
When shiver'd was fair Scotland's spear,
And broken was her shield.
Scott
.
The
situation of the French garrison at Fort Du
Quesne during the spring and early part of the
summer of 1755, was rather perplexing and
precarious
.
Monsieur De Villiers who had
succeeded
St. Pierre as its governor, had at this time only
about four hundred French soldiers under his
command, the remainder of those that had fought
at the Great Meadows having been detached to
other forts. He had taken great pains, if is true,
to conciliate the Indians, and had in reality
succeeded
in acquiring over the different tribes a
vast influence. Still they were too little under
his control, and were too restless and roving in
their habits to form that species of force, which,
in the event of that attack which he had every
reason soon to expect from the British, he wished
to possess. He had, therefore, repeatedly written
to the Canadian government for succours; and as
soon as the season permitted, that government had
made exertions to send forward to him both a
reinforcement
of men, and a supply of provisions and
military stores.
These, however, had not got down from La
Buf before the falling of the waters; and De
Villiers could not now expect them before the
waters should again arise. A few days rain, he
knew, would produce that effect, and for this he
had in vain, with great anxiety, waited for
several
weeks.
Matters were in this state at the garrison, when
about the beginning of July some Indians
informed
him of the approach of Braddock. He
immediately
sent out three or four trusty scouts to
watch the motions of the British, and soon received
intelligence that they had crossed to the south side
of the Monongahela. He then perceived that their
intention was to advance by the way of Turtle
Creek, there being no other fording place between
that and Du Quesne.
To dispute this passage with them was his first
intention; but resolving to view the ground
before
he concluded on his measures, he for the first
time, paid a visit to Frazier's, where he unhappily
beheld, with surprise and admiration, the charms
of Maria. A violent passion for that unfortunate
young woman immediately seized upon his soul.
The hurried and alarming nature of the crisis,
however, imperiously demanding all his attention,
prevented him from at that time declaring it; but
he resolved to do so as soon as the approaching
contest should be decided. De Villiers was a
widower
of about thirty years of age, of a temper
bold, sanguine, and irritable; and a man who
permitted
no scruples of religion or morality to stand
in the way of his gratifications.
On viewing the ford, he perceived at once that
he had not a force sufficient to contest its passage to
any good purpose, with the army that he understood
was coming against him. He therefore resolved
to adopt another plan, in which the Indians could
14 *
render him efficient service, as being more suited
to their mode of warfare. This was to form an
ambuscade, into which the British might be
ensnared
to their destruction. He accordingly
selected
the ground we have before described for
that purpose; and, as in case of its failure, he did
not wish his garrison to be much weakened, he
resolved chiefly to employ Indians in the affair.
He returned to the fort, and having assembled
about four hundred Indians, who were all
excellent
marksmen, he informed them of his design,
and received their ready assent to put it into
execution
.
To each of these Indians he gave two
loaded rifles and eighteen charges of powder and
ball. With these rifles over their shoulders, and
their tomahawks and scalping-knives slung by
their sides, these warriors proceeded on the
evening
of the 8th of July from the fort, to the place
of ambush, in order to lay it during the night, as
the British were expected to cross the ford the
next day. De Villiers, at the head of a hundred
of his best French soldiers accompanied them.
Before the Indians departed they assembled
outside
of the fort and loudly chanted the following
War Song.
Sons of warriors! bold and brave,
Now we haste against the foe,
Now like warriors we'll behave,
And lay the fell invaders low.
We'll lay them mangled in the dust;
Their bones shall rot,
Upon the spot;
Their fleshwhat wolves and panthers spare,
Shall yield corruption to the air;
The arms we bear not off, shall rust,
Which when our sons and daughters find,
As through the woods they chase the deer;
They'll call our valiant deeds to mind,
And sayour father's conquer'd here!
Sons of warriors! now be strong,
Hurry to the glorious strife;
Drive the leaden showers along,
And fiercely wield the scalping knife!
Bold children we of warlike race!
Our sharpen'd steel
Their hearts shall feel;
Our tomahawks shall pierce their brain,
Who dare to meet us on the plain,
And think us from that land to chase,
Which Maneto the mighty, gave,
And which our father's ne'er would yield!
Are we less strong! are we less brave!
No! soon we'll prove it on the field!
Vengeance, vengeance! sons of war!
Hark, our murder'd fathers cry
Steel your souls, and drive afar
The execrated enemy!
For merciless, with fire and sword,
They fiercely come
To work your doom;
As ours, in former days they wrought,
When for our native land we fought
But vengeance now you will afford!
Ah, Maneto! hear, hear our vow!
Swift to avenge our father's fate;
We'll sternly haste with fury now,
In dust to tramp the foes we bate!
De Villiers arrived at the destined spot long
before daybreak. He gave the Indians the
necessary
instructions how to act, and having placed
two hundred of them in each of the gullies before
noticed, he waited with his French troops at some
distance, also concealed, for the approach of the
enemy.
It was about noon when the British, having
taken
some refreshment upon the south bank of the
river, general Braddock gave orders for passing
over. His van, composed of some light
companies
,
and a company of grenadiers, to the number
of three hundred men, when about half way over,
were unexpectedly fired upon by a small party of
French, who shewed themselves among the trees
near the bank. On firing, this party immediately
retired back from the river, and Braddock
ordered
his van to hasten after them. On perceiving
this affair, Colonel Washington rode up to the
commander in chief, and begged him not to
follow
the French, as evidently such a small number
of troops, acting as they did, by just shewing
themselves and retiring, were only intended as a
decoy into some ambuscade.
My orders are to pursue these fellows,
returned
Braddock; and colonel Washington, I
have not been so long a soldier, I hope, without
knowing how to lead an army over a ford not
more than knee deep, in the face of a stronger
opposition than a few Frenchmen, without asking
advice from any man. I shall ask your opinion
when I think I need it.
Washington made no reply. He only sighed
as he perceived Colonel Gage, who commanded
the van, leading it on, after he had gained the
shore in pursuit of a few Frenchmen, who even
if they were either destroyed or captured, could
afford no laurels to the victors.
Alas! said he, riding forward to Captain
Adderly, who was leading on his company of
Virginia rangers.This is indeed madnessI
am afraid we shall pay dear for it. We must do
our duty, however.
I shall obey your directions alone, Colonel,
replied Adderly, to-day, as I know they will not
be inconsistent with my duty.So said all the
Virginian Captains. At that instant, Braddock,
at the head of the main body, had gained the
beach, and the order was given for the whole to
follow in the track that had been taken by the
van. Washington gave a signal for the
Provincials
to advance; for he determined not to
forsake
the regulars, although he so greatly
disapproved
of their proceedings in thus inconsiderately
plunging into a thick grassy wood, with which
they were totally unacquainted, in pursuit of a
few fugitive Frenchmen.
Keeping an anxious eye upon the motions of
the soldiers in the van, he soon observed them
following the French up the front of the
table-ground
between the gullies already described.
Only a few scattering shots had been as yet fired
by the French, as they retreated, which were
evidently intended to allure the British after them,
between the gullies where the Indians lay
hidden
,
and silently watching for their prey. In
this they succeeded to their utmost wish. The
van ascended the front of this piece of ground
with alacrity, and proceeded forward upon it for
about thirty or forty paces, suspecting and fearing
nothing, when, all at once the dreadful
warwhoop
was heard; two hundred rifles from the
ground on their left, poured their destructive
contents
upon them, and, the next instant, two hundred
from the right imitated the terrible example.
Two thirds of the van were now prostrated to the
earth. The firing for some minutes ceased, as
the Indians had now comparatively few objects
against whom to direct it. Braddock conceiving
the danger to be over, and determining to avenge
the slaughter of the van, and also anxious to
rescue
those who still survived this murderous fire
from the invisible assailiants, ordered a large
division
of the main body to ascend the height, and
forming there in two parties, to rush with fixed
bayonets into each of the ravines, and drive out
or destroy the concealed enemy. This corps
gallantly ascended to the scene of death, when
the firing was again opened with as much fury as
before. At the same time, the survivors of the
van were attacked from above by the French,
under
De Villiers, and they fell hastily back upon
their companions, who were now fallen into too
much confusion to charge the enemy according
to their instructions. Dreading another volley,
every man of them who had not fallen, hastened
back from the fatal spot to the lower ground in
great terror.
This panic was communicated to the whole of
the regulars, who would soon have re-crossed the
river in full flight, had not their officers, by great
exertions restrained them. General Braddock,
who was now mad with vexation, and rage, rushed
in amongst them, exhorting them to perseverance,
and they were once more brought to stand their
ground.
At this crisis, Washington again interfered with
his advice, that the army should not attempt to
dislodge the assailants, but draw off from the
reach of their fire, and continue their route to
Fort Du Quesne, without paying these concealed
enemies any more attention.
But Braddock was resolved to take another
course. He detached about two hundred and
fifty
men round, at some distance, by the left of the
ambush ground, in order to come upon the
hidden
enemy in another direction, expecting by
that means to have them surrounded, at least to
get them hemmed in between two fires. This
movement, however, was soon discovered by De
Villiers, who seizing on a favourable position,
by which this detachment, he knew, must pass,
met it there, and cut every man of it off, without
on his side, losing a single soldier.
In the meantime, Braddock was resolved to
make a stronger, and, as he conceived, an
irresistible
charge with his whole force upon the
enemy
.
He accordingly called upon his troops to
come on a third time, and leading the way
himself
,
he was followed by his devoted soldiers, and
the death-dealing ravines had victims once more
within their reach.
The French, however, were by this time,
employed
with the detachment that had been sent
to take them in flank, so that Braddock's men in
place of having, as before, to sustain a fire from
three different directions, had now to sustain it
only
from two, and would no doubt have dislodged
the savages from their concealment, had they
boldly pushed upon them with the bayonet the
moment they ascended the ground. But instead
of doing this, Braddock imprudently took time to
form them into two columns, with as much
deliberation
and formality as if he were parading them
at a review in Hyde Park.
The consequence of this slowness of motion,
was to restore courage to the Indians, who, as
they were not now supported by the French, had
felt some intimidation from the eagerness with
which the British seemed to approach them, and
scarcely expected any thing else than
destruction
in the very heart of their coverts. This
pause, however, restored their energy, and their
mortal fire again opened upon the troops. Here
one half of Braddock's officers were killed, he
himself had three horses successively shot under
him, and his whole division soon began to lose
that unfortunately compact array, into which he
had taken so much trouble to form them, and
which had only conduced to their more certain
destruction
.
In a short time they fell into absolute
confusion, and fled, some of them back to the
lower ground, and some forward to that lately
occupied by the French. Braddock was carried
back with the stream of those who fled in the
former direction; and near a spring immediately
beneath the point of the most western of the two
ravines, while attempting again to rally his
broken
troops, he had a fourth horse shot under
him, and while he was mounting another, he
received
a ball in his breast.
The Indians had seen him fall, and about a
hundred
of them rushed out of the adjoining ravine, in
order to seize him. Washington, resolving at all
risks, to save his commander from the hands of
the savages, called forward Adderly with his
Virginians, who charged the Indians as they were
carrying off the body. A volley from the fatal
ravine
,
soon prostrated nearly one half of Adderly's
men; but Washington had by this time shot with
a pistol one of the Indians who was dragging
Braddock to the ravine, and plunged his sword
into
the body of another, when his horse was killed
under him, and a dozen of shots fired at his head,
some of which perforated his hat, and carried
away its plumes and other parts of its decorations.
Adderly seeing his danger, rushed furiously
forward
with the remnant of his company, to his
rescue
,
and buried his sword in the entrails of a
savage who was levelling a murderous aim at
Washington, within a few feet of him. The rifle
went off, but its direction had been changed by
Adderly's blow, and the ball only tore the
epaulette
off Washington's left shoulder. In a
moment
Washington was on another horse, when
perceiving that a number of Indians had again
laid hold of the wounded Braddock, he plunged
in among them with tremendous fury, and levelled
three or four of them to the earth with the
irrisistible
sweeps of his broad-sword.
Another volley from the Indians, who perceived
that until he was destroyed, they could not
capture
the general, now took place at his person.
His horse was again shot, and his coat perforated
in five or six places; and Adderly's few
surviving
troops would not have been able to resist
the rush of Indians that was now made upon
him, had not another Virginia company,
commanded
by a captain Poulson, given its timely
assistance
,
and the savages were once more driven
into their lurking place, not, however, until they
had unhorsed captain Adderly, and carried him,
together with five or six of his men, with them.
Washington now had Braddock placed in a
light tumbrel, which was convenient; and sending
it hastily off the field, put himself at the head of
the Virginians and such of the regulars as yet stood
their ground, in order to rescue a division which
was still on the fatal height between the gullies,
the object of attack from the Indians on the
eastern
side. This party, about one hundred and
seventy
in number, had, at the time their
companions
fled back in confusion, rather advanced
forward
to the ground lately occupied by the French,
so that they were for some time a short distance
beyond the reach of the Indian fire, but
attempting
to return to assist their companions during the
struggle round Braddock, the Indians in the
eastern
ravine so effectually fired upon them that they
were compelled to draw back. Their presence,
however, had the good effect of occupying these
Indians so as to prevent them from joining in the
contest for Braddock, in consequence of which
the Virginians succeeded in his rescue. But
Braddock
was scarcely borne off the field, when the
situation
of these men became extremely dangerous.
The French were seen returning in triumph after
the slaughter of the unfortunate detachment that
had been sent to take them in the rear, and the
Indians in both ravines, the contest for Braddock
being now abandoned, were impatiently waiting
to shower upon them their destructive balls as
soon as they approached near enough to be struck
by them.
Vol. II. 15
The active and vigilant eye of Washington soon
perceived their danger, and he resolved to release
them, or perish with them. About two hundred
of the regulars who could not be rallied when they
took to flight, had already recrossed the river, but
including his Virginians, there was still a force of
nearly three hundred on the ground.
Come on, my brave soldiers! said he, we
must rescue our companions yonder from
impending
destruction. If we only give sufficient
employment
to the savages in any of these ravines, our
soldiers may escape. Let us try this eastern one,
it appears the more easily assailable. Hark! the
French above yonder have fired upon our men
already
.
At it, my boys, and every man do his best
either by firing, or by the bayonet, to destroy the
savages. Widen your ranksthe less compactly
you rush on, the betterForward!
The soldiers gave a loud shout, for they now felt
confidence. Their companions on the upper
ground heard it, and returned it as a signal of
cooperation
.
In a minute the eastern ravine was
attacked. The savages fired out of it, but killed
only about twelve of the assailants, for the latter
were not now in such close order as to prevent
their balls from missing.
Keep these Indians in play, my brave fellows,
for some minutes, cried Washington, and with
the blessing of God, I shall soon return to you.
So saying, he clapped spurs to his horse, and
ascended between the ravines at full flight towards
those he wished to rescue. Three gallant fellows
on horseback, named Peronny, Burton, and Craig,
voluntarily followed him. As he passed the length
of the ravines, a volley was fired at him from that
on the west, but he was at too great a distance
from it to be hurt by it. The attention of the
savages
on the east was at this time so much
employed
in resisting the attack of the troops, that they
scarcely attended to him. Several of them,
however
,
fired at him and his followers, two of whom.
Peronny and Burton were killed; but the
swiftness
of Washington's horse, or rather the
protecting
hand of a kind providence, saved him to his
country.
The troops to whom he advanced received him
with a cheer. Follow me rapidly, said he to
them; keep on this side, and shoot every
savage
you can see as you fly pastbut delay for
nothing! He immediately turned his horse, and
galloped out of the dangerous ground, followed by
the whole party who discharged their muskets into
the eastern ravine, as they passed it with all their
speed. They only received some scattering shots
from the savages, which killed but one or two of
their number.
To the bank of the river now, my brave
men! cried Washington, to the whole of the
troops.
They obeyed him, and in a few minutes, he
there formed them into ranks, and ordered them
to reload their pieces, as he perceived that the
Indians
manifested a disposition to pursue them. On
seeing the British thus prepared to receive them,
however, on open ground, neither the savages nor
the French thought proper to advance; and the
troops were safely conducted to the other side of
the river, where they were soon rejoined by those
who had previously fled from the engagement.
On reviewing the reliques of that fine body of
men, which, only a few hours before this disastrous
affair, expected that very evening to expel the
enemy from Fort Du Quesne, it was found that
out of twelve hundred, very little more than five
hundred remained, and of the officers only twenty
out of the eighty-five which they numbered before
the engagement, now survived. The artillery, all
the military stores, and baggage of every kind,
and even the private cabinet of General Braddock
which contained his instructions, were left in
possession
of the enemy.
Of the Indians it has been ascertained that not
more than eight or ten were killed, and perhaps,
as many wounded, and of the French a still fewer
number. They had taken nearly forty prisoners,
independent of the wounded who could not retire
with their companions, and whom they carried that
evening into fort Du Quesne.
The defeated army being apprehensive that the
French would bring their whole force out of the
fort to pursue them, that very evening began a
precipitate retreat to the camp of Colonel
Dunbar
at the Great Meadows. As they were nearly
destitute of provisions, Colonel Washington, who
seemed to be the life of the whole party, hastened
on before them in order to procure some, as well
as to order comfortable accommodations for them
when they should arrive. He made such dispatch
that he reached Dunbar's camp the evening of the
next day, procured the provisions, and by his
inindefatigable
exertions, the wearied and
disheartened
remnant of the troops were brought forward
in a few days without meeting with any fresh
disaster
.
Shortly after his arrival at this place the
unfortunate
Braddock died, and was buried on a hill,
where his grave is to be seen to this day.
CHAPTER XII.
And when my nightly couch I try.
Sore harrass'd out with pain and grief:
My tail-heat nerves, and tear-worn, eye,
Keep watchings with the nightly thief:
Or, if I slumber, fancy chief.
Reigns haggard-wild in sore affright:
Elen day, all bitter, brings relief
From such a horror-breathing night.
Burns
.
At
this disastrous realization of his worst
anticipations
,
how did the heart of Washington bleed
within him! It bled indeed severely; but it did
not, as before the catastrophe, sink under the
pressure of the calamity. There is in the minds
of men, especially of brave men, an elasticity
which often strengthens them, so as to bear up
against any misfortune, however great, when it is
actually present, but which does not always exert
itself during the mere contemplation of an
approaching
evil. Or, perhaps, the imagination
being
more actively employed in depicting the
horrors
of the evil before it comes, is apt to depict
them in their most gloomy and appalling colours,
so deeply and so strongly that the mind can
scarcely
endure the picture. But the calamity being
present, the mind, as if it had nothing more to do
but to suffer, submits, undoubtedly with pain, but
often at the same time with fortitude.
Washington indeed felt keenly and sorrowfully
on this occasion. Nay, he had anticipations of
the most heart-breaking kind, even yet, to agonize
his soul. Alas! he feared that this defeat might
be attended with the worst of consequences to his
15*
Maria. He did not indeed suppose that the
Indians
would offer any immediate violence to
either
herself or her friends, with whom they had
so long lived on amicable terms. But there was
now no prospect of her soon being rescued from
that Wilderness of savages and licentious
Frenchmen
,
where every thing was ruled by violence and
caprice, and where he conceived that a
beautiful
young female like her, could not, even in the
most tranquil times, be a single day safe from
insult
.
During the whole of the battle, her image
never
had been absent from his mind; and sadly,
sadly, did he grieve that its catastrophe was
likely
to be such as to preclude the possibility of his
enjoying only one minute's interview with her,
although her residence was in view of the very
ground on which he fought.
While mustering the defeated troops after
conducting
them to the south shore of the river, he
cast his anxious eyes across the stream, and
beheld
her, together with the rest of Frazier's
family
,
looking, he believed mournfully looking, at
the unfortunate army. He imagined that she
distinguished him. He bowed his head as he sat
on horseback, and he had the happiness to see
that she waved her hand in return. Gilbert, and
his sons took off their fur caps, and also
returned
his salute. He even believed that he
discerned
Gilbert, lifting his hands and face towards
heaven, as if to pray for his safety. His heart
burned within him to visit them, but his duty
compelled
him to proceed almost instantaneously for
the Great Meadows. He again renewed his
obeisance
to the family, and in a few minutes
afterwards
set off.
He had scarcely proceeded out of view of the
troops, when he heard a voice calling him by
name. He stopped his horse, and the prophet
Tonnaleuka arose out of a thicket that was close
by him.
Beloved of heaven! cried the prophet; I
will not detain you, for I know your errand must
be one of haste. Alas, this has been a
calamitous
day! I saw you escape in safety, and I thank
the Great Spirit. My son, Charles Adderly, has
not been so fortunate! But to what the Great
Being orders, we must submit. Farewell, my
son, I will not detain you.
Father, said Washington, if thou lovest me,
oh, watch over the safety of Maria! alas, she is
too beauteous and too tender a flower to be safe
amidst the storms of such a desert. Let me
know, wherever I may be, if aught befalls her.
I shall watch over her, said the prophet,
and shall let you know if she be unfortunate.
I concealed myself here that I might salute, and
bless you, as you passed. Farewell, and may the
God whom you worship still protect you, as he
has done this day!
Farewell, father, replied Washington; and
the prophet disappearing among the bushes, he
continued his journey with a heart greatly
relieved
by this short interview.
The feelings of Maria, and indeed of all
Frazier's
family, during the momentous scenes which
had been that day acted within their immediate
view, may be easily imagined by any reader of a
good heart, who reflects upon their circumstances
and situation. Gilbert's whole soul was with his
countrymen; and his heart warmed when he
beheld
their red uniforms.
Ah, Nelly! said he, they are something
like Christian soldiers. They put me in min' o'
Ireland and Maughrygowan. Oh, may God help
them against the savages!
Amen, said Nelly; and she lifted her eyes
to heaven to add fervency to the prayer.
As to Paddy Frazier and doctor Killbreath,
the vigilance of the French prevented them
during
the whole of the preceding spring, from
venturing
to manifest their partiality for the British
cause by any active exertion in its favour; and
during
the whole of these transactions, they had
preserved a very prudent, though very reluctant
neutrality. From the accounts they had heard
of the force that was coming against Fort Du
Quesne, they indeed believed that the
British
were now strong enough to do their own
business
effectually, without their assistance; and
from the appearance of the army when it
approached
,
they were confirmed in this belief.
They knew nothing of the ambuscade, for it had
been laid in the night, and De Villiers had been
so cautious as to communicate the scheme to none
but those who were to be employed in its
execution
.
They were, therefore, greatly
disappointed
,
grieved, and shocked, at the result of
the memorable battle of which they had been
spectators.
But who can speak the agony of Maria's mind
during the incessant peals of rifles and musketry,
which, for three long hours, rang in her ears, and
seemed to her imagination to carry destruction
to every thing within their reach. She knew that
her Charles was among the combatants; she had
with an anxious and affectionate eye singled him
out, as seated upon his prancing steed he led his
company of rangers across the river, and her
view had followed him until the firing commenced,
when her alarm and agitation became so great
that, unable to behold more, she was obliged to
retire to her chamber.
When she was informed that the troops were
recrossing the river, with the hope of again
seeing
her beloved Charles, she hastened to the
porch before the house, from which the rest of
the family were viewing the scene. Here she
perceived Washington, and returned his salute
as before-mentioned. But she perceived not
Charles, and in a few minutes she returned to her
chamber, in a state of dreadful suspense as to his
fate.
She was in this situation when Mrs. Killbreath
informed her that the French commander was in
the house, and had expressed a wish to see her.
Tell him, my dear Nancy, said she, that I
am really indisposed. The horrible scenes of this
day have rendered me incapable of seeing any
body. Oh, Nancy, Nancy! God only knows how
terribly my heart is at this moment torn with
suspense
and agony!
Nancy made her apology to De Villiers. It
was of too reasonable a nature not to be believed,
and he was of too gallant a temper not to admit
it. He observed, that he was not surprised at
her being terrified, and he was very sorry that the
affair had taken place so near her; but he hoped
that both Miss Frazier, and the whole family, in
whose welfare he protested himself to feel greatly
interested, would have recovered from their
terrors
by the time he should next have the pleasure
of visiting them. He then partook of some
refreshments
with which Mrs. Frazier presented him,
and returned to the field of battle, where the
victors
were busily employed, some scalping the
slain, and others collecting the spoil. He soon
called them together, and as the day was
considerably
advanced, the greater part of the Indians
accompanied him to Fort Du Quesne, which they
reached, in triumph, towards the evening.
Not Maria, alone, but the whole of Frazier's
family, felt anxious to ascertain the fate of Charles
Adderly, whom they had seen advancing to the
fight, but not returning from it. As soon therefore,
as the victors had withdrawn from the field,
Paddy
,
Archy, and Doctor Killbreath, hastened there
to ascertain the number of the slain, and whether
their friend Charles was among them.
What a melancholy and shocking appearance
this spot of ground now presented to their view!
Hundreds of human beings, who had that morning
rejoiced in all the vigour of health, and strength,
and buoyant spirits, now lay prostrate before
them, either already cold and insensible as the
earth on which they were stretched, or else were
writhing and convulsed in the last tortures of
expiring
animation. Some had their brains
scattered
beside them, and had expired on the instant;
others had received balls in their breasts or their
bowels, or other vital parts, which left them in
torment to linger out a few tedious hours of
agonized
existence.
Into the bodies of the greater portion of these
last, the Indians, either for the cruel purpose of
gratifying a malignancy of feeling, by making sure
of their destruction, or from the more humane
motive of more speedily putting an end to their
sufferings, had plunged bayonets, and driven
tomakawks
,
occasioning wounds through which the
bowels of many had protruded, and lay scattered,
and often mangled, upon the blood-stained grass
beside them. Upon every one of these
unfortunate
men, the scalping knife had performed its
barbarous office, and where the skull had not been
broken to pieces by a shower of bullets, it had
been stripped of its natural covering, in order to
furnish the savage conquerors with trophies of
their victory.
The conquerors, although they had carried off
a great proportion of the spoil, had still left a
considerable
quantity behind; enough, indeed, to
have made the fortunes of Frazier's family, had
they chosen to avail themselves of it. But at
this time, the feelings of even Paddy himself, who
was not in general very scrupulous in such
matters
,
were so much affected and shocked to
behold
such an awful havoc made upon human
beings
,
that all mercenary feelings were stifled in
his breast, and he could not carry away a single
article.
On numbering the slain, they found them to
amount to nearly seven hundredbut they had
the satisfaction not to find Charles Adderly
among them. They returned home with this
intelligence
,
which was soon imparted to Maria
by Mrs. Killbreath, and she was inspired with
the hope that providence might yet have
preserved
him for better times.
Oh, Nancy! said she, although you know
the secret of my heartlittle, little can you
imagine
what I this afternoon have suffered. Oh!
had they found him there mangled with the rest
of these murdered men, I feel that a few days
would have terminated my sufferings, and you
would have burried me in the same grave with
him I loved. Alas! I am not yet altogether
relieved
of my apprehension; but I will trustOh!
I will pray, fervently pray, to my God for his
preservation
.
She here requested Nancy to kneel with her,
and then with great agitation after thanking the
Deity for the gleam of hope which he had
allowed
to dawn upon her mind, she implored him to
prevent it from being at last totally extinguished
by the destruction of the youth, upon whose
preservation
her own so entirely depended.
She had scarcely finished, when she heard the
voice of Tonnaleuka in the outer room.
Oh, Nancy! said she, if there be comfort
on earth for me, that holy man can administer it.
Would to heaven, that all Indians had hearts like
his! Tell him, my sister, that I wish to see
him.
Tonnaleuka was soon with her. Oh,
father
,
said she, how I feel relief in your
presence
,
from the torments which this terrible day
has inflicted upon my mind. I thank God, that
you, at least, have met with no misfortune.
My daughter, said the prophet. Much,
indeed, have I felt for your situation to day; for
I knew the agony you would suffer in consequence
of these bloody deeds. The youth whom you
love was in the midst of them; but be comforted,
for he did not fall, neither is he a prisoner in
Fort Du Quesne. But I shall before many hours
discover the direction that his captors have
taken
,
and the great Spirit, I doubt not, will
protect
him.
Daughter, dry your tears!(for Maria at this
time wept violently, which afforded her feelings a
relief that the scorching agony of her soul had
before
prevented her from receiving.) This storm
will blow away. A calm will succeed, and
sunshine
will yetfor the Great Spirit is justgild
your course, and compensate for these afflictions.
One noble and glorious youth has this day been
miraculously preserved by his care, amidst the
thunder that pealed around him, and blasted
hundreds
by his side. My daughter, Washington is
safe, and the Father of the world has shown
kindness
to men.
I know it, Father, she replied. I have
beheld that excellent young man out of reach of
the foes, whom, I am told, he alone restrained in
their murderous career, and amidst the
intensity
of my other griefs, I felt consolation at the
sight.
My daughter, I rejoice that you so respect
this hero, although you know not half his virtues,
half his worth to the worldthat world which the
Great Being has not forsaken since he has spared
him to it; for my daughter, while he lives the
cause of mankind may suffer, but need never
despair.
I know, Father, she replied, that great
public good is likely to result from Colonel
Washington's
career, if Providence prolongs it. I am
sensibly aware of his worth, greatly do I
rejoice
in his safety, and ardently do I hope for his
prosperity. But ah, there are griefs that, at
present, come closer to my heart. Charles
Adderly
Oh,
Father! is he not in danger, and
can I be in comfort!Alas, alas, I cannot!
My daughter, I know your heart, I will not
therefore blame your feelings. I sympathize with
them. Charles Adderly I esteem, I lovefor he
is worthy of both. But I despair not of his
deliverance
from danger. The Great Spirit
preserved
him once, when in as much peril as now,
and he is as mighty to save as ever.
My daughter, I again ask you to be of good
cheerI must now leave you. I go to discover
where they have taken him for whom you grieve.
Farewell!
Farewell! she replied. And oh, may
the God of all things grant success to your
exertions
!
Maria's mind was greatly quieted by the
encouragement
to hope which she derived from this
interview; and during the remainder of the
evening
,
she appeared tranquil, and joined the rest of
Vol. II. 16
the family in their conversation on the disasters
of the day.
When retired to rest, however, her disquietude
returned. She was long wakeful and restless;
and when at length she fell into a slumber, it was
to experience the horrors of a frightful dream.
She thought she was wandering alone along the
bank of Turtle Creek, meditating upon the virtues,
the tenderness, and the misfortunes of Charles,
when she suddenly heard the noise of a mighty
rush of waters; she cast her eyes up the stream,
and perceived a terrible and overwhelming flood
rolling down the valley, and sweeping every thing
before it with great violence towards the place
where she stood. She instinctively attempted to fly
out of its course, but was unableshe seemed
spell-bound to the spot, until the waters came
upon
her, and were rapidly carrying her on their
surface
towards the river, when a terrific,
monstrouslooking
animal, half man, and half bear, rushed
headlong from the eastern heights, into the flood,
and swimming towards her, seized her in his
mouth, and making his way with her to dry land,
in a few minutes deposited her in a chamber, in
Fort Du Quesne. It then addressed her in the
human voice:
Look out of that casement, and behold a feast
which gladdens my eyes, said the monster.
I must away to enjoy it. She looked out, and
beheld her lover, Charles Adderly, bound hand
and foot, with iron chains, and seated on a high
pile of wood, to which a number of savages were
setting fire in several places, by the direction of
the monster. The next moment the flames
seemed
suddenly to ascend in mighty volumes round
her lover. She gave a scream, and awoke
in dreadful agony.
Mrs. Killbreath, whom the scream had alarmed,
hastened into her room to inquire what was the
matter.
Oh, my dear sister! cried Maria all
trembling
;
I have been terribly frighteneddo not
leave me! I beg thee! do not leave me till the
morning. I have had a dreadful dream
Be composedMaria! said her sister.
This is owing to yesterday's alarm! You
should not lay these things so much to heart.
But I will just inform my husband, who is afraid
you have taken sick, that the noise was but the
effect
of a dream, and shall then return and stay
with you till the morning.
Nancy did so.But Maria slept no more that
night; for she feared to experience such another
vision. The presence of her sister, however,
and the exertions of her own reason, enabled her
by the time the day dawned, to become once more
considerably soothed and tranquilized in her
feelings.
CHAPTER XIII.
Curse on his perjured art, dissembling smooth!
Are honour, virtue, conscience all exiled?
Is there no pity, no relenting ruth,
Points to the parents fonding o'er their child.
Then paints the ruin'd maid, and their distraction wild?
Burns
.
The
charms of Maria had made too deep an
impression upon the mind of the governor of Du
Quesne to permit him to delay long the repetition
of his visit to Frazier's. His reflections upon her
had kept him awake almost the whole night.
How in the name of heaven! thought he,
have I been so long ignorant of such a lovely
creature residing so near me! Such a jewel in such
a Wilderness! But I am a fortunate man to have
discovered her at last. I will make her my wife,
for it would be worse than villany to pollute so
much purity! nor do I suppose it would be so easy
a matter, for she appears as modest as she is
beautiful
.
By heavens, I will seriously offer her my
hand. She surely cannot refuse to become
mistress
of Fort Du Quesne; and I shall be happy in
the enjoyment of such a treasure! I wish the
morning was come, for I will not be content till I
know her mind, and till I have made her my own
property.
In the morning he accordingly, at an early hour,
set off for Frazier's. Maria had walked out upon
the bank of Turtle Creek, with the expectation of
deriving some assistance from the tranquillity and
beauty of the scene, in soothing the sorrow that
lay so heavy at her heart. He perceived her
before
he came to the house; and tying his horse
to a tree, he approached her on foot ere she was
aware.
He bowed politely to her, and smiling
pleasantly
,
addressed herMiss Frazier, I am really
happy to meet you here all alone, in this
charming
place. I hope you have recovered from your
yesterday's fright. I could not be easy, I assure
you, without coming to see whether you had
thrown it off.
You are very kind, sir, said she; but I
presume you had more important business to bring
you here at so early an hour, than merely to
inquire
after the state of a stranger's mind.
Upon my honour, Miss Frazier, no other
business in the world than just to see, and to
converse
with you, brought me from fort Du Quesne
this morning. Ah! believe me, my charming
girl! I think no business in the world half so sweet
or so important as enjoying your society. I wish
to God I had only known you sooner, we should
by this time have understood each other better.
It might readily enough have been so, she
replied, looking at him with an expression of
surprise
;
for I protest, sir, that I cannot understand
you now.
Ah! my dear Miss Frazier, you may say so, but
I cannot believe youyour pretty tell-tale eyes
say that you understand well the nature of my
visit. How can you mistake it! But I will
make it plainer to you. Ever since I first saw
you, I have been so fascinated, I could think of
nothing else. I feel as if there was nothing else
worth thinking of. Even the hurry of the battle
yesterday could not drive you for a moment from
my thoughts, and as soon as the enemy was driven
off, I hastened to see you. Ah, I feel as if I
could live by looking upon you!
16 *
You would derive very little benefit from
such diet, she answered, scarcely thinking it
worth while to reply seriously to such language;
and I am afraid that before long you should find
it very little to your satisfaction.
Nay, Miss Frazier, said he in a fond tone,
by my soul, these pretty cheeks, those ruby lips,
those sparkling eyesah! you may banter me,
and laugh at me if you choose, but, by heavens, I
never saw any thing in the world I loved half so
much to gaze upon!
Monsieur De Villiers, said she, my heart
is too much laden with sorrow at present, to laugh
at any thing, otherwise, I believe, that such
unmeaning
,
such frivolous, and pardon me, if I say,
such ridiculous nonsense, would provoke my mirth.
It is, sir, equally beneath your dignity, and
unsuited
to the present state of my feelings.
Ah, my pretty banterer! returned the
Frenchman, not in the least disconcerted, then
I shall speak seriously to you. Your charms have
warmed my heart to a sincere, uncontrollable
passion. I love you, by heavens I adore you! ah,
I have never seen a woman I could love as I do
you!
Sir, said she, this language seems as mad
as what you just now uttered was foolish. Both, I
must say, are unworthy of you, and disagreeable
to me.
Pardon me, madam, he returned. Can it
be unworthy of me to love so much excellence!
Noby all that is sacred, I swear, that if I were
the grand monarch himself, I should think you
worthy to share my throne. I love you, Miss
Frazier
,
with an honourable passion, at which the
most sainted purity could not take offence. My
hand is free, my fortune respectable, my heart
devoted
to you. I offer you them all, and shall feel
myself the happiest of mortals if you accept of
them.
Sir, she answered, I thank you for being
so explicit, and candid with me. I will consider
you to be serious in these liberal offers, and shall
be explicit, candid, and serious in reply to them.
Then hear my reply, and set it down on the tablets
of your memory, as one which neither your power,
nor even that of your grand monarch himself,
should he lend you his aid, will ever induce me to
alterI utterly and decisively reject them.
You do! said he, beginning to feel that he
did not stand on such eligible ground with her as
he had supposed. Then it exactly comes to this
issue, my fair tempter, that as I feel I cannot live
without you, you must become mine in spite of
yourself. But I wish for your voluntary consent;
for, upon my honour, I should be very loth to
compel
you.
Sir, she replied, we may as well drop the
conversation. My voluntary assent to your
proposals
you never can have. In the attempt to
pronounce it my tongue would wither in my mouth.
With respect to compelling me, you cannot be so
irrationally wicked. You cannot be so devoid of
good sense as to expect that compulsion will ever
produce affection; nay, you must know that the
excitement of absolute abhorrence would, it is
more than probable, be its consequence.
Then tell me, fair one, what I am to do!
asked De Villiers, checking a strong tendency
which he felt towards irritation. Tell me how I
shall obtain thee, thou ensnarer of my senses! for
obtain thee I must. Without thee my life will be
nothingworse than nothingit will be a burthen I
will not be able to bear. But, by all my hopes of
salvation, thou shalt be mine, if I shouldbut
no, he said, suddenly changing his manner, I
will not say it, I will not resolve it, for I cannot
resolve
upon any thing offensive to thee. Oh!
consent
to my proposals, become my wife, and live
happily with a man who adores, who shall for ever
adore thee.
Sir, said she, you have my answer already.
It is final, unalterable, and need not be repeated.
Then, said he, proud girl! either you or I,
or perhaps both of us, are doomed to wretchedness.
Permit me, at least, to kiss your hand before you
drive me off in despair.
Here he violently seized her hand, and
pressed
it forcibly to his lips. Her soul filled with
indignation and horror at his rudeness; but
fearing
to prolong his stay by making any observation
concerning it, she meekly turned from him when
he loosened his hold, and without making any
reply
to his farewell, hastened back to the house
in great perplexity and alarm. Having taken his
resolution as to the measures he should adopt, he
did not follow her, but the more to lull any
suspicion
of his design, he rode up the glen of Turtle
Creek, and returned hastily to Du Quesne, by a
direction different from the one he came.
She hesitated when she reached home, whether
she should communicate the incident to her
friends. She did not wish to excite in their minds
any unnecessary uneasiness; and she entertained
hopes that as the governor had received so
decided
a refusal, he might see the futility of his
pursuit
,
and disturb her no more. It is true, he threw
out some expressions indicative of a resolution to
persevere in his designs upon her. But these
expressions
might only be the common-place
protestations
of a man wishing to make an impression
on a woman whom he found difficult to
persuade
;
or, they might only be the sudden and
unreflecting effusions of the moment. At any rate,
how could her friends, few and powerless as they
were, resist the Governor of Fort Du Quesne,
if he should think proper to follow the import of
his insinuations? They might, indeed, contribute
to her concealment, until he should either forget
her, or be removed from his post. But this might
bring down his vengeance upon them; and even
should her concealment be necessary, by the aid
of Tonnaleuka alone, could it be effectually
accomplished
.
To lay the case before him, and be
regulated by his advice, she believed would, upon
the whole, be her wisest course; and she
concluded
on not disturbing the serenity of her friends
by acquainting them with the incident, until she
consulted him to whom she had always been
accustomed
to look up for advice in every
perplexity
.
As to De Villiers there was nothing further
from his intention than to relinquish his pursuit
after her. He saw clearly that nothing was to be
obtained from her by mere solicitation; and he
was determined not to expend time and labour
in vain. His passion for her was too violent to
brook such a delay. He therefore resolved to
have recourse to active and prompt measures;
and he was only sorry that he had happened,
while conversing with her, to throw out hints that
might put her on her guard against the attempt
he meditated. But this consideration formed a
motive, additional to the urgency of his passion,
to have his design immediately executed, so that
she might not have time to adopt any mode of
frustrating it.
He therefore, as soon as he returned to the
garrison, ordered a Lieutenant Ranttell, a man
whom he knew to be fit for his purpose, into his
presence.
Well, Ranttell! said he.
Your servant, sir, with a low bow, was the
reply.
I want you on a special service, Lieutenant,
which I expect you will manage exactly as you
shall be directed.
To a fraction, if possible.
There is a lady in the case, Ranttell.
A pleasant affair, sir, next to shooting the
English, and a damned sight better than burning
them, as these devils of Indians will have us to
do!
That's my business, not yours, observed the
Governor.
Your pleasure, sir,was the reply.
A captain's commission, Ranttell, said the
Governor, will be yours, my brave fellow, the
moment the lady's brought into the fort.
Snug's the word, replied the lieutenant, a
neat job, by St. Dennis! Where is the dove's
nest, Monsieur Le Governor?
At Turtle Creek, a daughter of the old
Irishman
,
replied the governor.
What! not Doctor Killbreath's wife, I hope,
cried Ranttell; but no matter, he added,
winking
significantly at the Governor, sweet's the eye
upon a pretty girl, whether married or single.
You mistake, said the Governor, affecting
some offence at this insinuation: do you think
me such a blackguard as to seduce another man's
wife?nono, Lieutenant, you mistake the
matter
.
I beg pardon, returned the Lieutenant, but
I am glad the Doctor is out of the scrape at any
rate, for he cured me of the cholic last spring,
when our own bungling surgeon could scarce tell
what ailed me. But I suppose it is the pretty
rosy-lipped, sweet countenanced lady, the
Doctor's
sister-in-law, that I saw last winter when out
in that quarter on a hunting trip. By the Lord,
she's a dainty. Had I been the Doctor, I know
which of the two sisters I should have chosen for
a help-mate.
But more persons than one, have a choice, you
know, observed the Governor, where two are
concerned.
Perfect logic, your honour, replied
Ranttell
.
Well, sir, said De Villiers, you know the
ladyI love her to distractionI wish to marry
hershe's an angel, and I would not for the world
pollute her. I told her so, but she is rather shy
about the matter. I want you to bring her here,
as I think I could here persuade her with more
effect, than in the woods under her father's wing
yonder. You neither need ask her consent, nor
that of any of her friends. Take twenty smart
fellows with you, enter the house boldly, and
bring her off without question. But, take care,
Ranttell! offer her no insult, as you would avoid
getting a ball through your brains. Remember,
she is to be my wife.
It shall be all done as fairly and politely, as
you would ask her to dance a rigadoon, replied
the Lieutenant. But when shall we set out,
Monsieur Le Governor?
De Villiers pulled out a watch, by my faith,
but I made good speed this morning, said he. It
is not twelve yet. In half an hour, Ranthell, be
off. Give each man a dose of rum before you
start, and another when you come in sight of your
destination, and I shall expect you back by
sundown
.
Good morningbe polite to the lady, and
civil to the family.
I'll manage it as neat as a new made plume
in a grenadier's cap, said the lieutenant, bowing
several times almost to the ground as he
withdrew
.
It was between three and four o'clock in the
afternoon
,
when Archy Frazier, who had been in
the woods at some distance to the westward of
the house, came in hastily, with intelligence that
a party of French soldiers were in sight. Maria,
who was in her own apartment, for she had
scarcely
stirred out of it ever since the rencontre with
De Villiers, did not hear this intelligence, as the
rest of the family did not think proper to disturb
her by communicating it. They ran to the door,
rather from an impulse of curiosity than alarm;
and unconscious that any of themselves were to
be the objects of his violence, they met Ranttell
rather cordially than otherwise, as, ordering the
body of his men to keep at a distance, unless
called forward, he, with only three soldiers,
advanced
to the house. Paddy and Doctor
Killbreath
,
had gone in the morning on a
hunting
excursion, and were not expected back till
night. Gilbert and Archy, therefore, were the
only male part of the family present; and for any
opposition he might meet with from these,
Lieutenant
Ranttell cared but little. As neither
Gilbert
nor Nelly could speak French, Mrs.
Killbreath
had to return his salutation and answer his
interrogations.
Good day! my friend Frazier! My best
wishes
for your family, was the first salutation, which
was accompanied with a ceremonious bow.
We thank you, replied Nancy, but as my
father does not speak French, you will excuse
his silence.
With all my heart, Mrs. Killbreath. But pray,
my sweet madam, where are all the rest of your
people? I hope our fighting here yesterday, has
not frightened them away.
My brother Paddy, and my husband the
doctor
,
are out hunting since the morning, and I
believe
we are all present except them and my
sister
,
who is rather indisposed since the alarm she
received during yesterday's battle.
You have stood that affair pretty well, I
perceive
,
Mrs. Killbreath, said the lieutenant; See
how hardy people become when they are married.
But is your sister so sick as to permit no visiter,
my fair friend? I have a message I wish to deliver
to her.
A message for Maria, exclaimed Nancy.
Pray, sir, who can it be from?
From a most true and hearty friend she has at
the garrison, replied the officer.
Inform me of it, and I shall communicate it to
her, and immediately let you know her answer,
said Nancy.
I am instructed only to communicate it to
herself, was the reply.
I shall tell her so, said Nancy, and she
without
more consideration, hastened to Maria's
apartment
.
But to her astonishment, the officer was
there almost as soon as herself.
Excuse me, ladies! said he, bowing and
smiling very politely to Maria; excuse me for
this unmannerly intrusion. But I must plead the
necessity I am under of obeying my commander.
My dear madam, said he, addressing Maria
exclusively
,
I have to inform you of Governor
De Villiers's request that you will honour him
with your company, this evening, at fort Du
Quesne
.
I have been ordered out with a party of
soldiers
to escort you there.
Alas, alas! exclaimed Maria, in violent
agitation
,
without making any direct reply to
Ranttell
;
I see I am undoneOh! Nancy, Nancy,
they are going to take me from you. I might
Vol. II. 17
have known italas! I might have concealed
myself
,
but I could not think he would have
perpetrated
such instantaneous violence. Oh, my God,
preserve me!
What is the meaning of this, lieutenant
Ranttell
?
asked Nancy; what do you want with
my sister? She cannot have done any thing either
to injure or offend the Governor.
Nor does the Governor, my sweet madam,
wish, or intend to do any thing either to injure or
offend her. It is pure love, Mrs. Killbreath, that
is at the bottom of this affair. But, my fair
lady, said he to Maria, I am ordered to
shew you all possible politeness, and have a horse,
as fine an ambler as ever paced over the sod, ready
and comfortably caparisoned to carry you to the
fort. Pray, now will you permit me to help you
on him?
Ah, sir, have mercy! exclaimed Maria, for
she shuddered at the idea of being in the power of
De Villiers. Oh! I beseech you, for the love
of heaven, do not assist to plunge me into ruin!
Heaven will bless you if you let me escape.
I am but a soldier, madam, and must obey
orders
you know.
And oh, sir, would you carry meme, who
never harmed you, to misery, to destruction!
There is no danger, madam, of either, I
assure
you, said the officer, trying to soothe her;
so long as we have a gun in the fort, and a
soldier
to fire it, not a soul on earth shall harm a
hair of your head. But we must be off, madam,
and please let us go in good humour together;
for, confound me, if I like to be at variance with a
lady.
By this time Gilbert hearing something of an
altercation between the Frenchman and his
daughters
,
advanced into the room.
What's wrang, Maria, my bairn? said he;
I hope the officer wants naething uncivil wi'
you?
Ah, father, my dear father! she replied, I
am undone!
Sir, said the officer, who perceived that
Gilbert was displeased, there is no use in
fretting
about the matter. Monsieur De Villiers has
taken a fancy to your daughter. He has ordered
me to carry her to the fort. He will, I assure you,
offer her no harm. On the contrary, he wishes to
make her his wife; and will treat her as tenderly
as the pupil of his eye!
What says he? asked Gilbert, who did not
understand the language addressed to him.
Nancy briefly explained its import.
Wants my dochter into the fort among
soldiers
!
exclaimed he, an' withoot her consent
too. Get oot of my hoose this precious moment,
ye rascal, to come here on sitch an errand, or by
the Great God!may he forgive me for sitch an
oath!I'll turn ye oot by the shoothers.
The lieutenant understood Gilbert as little as
Gilbert understood him; but he perceived him to
be enraged, and observed
My friends, all this is to no purpose. There
are twenty brave fellows without yonder who will
enforce my commands. So, my sweet madam,
said he, making a gracious bow to the half
distracted
Maria, and catching her by the arm, you
had as good come along without giving us more
trouble, or permitting this old gentleman to get
into
a scrape.
Alas! said Maria, since it is so, then God
alone can protect meso saying, she fell on her
kneesOh God! oh God! cried she, in
English
;
if there is deliverance for me from this
calamity, vouchsafe to send it ere I become
wretched
;
if not, oh teach me to submit to thy will!
Here Gilbert could endure lo longer; his rage
entirely overpowered his reason, and running
into
an adjacent room, he seized upon an axe that
happened to be there.
I'll cleave you to the yearth this moment,
cried he to Ranttell, if you get not oot, an' no
vex my bairn in this gate and he actually
wielded a blow which would have been fatal to
the lieutenant, had not one of the soldiers who
had entered the house with him, caught the axe
ere it descended, and attempted to wrest it out
of his grasp. Gilbert however, although
advanced
in life, was still a strong man, and in a
moment
overturned the soldier. But another of the
soldier's seized upon the axe, and had it just
extricated
from Gilbert's hold, when Archy Frazier
hearing the scuffle, darted forward upon him and
with a kick upon the stomach overturned him
upon his companion. Ranttell himself now
closed
with Archy, and the third soldier having called
forward the remainder of the troops, hastened to
assist his commander, and Archy was soon
overpowered
.
Ranttell, as soon as the troops came forward,
ordered a sergeant's guard to enter the house, and
Gilbert and his son were instantly tied, hands and
feet together, with ropes.
Now, my fair maiden, said he, (running to
Maria, who had just recovered from a swoon, for
she thought her father was killed,) the day is
our ownlet us be going. I am sorry for the
scuffle, but it was the curst hot-headedness of that
foolish old man that occasioned it. I wished the
thing to be done in peace. Mrs. Killbreath here
can loosen these ropes as soon as we are gone.
But take care, Mrs. Doctor, and this old dame
here, said he, looking at Nelly, whom the fright
had thrown into an hysterical fit, from which she
was just recovering; I wish her also to take care
not to allow the old dotard, and his hair-brained
son to follow us; or, by God! if they do, we shall
shoot them!
Having given these instructions to Mrs. Frazier
and her daughter, he caught Maria in his arms to
carry her off
Sir, said she, making a great exertion to
recover
her energy of mind; since such is my
fate, keep your hands off me, and I will submit;
but before you separate me, perhaps for ever from
these beloved beings, my father and mother,
permit
me to embrace them.
It is all reasonable, replied Ranttell, glad
to see that the application of personal violence
towards her would be unnecessary, do so with
all my heart; only remember I can afford you but
little time for the ceremony. And pardon me,
Mrs. Doctor, he observed. turning to Nancy,
if I interfere in women's concerns, but I see
there is one thing you are likely to forget. The
lady's stay in the garrison will, perhaps, require
some changes of raiment.
Mrs. Killbreath took the hint; but first
throwing
her arms round Maria's neck, she kissed her,
while her eyes overflowed with tears
Farewell, my dearest, dearest sister! said
she. And oh! may God deliver you from these
men.
She then hastened to pack up some clothing for
Maria, which when done she handed to the
lieutenant
.
While Nancy was thus employed, Maria
had alternately embraced her father and mother.
She was at length separated from them, and
proceeded
17*
so far as the porch, when Nelly running
after
her, again caught her in her arms.
Oh! my bairn, my lovely bairn! I canna let
you leave me. I will go wi' you. Where'er they
pit you, canna be owre bad for me. I will watch
owre you, an' comfort ye amang the soldiers.
My mother, I know not what to do, said
Maria
;
much could I wish they would permit you
to go with me, but I fear it would break your
heart to witness my misery.
Alack! returned Nelly; it will break my
heart to think of my bairn being in distress, an'
me no' wi' her to share it, an' to comfort her.
Pardon me, ladies! said Ranttell; but we
have no time now to discuss matters; and as my
instructions relate only to one lady, I believe I
shall be, at present, so moderate as not to exceed
them. So, my good mother, you had better walk
within doors, and pacify old crack-brain yonder,
who will no doubt pronounce many a solid curse
upon us before we reach Du Quesne. But, my
sweet fair one! you were the prize I was sent to
capture; be so good, therefore, as to come along.
Yon gallant steed impatiently champs his bit, as
if he longed for his lovely burthen.
He here separated her from the clinging arms
of her mother, who exclaiming, Oh, heavenly
God! my bairn! my bairn! my lovely, my
innocent
bairn, is lost! and she fell flat upon the
porch in a state of insensibility.
Maria with a bursting heart, and a burning
brain, was soon raised upon the horse prepared
for her, and the troops with their beauteous prize,
hastened back to Fort Du Quesne.
Gilbert and his wife felt the calamity that had
on this day befallen them the more acutely, as they
had, since their settlement in the Wilderness,
experienced
nothing of the kind. Their children
had grown up under their eyes, healthy, blooming,
and prosperous; and, in all their other affairs, they
had enjoyed such a uniform course of tranquillity
and success, such an uninterrupted continuance of
comfort and repose, that now when the storm of
misfortune burst upon them all at once, and struck
them so severely in their tenderest affections, it is
not wonderful that they were scarcely able to
endure
the shock.
Gilbert and his son were soon loosened by Mrs.
Killbreath from their bonds after the French
departed
;
but the folly of giving pursuit was too
apparent
for them to attempt it, and all they could
do was to weep bitterly for their lost Maria.
As for Nelly, it was a considerable time after
her fall upon the porch, before she was restored
to sensation, and when that was effected, it was
found that her mind had sustained such a shock as
to render her delirious. They laid her in bed, for
she was in a high fever, and Gilbert had no other
expectation during this sorrowful evening, but that
he had lost both his wife and his daughter for ever.
As he looked upon Nelly in her raving moments,
rage and vexation would sometimes overpower
him, and he would involuntarily exclaim
Heaven's curse upon the fiends! they hae
ruined me, an' a' my comforts!But God forgie
me, I should curse nae yen. I leave them to thy
hands, oh Lord! Deal wi' them according to thy
own pleasure; but oh! have compassion upon
this afflicted family. Protect my bairn, an' restore
my wife!
It was late in the evening when Nelly's mind
became so much tranquilized that she began to
relish the consolations of religion, and Gilbert was
sitting by her bedside reading the following
passage
of the version of the 4th psalm used by the
Church of Scotland:
In thy great indignation,
O Lord! rebuke me not,
Nor on me lay thy chast'ning hand,
In thy displeasure hot.
Lord, I am weak, therefore on me
Have mercy, and me spare;
Heal me, O Lord, because thou know'st
My bones much vexed are
when the prophet Tonnaleuka entered, on his
return from inquiring after the direction which
had been taken by the savages who captured
Charles Adderly. He had ascertained it, and was
now coming to report the circumstance to Maria,
and comfort her with the assurance, that
something
should be immediately done to effect her
lover's
deliverance.
The prophet was thunderstruck, when he was
informed of what had happened to the family. He
gave a groan, and threw himself in great agitation
upon a bench beside a table upon which he laid his
head, and pressing his throbbing temples between
his hands, remained in that posture for about
fifteen
minutes, without speaking a word. He then
suddenly started up, and hastily paced the room
backwards and forwards for some time in a
species
of frenzy, with his eyes swollen as if they
would burst from their sockets, but apparently too
much scorched with the fire of grief to shed a
single
tear. After which he resumed his former
posture
at the table, still silent, and seemingly
absorbed
in intense thought, as well as grief. At length
throwing himself upon his knees, he stretched his
hands, and lifted his burning eyes towards heaven,
and exclaimed
Oh! Great Spirit and Father of the universe,
assist me in the endeavour, and grant success to
what thou hast thyself suggested. I depend on
thee, on thee alone to protect that suffering maiden
and restore her again to her friends.
He then arose, and inquired for Paddy Frazier;
and when told that Paddy had not been at home
since the morning, he seemed very impatient, and
again paced the floor in great agitation.
In a short time, however, Paddy and Dr.
Killbreath
arrived, and Tonnaleuka appeared at once
to become much tranquilized. The consternation
and rage of both these hunters of the forest,
when they heard of their sister's misfortune, need
not be described: they both swore eternal hatred
to the French. But Tonnaleuka did not give
Paddy
much time to vent forth the vehemence of his
rage; he took him out of doors, where he
communed
with him about ten minutes. When they
re-entered the house, Paddy hastily provided
himself
with a small wooden flask full of rum and
some provisions, which he deposited in a pouch at
his side, and pitching his rifle on his shoulder,
set off again at full speed, with as much
briskness
and alacrity as if he had just arisen from
his couch, after the enjoyment of a long repose.
The prophet then exhorted the family to be of
good cheer, as he had great hopes that all might yet
be well; and as he understood from Mrs. Killbreath
that her father and mother had refused all kinds of
nourishment since Maria's capture, he desired that
supper should be prepared, of which, he said, he
should himself stay to partake. After supper, he
took Dr. Killbreath aside and requested him to set
off early in the morning towards the head waters
of Chartier's Creek, in order to watch the
proceedings
of a party of Caughnewago Indians, who had
carried Charles Adderly in that direction, and
to lose no time in bringing him back intelligence
of their intentions concerning their prisoner, as
soon as he should discover them.
My son, said he, show this wampum to the
sachem, Takshuma, who is their leader. He will
protect you from any injury, and perhaps, give you
all the information we require. I should have
gone on this errand myself; but, Maria, the child
of my heart, is now in distress, and I cannot
forsake
her.
My son, my inability to attend to the affairs of
Charles Adderly, may, at this crisis, be fatal to him,
unless Takshuma grants the petition which, in my
name, and upon the testimony of that sacred
wampum
,
I authorize you to deliver to him.Tell him
that Tonnaleuka, the adopted son of the deceased
Fallakamsah, formerly chief sachem of the tribe of
the Mingoes, and the prophet of Maneto for fifteen
tribes, requests Takshuma, sachem of the
Caughnewagoes
,
to grant the English prisoner Charles
Adderly
,
if the Caughnewago counsellors should
condemn
him to be burned, that which no prophet of
Maneto has ever been refused when he asked it
for a condemned prisonernamely, seven days
after
his condemnation to make his peace with
Maneto
before he be given to the flames.
If I had this petition in writing, observed the
Doctor, with much simplicity, I should, no doubt,
remember it better, and deliver it more correctly
to the sachem.
My son, you shall have it in writing then, said
Tonnaleuka, for your own use. Only show not
the paper to the sachem, for he will either despise
you for requiring such as assistant to your
memory
,
or he may look upon it as a forgery of your
own, for the chiefs and prophets of our people
never
use such means of communication with each
other.
The Doctor promised to obey the prophet's
instructions
,
which, as well as the petition, were
reduced that evening to writing, and he set out
on his errand early the next morning.
CHAPTER XIV.
And now he pours his choice of fear,
In secret on Matilda's ear;
Consent, and all this dread array,
Like morning dream shall pass away;
Refuse, and by my duty press'd,
I give the wordthou know'st the rest.
Scott
.
The
great luminary of this nether world had
upwards of an hour's journey to perform, ere he
could hide himself behind the edge of the
western
horizon, from the view of the inhabitants
of Fort Du Quesne, when the lovely object of
its Governor's passion, was brought an
unhappy
captive within its walls.
When the sound of the bugle announced the
arrival of Ranttell's party, the Governor, with a
feeling of some embarrassment, hastened to
salute
the enchanter of his soul, whom he
perceived
to be with them, and to conduct her unto his
residence. When he held out his hand to assist
her in dismounting, she for a moment, with an
instinctive
shudder, shrunk from his touch; but
instantly
recollecting that there was no possibility
of then avoiding it, without perhaps, subjecting
herself to greater rudeness, she silently accepted
his assistance, and suffered herself to be led, an
uncomplaining victim, to the lodging that had
been prepared for her.
This was a tolerably neat room of moderate
dimensions, on the second floor of the governor's
house, which was situated near that part of the
circumvallation which overlooked the
Monongahela
.
It was in the northeastern angle of the
house, and had in view from its front windows,
the principal area, or parade ground, within the
stoccade. Besides the necessary furniture which,
although not splendid, was commodious and clean,
it contained a few books of a romantic and light
species of literature, arranged on some shelves
adjoining the door of a small dark closet, which
formed an appendage to the apartment.
Miss Frazier, said De Villiers on handing
her into this room, I am sorry, to my very soul I
am sorry, that you should have compelled me
to take this step. But I felt that I could not
live without you, and I had no alternative.
Endeavour
to make yourself comfortable in this
abode, such as it is, I wish to God it was a palace
for your sake.
Sir, said she, comfort is now a matter of no
concern to me, for it is what I feel I cannot
enjoy
.
Alas! to enter a place under such
circumstances
,
would be the same as a dungeon.
Here the energy which had sustained her
during
her journey, forsook her, for the state in
which she had left her friends, rushed into her
remembrance, and she burst into tears.
Oh, my dear father and mother, said she,
what must you not feel at this moment! heaven
support you under this trial.
Be pacified, my lovely maiden, said De
Villiers
,
in a soothing mannerfor he really felt
affected
at her sorrow. Your feelings are too
tender. You are by far of too timid and
apprehensive
a disposition. I assure you that you will
suffer no evil here, and shall also take care to
remove
any uneasiness your friends may feel on
that account. The urgency of passion,
irresistible
passion, for you, alone, constrained me to
separate you from them. But, believe me, it was
not to make either you or them unhappy; and,
upon the honour of a soldier, I promise that any
thing short of parting with you, I shall submit to,
in order to make your residence with me
agreeable
.
Alas, then, I need expect no relief from
misery
,
she replied, for nothing short of a separation
from you, and restoration to my friends, can
afford
such relief. Oh, restore me to them, and I
shall never cease to bless you, I shall never cease
to pray for your happiness!
What! said he, nonoyou know not
how I adore your loveliness, or you would not
expect
me to part with it so soon. It would be
folly
indeed, to throw that treasure out of my hand,
for which the whole world could not afford me an
equivalent. But the whole world, Miss Frazier,
cannot now deprive me of you. That blessed
consideration makes me ample amends for your
present displeasure. Oh, smile upon one who
doats on you, and be reconciled to yield to the
ardour of his affections, by becoming his wife, and
his whole future conduct, he pledges his salvation,
shall be regulated so as to make you happy.
Sir, said she, recovering her full energy of
manner and tonenevernever! You have
already had my answer on that subject; an
answer
which no earthly consideration can ever
induce
me to change. No, my heart would burst
to pieces ere my tongue should utter a promise to
be yours.
Well, my sweet tormentor, you would inflict
a pang into my soul, would you, by such a
manifestation
of hatred for me? But, by heavens!
you are beautiful, and so long as I can behold
those fascinating features, I shall feel no pangs of
any kind! When I shall feel sorrow, I shall fly to
Vol. II. 18
you, and gaze upon you. The sight of your
charms will quicken me into joy, and to clasp
them to my enraptured bosom, will transport me
into bliss. He pausedbut she continued
silent
,
shuddering at his vehemence; and he soon
again continued:
Maiden! You say you will never promise to
be mine. Be it so. I can, if I please, dispense
with that promise, and yet be happy. For know,
my enchantress, you are at this moment mine to all
intents and for all purposes, as completely and
absolutely
,
as if the priest had made you so. It is
for your own sake, my fair one, and not for mine,
that I wish the forms to be gone through. What
say you?will you consult your own reputation,
your own purity, and the satisfaction of your
friends, and pronounce the vow which will make
me happy without making you wretched.
Never!she replied, in a tone of firmness
and decisionnever. If I am doomed to
wretchedness, no act of my own shall ever be,
with my knowledge, accessary to it. If I cannot
control the power of others over me, I can, at
least, control the meaning of the words that I
utter, and never shall I utter any which will
entitle
you to exercise authority over me.
Say you so, obstinate, foolish girl? he
replied
,
with considerable irritation. But your
obstinacy
,
or if you prefer the phrase, your firmness
on this point, shall be tried. By heavens! if I
did not love you too sincerely to seize your
charms, and rifle your sweets without ceremony,
I would not delay my bliss one hour. But harsh,
inconsiderate as you are, your purity and
satisfaction
of mind, are worth something in my
estimation
;
they are worth at least a few days
postponement
of my happiness. It shall be,
therefore
,
postponed that it may be the sweeter when
it comes; for, by the great God, I swear, it shall
come with your own consent, if I should shake
your very soul to its centre in order to extort that
consent from you! This is my determination,
seducing, obdurate girl! I shall now leave you to
reflect upon it. But your lovely hand shall first
impress rapture upon my lips.
So saying, he forcibly kissed her hand, and
left the apartment. Maria threw herself upon the
bed, and burst into tears. The full sense of her
wretched situation, and still more wretched
prospects
,
rushed violently upon her mind, and she
poured forth the sorrows of her soul to her
Maker
,
from whom alone, if there was any
deliverance
for her, could she expect it, by some
miraculous
means to proceed. She prayed,
fervently
prayed, that whatever might be the acuteness
of her personal sufferings, she should, at least, bear
them without sinning, and that if her distress
should occasion her destruction, her soul should
return to him from whom it had proceeded, as
undefiled
,
and as unoffending as she had received it.
This pious train of thought had the effect of
greatly tranquillizing her mind, and when, in about
fifteen minutes after the departure of De Villiers,
a squaw entered her apartment with some
refreshments
,
she prevailed on herself to partake slightly
of them, after which, committing herself to the
all-powerful protection of the God on whom she
relied, she locked her chamber door, and throwing
her harassed frame again upon the couch,
endeavoured
to court repose.
But it was long before she obtained it. The
misfortunes of Charles Adderly, who loved her
so tenderly, and to whom the whole affections of
her soul were engaged, for sometime occupied
and agitated her mind, so entirely and intensely,
as almost to obliterate the recollection of her
own. The awful fate which she feared he either
had suffered, or would be doomed to suffer, from
the cruelty of the savages, excited her mind, as
she reflected deeply upon it, to a species of
intolerable
feeling, so nearly bordering upon
despair
,
that she could have wished herself
annihilated
,
to get rid of it. When she pictured to
herself
the horrors of his destruction, amidst the
flames, gladly, gladly would she have rejoiced in
the possibility of becoming herself a substitute to
undergo the dreadful doom in his stead.
Then, again, when the terrors of her own
situation
would recur to her, the possibility of being
condemned to the horrible embraces of a wretch
whose villany she execrated, occasioned her to
shudder, a cold sweat broke upon her frame, and
she thought that even Charles's worst fate must be
happiness, compared with hers.
Oh, would to my God! she mentally
exclaimed
,
that sooner than permit such a
catastrophe
to take place, he would strike me dead
with his thunder, or cause this building to take
fire and consume me amidst the conflagration.
Nature at length became wearied with the
poignancy of sorrow, and she sunk into a kind of
stupor which terminated, at last, in a slumber,
disturbed and troubled, indeed, but infinitely
more refreshing and invigorating in its effects
than she had any reason to expect.
She arose the next morning, rejoiced to find
herself
restored to a degree of resolution and
fortitude
,
of which, the preceding evening, she had
been entirely destitute; and she now felt as if she
could courageously meet her fate, let its aspect
be ever so appalling.
The squaw that had the night before brought
refreshments to her, appeared some time after
she arose, with a request from the Governor that
she would favour him with her company at
breakfast
,
which was waiting for her in a parlour below
stairs. This invitation she declined on the plea
of indisposition. The squaw retired, but in a
short time returned to prepare breakfast in her
apartment, and in a few minutes was followed by
De Villiers himself, who saluted her with great
politeness, hoped her indisposition was not of a
serious nature, and since she was unable to afford
him the pleasure of her presence at breakfast,
below
,
he would crave the liberty to enjoy it in her
own room.
You are master here, sir, said she, and no
doubt, despotically enough disposed to make all
such matters bend to your will. My opposition
to your taking this liberty, would I am therefore
persuaded, be fruitless, and should not relieve me
of your presence, let me feel it as disagreeable as I
may.
Then my presence is still disagreeable to
you, he observed; well, let it be so, since
yours affords me delight, by the Holy Virgin! I
will enjoy it. But, my fair one, I wish you to join
me in this breakfast, for, by my faith, I did not
bring you here to starve you.
Sir, said she, on condition that you avoid
the subject so grating to my feelings, I shall
partake
with you, but on no other.
He bowed a complaisant assent, and she sat
down to table with him. But the meal was
scarcely
over when he renewed the ungrateful subject.
Oh! how happy, Miss Frazier, he said,
looking tenderly at her, and drawing a deep sigh,
should I be, if you were thus the voluntary and
permanent mistress of my table, and myself! Oh,
will you not consent to receive the hand of the
man who loves you beyond all the world?
18*
The reply, sir, said she, that I have so
decisively given to that question already, I think
might be sufficient to convince you of the inutility
of repeating it. That reply was made never to be
changed, and it never can be changed!
Other methods must then be tried, said he
with fierceness; for by heavens! I must have
you for my own, if there be energy in human
power
to effect it!
At this moment the sound of a trumpet was
heard. It is these cursed Indians, said he,
starting to his feet, that are going to hold a
council concerning our English prisoners, a
number
of whom they are resolved to burn. I have
been trying to persuade them from it, but it won't
do. They must be gratified; otherwise they'll go
off in dudgeon, and I cannot spare them at present,
lest the British under Dunbar should think proper
to make a trip this way. I must attend their
counsel
now and save as many lives as I can.
Maria, whose humanity shuddered at this
intelligence
,
and who that moment thought upon the
fate of Charles Adderly, which, for aught she knew,
might be dependent upon the decision of this very
councilcaught the Governor's arm as he was
going
away.
Oh, for the love of heaven! Monsieur de
Villiers, said she, save these unfortunate men.
God will bless you for the deed.
Since it is your wish, my sweet one, he
replied
,
I shall do my utmost; but these savages
claim so much merit for their fighting the day
before
yesterday, that I fear I shall make but little
of them, especially as they captured these men
themselves. So eager, Miss Frazier, are they
for burning their prisoners, that I am told a
party
of them left the field of battle with one or two
captives whom they were resolved not to be
baffled
in sacrificing, and carried them southward,
lest, if they had brought them to the garrison, I
should have interfered to save them. But I
perceive
the old Mingo prophet, Tonnaleuka, among
them. This promises well, as he is always averse
to burning prisoners, and he has more power over
them than I have. Between us, I think we sball
be able to save some of these Englishmen.
Oh! I beseech you to save them all, if you
can, cried Maria.
That is impossible, he returned; I have
already
conceded that they should have at least
twelve at their disposal; they claimed this as a
reward for their conduct in the late battle, and I
could not well refuse them. The present counsel
is to determine how many more they shall have,
as well as to select the twelve for whom they
have already stipulated. If the Mingo prophet
assists me, I think, however, we shall be able to
save the remainder.
That prophet is a good man, observed
Maria
;
I know he will assist you, and may heaven
also assist you in the benevolent work.
Amen, said De Villiers. Good
morning
,
my sweet girl. I will think of your wishes, and
if possible protect these men.
Shortly after De Villiers departed, the
sorrowful
Maria beheld from a window the wretched
captives, nearly forty in number, tied together, in
pairs, and surrounded by several hundred savages
who were dancing, singing, halloing, and
exhibiting
,
in every grotesque and frantic manner that
could be conceived, their triumph over the
unfortunate
objects of their barbarous mirth. Her
heart for a moment rejoiced to see that Charles
Adderly was not among them; but it almost
immediately
sunk within her, when she recollected
that his destruction was perhaps on that very
account
,
the more certainly inevitable.
For he, alas, she sighed, my unfortunate
Charles! He must be in the hands of those
inveterate
savages who fled with their victims lest the
French should rescue them from their barbarity.
Ah! my Charles, to what an evil destiny have we
both been born!
As these reflections passed through her mind,
she grew dizzy, the surrounding objects wavered
before her eyes, and she staggered back to her
couch; but there a flood of tears coming to her
relief
,
she soon became again calm and resigned,
and resumed her station at the window. Here
her heart warmed to behold Tonnaleuka. His
presence seemed, even under the circumstances in
which she beheld him, to throw a certain
consciousness
of security around her, and an almost
confident
hope that the poor captives who excited so
much of her sympathy, would escape uninjured.
He was earnestly talking to some of the Indian
chiefs, who appeared to listen to him with great
attention. At length De Villiers went forward to
him, and walking aside with him to some distance
from the groupe, they seemed to converse together
for about ten minutes with great earnestness. The
Governor then returned to the Indians, and
giving
the word to march, a flourish of trumpets
succeeded
,
and the party, consisting almost altogether
of Indians and prisoners, proceeded out of the
fortress
.
Tonnaleuka remaining some distance
behind
,
took an opportunity, after the Governor had
disappeared, when he was unnoticed by the
sentinel
who was looking after the procession, to make
an obeisance to Maria, who still remained at the
window. He then lifting his right hand to heaven,
and putting it three times on his right ear, thereby
intimated his assurance, that God would hear her
prayers for protection, and afford her deliverance.
She motioned to him in token of understanding
his meaning, and he disappeared, leaving on her
mind a feeling of encouragement, of an
indefinable
,
but invigorating nature, as strong and
cheering
as if it imparted an almost certain conviction
that she was under the immediate care of heaven,
and she felt a degree of tranquillity and fortitude
that she had not before experienced since her
captivity
.
In about two hours, she heard the trumpets
again sounding, and, in a short time, the captives
and their savage conquerors returned into the fort.
Maria perceived that the procession was not now
so numerous as when it left the fort; but this
excited
no surprise in her mind, as the roving and
irregular habits of the Indians occasioned them
often to disappear suddenly and unaccountably
from scenes, in which it might be expected they
would feel the highest interest.
The prisoners being conducted to their
quarters
,
the Indians dispersed, and the greater
number of them instantly left the fort; and De
Villiers hastened to visit the lovely captive whom
he had immediately under his own custody.
Miss Frazier, said he, as he entered her
apartment; I am heartily glad to get rid of these
savages, and once more enjoy the delight of your
presence. It is like changing the company of
fiends for that of an angel.
Ah! sir, tell me, she returned, Has any
thing been done for the poor Englishmen? Have
you secured their safety?
They are all safe, thank God! he replied;
except the twelve I mentioned to you who have
been selected by lot. I exerted myself greatly,
since I knew it would please you. They have
given up all the others to us as prisoners of war.
And whatwhat! she asked, with much
emotion, is to become of these unfortunate
twelve?
Why I fear much that the savages will burn
them, according to their custom in such cases,
replied De Villiers.
And oh, Monsieur de Villiers, said she, is
there no way left to save them from such a cruel
fate? Have you not force enough, influence
enough, to protect them. Oh, think that these
men may have tender relativesfathers, and
mothers
,
wives and children, whose hearts are at this
day in agony to ascertain their fate! Oh, think,
feel, if thou canst feel for the misery of others,
what will be their horror, their distraction, when
they hear that those so dear to them have come
to such a terrible end. Oh, do something to
save them, I conjure, thee if thou wouldst expect
salvation thyself!
Why, my sweet enchantress, said he, why
plead so strongly in behalf of men of whom thou
knowest nothing, and who neither know nor care
any thing about thee; and yet be so indifferent to
the prayers and entreaties of one who adores thee?
Why feel and tremble so much at the idea of mere
strangers being burned to death by a fire of wood,
and show so little compassion for one whose life
thou art barbarously consuming in the flames
kindled by thy own charms? Ah! why, cruel
girl, accuse the savages of barbarity to their
victims, who are their enemies, when thou art
thyself
as barbarous, and hard-hearted to thy own
loverto me, alas! who love you with a passion
too violent for me to bear long unrequited and
live.
Sir, said she, it is to no purpose that
you talk in this manner. Tell me, tell me, can
you do any thing to save these unfortunate
men?
Tell me first, my angel, returned he,
can you, will you do any thing to save me from
a worse fate?
Oh, my God, she criedlooking up to
heaven
,
direct me, merciful Power! what to say
what to do!Alas, sir, she continued casting
her eyes upon De Villiers, to what straits would
you drive me, saysayfor heaven's sake, can
you save these men?
If you give me your hand at the altar, said
he, after a little apparent meditation, as the
price of their lives, you shall have them, if I
should turn out my garrison to rescue them from
the stakes.
Oh, heavenly Father! she exclaimed, to
what a situation am I reduced! Alas, sir, I cannot,
I cannotOh, hear meI would, ah! I think I
would give it to you to save these victims, but
alas, it is pledged, irrevocably pledged to
another
.
Your hand pledged to another! exclaimed
De Villiers, rising from his seat in surprise, and
pacing the room in great irritation. Your hand
pledged to another, and no doubt your heart too
Miss Frazier, is it not so!
Alas, sir. I cannot deny it. But surely, surely,
if it be in your power, you will not let these
unhappy
prisoners die.
Die! he repeated, yesthat they must.
Butbut, perhaps, no, said he, suddenly
changing
his manner. It isthat is, it may be still in
your power to save them. You are not married,
I hope?
No, sir.
Then, my lovely fair one, these men may yet
be safe. Let us make a bargain.Let your hand
be mine, and their lives shall be yours.
Alas, sir, have I not told you that my hand
is already pledged.
Merely pledged, cried he, what signifies
that? A mere verbal promise. The wind of the
mouth, which, when it passes into the air, is
nothing
.
Miss Frazier, you will surely not place
such a trifle, such a nonentity into
competition
with the lives of twelve human beings.
Say the word, my sweetest, tenderest, loveliest of
women, utter that which humanity calls upon you
to utter, and they are safe.
Alas, sir!Oh, what can I do? but it is
impossible
.
I cannot unsay what I have said. I
cannot forfeit my truth! No, no, rather than that,
let me first die the death allotted to these men!
Then these men whom you devote to the
flames shall die! said he, and he hastened out of
the room in a paroxysm of rage.
In about twenty minutes the sound of trumpets
was heard, and a guard of soldiers appeared
conducting
twelve prisoners across the court of the
fortress opposite Maria's window, at the distance
of about twenty yards from which De Villiers
gave the word, and the party halted, and fronted
towards the window. The prisoners with their
heads uncovered, then kneeled and looked up to
Maria, as if earnestly supplicating for some
important
favour.
De Villiers left them in this situation, and
hastened
to her apartment.
Look, said he, hard-hearted girl, at those
poor men now under sentence to suffer, within one
hour, the most terrible of all deaths, burning at the
stake! Look at them on their knees imploring
thee to deliver them from a fast approaching and
cruel fate. I have told them that their destiny is
in thy hands, that if it pleaseth thee, I will defend
them from the vengeance of the savages, and
procure
a reversal of the condemnation that has been
passed against them. Wilt thou save them, or wilt
thou let them perish?
Maria looked at the men. Their uniforms of
red, in times of prosperity the most brilliant and
imposing of all warlike colours, now stained and
tattered; their wobegone countenances and
wearied-out frames, their humble posture, their
hair uncovered and scattered to the winds,
to the imagination of Maria, bespoke misery,
hardship, and terror in the extreme. She burst
into tears as she beheld them; for she reflected
that these very men, had, perhaps, been once
happy
in the enjoyment of domestic comforts,
virtuous
endearments, and tender attachments; and
now, when on the very verge of terminating their
existence, of leaving all their joys and affections
behind them, and undergoing the most excruciating
species of destruction, she beheld them imploring
her, who had it in her power to save them by
foregoing
her own happiness, not to consign them to
their awful doom from any selfish consultation of
her own wishes, but by gratifying a man who
besought her to become his wife, to deliver them
and restore them to safety. What was she to do?
Could she deny De Villiers, and have these poor
supplicants carried off to instant destruction; or
could she yield to his desires, and make herself
miserable, and, what was the worst of all
alternatives
,
be unfaithful to Charles Adderly?
De Villiers perceived her wavering, and he
urged her to a decision. Five minutes, my
love, said he, pulling out his watchLet five
minutes pass without promising to become my
wife, and these men shall be ordered away to the
stakes and the faggots already prepared for their
execution
Vol. II. 19
Oh, barbarous man! have mercy, have
mercy
!
she exclaimed. Her eyeballs swelledher
lips quivered and grew pale, her limbs tottered
under
her, and she fell backwards upon the floor.
Godof heaven, I have killed her! cried De
Villiers
.
He lifted her in his arms, placed her on the
bed, and calling loudly for assistance, the attending
squaw made her appearance. Some stimulants
were applied to Maria's temples, and she soon
began
again to respire, and recover her sensibility.
She at length incoherently exclaimed:
Oh! tell methey have not surely sent them
to the flames! The governor cannot be so
barbarous
!
Let them be savedlet them be
saved
!
Alas! I cannot bear to have them
burned
!
De Villiers now made a signal out of the
window
,
for the troops and the prisoners to withdraw.
Then returning to Maria's bed-side, he watched
over her with great anxiety, until he saw the
regular
chain of her thoughts properly restored,
which took place much sooner than he expected.
His desire to work upon her feelings, so as to
extort
from her a consent to marry him, returned
with her recovery; and to her inquiry of what
had been done with the unfortunate prisoners, he
replied,
They are, my love, respited until to-morrow
at noon, in order that you may have time to
deliberate
leisurely, and decide upon their fate and
mine. And, oh! may I conjure you, Miss
Frazier
,
before that time, to resolve on saying the
word, which will save them from destruction, and
me from despair! I shall now leave you, that you
may enjoy repose. Give your commands to
Halmanna
,
this squaw, and she will supply you with
whatever the garrison can afford to make you
comfortable. So saying, he relieved Maria of
his presence by withdrawing from the
apartment
.
The shock she had sustained had thrown her
into a violent fever; and a certain wildness in her
expression and manner had become so apparent,
as to alarm Halmanna, who in consequence
entertained
some thoughts of acquainting De
Villiers
with the circumstance, in order that
medical
aid might be procured, when she saw the
prophet Tonnaleuka entering the house.
Halmanna
,
who believed that if either earthly or
spiritual
aid could assist Maria, the prophet was the
most likely person to afford it, answered
Tonnaleuka's
inquiry after Miss Frazier, by expressing
a desire that he should visit her, as she was very
sick.
This being exactly what Tonnaleuka intended
to do, he did not require a second invitation; but
desiring the squaw to remain below stairs, and
not come near the apartment unless sent for,
while he remained with the young lady, he in a
few moments was in Maria's presence. The very
appearance of this venerable man, who had from
her infancy been her guide, her oracle, and her
friend, and the soothing, parental sound of his
voice, produced a powerful effect in allaying her
fever, which, having been occasioned altogether
by an over-wrought mental excitement, now
obtained
its proper remedy in the application of
comfort, encouragement, and consolation.
Oh, my father, said she, as he advanced,
your Maria has at length known misfortune
she has suffered misery, she has felt despairOh,
art thou now come, as thou wert ever wont, to
administer peace and comfort to my soul?
My daughter, I am come for that purpose,
replied the prophet, sitting down beside her, and
I thank our Great Father, it is in my power.
My daughter, hear me! my words are
comfort
,
and they are truth. Thou hast this day been
greatly imposed upon by the wicked governor of
this fortress! The prisoners whom thou sawest,
are not condemned to suffer, nor are there any
now under such condemnation. Alas! those who
were condemnedtwelve gallant soldiers, my
heart still bleeds for themwere meanly given up
by the Governor ere I could interpose in their
behalf, and in despite of all my exertions, they
were carried across the Alleghany river at noon
this day, and committed to the flames. Their
sufferings are by this time terminated, and the
tribes will, on this occasion, require no more
victims
.
Hear me, my daughter. Those who were
sentenced to die, returned not back to the fort
after
leaving it this morning. A band of Ottawas
went directly with them to the place of death,
and many of my red brothers who did return to
the fort, followed immediately after dismissal, to
view the sacrifice.
Hear me farther. As I was amidst the
English
prisoners, after the Indians had withdrawn,
assuring them of their safety, for they
understood
not the language in which their fate was
decided, and therefore knew it not, the
Governor
came among them. He ordered twelve of
them to be separated from the rest. He
promised
them permission to return to their
countrymen
under colonel Dunbar, if they would
advance
into the middle of the fortress-yard, and
there kneel, uncovered, before a young lady who
should appear at the window of his residence,
and obtain in that humble posture, her consent to
their enlargement. He informed them, that while
making their supplications, they should not speak,
as the lady did not understand English; (for his
whole scheme was a system of falsehood,) but
that he himself should convey to her the purport
of their request, and report the lady's answer.
He has since informed them that your answer
will not be given till to-morrow noon. In the
meantime, the men are duped by his artifice to
expect liberty which he will not grant, as you
have been deceived into the belief that they were
petitioning to be rescued from a danger which
they neither dreaded, nor have any reason to
dread.
Therefore, my daughter, hear my advice.
Persevere in your refusal to become this man's
wife. Powerful as he is, the Great Spirit is
more powerful than he, and will frustrate all
his designs against you, because he loves virtue,
and you are virtuous, and because he hates vice,
and this man is vicious. Before many days, I
trust that the Great Spirit will raise up a
deliverer
for you, and disappoint the tyrant in his
designs
.
My daughter, treasure this my advice in your
heart, and fear neither the cunning nor the force
of the tempter.
Father, you have indeed comforted me,
she replied. You have restored life to my soul.
For myself, I now fear nothing, since thou, whose
words have never yet deceived me, hast bade me
not fear. But, Oh, father! forgive my
weakness
,
when I say I am still wretched, since there
is one whom thou knowest to be dear to me, in
danger. Alas! I need not name him. Canst
thou tell me aught of him?
My daughter, said the prophet, I know
thy heart is distressed on account of that youth.
I have discovered the path his captors have
caused
*19
him to tread, and hope too, that the Great
Spirit will extend to him a share of that mercy
with which he is ever ready to aid the virtuous
and that he will rescue him whose misfortunes
you lament, from the dangers that surround him.
My daughter, I again recommend you to be
of good cheer in all these matters. Inform not
the Governor that you know his perfidy. It would
only exasperate him, and induce him to have
recourse
to other stratagems which might involve
you in fresh troubles. Require time to
deliberate
,
ere you give an answer to his demands. A
little delay may bring you deliverance. But never,
never, on any account, answer him according to
his wishes. For, my daughter, you know him
to be wicked. Uniting your fate with him, would
be, therefore, to join in his wickedness. But I need
not counsel you thus, since I know that your
virtue
is firm, and your heart constant.
Oh, father, said she, seizing the prophet's
hand and kissing it, while she moistened it with
tears of gratitude and joy, thou hast ever
been to me the source of wisdom and the
inspirer
of virtue. Next to my heavenly Preserver,
I owe to thee the chief blessings of my life.
Whilst thou watchest over my safety, methinks
that no evil can befal me. Oh, father, wilt thou
watch over that of Charles Adderly? Alas, what
would protection be to me if he meets with
destruction
!
My daughter, hear meall that is in my power
to do for that young man, is now doing; and when
I say I doubt not of his safety, why should you
doubt of it? Why should you tremble, when I say to
you, be of good cheer on his account as well as
your own? Our great Father, on whom you
must never forget to place your principal
dependence
,
will never fail you. He will, as the
oracles
of your religion say, `make all things work
together for the good of those who love him.'
My child, that military parade at which the
Governor is now employed, will soon be over.
He will then, no doubt, return to you. I must,
therefore, withdraw. May the Great Being on
whom you depend, protect you, and keep you
firm!
He now departedbut before leaving the house,
he laid upon Halmanna his commands that she
should inform no one of his visit to the sick lady.
Thanks to Maneto, said he, she is now
free from her fever. But a worse complaint will
seize thee, Halmanna, if thou disobeyest my
directions
.
Far be it from me, replied Halmanna
trembling
,
to disobey the prophet of Maneto.
Then may Maneto bless thee, said
Tonnaleuka
,
and waving his awful wand over her head,
he disappeared.
CHAPTER XV.
Ask me not what the maiden feels,
Left in that dreadful hour alone;
Perchance her reason stoops or reels
Perchance a courage not her own
Braces her mind to desperate tone.
Scott
.
In
about half an hour after the prophet
withdrew
,
De Villiers visited Maria. He expressed
great satisfaction to find that she was so much
better than he had expected; but as she felt an
inclination for repose, and informed him of it, he
conceived that indulging her in it at this time,
would contribute greatly to the further
restoration
of her health and serenity. He therefore,
shortened his visit, and briefly exhorting her for
the sake of the unhappy prisoners, as he called
them, for his sake, and for her own, before the
appointed hour, to determine on being his wife,
he withdrew without offering her any species of
rudeness.
The next morning, wishing to gain somewhat
upon her esteem, by a conciliating demeanor, and
a show of delicacy towards her, he admitted her
plea of indisposition, and did not insist on
joining
her at breakfast. Shortly afterwards,
however
,
he entered her apartment. She appeared
tranquil and resigned, because the suggestion of
hope had afforded her consolation, and inspired
her with fortitude. There was, in consequence,
a sweetness in her looks, and an increase of her
charms, unknown or unthought of by herself,
which rendered her appearance altogether more
irresistibly fascinating than he thought he had
ever before beheld it. His passion for her was
therefore more than usually inflamed. But afraid
of again occasioning her such a degree of
mental
excitement as had overpowered her the
preceding
evening, he resolved to restrain the
impetuosity
of his feelings, and, if possible, address
her in language that should neither alarm nor
offend
her.
Miss Frazier, said he, I need scarcely
express
my happiness at seeing your serenity and
contentment so far restored while under my roof,
that I think you could in time bring yourself to
live comfortably with me. This circumstance
affords
me some hope that my application for your
hand may not be altogether in vain, and that
perhaps
you have come to the resolution to decide
favourably upon the important affair now
committed
to your award.
Sir, she replied, I have been thinking of
that affair; but it is really one of too much
importance
to be decided without more deliberation
than I have yet given it.
Ah! Miss Frazier! said he, surely you
cannot hesitate to interpose a single word between
twelve fellow-beings and destruction; and you
know the hour speedily approaches, which,
without
that interposition, shall consign them to their
fate.
Monsieur De Villiers, said she, I have
never
yet asked a favour from you for myself,
and when I first entered these walls I conceived
that I never should. I have now changed my
mind so far as to make a request, which I hope
you will not refuse to grant.
Ask it! my sweet one, he replied, and any
thing but parting with you, that is within the
compass
of my power to grant, I pledge my honour
shall not be denied you.
My request is moderate, she replied,
altogether
within your power to grant. It is only that
I may be indulged with a few days longer time to
deliberate on this matter; for I feel it impossible to
bring my mind to such an instantaneous change
of feeling, as to forget the youth to whom I am
pledged, and promise to wed another, by the mere
effort of only one day's consideration.
He paced the room for some time in silent
meditation
after hearing this request. At length, he
said,
It is perhaps reasonable; it is perhaps
natural
,
that this should be so; and you will never find
me, my bewitching girl, inclined to treat you
unreasonably
.
You shall have a few days; but, oh!
let them be fewfor my heart longs, exceedingly
longs, to call you its own!
Give me one week, said she; alas! I fear
even that will be too short for my purpose!
My fairest love! cried he, must I
postpone
my bliss so long? But I will indulge
thee. I will show thee by so doing, that I value
thy comfort, thy wishes, more than I do my own.
I will now hasten to inform the unfortunate
Englishmen
that they have obtained from thee at least
one week's reprieve from their awful sentence:
and oh! may they at last obtain from thy
humanity
their final deliverance! Think not that I am
cruel towards them, my fair one. Alas! thou
art cruel towards me; and if they be sacrificed,
it shall be to thy barbaritythey shall be the
victims of my rejected love.
She made no reply to this hypocritical address;
for her soul despised his deception, and she even
feared to look at him, lest the indignation of her
eyes should betray that she was aware of his
falsehood. Very much to her satisfaction,
however
,
he scarcely waited for a reply, but, with the
self-congratulating air of a man who has gained a
great triumph, he bade her good morning, and
retired
.
The next day happened to be a gala day among
the French, whether on account of its being the
birth-day of a saint or a
grand monarque
, is
immaterial
,
and arrangements had been made for
celebrating
it by a grand fete, in which the greater
portion of the soldiers were to be engaged. About
two hundred and fifty, it was resolved, should
proceed
about mid-day to a rising ground, now called
Grant's Hill, nearly half a mile to the eastward
of the fort, where it was intended that they
should march, and countermarch, fire
artillery
and musketry, eat a hearty dinner, and get
drunk, and sing, and swear, and dance, and cut
capers, until they were tired; when they should
return in the evening to the fort, tumble into their
couches, and snore off their debauch like gay
fellows.
At about twelve o'clock, the whole garrison was
accordingly put in motion, the soldiers and officers
running promiscuously to and fro upon the parade
ground, where they were to fall into ranks,
previous
to their marching for the scene of revelry.
Maria had just stationed herself at her window,
to view the scene, when she beheld the
Tonnaleuka
entering the fortress-gate, accompanied by an
Indian chief, of a tall and majestic figure. De
Villiers had, at this moment, entered upon the
parade-ground
,
for the purpose of ordering the troops
to assume their ranks. He halted as he perceived
the prophet and the chief advancing towards him.
After conversing a few minutes with the former,
he made an obeisance to the latter; and calling
upon a soldier, he gave him some instructions,
when the soldier led the way, followed by
Tonnaleuka
and his companion, to the governor's house.
In a short time, the soldier returned to take his
place in the ranks; and in less than fifteen
minutes
more, the drums and fifes struck up a quick
march, and the whole party proceeded to Grant's
Hill. Soon afterwards, Maria perceived the
prophet
alone crossing the area before her window,
towards the gate. He looked suddenly back, at a
time when he was unnoticed by any one in the
yard, and hastily saluting her, continued his way
out of the fort.
There was an air of something of importance
and satisfaction visible in his manner. She even
thought, that, at the time he saluted her, she had
seen, what she did not recollect ever before to
have seen, a smile playing on his countenance, and
she could not but feel confident that some event
was about to take place for her advantage.
She was occupied with these thoughts, when
Halmanna, entering the room, informed her that
she had been commanded by the Mingo prophet
to conduct a chief of the Piantia tribe into her
apartment, but not to reveal the circumstance to
any other person in the garrison.
What can this chief want with me? thought
Maria. But he can want nothing but good, since
his errand is sanctioned by Tonnaleuka. She
therefore desired Halmanna to admit him. Her
heart beat violently as she heard his steps
advancing
.
She rose to meet him, and beckoned the
squaw, who was entering before him, to retire.
He was dressed in an elk-skin robe, the long skirts
of which reached below the calves of his legs.
This robe was closely wrapped round his waist, so
as to show the well-formed configuration of his
person, and fastened securely there with a broad
belt, fantastically, but rather handsomely,
ornamented
with porcupine's quills dyed of various
colours. His arms were covered with a kind of
roller, made of stripes of the soft fur-skins of the
smaller animals, neatly enough attached to each
other with thongs of half-tanned deer-skin, and
wound round the arms from the shoulders to the
wrists. At the shoulders, the elbows, and the
wrists, these rollers were kept in their places by
leathern bands, also ornamented with
variegated
porcupine's quills. His cap was of a very
showy description, made of beaver-skin, with a
high plume formed of feathers of different dyes,
which, glittering in the sun as he moved along the
fortress-yard, produced to the eye of the spectator
a very striking and brilliant effect. Tassels, made
of small feathers, also of various colours, hung in
abundance, eight or nine being on each side, over
his ears and down his cheeks, so as to shade and
partly conceal them; forming, on the whole, a
singularly
beautiful and gaudy costume. His feet
and legs were covered with mockasins and
leggins
,
in the usual manner of the Indians.
This chief, so majestic in his person and
splendid
in his apparel, on entering the chamber of
Maria
,
approached her evidently with much
emotion
,
and, to her great astonishment, addressed
her in English.
How sorry I am, Miss Frazier, said he, to
find you a captive in such a place, and in the hands
of such a man!But I forgetyou do not know
me in this disguise. Alas! has the form of him
who loves you with an ardour beyond whatever
man has felt for woman, made so slight an
impression
upon your mind, that the mere changing of
the hue of his countenance can conceal him from
your recollection? Must I name to you the man
who loves you with a tenderness and a
devotedness
,
Vol. II. 20
which none but himself can ever feel?
alas, must I name to you
George
Washington
?
Oh, my friend! cried she, alarmed for his
safetyfriend of the oppressed! hero of thy
country! how is it that you have ventured upon
this dangerous ground? I tremble lest you be
discovered
.
The Indians would have no mercy upon
you, and the French who possess this place are
scarcely less barbarous.
To rescue you, my soul's beloved, he
replied
,
I did not hesitate to venture here. Ah,
where would I not venture for such a purpose!
But, fear not, Miss Frazier, I come strong in the
confidence of doing a good deed; strong in the
confidence that he who has preserved me amidst
more eminent dangers, will preserve me through
this; or if I should fall doing my duty, and in the
attempt to serve thee, thou fairest, most injured of
my country's daughters, it shall be a fall so
honest
,
so glorious, that my conscious spirit will in
other regions look back upon it as a matter of joy
and exultation.
Ah, sir! said she; was it not rash to risk
that life on which, perhaps, the salvation of a
nation depends, for the safety of an individual!
It is never rash to perform our duty, replied
the hero; no matter what may be the risk.
Thou wert in distress. I was informed of it. That
information was a call from heaven to hasten to
thy rescue, and I fear not but that heaven will
assist
me in accomplishing it.
Yes, said she; I have confidence in your
success, although I know not by what means you
intend to effect it. But you are the favourite of
heaven, and whatever you may undertake I know
will succeed. But were you not afar off when I
was seized? It is yet but a few days since. By
what strange means could you hear it, and by what
miracle are you here, in the midst of the terrors of
fort Du Quesne so soon, and uninjured?
I shall inform you, said he. It was the
evening before yesterday. I had just returned
from the procession which conveyed General
Braddock to his last home, when your brother
Paddy entered my tent. He acquainted me in a
few words, but they were words that cut me to
the heart, that the French had attacked your
father's
house, and carried you off to Fort Du
Quesne, by order of its Governor. Alas, thought
I, now indeed is come to pass that which I long
feared would be the consequence of so much
beauty living so far from the protection of the
laws and customs of regular society! But it was
no time for retrospection. How to rescue you
from your ravishers was the only question. To
think of force was vain. The remnant of the
Virginians left by the late battle, scarcely exceed
a hundred, and Dunbar is commander of the
regulars
.
But even had I possessed an adequate
force with which to attack this fortress, to bring
that force against it, would not have been the
surest
way to effect your deliverance. It would
have warned the tyrant that he was in danger of
losing you, and he would have removed you to
some secret place, where perhaps all our diligence
could not have found you. Personal exertions
were, therefore, the only means I had left, and I
resolved to try them. The prophet had desired
me to meet him in his cavern, with as little delay
as possible, in order to decide upon the measures
we should adopt. Before coming to any
determination
,
therefore, I thought proper to hasten
there.
I accordingly informed Colonel Dunbar, who,
on account of the harassed and fatigued state of
his men, does not intend to leave his present
station
for several days, of my intended absence; and
furnishing Paddy with a horse, he led the way
with great rapidity, and we arrived at the prophet's
concealment last night. I at once approved of
the plan he had formed, and as he had already
provided all that we conceived necessary for its
execution, we set out from his cavern about two
hours since, and thank Providence, have thus far
succeeded. The rest remains for the night to
accomplish. All that I require of you is, that
you will be courageous and firm in the part you
will have to act. Tonnaleuka provided a
disguise
for you as well as for me, and as soon as the
people of the garrison have gone to rest, if we
can only make our way out of the fort, he will
be in waiting at no great distance, with horses
ready to carry us to safety. This is the dress
you are to assume. Here he produced, from
under
his robe, the habiliments of a squaw.
These, he continued, when the proper time
arrives, you will throw over your other clothes, and
thus concealed, you will act as my interpreter
with the sentinel, and solicit his permission for me
to pass out of the fort to worship, according to the
custom of the Piantia chiefs, beneath a red-oak
tree, to which you are to guide me.
Alas! said she, if the sentinel refuses, we
shall be detected, and thenoh, sir, your
destruction
will be inevitable. It is better not to attempt
itit is, indeed too dangerous. Why should you
suffer along with me? Let me bear my own
misfortunes
alone! It would only double their weight
upon my head, if your generosity should involve
you in them.
Fear nothing, dearest Maria! returned
Washington
;
if the sentinel should refuse, I shall have
a remedy at hand. We need not now trouble
ourselves
with the fear of such a difficulty, for I
assure you, that if we overcome all others, we
shall overcome that also.
Ah! I perceive, she exclaimed, that there
are indeed, other difficulties of a perilous nature.
The Governor may come and discover you here,
and you will be undone.
He knows me only, said Washington, as the
character I now personatea chief of the Piantia
tribe, come here by order of his nation, to form a
treaty of alliance with the French. Tonnaleuka
is my interpreter, and the Governor has agreed to
give us an audience to-morrow morning after
breakfast. In the mean time he has given
directions
that I shall be entertained in this house with
all proper respect. The squaw Halmanna has
received her particular instructions from the
prophet
,
which you are aware, she will not be easily
induced to disobey.
As to the governor finding me here: he will,
you may be assured, return with too much bustle
and noise from the revels, to take me by surprise;
and I can easily resume the apartment that has
been allotted to me, before he advances to the
house. So, on the whole, Miss Frazier, I do not
see that I stand in much danger of being
detected
.
I trust in God that you will not be detected,
she observed, and, I believe, the matter is
prudently
arranged. I shall endeavour to do all in
my power to promote its success; for, alas, upon
its success alone does my deliverance from a
horrible
destiny depend.
To lull suspicion as much as possible, and also
with the view of making himself acquainted with
the different parts of the fortification, so as to be
serviceable to any expedition he might hereafter
accompany against it, he walked, during the
afternoon
,
20 *
openly and freely round the yards and
houses, minutely inspecting the whole
circumvallation
,
the trench, the different redoubts, and
whatever
added to the strength of a place which had
now excited a high degree of terror throughout
all the middle provincess of British America.
Towards the evening, the revellers on Grant's
Hill, returned to the fort, as Washington had
foreseen
,
with much noise and obstreperous mirth, the
greater number of them being almost overcome
with intoxication. On their approach,
Washington
retired to his apartment, where he anxiously
awaited the hour when he might again visit his
beloved, and conduct her to safety.
De Villiers entered her apartment as soon as
he had dismissed the soldiers. His spirits were
under considerable excitement from the wine and
the jollity he had been just enjoying, and when he
beheld Maria more than usually cheerful and
charming, he felt a strong propensity to break
through the agreement he had made with her, and
to delay no longer that bliss for which he so
ardently
longed. Her manner, however, more
dignified
,
calm, and collected, than he had seen it
since she entered the fort, convinced him, for he
was not so intoxicated as to be totally incapable
of reflection, that this could not be accomplished
but by the absolute application of perhaps more
than even his own personal force; and he could
not but recollect, inflamed as he was with both
love and wine, that the perpetration of the deed
in such a manner, would render him detestably
loathsome to her for ever after, and might also be
the means of her instant destruction.
After entering the room, and saluting her, he
sat gazing at her for several minutes in silence,
absorbed in reflections of this nature. At length,
resolving to restrain his impetuosity, he muttered
to himself, but unconsciously in an audible tone,
No, by heavens! I shall not be guilty of such
folly. If I have patience, I shall have her on
more easy and agreeable terms. Then,
recollecting
that she must have heard him,
Bewitching
being! you have set me mad; you have
rendered me wild! cried he aloudby the
sorcery
of your charms!Ah, by heavens, you know
not the sacrifice I make in delaying my bliss!
Here the blood gushed to his face, his eyes
became
inflamed, and darted the very fire of
passion
.
Hell and fiends! he exclaimed: If I
must bear this torment longer, it cannot be in the
overpowering presence of her beauties!
So saying, he rushed out of the room, to the
great relief of Maria, who trembled in every limb,
as she witnessed the terrifying fury of his lawless
and wicked passions, which had thus gained such
fearful ascendancy over both his reason and his
will.
The governor hastened into his own
sittingroom
,
and sent for one or two of his officers, with
whom he resolved to become dead drunk, in order
to bury in the gulf of inebriation, the
remembrance
of Maria's charms, and the ungratified
tortures
of passion which they excited.
Washington's apartment adjoined that in which
these Frenchmen now quaffed their wine in
quartfuls
,
and roared out their brutish and clamorous
joviality in singing and swearing, until the whole
house rung with the noise. At length, although
at a pretty late hour, he had the satisfaction to
perceive, by their clamour gradually becoming
more feeble and interrupted, that the potent
offspring
of the grape was laying his heaviest hand
upon them, and would soon suspend their
faculties
altogether. A short time, indeed,
accomplished
this matter. A dead stillness succeeded
the riotous and unbounded noise that had so lately
filled this region of debauchery, and Washington
justly concluded that the revellers had sunk into
stupor and insensibility upon the scene of their
enjoyment. And although he conceived that the
circumstance was favourable for the enterprise he
had on hand, yet he could not but feel a pang of
mortification and sorrow, when he reflected on the
degradation and debasement of human nature
which this scene presented to his imagination.
CHAPTER XVI.
Sweet bud of the Wilderness! emblem of all
That remains in this desolate heart,
The fabric of bliss to its centre may fall,
But patience shall never depart!
Though the wilds of enchantment, all vernal and bright,
In the days of delusion, by fancy combin'd,
With the vanishing phantoms of love and delight,
Abandon my soul like a dream of the night,
And leave but a desert behind
Campbell
.
It
was nearly twelve o'clockevery thing in
the Governor's house was still and silent; even
the squaw had retired to rest, and, excepting those
of Washington and Maria, it is probable that there
was not at that moment a wakeful eye under its
roof.
Washington stole cautiously out of doors, in
order
to view the state of matters in other parts of
the garrison. All was as motionless and silent as
his heart could wish. The measured tramp of the
sentinel at the fortress gate, was alone to be heard;
and, although it was in the middle of July, the
clouds of night seemed to perform their office with
much effect, and the face of nature was
enveloped
in a tolerably thick mantle of darkness.
Having ascertained this favourable situation of
things, the young hero bent his soul to the
business
for which he had thus ventured into the strong
hold of his enemies. He ascended to the
chamber
of Maria. He found her waiting with
impatience
for his appearance.
Miss Frazier, said he, thank heaven, the
moment is favourable. Haste, lovely maiden,
throw on your disguise. Be of good courage, and
let us proceed from this abode of wickedness and
brutalityGod will open the way for us.
A minute or two sufficed to make her ready.
She caught Washington's arm. They descended
the stairs slowly and without noise, and boldly
walked across the area towards the gate.
Hallo! who comes there? shouted the
sentinel
.
(You are my interpreter, remember,
whispered
Washington to Maria, as I do not speak
French.)
We are friends, replied Maria to the
sentinel
,
imitating, as well as she could, the
pronunciation
and tone of a squaw.
And where are you going, my friends,
asked
the soldier, at this hour? Why does your
comrade remain dumb, mistress?
This is the Indian chief, she replied, that
came here to-day with the Mingo prophet. He
cannot speak your language, and on that account
requested me to solicit your permission for him
to pass out to worship the Great Spirit beneath
the branches of the red oak, as all the chiefs
of his nation have been accustomed to do at this
hour of the night, twice every moon, once in the
full, and once in the wane.
And pray, Mrs. Squaw, what is your business
with this chief? Let him go and worship till he
rots, if he pleases; but for you, my dame, I would
advise you rather to go to sleep. He can worship
devoutly enough without your help, I dare say.
Turn back, mistress, if you please. Here the
sentinel pushed her somewhat back from him,
while she replied, in considerable fright
Ah, sir, my good soldier! I must indeed go
with this chief. He is a stranger, and does not
know where to find a red oak treeI must guide
him.
Let him take the first tree he meets, said the
sentinel; it will answer the same purpose,
whether
it be oak or hiccory. But as for you, dame
square-toes, I say you shall not pass here to-night.
No, by St. Peter! I shan't risk disobeying orders
so far.
Sir, observed Maria, her agitation having so
much increased that she forgot her assumed
character
of the squaw, and to the surprise of the
soldier, spoke good FrenchSir, said she,
this chief declares that he will not go without
me. Oh! pray, do now, my good friend, permit
us both to pass, and heaven will bless you!
Heh! who are you? cried the sentinel. I
protest you seem somewhat too christianized for a
squaw. By the holy mother! but I believe there
is something wrong in this affair. The Governor
has a lady in keeping. I think I must keep you
both within the walls, till we see who you are. I'll
be broiled, if it would not cost me a bullet in my
heart, if I allowed that lady to escape. Back to
your quarters this moment, or by the devil! I shall
call the guard.
Alas! said the frightened Maria in English
to Washington, while the sentinel was uttering this
tirade; we are discovered, we are ruined! Ah
me! he threatens to call the guard upon us!
At that instant the sentinel seized Maria rudely
by the arm, and endeavoured to separate her from
the chief, calling out loudly for the assistance of
the guard; but the next instant he fell, with a
dagger
plunged to the hilt, by the whole of
Washington's
tremendous force, in his heart.
The hero seized the trembling Maria in his
arms, for terror had rendered her unable to
support
herself, and hastening with his beloved
burden
out of the fort, to the spot where Tonnaleuka,
attended by Paddy Frazier, had appointed to wait
with horses, Maria was in a moment placed on one
of them, and her strength being sufficiently
recovered
,
Tonnaleuka led the way through the woods;
she followed, and Washington and Paddy brought
up the rear.
The numerous shots that they heard fired from
different directions round the fort, soon told them,
as they rode securely through the intricacies of the
forest, that the garrison was alarmed, and that the
next day there would in all probability be a hot
pursuit made after the sweet fugitive who had thus
escaped from the fangs of a tyrant.
About an hour and a half brought them to
Tonnaleuka's
cavern, from whence Paddy removed
the horses to a close dingle at some distance, for
the sake of pasturage and concealment.
Some slight refreshment, and the consciousness
of security from the power of the tyrant who had
threatened the ruin of her happiness, together with
the relief from desponding reflections, which the
hurry and excitement of her flight had produced,
now restored Maria to a train of pleasing and
grateful ideas, and she could not refrain from
expressing
her sense of the happiness she felt in
being
thus once more under the protection of true
friends, and of the obligations she was under to the
brave youth, whose prudence and heroism alone
could have, with the blessing of Providence,
effected
her deliverance.
Ah! Colonel Washington, said she, to you
I owe more, more obligation and gratitude than I
can express.
Miss Frazier, he replied, to the Almighty
I owe thanks that he has made me the humble
instrument
of preserving the loveliest of his
creatures
from wretchedness. I owe these thanks for
this never-to-be-forgotten blessing, even on my
own account; for, alas! had that son of barbarity
succeeded in his designs against younever,
never
from that day should I have known comfort in
this world. Miss Frazier, I have told you often
with what ardour and sincerity I love you, how
much my happiness in life depends upon a union
with you; and although you have not thought
proper
to encourage my passion, by affording me one
single whisper in its approval, yet I have persisted
to love you, and even to look forward with a fond
hope to the day when you might be brought to
afford me some return of affection, and perhaps
receive me as the happy partner of your fate.
He here paused for a moment. His heart was
full; but Maria appearing too much affected to
reply, he soon resumed
Ah, think, beloved of my soul! how much
your present situation requires a protectorhow
absolutely it is necessary that you should leave
this lawless Wilderness, where men of untamed and
licentious passions rule every thing according to
their wicked fancies and caprices, unrestrained by
either the laws or the opinions of civilized society.
For your own sake,for you are now become the
mark against whom the violence of their ruffian
passions will be directedfor the sake of that
angelic
purity which is here exposed to the attacks of
fiendsfor the sake of your own happiness, the
ruin of which is pursued with barbarous avidity by
the tyrant of these wilds,fly with me to the
protection
of society and laws. Give meme, who
will otherwise never enjoy this world with
satisfaction
,
the right to become your protector, and to
secure
you an asylum where none will dare to
molest
you, and where the friends you love may
also live in security and comfort.
Vol. II. 21
My brave, my generous protector! cried she,
how can I answer you! Would to God that I
could recompense your kindness, that I could show
my gratitude, that I could prove to you how much
I esteem your virtues, and admire your nobleness
and heroism of character, by any other means than
that which you ask! But, alas, my most valued,
my most admired friend, you ask what it is not in
my power to givewhat is not mine to give
she here checked herself for a moment, and then
resumedyes; I will intrust thee with the secret
of my heart. I owe thee thisah, what do I not
owe thee!but my confidence thou shalt have.
Perhaps I have withheld it too long, and thereby
encouraged thee to entertain hopes which, sorry,
sorry am I to say, must end in disappointment
my heart, sir, is another's.
Another's! exclaimed Washington,
staggering
back, and for a moment turning pale; but soon
the violence of the shock, severe as it was, yielded
to the native energy of his heroic soul; a moment's
struggle took place, and he recovered his
composure
,
although not his ease, of mind.
I am to blame, sir, she continued, for not
revealing this to you sooner; but, alas, I was too
timid, or rather I was ungenerous enough to fear
the effects of a rivalship between you and the youth
who had gained my affections before I saw you,
for, believe me, that, even when you first sought
my heart, it was not mine to give you.
Then, Maria, said Washington with great
calmness, I know my fateit is to linger out a
life in this world, as long as Providence may
please to continue it here, without seeking, without
hoping, without caring for personal happiness.
But I am resigned. It is the will of Providence.
My soul, I know, shall never sink under any
calamity
,
since it does not now sink under this, which
is the severest I can ever experience. But, Miss
Frazier, although I can submit without murmuring
either at you, or at Providence, to this forlornness
of my own fate; although I can submit to part
with those blissful hopes which for more than
eighteen months have formed the great solace of my
life, the hopes of you and happinessyet your
welfare
,
believe me, is as great an object of solicitude
with me as ever. I therefore again repeat an offer
I once before made to you, that you, and all your
friendsand it must be remembered that from this
date your friends will be no longer safe in this
neighbourhoodshould remove to Virginia, where
I shall engage to settle them in comfort, safety,
and respectability.
She was about to reply, when the sound of
footsteps
hastily advancing along the dark passage of
the cavern, arrested their attention. In a moment
Doctor Killbreath appeared, and without ceremony
addressed Tonnaleuka:
Your petition has been granted, father; but it
only prolongs Captain Adderly's life till Monday
at noon.
Alas, what of Captain Adderly! exclaimed
Maria, where is he? oh, tell metell me! for
heaven's sake what is to become of my Charles!
At the prophet's request, replied the doctor
inconsiderately, he has been respited from the
flames till Monday; but then I fear that his death
will be inevitable. The Indians, with great
reluctance
,
granted him this reprieve. The faggots are
already
But he said no more, for that moment Maria
fell lifeless to the floor. Washington flew to her
and lifted her in his arms. She breathed not; she
was deadly pale, and the only sign of animation
she displayed was a slight quivering motion
observable
in her lipsthose lips that had lately been
of the most inviting ruby hue, and that
countenance
on which every female charm had delighted
to dwell, were now destitute of their graces, and
ghastly, as if the spirit which had imparted their
loveliness, had indeed fled from its possessor, and
left her numbered with the dead. Washington
carried her to a bed to which the agitated
Tonnaleuka
conducted him. The soul of the hero, as he
bent over her, and beheld the hand of death thus
apparently upon her, felt the most acute pang of
sorrow he was ever doomed to experience, and
moistened her livid cheeks with the last tears that
were ever seen to fall from his eyes.
The most judicious means within reach were
applied for her recovery, and in about seven or
eight minutes the organs of vitality began to
resume
the performance of their functions. She gave
a deep sigh, and respiration recommenced; the
fluid of life again circulated through her veins,
and the beautiful hue of her countenance began to
return.
Thank my God! cried Washington, who
first perceived these indications of her restoration,
thank my God, she will yet live!
Thank thee, thank thee, oh, Great Spirit of
the universe! said Tonnaleuka, who had been
extremely distressed during the whole scene, Oh,
thou who restorest this suffering child to us, do
thou support her under the trials thou hast brought
upon her! If the youth of her choice must die
this awful death, do thou enable her to bear the
shock.
She was now able to articulate, but it was in a
manner wild and incoherent. The returning tide
of life brought along with it a burning fever, and
when she spoke, she spoke only in delirium.
Charles Adderly! were the first sounds she
uttered. Oh, the savages! she continued,
they have consumed my love! Take me! take
me! burn me with him! Ah, I feel myself in
flames! my heart is already burning! I am glad
of it! Charles, my beloved, our sorrows will soon
end!
Here she relapsed into silence, and
appeared
to be again falling into a state of insensibility.
This, however, continued but a few moments, when
her frenzy returned with as much violence as
before
.
Doctor Killbreath now judiciously proposed to
extract some blood from her arm, which was soon
accomplished, and shortly afterwards she became
tranquil, her horror-struck imagination became
less tortured, and reason, piety, and resignation,
resumed their seat in her soul.
Washington now felt relief from the terrors
which had during the time of her suspended
faculties
,
and her subsequent frenzy, almost
overpowered
even his manly heart. He now saw who was
the object of her affection. He had never before
dreamed of it.
Captain Adderly, thought he, alas, it is
so; she loves him. Her happiness depends upon
his welfare. Happy Adderly! at least thou hast
been happy, for thou hast been loved by such a
being. Oh, Maria, Maria! how I could have
cherished thee in my bosom! But though thou
art never to be mine, mayest thou be happy!
He now took Doctor Killbreath apart,
conversed
with him for some minutes, then returning to
Maria
I must leave you hastily, Miss Frazier, said
he. I am glad to see that you are recovering.
Support your trials with fortitude, and may the
God of heaven yet restore you to happiness.
Farewell
;
my duty now calls me elsewhere.
Farewell, generous, benevolent Washington!
said she, holding out her hand to him. He could
not refrain from pressing it, for the first time he
had ever taken that liberty, to his burning lips,
while she repeated, Farewell, noble-hearted
young man! I never shall forget thy kindness.
He took one look at her beautiful countenance.
He dared not trust himself with a second; but
hastened
,
with great agitation, from her apartment;
and, followed by Dr. Killbreath, left the cavern.
CHAPTER XVII.
Farewell, thou fair day; thou green earth, and ye skies,
Now gay with the bright setting sun;
Farewell loves and friendships, ye dear tender ties,
Our race of existence is run!
Thou grim king of terrors! thou life's gloomy foe,
Go frighten the coward and slave;
Go teach them to tremble, fell tyrant but know,
No terrors hast thou for the brave!
Burns
.
The
reader will recollect that in the account
we gave of the battle of Braddock's Field, we
mentioned that Charles Adderly slew a savage
when in the act of levelling his rifle at
Washington
at the distance of only a few feet from that
officer, by which means the intended deadly aim
failed to accomplish its purpose. This savage
happened to be a hero of great repute among the
Caughnewago Indians. Several of them
perceiving
his fall, gave a howl of lamentation, and
instantly
resolved to seize his destroyer, in order to
devote him to the flames, as a sacrifice to the
memory
of their slaughtered hero. They
accordingly
succeeded in making him prisoner; the
attention
of the British being at that time principally
occupied in preserving Braddock from falling into
their hands.
When the battle was over, the Caughnewago
chiefs after a short consultation among themselves
concerning what should be done with Charles and
another prisoner, a Virginian named Bartley, who
had also killed a chief, and whom they were also
resolved to sacrifice, determined to remove them
while yet in their power, to a distance from fort
Du Quesne, lest the French might claim them in
the European manner as prisoners of war, and
disappoint
them of their revenge.
Twenty warriors, therefore, set off as soon as
a favourable opportunity offered with these
prisoners
across the river, and procceeded towards
the head waters of Chartier's Creek, where they
intended
to hold a council, in order to condemn
their victims to the flames in the regular manner.
During the march the prisoners were stripped
almost
naked, their hands were tied behind them,
and they were subjected to various kinds of
barbarous
treatment. They were sometimes whipped
forward with rods, and at other times goaded
with sharp pointed sticks, till the blood trickled
down their sides and backs; while their
tormentors
endeavoured, by every species of wild and
frantic exultation, to mortify their feelings with an
acute sense of their degraded and wretched
situation
.
They halted for the night, upon the margin of a
small stream about ten miles from the field of
battle
.
Here having tied Charles and his
fellow-prisoner
,
back to back, they continued to dance
round them in triumph, singing songs of victory,
and clamoring forth yells of exultation for upwards
of an hour. They then feasted upon a deer they
had killed, a large slice of which they threw upon
the grass to each of the captives, but the minds
of the latter were too much overpowered with a
sense of their horrible situation to permit them to
partake of nourishment.
During this awful night, what did Charles
Adderly
not suffer both in mind and body? With a
lacerated frame lying, nearly naked, stretched
upon the ground in the open air, with his back
closely bound to that of an unfortunate being in
the same melancholy condition, he suffered a
degree
of pain, which, notwithstanding all the
weariness
and exhaustion of his frame, prevented him
from enjoying the slightest slumber.
But the pangs of his body fell infinitely short
of those of his mind. An absolute certainty of the
most awful fate that could befall humanity stared
him in the face; and often, notwithstanding all his
attempts to exercise fortitude, made him shudder
and sweat with the agony of the reflection. And
then his Mariahis tender, his faithful, his lovely
Maria, the delight of his eyes, the joy of his soul,
the inspirer of the sweetest throbs of his heart, and
the sweetest hopes of his fancyalas! to her he
could not bid a last farewell, of her beauties he
could not take a parting glance, which his soul
might cherish and brood upon with rapture, as it
took its flight from his consuming body!
Alas! shepure, harmless, lovely, helpless and
defenceless, might also be in the hands, and
subjected
to the insults and tortures of the merciless
savages, who would now be let loose in all their
wantonness of barbarity, to wreck their vengeance
upon every individual of British origin that should
come within their power! And shehe groaned
deeply as the idea passed through his mindand
she, alas, was immediately within their power,
the power of fiends, (he mentally exclaimed,) who
will neither regard her sex, nor her youth, nor her
innocence, nor her loveliness! ah, my Maria!
What can thy Charles do for thee? in bonds here
himself, and in wretchednessOh, if I could bear
thy misfortunes and my own together, how should I
rejoice! Oh heaven! wilt thou not protect her
whose purity is so like thy own? But why do I rave;
perhaps, thou dost protect herperhaps, even
amidst these disastrous times, she is safeoh! to
obtain that assurance, how boldly would I face,
how gladly would I endure the fiercest torments
the savages can inflict upon me!
Early the next morning this unhappy young
man was compelled to resume his journey for
about ten miles further, when the Indians again
halted at a place where five or six wigwams were
inhabited by some squaws and children. It was a
small glade of somewhat romantic aspect,
surrounded
with sloping hills, and having a pleasant
stream trickling along its western border.
Here a feast was again prepared for the
party
;
and the prisoners were once more offered
nourishment, of which they refused to partake.
When the feast was over, the sachem Taksuma
assembled the warriors in council to condemn the
prisoners, who were placed on the ground before
them. Charles Adderly's sentence was the first
to be passed, previous to which Taksuma spoke
as follows:
Brothersthank Maneto! We have
inflicted
a sweet and glorious revenge upon the
oppressors
of our fathers. These oppressors are
proudthey think to grasp the whole earth.
They robbed and murdered our fathers, and took
more land from them than they can use. That
land they unjustly hold to this day; yet they are
not satisfied. They thought to rob us too,
Caughnewagoes
!
They thought that we had hearts like
the timid deer, and that they had no more to do
than to shew their faces, and we should fly.
Brothersthey say that the mere treading
upon our ground makes it theirs, and they think
that wherever we see the prints of their fect we
should abandon the country.
Brothersthey came against us with many
men, strongly armed, and we were few; but the
Great Spirit taught us how to conquer them. I do
not think that they will soon again be so foolish as
to disturb us, for they have been taught a lesson.
Brotherswe lost some of our people by
their steel. Hillsamash, who had fought thirty
battles, and taken three hundred and fifteen
scalps from our enemies, has been slain. That
man before you slew him. I saw him with my
eyes. They grew dim. The sparkles of horror
flashed before them as the horrid steel ran through
the body of my friend.
Brothershe is gone to Maneto. But we
must avenge his death. Are ye for kindling the
flames?
The assembly signified their assent by a loud
and unanimous acclamation, and six warriors were
ordered to prepare wood for the execution, which
was to take place on the third hour afterwards.
The other prisoner was soon also condemned,
and both were to be bound to the same stake, and
to endure the flames together.
Charles had now become resigned to his fate.
His course through life had, at its commencement,
and for a long period afterwards, promised to be
prosperous and happy. Nay, it had been so.
He had enjoyed happiness, the favour of the
public
,
the affection of his friends, and the love of
the sweetest female his country had ever produced.
It is true his career had been short, and had,
especially of late years, been occasionally beset
with troubles and perplexities; but this latter
period
had also been the time of his greatest rapture
and joy. He had lived long in a few years; and
now, if his hopes and enjoyments were to be cut
off in their very bloom, his fears, his griefs, his
pains, his sorrows, would also be annihilated. The
former might return to him with tenfold increase
of enjoyment, but he had great and consoling
reason
to believe that the latter never should.
While he was fortifying his mind with these
considerations
for the endurance of the last terrible
scene, which he every minute expected to
commence
,
he perceived a white man hastening down
the hill that rose to the northward. The savages
raised an exclamation of joy, as if they had now
obtained a third victim for their vengeance; and
Charles shuddered when he distinguished the
approaching
stranger, whom he believed to be
running
voluntarily into the jaws of fate, to be Dr.
Killbreath.
The doctor however advanced fearlessly
forward
;
and holding out the wampum of
Tonnaleuka
,
he informed the Indians that he was a
messenger
from the prophet, and was immediately
received
with an obeisance, and a shout of welcome.
He then advanced to the sachem Taksuma, who
was pointed out to him, and delivered to him the
prophet's petition, according to his instructions.
Taksuma immediately called upon the warriors
to be attentive.
Listen, said he, brothers, to the desire of
Tonnaleuka, the holy prophet of Maneto. The
prisoner Adderly is not prepared to die. In
sacrificing
him, it is only the body, not the spirit, we
wish to punish. Maneto will be offended if we
deprive
him of this man's soul, which is not now fit
to go into his presence.
Brothers, Tonnaleuka, the great prophet, who
declares the will of Maneto, asks the quarter of a
moon of longer life for this man, that his spirit
may, in that time, prepare itself for the company
of the Great Father who made it.
Brothers, I think we dare not refuse this to
the words of the prophet, for the prophet's words
are the words of Maneto.
The greater number assented with a voice of
applause
;
but there was a chief, named Remalseh,
the brother of the slain Hillsamash, who appeared
discontented with the decision. Taksuma asked
him to say why he dissented from the voice of the
prophet.
Brothers, said he, addressing the assembly,
I respect the prophet, because I worship and
adore Maneto. I will therefore join my assent
with yours to allow the destroyer of my brother
seven days longer to breathe the air and to see the
sun.
But, brothers, hear me; I grieve much for
Hillsamash, and long exceedingly to feast my eyes
with the sacrifice of the man who slew him. Is it
not natural? He was a brother who reflected
honour
upon our parentage. I could shed tears for
him, but I am resolved never to shed tears for any
thing. That prisoner deprived me of him, and my
heart shall not feel at ease till I see his destruction.
The grief of my soul shall disappear and waste
away, as the flames waste the flesh from the bones
of that man; but not till then.
Brothers, I shall not oppose the desire of
Tonnaleuka
;
but lest my indignation against the
destroyer
of Hillsamash should not permit me to
bear to see him live the time requested by the
prophet
,
I shall go westward to hunt, but shall return
on the day of sacrifice to delight my soul with
beholding
the torments of the victim.
So saying, he looked in Charles's face, gave a
yell of execration, and hurried from the
assembly
,
followed by three others, who felt in a manner
similar to himself.
Doctor Killbreath had now a short conversation
with Charles, in which he informed him of the
reprieve
the prophet had obtained for him. The
prophet would have come himself after you, said
he, and would perhaps have rescued you
altogether
,
but for a very unfortunate occurrence
which took place at our house yesterday, and
Vol. II. 22
which will require all his attention for a few days.
If he can get off from that business before your
reprieve is expired, I think he will yet save you.
What, sir, has taken place at your house?
asked Charles fearfully, for he dreaded that
something
had befallen Maria.
Why, sir, replied the doctor, I think I may
as well tell you the whole matter; your heart is
stout enough to hear bad news, I hope, although I
know it will try you a little. In short, captain,
the commander at Du Quesne sent out a party of
troops, who attacked our house, bound the old man
and Archy with ropes, (Paddy and I were from
home) frightened the old woman and Nancy out
of their wits, and carried offMaria, with whom
Maria! exclaimed Charles, carried off to
Du Quesne! Alas!Oh, doctor, I could curse,
eternally curse the villains! But what,oh, in
the name of heaven, what can I do for her?
Nothing, sir, said the doctor calmly, although
he himself felt much on the subject, but there
are hands at work for her rescue more powerful
than yours can be. I trust they will be
successful
.
Oh heaven grant that they may! said
Charles; but,ah, these bonds restrain me.
Oh God! why am I thus, when my heart's
treasure
is in distress? Oh heaven, is there to be no
end to my misfortunes!
Be calm, captain, said the doctor; had I
known you would have felt this matter so violently,
I should not have informed you of it.
Talk not to me of feeling violently! cried
Charles. Great God! what in heaven or earth
could make me feel violently if this could not!
Oh God! Oh God! that I could act violently too!
then these hell-hounds of Du Quesne should soon
learn what it is to molest innocence and loveliness
like hers. Talk not to me of feeling violently:
those who cannot feel as I do, have never loved as
I do. Ah, no! never one loved as I do. Oh,
Lord of mercy! cried he, fervently lifting his
hands and eyes towards heaven, save her, save
her, and let me perish!
Here the Indians assembling round him,
inquired
what was the matter. The doctor informed them
that he had heard bad news from one of his friends
whom he loved tenderly, and that he was thus
giving way to his grief for the misfortune.
Hear me, brother, said Taksuma to the
doctor
.
I thought not that the white men loved
each other so well. This man bears his own fate
without complaining; but he rages, even to
madness
,
when he hears of a friend being in distress
and distress which cannot be more fearful than his
own. Are there many of your people of this
temper
?
Many among us feel much for the distresses
of their friends, replied the doctor; but there
are few, I believe, who carry their feelings to such
excess as Captain Adderly does on this occasion.
I honour him for it, said the sachem, and
shall take care that he be not tortured as the friends
of Hillsamash desire he should, before his death.
He must be sacrificed, for he has slain a warrior,
and is sentenced; but we need not torture him.
Neither the red-hot iron, nor the burning brand
shall be lifted against him.
The doctor took care, in proper terms, to give
due praise to this manifestation of the sachem's
elemency, and informed him that he knew the
prophet Tonnaleuka would esteem him much on
its account.
One of the chiefs now informed Taksuma, that
the hour was come when the other prisoner should
be executed. Orders were therefore given to
have him led to the stake. This unfortunate man
took a last farewell of Adderly.
I go before you, said he, to the awful
doom. But this is, perhaps, a privilege as my
sufferings will be the sooner ended. I am not
afraid to die; but the manner is terrible. Would
to God that these barbarians would send a bullet
through my heart; they might then consume my
dead carcass as they please. But I must submit
to the tortures, though my soul shudders within
me, yet I will brave it out.
Farewell, Bartley, said Charles, almost
suffocated
with grief and horror. Your fate is,
indeed
,
preferable to mine. Seven days less of such
mental torment as I shall endure is no trifling
consideration
.
May God take you to himself!
They then cordially shook hands, and Bartley
moved towards the stake. He stopped suddenly,
however, when he was a few yards distant, and
beckoned Doctor Killbreath towards him.
You are a stranger to me, sir, said the
victim
,
but you are a Christian and a Briton, and
your countenance bespeaks humanity. I think,
therefore, that you will not refuse to grant an
easily
performed request to a dying man.
If in my power, I will assuredly grant it,
replied
the doctor, who felt extremely afflicted at
Bartley's fate.
You carry a rifle, observed Bartley,
looking
at that on which the Doctor leaned.
Yes, sir, returned the doctor.
It is charged I suppose, said the victim.
It is, sir, was the reply.
My heart would be thankful for its contents
ere these savages commence torturing me,
observed
Bartley.
The doctor mused for a moment on the
propriety
of granting this request; at length, looking at
the prisoner's entreating countenance, he could
withstand the workings of compassion no longer,
and he resolved to gratify him, let the consequence
be what it would.
You shall have them, said he.
May heaven bless you, replied Bartley.
Farewell! I hope we shall yet meet in heaven;
and he marched to the place of execution with a
countenance of joy, amidst the exulting savages,
who not understanding the nature of his dialogue
with the doctor, were astonished to behold his
sudden
assumption of bravery and firmness.
The victim was tied to the stake, the red-hot
irons, and the flaming brands were prepared for
torturning him, and half a dozen of savages waving
these terrific implements in the air, and were rushing
forward to drive them into his flesh, when the
report
of a gun was heard, and he fell dead upon
the spot.
Enraged at being thus disappointed in the
gratification
of their barbarous revenge, they pursued
the doctor, whom they soon caught, and would
have instantaneously inflicted on him all the
tortures
they had intended for Bartley, had not
Taksuma
interfered.
Brothers, said he, be cautious in this
matter
.
This man is the messenger of Tonnaleuka.
He has, it is true, defrauded you of your just
vengeance against a prisoner, and dared,
profanely
,
to interfere with the customs of your fathers.
I will not excuse himbut he bears the holy
wampum
of Tonnaleuka, and we should dread the
displeasure
of the prophet.
BrothersTonnaleuka himself will condemn
his action. Let us detain him prisoner until we
inform the prophet of it. Whatever punishment
22*
he may award, we shall inflict. The prophet
knows best how such an outrage should be
punished
;
or he will consult Maneto on the subject,
and instruct us how to act.
This mode of proceeding was agreed to by the
warriors, and the doctor was confined a prisoner,
with a sentinel placed over him, in one of the
wigwams
.
Charles Adderly was also confined in a
wigwam, but being the destroyer of a chief, and a
victim already condemned to the flames, he was
more strictly guarded than the doctor, who it was
not supposed, would be so likely to attempt any
desperate mode of escape. Charles was kept
constantly
bound hand and foot, with four Indians
guarding him, whereas the doctor's wrists alone
were tied together, and he was watched but by one
sentinel.
Taksuma did not fail to despatch a
messenger
in search of Tonnaleuka, to inform him of what
had happened to the doctor. The affairs of Maria
at this time kept the prophet so busily moving from
place to place, that he was not easily traced. At
length, however, the messenger hearing that he
was likely to be found at fort Du Quesne, directed
his course there, and arrived at Grant's Hill at the
time the French soldiers were holding their revels
on that place. The messenger had no
disinclination
to partake of the good cheer that was
politely
offered him; and after having eaten abundance,
he applied himself with great vigour to the
consumption
of the liquors that were handed to him
profusely
by some of the merry Frenchmen, who
wished
to amuse themselves with his fooleries during
the time of intoxication. He therefore, in a short
time, forgot his errand, Doctor Killbreath,
Taksuma
,
and every thing but the enjoyment of his
frolic, and consequently did not see Tonnaleuka
for that day, and Doctor Killbreath himself, the
reader already knows, saw him in the cavern the
next morning. How this happened was simply as
follows:
The Indians becoming rather scarce of provisions,
had all gone off in small parties to hunt, except
the four who were left to guard Charles, and the
one who kept watch over the Doctor. On account
of being able to speak Indian, the Doctor had
somewhat ingratiated himself with a squaw who
lived in the wigwam with him. On the evening of
the fourth day of his confinement, the Indian that
watched him becoming drowsy, requested this squaw
to keep guard over the Doctor, while he should
enjoy a little sleep. She assented. The Doctor
soon prevailed on this Indian female, who, as all
females should be, was tender-hearted, and more
than particularly so towards the Doctor, to elope
with him, promising her a great many fine things,
and among others, to make her his wife as soon as
they should reach a place of safety, assuring her at
the same time, that his master Tonnaleuka would
not fail to bless her, and procure her the
forgiveness
of her friends. The simple lady believed him,
for she loved him.
The Doctor's bands were accordingly loosened,
and off they set, the Doctor trking care to
carry
the sentinel's rifle with him, without bidding any
one good bye, and were not missed for nearly two
hours afterwards.
As the Doctor was very impatient to reach
home, he soon outran the squaw; and forgetting
all his former protestations of love, and regardless
of her cries, her tears, and her upbraidings, he
cruelly
left her all wearied and forlorn, amidst the
clouds of the night, in the heart of a wild desert,
either to follow him at her leisure, or retrace her
way to her own wigwam, as she thought proper.
CHAPTER XVIII.
Thou power Supreme, whose mighty scheme,
These woes of mine fulfil,
Here, firm I rest, they must be best,
Because they are thy will.
Then all I want, (Oh, do thou grant!)
This one request of mine,
Since to enjoy thou dost deny,
Assist me to resign.
Burns
.
The
seventh and last day of Charles Adderly's
reprieve from his impending doom at length
arrived
;
and any faint hopes that he might have
harboured
of a final deliverance, were now scattered
to the wind. Remalseh the brother of the slain
Hillsamash, and the other Indians who had gone
off on hunting excursions, now returned to enjoy
the ceremony of his execution.
Charles's feelings were sunk, in consequence of
the intensity of their previous excitement, nearly
to a state of torpor, and he looked upon the awful
preparations that were making for his destruction
almost with indifference.
Very much to the dissatisfaction of Remalseh,
Taksuma prevented the savages from making any
arrangements for torturing him. An altercation
arose between these chiefs on the subject, but the
latter having the authoirty, insisted on keeping his
word to Doctor Killbreath, and the warriors
obeyed
his directions. Charles had been informed by
the Doctor of Taksuma's promise, but he
entertained
such an opinion of the general wickedness and
barbarity of the Indians, that he placed very little
confidence upon it. When he, therefore,
perceived
Remalseh, whom he knew to be his
inveterate
enemy, disputing with Taksuma, he had no
doubt, from their manner and gestures, although
he understood nothing of their language, that
their contest was on this subject; and as
Remalseh
appeared the more violent of the two, he was
confident that he should carry his point, and that
consequently the usual tortures would be inflicted.
This idea aroused him at length from his
torpor
.
Had they resolved to overwhelm him at
once with the flames, his sufferings would be soon
over, and he could look upon his fate with a
stoical
indifference; but the slow, lingering, and
excruciating
torments, the endurance of which he
now anticipated, were more than human nature
could bear to reflect upon unappalled.
Notwithstanding
all his resolution, he therefore became
considerably agitated, when, as soon as the hour
of noon arrived, they led him naked to the stake,
with great clamour, triumphant yelling, and
frantic
exultation.
Remalseh himself tied him to the fatal spot, and
with ferocious barbarity drew the bands so tight
as almost to cut the flesh down to the bone.
Taksuma
waited until this inveterate savage should
retire
from the victim, in order to give the signal for
throwing upon him the already blazing mass of
wood that was kindled by his side. Remalseh
gave a shout of joy that all was secure, and had
just retired a few paces from Charles, when a troop
of cavalry burst, like a clap of thunder, down the
eastern hill; a loud huzza rang through the air,
while at the same instant, a volley from a number
of carbines levelled Remalseh, Taksuma, and five
other Indians to the earth. The rest of the savages
had scarcely waited to see this slaughter of their
chiefs, but had fled in dreadful panic, in various
directions, into the adjoining woods. In a moment
the sword of Washington had cut the bands of
Adderly
,
and the hapless victim was rescued from the
fire of savage vengeance, ere a single particle of it
had touched his body.
Ah, is it thou, matchless Washington, cried
Adderly, embracing the hero as soon as his arms
were loosened, that hast restored me to life?
It is, my friend, replied Washington; and
I shall do more, I shall restore you to happiness.
Ah, knowest thou, wonderful man,
exclaimed
Charlesknowest thou what can make me
happy?
I do know, said his delivererIf any thing
on earth can make thee happy, it is the heart and
the hand of the loveliest, purest, and most
endearing
woman in the creationMaria Frazier!
Angel of mercy! cried Charles, with a wild
mixture of hope, joy, and surpriseWhere
where is she? Is she still in safety?
Thank God, said Washington, with a half
suppressed sigh, she is safe from all present
danger
.
You are now safe also; and may you both
long continue so.
And it is to you, Colonel, that they both owe
it, said Doctor Killbreath, coming forward to
Adderly
,
and shaking him warmly by the handI
wish youfrom my soul, Captain, I wish you joy,
of both your life and your love. You may thank
Colonel Washington for both. He plunged into
the heart of Fort Du Quesne, and rescued, singly
and alone, my wretched sister-in-law out of the
midst of the Governor's house as safe and unhurt
as she entered it.But with your leave, gentlemen,
what if we search these deserted wigwams, (for I
perceived the squaws running off, as we
approached
,
as fast as their yoke-fellows,) for something to
eat; for after our long rapid ride, I confess I
should think a slice of venison an excellent
dainty.
I propose, first, observed Washington, that
we find some clothing for Captain Adderly; and
then we shall think of what is best to be done for
refreshing our frames.
My portmanteau, said the Doctor, will
furnish
him a suit of as good captain's uniform as
there is in the army. I knew the Captain would
be naked; and while you were assembling the men
at the Great Meadows, I provided the dress.
So saying, the Doctor led forward his horse,
unstrapped his portmanteau, and produced a
captain's
uniform, of the provincial service, complete
in all its parts, which, although it did not in every
particular exactly fit Charles, answered his present
purposes, and he in a moment resumed a
christianlike
,
or rather a soldier-like, appearance; and an
unoccupied horse having been brought by
Washington's
care purposely for him, he was now able
to take his place among his companions in arms.
On exploring the Wigwams, there was neither
man, woman, nor child, to be found. All had fled
in rapid consternation, the moment the cavalry
appeared
,
the squaws carrying away the younger
children, and the older ones running after them.
So complete indeed had been the panic, than even
the warriors, who had assembled to witness the
intended sacrifice, had not carried away their
rifles
;
and Dr. Killbreath, whose rifle had of course
been taken from him when he was captured for
making such an offensive use of it, although he had
replaced it with that of the sentinel, from whom
he had run off, did not now scruple to reclaim his
own, which he found in one of the wigwams, and,
to which, as it had been an old acquaintance, he
gave a hearty welcome.
As the troops had brought some provisions with
them, they were enabled, with the aid of what they
found in the wigwams, to make a very comfortable
meal, which they had no sooner dispatched, than
they bent their way towards Turtle creek,
Washington
being anxious to conduct Captain Adderly
in safety to his Maria.
The squadron of horse consisted of about fifty
in number, Virginia rangers, all well acquainted
with scouring the woods. They did not,
therefore
,
fear for any force that under the present
circumstances
of the country could be hastily brought
against them from fort Du Quesne, or elsewhere
in the neighbourhood. The present garrison of
Du Quesne consisted chiefly of infantry, there not
being more than one company of horse in it, so
that if a French force too numerous to be
attacked
with advantage, should appear, they could at
least keep out of its reach by their superior
fleetness
and knowledge of the woods.
As their horses had been driven at a very rapid
rate all the way from the Great Meadows to the
place of destination, to which Dr. Killbreath had
been their guide, they now moved at rather a
moderate
pace, and it was late before they arrived at
Frazier's.
Here they met with a hearty and joyful
welcome
;
provisions for the men, and provender for
the horses, were both furnished with prompt and
zealous liberality. Gilbert and Nelly showered
blessings, often and often, upon Washington's
head, for what he had so nobly and gallantly done
for their darling daughter. They had both gone
to Tonnaleuka's cavern in order to visit her, it
being
dangerous for her at the present crisis to
enter
their house which had, indeed, since her
escape
from the fort, been several times searched,
and ransacked by parties of soldiers sent out in
pursuit of her. Gilbert had been even told that
De Villiers had threatened to come himself, and
raze it to the ground, if the old man did not
inform
him where Maria was to be found. As
Gilbert
,
however, conceived that this was only a
threat which the governor had no intention to put
into execution, he did not, on this occasion, think
proper to inform Washington of it. The troops
were, therefore, after they had received
refreshments
,
conveyed to the same dingle where Paddy
Frazier had concealed the horses on the night of
Maria's rescue from Du Quesne. Washington
preferred
that they should encamp there for the night
rather than at Frazier's, as being a spot where there
was less danger of being discovered by the enemy,
while it was equally favourable for his setting off
for the Great Meadows, to which place he
intended
to proceed the next day.
This matter being adjusted, he retired with
Charles Adderly to pass the night at Frazier's, it
being too late an hour to visit the cavern of
Tonnaleuka
.
The impatience of Charles to behold
the charmer of his soul, the espoused of his heart,
after her late disasters, was, indeed, so extreme that
he could scarcely brook the delay which this
arrangement
occasioned; and it was with difficulty
that he permitted his desire to hasten immediately
to her abode, to be overruled by the persuasions
of the more prudent and considerate Washington.
She shall not be disturbed from her repose,
said Charles, in arguing the point. All I want
is to enjoy the happiness of feeling myself in the
same habitation with her till the morning.
You will, at least, if you persist in gratifying
this piece of useless impatience, said
Washington
,
disturb Tonnaleuka's repose, a matter which
I am sure would give you no pleasure; and, then
consider, that as the prophet may not have
accommodations
Vol. II. 23
for you in his subterranean abode, you
might be obliged to sit moping and dozing by the
fireside, either breaking your heart or dreaming
nonsense, till a reasonable time in the morning
should afford you the wished-for happiness. No,
you have, just now, my friend, too much need for
the refreshment of a few hours comfortable rest
yourself after what you have undergone, for me to
permit you to take this whimsical step.
Well! do as you please with me, replied
Charles. You are not so hot brained as I am;
and, as you do not feel so acutely in this matter,
you can judge more cooly, and, no doubt, more
correctly.
Alas! thought Washington, and he heaved a
sigh, he knows not how acutely, how severely I
feel in this matter.
Charles was, indeed, as his illustrious friend
had observed, much in need of rest. Ever since
he had fallen into the hands of the savages, he
could scarcely be said to have enjoyed any; and
in spite of all his ardour and impatience to be with
Maria, as soon as he had thrown himself upon a
comfortable couch in one of Gilbert Frazier's
apartments, he fell into a deep and invigorating
slumber, which continued until the beams of
heaven shone full upon his pillow in the morning.
He then arose vigorous, cheerful, and rejoicing,
confident now of proceeding instantaneously to the
presence of his beloved. But he was doomed to
bear another half hour's provoking delay; for Mrs.
Frazier would by no means permit such esteemed
guests to leave her house without breakfast, and
Washington agreed that she should be
indulged
.
Charles had, in consequence, to submit with
as good a grace as he could assume, and by
making
a considerable effort, he was able to smile
off the vexation and chargin, which these little
cross-purposes to his wishes occasioned him to
feel.
At length all obstacles were removed, and
Washington set out with him to the cavern.
Maria had suffered much from her anxiety
concerning
the fate of Charles; but the attentions of
Tonnaleuka, who had industriously infused into
her mind the consolations of hope and of piety,
greatly soothed, and meliorated her feelings.
Tonnaleuka
,
however, had not himself any certainty
as to Charles's safety; nay, he had begun to
entertain
great fear for the worst, and therefore could
not administer to the afflicted Maria that solid
species
of comfort which an unequivocal assurance of
his belief in her lover's safety, would have enabled
him to do.
They were sitting together after breakfast,
conversing
about the misfortunes of Charles, when
they heard the sound of persons entering the
cavern
.
My child, I have a presentiment that there is
good news approaching us, said Tonnaleuka.
Heaven grant it! she replied. But, alas,
I am so accustomed to hear of nothing but
disasters
,
thatOh, God of goodness, is it so! and
the next moment her head was in Charles's
bosom
.
My dearest Maria! My dearest love! he
exclaimed
;
have we methave we, at length,
met!oh never, never again, while we live, shall
we part!
For some minutes she was unable to speak;
at length she burst into tears, and found
utterance
.
Oh Charles! said she; it is you, indeed,
whom I again behold. Thanks to a merciful God,
you are yet living! By what miracle has he
preserved
you from your awful doom? Oh, are you
not yet in danger?
No, my dearest love, he replied; I am in
no danger; but that thou art safethat I find thee
herethat I thus clasp my treasure to my heart
thanks! glory to the God who has thought of us
in mercy! who has rescued us out of distress
unspeakable
;
who has brought us together in a
manner
,
indeed, miraculous; by means of an exertion
of such a combination of wisdom, courage,
benevolence
,
promptitude and energy of action, which
no earthly being but one possesses!
Ah! cried she suddenly; I see it; I might
have known it! It is he, it is he! Nothing that
man can do is difficult for him. My deliverer is
thine. Oh, Washington, Washington!
Here she advanced towards the hero, who met
her calmly in his manner, but inwardly trembling,
and almost fearful for the steadiness of his own
heart. Ah! when she who reigned over his whole
affections now fondly approached him in all her
charms of youth, beauty, tenderness, and virtue,
could he feel easy, collected, and cool! No;
Washington's feelings were not of a temperament
capable of such stoicism. But he had a soul
superior
to his feelings, and capable of controling
every impulse that stood in the way of his duty.
He had now formed within his mind a purpose
which he conceived his duty called upon him
immediately
to accomplish. It was indeed a task,
a difficult task. The force of nature was strong,
was almost irresistible against it. But he would
not shrink from it, although his heart should burst
assunder in its performance.
Thanks, thanks, thou incomparable man!
cried Maria, to the restorer of her Charles and
herself to happiness and each other. What can I
say to express the weight of our obligations to
thee?
Miss Frazier, he replied, taking hold of the
hand which she held out to him; spare your
thanks. The witnessing of your joy on the
present
occasion is an ample recompense for my
exertions
.
But let me say that it will recompense me
still more amply to witness the confirmation of
your permanent felicity. Captain Adderly, said
he, give me your hand. Here he for a
moment
appeared much affected, and a sudden
paleness
came upon his countenance. It continued,
however, but an instant; the cloud passed swiftly
away, and all the firmness, nobleness, and dignity
of America's hero, shone full and bright from his
countenance.
The struggle is now over, thought he; and I
am what I should be. My friend, said he to
Charles; that lady by your side I have loved,
as I shall never love another. But you possessed
her heart, before she possessed mine. You are
become necessary to her happinessher
happiness
,
in competition with which I value my own
as nothing; and I know well that she is necessary
to yours. Take her, my friend; make her your
own; and oh may you be long happy together!
My best of friends! cried Charles, almost
weeping with the force of his admiration for his
deliverer's magnanimity. Youyou alone could
be capable of this. I shall not attempt to express
my gratitude. It would be in vain. But a heart
like yours can easily imagine it.Ah, then you
loved my Maria. I once for a moment suspected
it. But I was secure in her fidelity, and cast the
suspicion from my soul as injurious towards her.
Highly, highly can I estimate the sacrifice which,
on her account and mine, you now make of those
heavenly hopes which must have accompanied a
23*
love for her; and highly should I appreciate
myself
if I could imitate thee in the magnanimous
self-denial of sacrificing such hopes at the shrine
of friendship and duty. But, alas, I feel that I
am not capable of such virtue. Oh Maria, your
Charles acknowledges his inferiority to that man!
And well may you without a blush
acknowledged
it, replied Maria, proud of her lover's
admiration of the hero, and rejoiced that he did
not hesitate to confess him his superior in virtue
and energetic greatness of mind. For ah, she
continued, who can compare with him in
virtue
?
oh, what do we not owe him!
My children! said Tonnaleuka, who had
hitherto remained in silent astonishment; this
scene, indeed, affects me. I knew Colonel
Washington
capable of much, but I scarcely thought
him capable of this; for I knew the fervour of his
love for that maiden, and I know with what
adamantine
bonds, (said he with unusual energy) love,
like his, binds the human heart.
My children, I cannot speak my joy at this
happy meetingOh may the Great Father who
raised up this heroic deliverer for you, make you
long the objects of his care in this life, and in that
of immortality, the inheritors of his eternal love!
Washington now again addressed Maria, Miss
Frazier, said he, there is yet one thing
remaining
to set my mind at ease respecting you, that
is, your removal from this desert, where you
are now beset with perils, imminent,
innumerable
,
and terrifying. I entreat you to leave it
with the man of your choice. Give him a legal
right to protect you in the midst of society. I shall
then be assured of your safety, and become, if
not happy, at least resigned, and perhaps, content
with my lot.
Sir, she replied, Captain Adderly is aware
of my only objection to the wishes he has often
expressed on this subject. This objection still
remains
.
If it were removedbut of that I see, at
present, no probabilityI will not affect to say, that
I should advance any other.
Oh Maria, my dearest love!said Charles,
Do overlook that objection under present
circumstances
.
It is one which, under any
circumstances
,
ought not to intervene between a union of
hearts like ours. It is of too trifling a nature,
surely, to be put in the balance against your
safety
and my happiness. Believe me, my love, my
father is not of such a mercenary mind as you
imagine. He will place no importance upon gold,
in comparison to the permanent happiness of his
son. He has both too much liberality as a man,
and too much tenderness as a father, for that.
But his consent, at all events, should be first
procured, returned Maria. You are his only
son; he has no doubt been an indulgent father;
and it would be giving him real ground for offence,
if you should take such an important, irretrievable
step without his approbation, nay, without his
knowledge.
Miss Frazier, observed Washington, these
sentiments become you; they are just such as I
should expect from your acute delicacy of feeling,
and strong sense of propriety. But I am glad that
there are no other obstacles in the way. These
shall vanish. I shall contribute to remove them.
You know me too well not to suppose that I shall
be the obliged party if you accept the offer I am
about to make. It has pleased providence to
bestow
upon me a fortune amounting to even more
than affluence. A portion of this I can easily, and
shall gladly, devote to the promotion of a purpose
so dear to my heart as your safety and welfare;
and must beg leave to make over to you deeds of
such a property as shall reconcile your future
father-in-law to your alliance with his family. I
trust
Ah! said Tonnaleuka, hastily interrupting
him. Hear meWhere will your generosity,
your kindness for this young woman have an end?
Hear me, permit me to speak. You have
plunged into the midst of her enemies, and
snatched
her from ruin. You have relinquished in favour
of a rival the most fondly cherished wishes of your
soul, to promote her happiness, and now you
would bestow fortune upon her.
But, hear me, glorious young man! and
believe
me, she requires not this last instance of your
generosity. She is richas rich, even in worldly
goods, as the father of any man whom she may
make her husband, should wish her to be. She
is my hieress. She is my daughter! my only,
only child! Oh, Maria, Maria! I am no Indian
I am a son of Europe. Oh, embrace me, I am
thy father!
My father! she exclaimed, as she threw her
arms round him, and leaned her head on his
bosom
.
My father, and have I really such a
father
am
I not indeed an orphan? But I long felt
it, although I knew it not. I never felt forlorn in
thy presence. Oh, gracious God! thou art kind.
This, indeed, this crowns the mighty blessings
thou hast this day conferred upon me. Oh, my
father
,
my father! I feel thou art indeed my father.
Why did I not know my happiness sooner?
Daughter of my love! replied Tonnaleuka,
again clasping her to his heart, in your infancy
I saw you happy and safe, and I was content. In
the latter years, you were also, until within these
few days, as serene and comfortable as perhaps
the state of womanhood will permit. I would not,
therefore, disturb this serenity of your bosom for
no purpose, and I saw none that could be
answered
by doing so. I had acquired an influence
over the inhabitants of these wilds by my
assumption
of their manners, and of the character of a
prophet
among them, which had been often useful to
themselves, and which I believed might on some
emergency be useful to you and to your friends.
I wished, therefore, to maintain this character
undiscovered
and impenetrable to all the world, so
long as it might be attended with such benefits.
I perceive that you, and they, and I, must now, all
of us, leave the Wilderness, from whence that
repose, and safety which once blest it, is fled. We
must mix in the ranks of society, my daughter.
The scene will be new to you, and it may for a
while be irksome. But it will afford you safety,
and an opportunity of performing duties, and
consequently
of being useful to both yourself and
others, which cannot here be found.
But, my friends, said he to Washington and
Adderly, I perceive that you are surprised at
this discovery, and, no doubt, feel a curiosity,
since you find I am not an Indian, to know what
I really am. I shall at present give you but a
brief sketch of my history. At a more convenient
season, I may, perhaps, enter more minutely into
its details.
CHAPTER XIX.
Be hush'd, my dark spirit! for wisdom condemns,
When the faint and the feeble deplore;
Be strong as the rock of the ocean that stems
A thousand wild waves on the shore!
Through the perils of chance, and the scowl of disdain,
May thy front be unalter'd, thy courage elato!
Yea, even the name I have worshipped in vain
Shall awake not the sigh of remembrance again;
To bear is to conquer our fate.
Campbell
.
I am
, said Tonnaleuka, by birth a
Scotchman
,
and a Highlander. My European name is
Mackintosh, a name to which my zeal for an
unfortunate
cause has given a place in the history of
Britain. At the death of Queen Anne, it is well
known that the friends of the house of Stuart,
among the most zealous of whom I ranked myself,
for I was then young, enthusiastic, and rash,
resolved
to attempt the re-establishment of its exiled
representative upon the throne of his ancestors.
The Earl of Mar was the first to raise the
standard
of insurrection in the Highlands, and I was
the first to join him with the whole strength of my
clan, consisting of nearly a thousand of as brave
men as ever wore tartan. We soon heard that
Mr. Forster, the Earl of Derwentwater, and some
others had raised forces in England to support the
same cause, and were on their way to join us in
the Lowlands of Scotland. I was detached at the
head of twenty-five hundred men to meet them in
the Lothians. The Frith of Forth had to be
crossed
in the face of a strong naval force, aware of
our design. By various manuvres, however,
we drew off the attention of the ships from the
place of our embarkation, and, during the night,
arrived safe on the southern shore. I
immediately
invested Leith, which surrendered; but the
Duke of Argyle hastily throwing himself into
Edinburgh
with a large body of troops, I was deprived
of the capital. I proceeded, therefore, without
delay, to join our English confederates, who
waited
for us at Kelso some distance southward.
Being now nearly six thousand strong, we
resolved
to push boldly into England, in order to
encourage our adherents there, and strike some
sudden blow against the Hanoverian government.
Fortune smiled kindly enough upon us until
we reached Preston, where she ceased for ever to
encourage our cause. General Willis there
besieged
us with a formidable army. We were
compelled to surrender, and I, together with all
our leaders, was carried to London, and
imprisoned
in Newgate. About the same time, the Earl
of Mar was defeated in the Highlands, and the
friends of the Stuarts gave up the contest.
They paid dear for it, however. Almost every
week brought into my prison intelligence of the
execution of some of my confederates, few of
whom, after condemnation, received mercy. I
who had been much more active than many who
had suffered, had therefore no reason to expect
any. For several months there was no word of
my trial. At length I was desired to prepare for
it, as it should take place in a few days. Several
of my fellow-prisoners, also under the charge of
high treason, were to be tried at the same time.
The evening previous to the sitting of the court,
I engaged five of these to assist me in an attempt
to escape. We soon mastered the jailer and his
assistants, and in a moment dispersed ourselves in
different directions amidst the crowds of London.
Less than a week afterwards found me at the court
of St. Germain's, the titular sovereign of which
received me with great respect and cordiality.
My Scottish property was now lost to me by
an act of attainder, and I was declared an outlaw.
I was soon in beggary, but the interest of the
Stuarts
was sufficient to procure me a captain's
commission
in the French army. In a few years I was
sent as lieutenant-colonel of a regiment to Canada.
My superior, disliking the climate, soon returned
to Europe, and I was made colonel. In this
capacity
I was stationed for a number of years at a
fort near the falls of Niagara. Here I had an
opportunity
of becoming thoroughly acquainted with
the manners and customs of the Indians, as well as
many of their languages; and also of greatly
improving
my fortune, by purchasing their furs, and
transmitting them for sale to Quebec, where I had
formed connexions with mercantile houses for
that purpose.
I had never yet thought of entering upon the
marriage state; for, although I had not been
indifferent
to the sweets of female society, yet,
perhaps
the sense of my misfortunes and unsettled
condition of life, had prevented any woman from
making a serious impression upon my heart.
But I was now doomed to behold one to whose
graces, accomplishments, and virtues, I felt
delighted
to pay homage. It was during a visit I
paid to Quebec on pecuniary concerns, that I first
beheld her. She was the daughter of Monsieur
d'Anville, commander of the Quebec garrison, and
only a few years from France. I became entirely
captivated with her charms, and although I was
then thirty-seven years of age, and she but
twentytwo
,
and although she had refused the hands of
numerous suitors, I had the happiness to gain an
interest in her heart. Her father at first made
some difficulty about consenting to our union. He
was rich and noble; but I was so too, and he at
length yielded.
We were somewhat more than a year
married
,
when by Monsieur d'Anville's interest I was
appointed to command the garrison at
New-Orleans
.
In proceeding there, I was instructed to
descend
the Ohio river, to take notes of the most
eligible situations for a chain of forts which the
French government then contemplated erecting,
so as to secure the possession of the whole
country
from the St. Lawrence to the Gulf of Mexico.
I set out with my wife, who was attended by
one female servant, in the autumn of 1734. We
were accompanied by six officers, who had also
received appointments at New-Orleans. We
advanced
on our journey, receiving assurances of
friendship from the different tribes on our route,
and without meeting with any accident, until we
reached the mouth of French Creek, when
unfortunately
our servant girl died, and my wife was
left without any female attendant. We felt this
accident the more acutely, as Maria, which was
my wife's name, was then far advanced in
pregnancy
,
and there was no possibility of replacing
our deceased servant with another from Canada
previous to the time her confinement was
expected
.
In this dilemma we heard of an Indian queen
residing on the bank of the Monongahela, not far
from our intended route, whose society, it was
thought, would be the most suitable the country
could afford to my wife under present circumstances.
We accordingly hastened there, and Alliquippa
received us with great friendship and kindness.
Maria, however, still felt so uncomfortable at
the prospect before her, with only savage women
to attend her, that it was with great joy we were
informed of some white women being in the vici
dian language, when I spoke in any other, they
conceived that there was something supernatural
about me, and began to reverence me in my
insanity
,
as a person under the effects of
prophetic
inspiration.
As this opinion of these savages had
probably
saved my life, I believed it best when I
recovered
,
not to undeceive them. I rather took
some pains to confirm them in it. At length my
desire to inquire after my child became so strong,
that I privately left the Iroquois with that
intention
.
I had proceeded eastward as far as the
Scioto river, when a party of the Mingoes seized
me. I, however, understood their language,
customs
,
and opinions too well, to feel much alarmed.
The delay in my enquiry after my child, that the
accident would occasion, grieved me most. My
appearance, both as to complexion and dress, was
altogether Indian, for I had, in order to avoid
danger on my journey, used their dyes in colouring
my skin. I also had resolved to avail myself of
the hint which the credulity of the Iroquois had
given me, if I should fall in with any of the
tribes, to pass upon them as a prophet. I
therefore
represented myself to the Mingoes as
origiginally
belonging to a remote nation of Canadian
Indians, and as frequently having had visions by
which I was instructed to go towards the Ohio in
order to teach the tribes in that quarter the will
of the Great Father.
It happened that these Mingoes, had, at that
time, some prisoners whom they had taken from
the Ottawas in a battle, and concerning whom they
were the next day to hold a council, which they
invited me to attend. I immediately determined
to try what I could do to save these prisoners, by
working on the belief which their conquerors
seemed to entertain of my prophetic mission, and
succeeded beyond my expectation.
I was in consequence of this incident,
inspired
with the resolution of remaining among the
Indians for the purpose of using the influence I
had thus acquired, in order to tame their
manners
,
and restrain their barbarous practices
towards
their enemies. With this view, I
solicited
adoption into the tribe of the Mingoes, and
their principal sachem, Fallakamsah, who had
lost a son in the late fight with the Ottawas,
received me with all the usual formalities, in his
stead.
My desire to make inquiry after my child,
however, still urged me to proceed eastward. I
informed Fallakamsah, that a vision had ordered
me to that quarter, and requested his cousent to
my journey. He at once gave it, observing:
Fallakamsah never will oppose the
revelations
of the Great Spirit
I came to Frazier's. He did not know me.
I saw my child, I kissed it, and pronouncing a
blessing upon its head, returned to the Mingoes,
for the purpose of extending my influence among
the Indian nations. I succeeded, and was soon
acknowledged by all the neighbouring tribes as
the undoubred prophet of Maneto.
In a few months, I again visited my daughter,
and formed the resolution of making a concealed
residence in her vicinity. I soon discovered this
cavern; it was naturally well suited for my
purpose
;
and with considerable labour and
perseverance
I rendered it still more so by
constructing
its entrance as you find it. It was whilst I was
employed in this undertaking, that my intercourse
with Frazier's family, in the character under which
they have ever since known me, commenced. In
a dell, a short distance from this place, I found
Paddy, who was then but a small boy, lying on the
ground crying piteously, with a fractured limb. I
carried him home, and by this means obtained an
unsuspicious introduction to the intimacy of the
family. Previous to this, my visits had been few,
and made cautiously, for I feared discovery from
the superior means which Gilbert and his wife
had of knowing me. I escaped such discovery,
however; for simple and undisguised themselves,
they placed implicit confidence in my story, and
looked upon me to be nothing more than I
pretended
.
I now became the instructor of my child, and
I felt happier than ever I thought this world could
make me, since it no longer contained her who
had given me the only true relish of existence I
had ever enjoyed. I had no desire to return to
society. My all was here, in the Wilderness.
My child was here, the last sad home of my wife
was here; here was the spotah, how often
have I watered it with my tears! where the
remains
of her once lovely form were interred.
Here, too, was the theatre of my usefulness to
humanity. By my authority over the minds of
the savages, I have had the happiness to save
many a human being from destruction. In
maintaining
that authority, however, I must not
conceal
that I was often obliged, in imitation of the
Catholic priesthood in former times, to work
miracles
;
in successfully effecting which I have
been long greatly assisted by the shrewdness and
dexterity of Paddy Frazier, who alone is in the
secret of my being an European, although he
knows nothing more of my history. It was by his
management that the eagle which was sacrificed
instead of Doctor Killbreath, at Le Buf, was
found so opportunely bound to the Rock at Lake
Erie, and numberless other instances
* 24
Tonnaleuka, or rather the Laird of Mackintosh,
was here interrupted by the hasty entrance of
Paddy Frazier, with information that a party of
French soldiers, commanded by De Villiers
himself
,
had just surrounded his father's house,
threatening
to burn it, and to carry the whole family
prisoners to Fort Du Quesne, in order to compel
them by torture to discover the place of Maria's
concealment.
Here was a new trial for Maria, and one which
would have overpowered her, for she felt the
most tender affection for those kind friends who
were thus plunged in calamity on her account,
had not Washington, instantly perceiving the state
of her feelings, addressed her:
Fear not, Miss Frazier, for your friends. I
have a force at hand sufficient to rescue them from
these tigers of the forest. My life for their
safety
.Father,
comfort thy daughter till we return.
And now, Captain Adderly, and you, Paddy
Frazier
,
follow me!
He hastened to the dingle where his troops
were encamped. Their gallant horses swept
the ground in full speed, and in a few minutes
the French party were attacked almost by
surprise
.
The greater number of them fled at
the first onset, and those who stood to give battle,
only stood to be slain or captured. De Villiers
who was a good soldier, did all in his power to
form his men, and prevent their flight. He
mounted his horse, galloped from place to place,
after his flying soldiers, to bring them back, and
those who did keep the field, were retained there
altogether by his exertions.
His exertions, however, were soon ended, for
Paddy Frazier having pointed him out to Charles
Adderly, who had never before seen him, Charles
flew towards him with the rapidity of an eagle
darting upon its prey. He came upon him
unawares
,
and so intense was the bitterness of his
rage against him, that his first impulse was to
strike him to the earth, but he checked his blow.
Turn, execrable villain! said he, and
defend
yourself.
In the name of the devil, who are you,
cried
De Villiers, as he turned towards his antagonist.
I am the avenger of Miss Frazier's wrongs,
said Charles. Knowest thou that name?
By heavens, then, you are her lover, I
suppose
the
destroyer of my bliss! Have at thee,
then! He hastily fired his pistol at Charles's
breast, but the horse of the latter that moment
raising his head, received the ball in his brain,
and fell to the earth, while Charles's sword plunged
into the neck of De Villiers's horse, which fell
at the same time.
In another instant, the combatants were on
thair feet, with their drawn swords in their hands,
frowning terribly at each other, in all the
desparation
of deadly rage. They gazed not, they
spoke not, but with fiery speed sprung to the
attack
.
The sparks flew rapidly from their
weapons
,
the motions of which could scarcely be
discerned
by the eye, while their sounds rang loudly
and fearfully upon the ear. But they did not long
continue to do so. By a sudden side stroke.
Charles dashed his opponent's sword from its
direction
,
as it was coming with a violent thrust
towards him, and ran his own through De
Villier's
neck, who fell to the earth groaning and
pouring forth a torrent of blood, which soon
terminated
his existence.
So perish all the foes to virtue, and the
oppressors
of innocence! cried Charles.
Maria
is avenged! I at length have done something
to deserve her!
By this time, the French had all either fled, or
submitted. Gilbert, and Archy Frazier, and
Doctor
Killbreath, who persisting in their refusal to
discover Maria's concealment, had, for the
purpose
of being carried prisoners to the fort, been
strongly pinioned, were now released, and Nelly
and Mrs. Killbreath, soon recovered from the
fright into which it is natural to suppose these
violent proceedings had thrown them. The
family
now hailed Washington as their deliver from
a ferocious and enraged enemy; and the ardour
with which Gilbert and Nelly expressed, in their
simple manner, their gratitude to God, and to
him as God's instrument for their preservation,
sunk deeply into his heart; and he resolved, if
possible, to persuade them immediately to leave
the Wilderness, where they could no longer
enjoy
safety, and make their residence for the future,
within the pale of civilization and law.
Gilbert assented. Ye hae, wi' the blessing
o' God, said he, delivered us frae the house of
bondage, an' wherefore should we no submit to
be guided by you to the land o' safety? for I trow
we canna' bide langer here, let us gang whar' we
will, unless we want to fa' into the pit o'
destruction
.
As Washington wished to proceed without more
delay to the Great Meadows, lest the French
should come out with their whole force from Du
Quesne to attack him, Charles hastened to the
cavern to inform Maria and her father of their
victory
,
and the consent which all their friends had
just given to accompany the troops to the
inhabited
country, and that the whole party now only
awaited their joining them to set out for Dunbar's
camp.
When Gilbert was informed that Tonnaleuka
was the father of Maria, he manifested the most
excessive joy. Noo, Nelly, said he, did I
no tell ye mony a time that the prophet could na'
be an Indian. He had aye owre muckle sense,
an' gifts sae like a Christian, that he couldna' ha'
talked better on what was richt an' wrang, an'
what was true religion, gin he had been born at
Maughrygowan.
An' I aye had a notion, observed Nelly,
that the French officer, wha was sae
affectionate
to his wife, wad yin day or ither come back to
look after his dochter.
Gilbert's horses were soon equipped for
transporting
his family from the Wilderness, where the
repose he had long enjoyed was now not to be
found, to the habitations of society, where, if he
should be occasionally annoyed by the clamour of
clashing interests, he should, at least, have the
shield of law to protect, and the forms of religion
to soothe his declining years.
The laird of Mackintosh, or, if the reader
pleases, Tonnaleuka, soon arrived with his
lovely
daughter at Frazier's, and the whole party
immediately
set off for the camp at the Great
Meadows
,
where they arrived in something less than
two days. The day following Dunbar struck his
tents, and the army, accompanied by our friends
of the Wilderness, proceeded by easy stages to
the fort at Will's Creek.
It was agreed upon by our party that they should
remain here until a messenger, who was
immediately
despatched with a letter from Charles to
his father, acquainting him with the state of his
affairs, his prospects, and his wishes, and
soliciting
his concurrence in themshould return with
an answer, which, from the complexion the case
had now assumed, it was not doubted would be
favourable. Although the army made but the
delay
of a few days at this place, Washington
gratified
his friends by remaining with them, until he
should witness the ceremony that was to secure
them to each other for ever.
To keep the reader no longer in suspense as to
the fate of these two faithful lovers, we hasten to
relate, that as soon as old Mr. Adderly received
Charles's letter, he proceeded to Will's Creek, in
order that he might, with his own eyes behold the
charmer of the Wilderness, who had so entirely
captivated his son's heart, as to cause him to
reject
some of the most splendid alliances in
Philadelphia
.
The first sight of Maria removed his
surprise at his son's preference, and the first
conversation
with her made him delighted with it, and
he took the earliest occasion to observe to
Charles,
It is no wonder, my son, that you became
enamoured of this sweet blossom of the forest,
and felt such an ardent desire to plant her in your
bosom, and carry her to a more congenial air. I
really give you credit for waiting with so much
patience during the slow process of obtaining my
consent.
I deserve no credit, replied Charles, on
that account. Whatever is due to my
forbearance
in not making her permaturely my own, and
depending on your indulgence afterwards for
pardon
,
is altogether owing to her. Even at this
moment
her consent to make me happy depends upon
yours.
Then mine you shall have without another
moment's delay, said his father. Secure her as
speedily as you can, Charles, for I really believe
that she is a prize, and may heaven make you long
happy together!
Thank you, thank you, my dear father!
cried Charles, and he could not avoid kissing the
old gentleman's hand with rapture.
I shall sign and seal articles, as to money
matters
,
with the Laird this very night, observed the
father.
As you please, for that, father, returned
Charles, with indifferencefor he, at that
moment
,
cared not a farthing for money matters.
In short, in a few days, the great object of all
Charles's desires was obtained. His Maria was
made his own; and the heart of Washington felt
comfort in beholding safety and happiness thus
secured
to her for whose fate he had long felt such a
warm and tender solicitude. He, the next day,
bade the bridal pair an affectionate farewell, and
returned to Mount Vernon; while they, with all
their friends, proceeded to Philadelphia. Charles's
mother was greatly delighted with her
daughter-in-law
.
The sweet rose of the Wilderness was
soon introduced into the first society in her
country's
capital, which she continued long to adorn;
and, notwithstanding the seclusion of her early
years, the natural excellence of her
understanding
,
and the judicious culture it had received from
her father, enabled her to acquit herself so well in
every department of social life, that she soon
acquired
,
and preserved through a long, useful, and
agreeable intercourse with the busy world, the
esteem and admiration of all who knew her.
Her father resided, cheerful and happy, under
the same roof with her, enjoying amidst the luxury
of ease and literary recreation, the satisfaction of
her presence, and that of her children, for about
twelve years, when he took his departure to join
his long-lamented wife in the regions of
immortality
.
With respect to Gilbert Frazier, the
benevolent
intentions of Washington to bestow upon him
a secure and comfortable residence in Virginia
were disappointed.
I thank you, colonel, said he, before the
illustrious
protector of himself and his family
departed
from Will's Creek; I thank you, frae the
very bottom o' my heart, for your kindness to me
an' mine; baith for what ye hae done, an' what
ye noo offer to do. But I canna gang to bide in
Virginia, whar' there are sae mony black-a-moors,
the very sicht of wham wad gar my flesh creep to
look at. But I'm as thankful as gin I took your
offer; an' I'll no forget, no, while my saul an'
body hang thegither, I'll ne'er forget, to pray for
blessings on your gude heart, as aften an'
sincerely
as I'll pray for my ain bairns
Charles soon discovering that Gilbert's wishes
were inclined towards his former residence on
the Juniata, purchased it for him; and the
kindhearted
protectors of Maria's infancy, passed on
one of the most engaging spots on that
picturesque
stream, the declining years of their lives
in as much tranquillity, and almost as much
contentment
as they would have done at
Maughrygowan
itself. Their son Archy, married shortly
after their re-settlement on this place, which he
continued to cultivate until the death of the old
people. It is said that he then sold this farm,
(Paddy having relinquished all claim to it) and
returned to his former residence in the
Wilderness
,
to which he had always felt a partiality, and
from the vicinity of which, the British arms had
long before expelled the enemy who had
occasioned
his friends so much trouble. Here some
casualty cut him off during the war of the
Revolution
,
after which the family disposed of the place,
and removed to the eastward of the Alleghany
mountains, but to what neighbourhood I have
been unable to ascertain. The place at Turtle
Creek, however, bears, in honour of its original
settler, the name of Frazier's Field to this day.
As this name commemorates that of the first
cultivator
of the Western Wilds, it is to be hoped
that no capricious, cold-hearted proprietor of the
spot, will ever attempt to give another; or if it
should be attempted, that the voice of society
will resist the ungenerous innovation.
The future fortunes of Doctor Killbreath, afford
nothing worth relating. He settled in the practice
of his profession in some town near his
father-in-law's
residence, where he remained during
life, and where it is probable that some of his
posterity remain to the present day.
The reader will have observed that our friend
Peter M'Fall does not appear on the scene from
the time he returned to Philadelphia, after the
battle of Fort Necessity. The reason was this.
Shortly after his return to the city, he met with
an Irish sea captain whose ship was about to sail
for Cork. By the assistance of a few kindly
glasses of grog, this captain suceeded in
persuading
Peter that there could be no harm in taking a
trip across the Atlantic with him so see old Ireland
once more, because it was as plain as the
mizenmast
,
that he could at any time put his foot on
board of a ship that would bring him back to his
master, when he choosed to do so. Peter
accordingly
set sail for Cork; but he no sooner reached that
port, than the British navy unfortunately
happening
at the time to be rather short of hands,
he was hurried without his consent being asked,
on board of a king's ship, which, although she
shortly afterwards sailed for America, she was
so unaccomodating as not to land him there.
At length, by Peter's assistance, Great Britain
having conquered her enemies, she very
generously
let him go about his business. He
returned
to Philadelphia, and was retaken into
Charles's service; several months after which,
Vol. II. 25
in conseqtence of a series of events which we
have not time to relate, he happened to see the
fair Esther Gist, tripping along the streets. Och!
his heart again warmed to her; he saluted her
slyly
,
and put the question to her so
nately
that they
weremarried. He, and his wife, lived very
comfortably
together to a good old age, in Charles
Adderly's
service.
As to Paddy Frazier, about the time that his
father re-entered upon the Juniata farm, he
established
himself as a merchant in the town of
Carlisle, in the vicinity. He continued this
business
very prosperously, till the winter of 1776,
when, hearing of the distresses under which the
army of his favourite Washington at that trying
crisis laboured, he abandoned his merchandise,
collected about twenty smart fellows of the
neighbourhood
,
well skilled in the use of the rifle, put
himself at their head, and joined the hero of
his country, about three days before the glorious
attack upon Trenton, which turned the scale of
the war in favour of the friends of freedom.
It would be tedious to recount the
multiplicity
of exploits performed by this sagacious
and intrepid partisan and devoted follower of
Washington, during the remainder of that
memorable
war. Washington, who well knew both the
merits and defects of his character, kept him in
constant employment at the head of scouting,
foraging, manuvering, and harassing parties,
for managing which, his genius was exactly
suited
;
but he never elevated him to any important
stationary command, as he was aware that such a
situation would neither answer his inclination nor
his talents, so well as one less dignified, but
requiring
more promptitude and activity. At length,
having frequently received the thanks of his
beloved
commander, for the numerous and
important
services he had rendered his country during
her tremendous struggle for national existence,
he fell, bravely performing his duty, at the very
close of that struggle, greatly lamented by him
who best knew how to appreciate the utility of
his active career. This happened during the
attack
upon the British lines at Yorktown. He was
leading on his men, who had on that occasion
exchanged their rifles for muskets and bayonets,
to storm one of the British redoubts, when he
received a ball in his breast. He staggered and
fell. His party would have retired to carry him
off; but waving his hand, he cried
Never mind me, my lads! push onyou know
your duty.
Shortly before he expired, he heard that the
redoubt
was taken. Carry me there, said he,
and let me die in it. He was obeyed, and laid
on a British mattress. In a few minutes he felt the
hand of death upon him.
Tell Washington, said he to the bystanders,
that I die happy, for I die victorious, the death
of a patriot soldier, worthy of having been his
follower
!
and he expired.
When this message was conveyed to the
immortal
chief, now leading on his conquering legions to
their last and most glorious victory, he heaved a
sigh, the memory of his youthful days, the image
of the sweet rose of
The Wilderness
, with
whom the idea of the deceased soldier was so
nearly
connected, came, like an April sun, with
melting
influence, upon his soul, and he briefly said
Alas! a brave man is cut off in his prime!
but he mentally addedso were my sweetest
hopes once extinguished!
The extinction of those youthful hopes of
mutual
affection and happiness in the possession of her
whom he had loved with a fervour almost, perhaps
altogether, beyond example, to which the father of
his country here alluded, produced, indeed, upon
his mind an effect which continued during the
whole of his long and illustrious life. Never,
after
a dissapointment so deeply impressive upon
his heart, and under which nothing but the strong
sense of duty which he possessed in so remarkable
a degree could have supported him, did he expect
again to entertain the same feeling for female
excellence
,
or enjoy the same delight in the
contemplation
of female charms. To no woman could he
ever again expect to devote his affections so
entirely
and so rapturously. Hence he could spare
more of his thoughts to the graver interests of
mankind
,
he could devote more of his affections to
his country; and since the intensity of love had
now become exhausted from within his soul, he
resolved to cherish patriotism as the passion from
which, alone, he could derive the purest, the
most manly, the most rational, and the most
exalted
delight. He never, it is true, forgot Maria,
and the sweet feeling she had once excited in his
bosom; but his country, and her welfare, were, for
the future, the chief objects of his affection. Her
joy should be his joy, her misery should be his
misery, and for her benefit should he exercise the
whole force of his powerful understanding, the
full energies of his indefatigable perseverance,
his invincible courage, and his pre-eminent
wisdom
.
His heart having suffered much, he became
serious, and contemplative, even in the days of his
youth; but he had done his duty, and hence he was
blest with the consciousness of self-approbation, and
with the possession of a magnanimous firmness, an
independence, and a fearlessness in all his actions
and intercourse with the world. Having parted with
the only object that could engross his whole
affections
,
and being naturally free from every close and
selfish feeling, his heart regarded all men as his
brothers, it cherished his country as his only
mistress
,
and hearkened to his duty as his only
master
.
In short, from the day on which it was
forced
to abandon the tender hopes of a youthful and
enthusiastic love, it would be impossible to find an
example of human nature having produced a heart
more purely and entirely devoted to all the calls of
philanthropy, patriotism and duty, and productive
of actions more conducive to the benefit of the
world, than the heart of
Washington
.
THE END.Dear Charles,
My persuading you to submit, at this time,
to a residence in a dark subterraneous cell, is a
proof how anxious I am for your safety. You
will, no doubt, feel your situation lonely and
disagreeable
;
but I hope the necessity for it will not
be of long continuance; and, in the meanwhile,
in order to relieve its tediousness as much as
possible
,
I shall send you a supply of such books as I
possess, best suited for your entertainment. You
may be also assured, that our family will let you
want for nothing in their power to afford you
comfort.
Oh, Charles! how little are the men and
women
of society aware of the dangers and
calamities
that often visit the most remote and secluded
condition! How have their philosophers and their
poets praised, in strains of enthusaism and
rapture
,
the virtue, the tranquillity, and the
happiness
,
to be found in retirement! Ah! they
appear
to forget that human passions, and, therefore,
human crimes and human miseries, are ever, in
such places, more violent and fierce, because
more unrestrained and unmodified by the salutary
customs and institutions of society!
But, Charles, the object of my writing to you,
is to encourage you to an exertion of patience in
your present solitude, and not to magnify the evils
to which it is exposed, by making contrasts, for
which my inexperience renders me incompetent.
But these times of calamity, I trust, will not
always last. Providence will yet moderate the
storm, and grant this Wilderness a restoration of
that calm which it once enjoyed. Till then, let
us shelter ourselves, as much as possible, from the
fury of the times, and be content with privations,
if we can only thereby secure safety. I am aware
that this advice will not be relished by your
adventurous
spirit; but it is because I dread that
spirit, fearless and rash as I know it to be, leading
you into fresh dangers, that I am so solicitous for
your present confinement. If it will in any degree
enable you to support that confinement, I have
here no hesitation to repeat the assurance, which
you already have, of the unalterable nature of my
affection for you.
Let me be assured in return, that you will
bear your present lot without repining, and you
will contribute much to my ease of mind;and,
that heaven may protect you, and hasten over
these times of danger and distress, is the fervent
prayer of your
Maria
.We, the officers of the Virginia regiment, are
highly sensible of the particular mark of
distinction
with which you have honoured us in
returning
your thanks for our behaviour in the late
action
;
and cannot help testifying our grateful
acknowledgments
for your high sense of what we
shall always esteem a duty to our country and the
best of kings.
Favoured with your regard, we shall
zealously
endeavour to deserve your applause, and by
our future actions strive to convince the
worshipful
house of burgesses how much we esteem their
approbation, and, as it ought to be, regard it as
the voice of our country.
Signed for the whole corps,
GEO. WASHINGTON.
[1]
[1]
See Marshall's Life of Washington.THOMAS ADDERLY, Esq.
Dear Sir
The progress we have made in the
transaction, in which your son and my niece were
to be the parties disposed of, had induced me to
hope for a speedy and final settlement of the
affair
;
but I am sorry to say, that owing to some
misadventure on the part of your son, the
bargain
is likely to fail on your side. My niece,
which was the part of the concern for which I
stood engaged, is still substantial and ready for
delivery
,
when the equivalent shall be forthcoming,
and the demand made.
Your son, it appears, after having, by much
management, embezzled the esteem or love, or
heart, or whatever you women's-men choose to
call it, of my niece, has become a defaulter and
decamped from the premises, leaving her in a
very destitute and forlorn state. She will not
leave her own chamber; and as she scarcely makes
use of an infant's allowance of nourishment, I
fear that her health will give way, if it has not
already
done so, under the pressure of this
unexpected
shock.
As the head and principal manager of the firm
from whose deficiency in the stock of proper
conduct
,
our present embarrassments have arisen, I
call upon you, as you value the honour and
standing
of your establishment, as well as the credit
and prosperity of ours, to make all exertions to
procure the needful, and by promptly acquitting
yourselves of your obligations, relieve us out of
our present distresses.
Your due attention to these matters, is
earnestly
requested at as early a day as you can
command
.
I am, with proper consideration, your most
obedient
servant,
Robt. Walworth
.